Joe Guy ok smart ass
Joe Guy well it's hard for him to keep his word when the Democrats keep hindering everything he does.
Joe Guy I call bullshit on what u said it's TRUE u just have to see through it all the liberal B.S
Prisons already have walls. Put trump behind one
Joe Guy That's why I support Trump he is not a politician
Tim Countryman have you ever been to Europe??? I have its actually super nice there nothing close to the shithole that we are turning into
Ry Burzynski but it's ok to send 10.6 billion dollars to Central America and south Mexico ? Where the democrats logic behind that ? I'd love to hear it...and since someone bound to ask "when did that happen?" , It was Dec.18 2018...
Joseph Angel Alvarado yes Wall!
Joe Guy he has brains and people and money...it is not a sin. I don't work hard labor either, doesn't mean a thing...
Prisons already have walls. Put trump behind one
https://www.callmycongress.com/callmycongress.com
Moni Brooks For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants.   There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Moni Brooks For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants for years, without even producing ANYTHING!!!  There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Moni Brooks Troll
Moni Brooks No wall
Joe Guy he has brains and people and money...it is not a sin. I don't work hard labor either, doesn't mean a thing...
Moni Brooks Pay die it Low Minded Trumpee  Go
You are an idiot!  Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Ha! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Tell that to the CBP officer who can’t pay rent. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment. Those USSS agents that guard Trump and put their lives on the line everyday are working for free as is the Coast Guard and more! Trump could care less! This is a crisis caused by the liar in the WH.
Chris George keep laughing! Sense of humor is good! You're going to need that sense of humor in the days to come. In fact, it will be your only comfort. Keep smiling!
Chris George we lose because you post something from Wikipedia LOL  Go have your milk and cookies and go to bed. Just go night night.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Amy Johnson I guess the Democrats need to approve the funding then, since they care so much about the Americans.
Moni Brooks More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
Moni Brooks No wall
Mark Kroeckel they're still choking on his success and they will continue to choke on his success because nothing they can say or do will erase the legacy of Barack Hussein Obama the best American president that we have ever had. And what happened in the Supreme Court today is going to seal Donald Trump's fate. #moneytrail #neverlies  https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html

Moni Brooks build the wall around the white house
Moni Brooks More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
nice Julie. I luv it!
Jodi Daves we must somehow purge this country of all these lunitics.  they are going to destroy us if we dont
https://www.facebook.com/1491272185/posts/10208315024381848/
Jamie Bennett why not ?
Naomi Boyer why not ?
https://www.facebook.com/reallyamerican/photos/a.942157972506564/2024361984286152/?type=3&eid=ARCI6g9Yxp4ffU-3WGhJJqWr4dU7Hp3dQNQGIHHmrZ5g4k2yk50Cw5kW9tyoMqA3o-4K8PMH9HNeT8H_&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARAXFe7eB9oeIc90Es0ZjoUnsZcbDDrqx1OMk-1LNLLfisk4KAy-HBTxrvWbVDplgRi4SSrZeWsDMvQ4IodFzIpVlzCBLwHrl2XxIH0WcXMoAgR30DcthX-aVIkAerciIDARtB0WWmWD6xeO7I58fYBPQNsVxpAqrPGggRoMVH0qF-YUvIkg5QARGl1QcLmAwqzrH8ce-hLb9uApCxprI2P4ktayeQEm429ZPRYJcsH71LbAEJ4FeHsG1nJHMv2vARGO3PfXN-zoLsAup5t_Jc37zYSkOY97C-CzcW-s-s9hzyNZMm1hMdMDCtAMpco4axJykZUMSNcVc6I6OTisPHvcdhhqxkANr5f_1uyzuhSMvyUu-fTK2IQsA7a0P3zRkP57pluQ41tZUt6idnRQCNFVP5RxIx-3uPf2sYh9ADZlPmd_XDrmMOaGjcU7LanEdMzn3dcaLckhYfR7O6dmJI_2Biwv-KaWtaizJp_HyPacs4EGytqbR1T7pwRotHfusl7AtejX66PTEnub_BeZCA&__tn__=EEHH-R
Moni Brooks build the wall around the white house
Ry Burzynski if you want money to help our needy then tell our govt to stop giving billions to other countries
https://www.facebook.com/reallyamerican/photos/a.942157972506564/2024361984286152/?type=3&eid=ARCI6g9Yxp4ffU-3WGhJJqWr4dU7Hp3dQNQGIHHmrZ5g4k2yk50Cw5kW9tyoMqA3o-4K8PMH9HNeT8H_&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARAXFe7eB9oeIc90Es0ZjoUnsZcbDDrqx1OMk-1LNLLfisk4KAy-HBTxrvWbVDplgRi4SSrZeWsDMvQ4IodFzIpVlzCBLwHrl2XxIH0WcXMoAgR30DcthX-aVIkAerciIDARtB0WWmWD6xeO7I58fYBPQNsVxpAqrPGggRoMVH0qF-YUvIkg5QARGl1QcLmAwqzrH8ce-hLb9uApCxprI2P4ktayeQEm429ZPRYJcsH71LbAEJ4FeHsG1nJHMv2vARGO3PfXN-zoLsAup5t_Jc37zYSkOY97C-CzcW-s-s9hzyNZMm1hMdMDCtAMpco4axJykZUMSNcVc6I6OTisPHvcdhhqxkANr5f_1uyzuhSMvyUu-fTK2IQsA7a0P3zRkP57pluQ41tZUt6idnRQCNFVP5RxIx-3uPf2sYh9ADZlPmd_XDrmMOaGjcU7LanEdMzn3dcaLckhYfR7O6dmJI_2Biwv-KaWtaizJp_HyPacs4EGytqbR1T7pwRotHfusl7AtejX66PTEnub_BeZCA&__tn__=EEHH-R
Janet Braden Duvall https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2019/01/08/facts-donald-trumps-border-wall-address-nation-immigration-shutdown-column/2503981002/?fbclid=IwAR0UzeGw36ORHDS_oljWbpKMChMi1NBJiJoS1zqJ5YhG2iW3SONjqh9oCAM
Ellis Island didn't require a wall but millions of LEGAL immigrants came to the United States through it. LEGAL being the keyword.
Why?
Jamie Bennett So we can stop people who hate us from walking in, after that we can figure out what to do with the people that hate us who are already here .
Why?
Good your not from America because he don't want you here.
Paul Dahm no need to be an AH fella...
Trump. Just because you were able to ask your parents for money or have the Saudi Government bail you out of your bankruptcies do most hardworking Americans have that luxury. They were not born with a silver spoon in their mouth....
Eric Wroblewski thank you
Because he can. And will. 😉
Gabby Igwe I will when #45 does. Until then, it is a vital issue.
Gabby Igwe
you are correct sir
Fisher Solorzano Huaman aww good for u. A person who has never sinned.
Albert Kojo Kyekye shut up fool
Eric Wroblewski thank you
Baron Von Brztekkenburg Stupid CNN watching troll
Camille Ortiz Marroquin Democrats are the perverts.
Tanya Pittman Stop the race card when vital issues are discussed.
Albert Kojo Kyekye you can have him ruin your ruined country!
Albert Kojo Kyekye shut up fool
Francine Cartel its sad but he will survive it.
Shut your face ,,ass face ,
Thank  you  for   Noticing, we love  him
Agree, does what he promises,  not like the lying bastards mps in the uk
George Mendes  lol all you proved with that made up list , is that you know the months of the year in order! Lol Good for you! I have a gold star sticker for you!!
Vince Belardino you aren't really going to wait for little Miss Wendy to message you with facts, are you! 😄
Mike Watkins Ignorance suits you.
AW Sylwester The answers are YES.  Free elections?  Really?  You REALLY went there?  YOU are as ignorant as they come.  Go drink more of the Hillary Obama Koolaide !!!!
Shut your face ,,ass face ,
Camille Ortiz Marroquin Explain, bullet points please.
Donna Sease I agree
Clayton Sauer you must have him mistakened for your kin
Albert Kojo Kyekye me 2!! America should stand up for this brave man as he takes on the most corrupt warmongering political monsters on Earth.
Baron Von Brztekkenburg He's not a Russian 🤦‍♀️
Albert Kojo Kyekye agree
George Mendes dumb ass liberal.
Albert Kojo Kyekye Democrats care about illegals more then citizens. Truth.
Linda Hopkins McIntyre clearly, YOU, are not informed.
Wendy Winett Costello what a dumbass comment un American 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Baron Von Brztekkenburg He's not a Russian 🤦‍♀️
George Mendes if the next person that dies by heroine overdose or illegal alien violence is in your family it might occur to you what a dumb@$$ ya are ~ ignorant fool!
Jim Borecky
yes Ricky Wallace. We all want immigrants, but we want them to come in property and go through the proper channels. There’s a reason immigrants sneak into America illegally. It’s because they are criminals or they only want to abuse our Federal Welfare program. Legitimate immigrants will go through the proper process and become very welcome American citizens.
Wendy Winett Costello what a dumbass comment un American 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
https://www.theroot.com/10-things-they-wont-tell-you-about-the-border-wall-1831558139
George Mendes stop lying.... There is a problem on the border and you know it
Mollie Cox you should stfu
Camille Ortiz Marroquin Access Hollywood 😂😂😂
its the truth ! Where was the wall, When he was first elected !
at least you admit you are from another country, many comments on here do not admit it.
Albert Kojo Kyekye he is
Camille Ortiz Marroquin yes he did
Ricky Wallace says who??? Not born here??? Not worthy of a response... good luck
Ricky Wallace your sad, and who gives you the right to say a person doesn't have the right to here,  really! Dumbass
Jay Vaughn go to San Diego and they will tell your drunk, they say your stupid, go see for yourself !
Bren Butler may i have some of what your smoking@
Sandie Harris and neither is yours !
rising share of unauthorized immigrants have lived in the U.S. for more than a decade. About two-thirds (66%) of unauthorized immigrant adults in 2016 had been in the U.S. more than 10 years, compared with 41% in 2007. A declining share of unauthorized immigrants have lived in the U.S. for less than five years – 18% of adults in 2016, compared with 30% in 2007. In 2016, unauthorized immigrant adults had lived in the U.S. for a median of 14.8 years, meaning that half had been in the country at least that long. To learn more: Explore unauthorized immigrant population trends for states, birth countries and regions. Note: This post was originally published on Nov. 18, 2014, and has been updated. TOPICS: UNAUTHORIZED IMMIGRATION, IMMIGRATION TRENDS, GLOBAL MIGRATION
All you people think trump is for you not so he is for his self!!!!!!!!
THE GREAT WALL
January 2017 - Trump inaugurated - GOP majorities in both houses of Congress January 2017 Wall not an emergency February 2017 Wall not an emergency March 2017 Wall not an emergency April 2017 Wall not an emergency May 2017 Wall not an emergency June 2017 Wall not an emergency July 2017 Wall not an emergency August 2017 Wall not an emergency September 2017 Wall not an emergency October 2017 Wall not an emergency November 2017 Wall not an emergency December 2017 Wall not an emergency January 2018 Wall not an emergency February 2018 Wall not an emergency March 2018 Wall not an emergency April 2018 Wall not an emergency May 2018 Wall not an emergency June 2018 Wall not an emergency July 2018 Wall not an emergency August 2018 Wall not an emergency September 2018 Wall not an emergency October 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Democratic majority elected in House January 2019  EMERGENCY  Fact: Border apprehensions are at a 45 year low.  There is no crisis at our border. It's fake news.
Russell Lehr why don’t you leave
Dolly Paez obviously you have no idea what’s going on
Enio Caldeira idiot
George Mendes your lying, where are you really from
Manuel Ruiz you stfu! And get informed. Trump not only admitted it, he bragged about it on national tv to a reporter with Access Hollywood. It has been shown many times. It is “live” with Trump and he is BRAGGING about it. Get informed.
George Mendes why,that Mexican rat dirt weed not working for ya anymore.  Put the crack pipe down
Sylwia M Siwiak wow, you've got it all figured out. Keep drinking the dumacrats coolaide. One more idiot to weed out.
George Mendes and where is it you live near the boarder?
Camille Ortiz Marroquin Calm down or can you not be civil your president Trump is more civil than you could ever wish to be at this rate if you are going to post statements or smack remember to include the proof please have a blessed day!
Albert Kojo Kyekye, you like Dictators??? You are one dumb Mfkr!
Baron Von Brztekkenburg  So your finger pointing up to your name you’re saying you a Russian troll.  You’re more like dough boy troll. 🤪🤪🤪🤪
Enio Caldeira illegal troll alert
George Mendes  no you are
Camille Ortiz Marroquin  your such an idiot, a hater of Donald Trump's good fortune!! Keep drinking the dumacrats coolaide.
Ass
John Baron screw You Snowflake!!
George Mendes  no you are
Wendy Winett Costello what tamper.  The wall?    Nah hes doing for the American people
Camille Ortiz Marroquin STFU you scab encrusted cockpocket...
Wendy Winett Costello Inform yourself
Please Albert take him!!!
Scott Demore yes there is- a sober Trump.
Scott Demore yes, a sober Trump.
Art Gage congratulations invite Trump to join you there.
John Baron disgusting disrespect...just like your pervert Trump.
Camille Ortiz Marroquin oh ffs go sit down...
Wendy Winett Costello Inform yourself
Ben L Anderson Trump admits, brags about, “grabbing” women’s privates. You respect that?
Klaus Birk Jensen especially Russians
Debbie Goins  Sweetheart,  yes”WE” do ... if he is not impeached first, “WE” will see to it that Trump is a one term President. Count on it.
He will very likely be impeached.
Rose Laessig crude,  very Republican.
Marie Adame what about”Mexico will pay for it?” Another Trump lie.
Marie Adame “Hell” is a pervert, business crook, molester of women as the US President....
Julian York delusion much lol?
A president who would deliberately hurl his country into such dangerous disorder in a fit of temper over his desire to appease white supremacy is not fit to hold the office, and is a menace to the nation and the world.
Yoyre either insane, or don't know the whole story.
Camille Ortiz Marroquin no WE DON"T sweetheart!!
Bethany Kessel on what?
Retha Ricketts idiot, those are not Obama's words, but Liar in Chief's!
What about his commitment “Mexico will pay for the wall.” Another Trump lie.
Cindy Schmucker Yoder No, call Trump & remind him of his promise “Mexico will pay for the wall.” Trump lied to America.
Sylwia M Siwiak yeah like your party has good character? Look at all the dead people around the Clintons it’s not a coincidence. Look at Schumer and Nancy the two little rats behind the podium yesterday they look like cornered rats scared to death who didn’t respond to one thing the president said because those are facts the morons can’t dispute, They didn’t respond to the country’s security or the wall they supported in the past! they change their minds like they change the freaking underwear they stick their finger up their asses and see how the wind is blowing and that’s how they vote, President Trump has done nothing but good for this nation bringing back jobs that dumbass Obama swore we’re gone forever, unemployment at its lowest, Economy at its best, military strong, you stupid idiots are so naïve and you listen to the idiots on CNN like a little freaking zombies you don’t have a brain in your head to think for yourself. The only only demons Are democrats and the closet  themselves Republicans like mitt Romney, former people like McCain, flaker corker and others who don’t support this nation! No one didn’t minded went oh bummer signed all his edits like if he was the king because he couldn’t get it passed tin Congress so he just signed legislation that was fine. You didn’t mind when he closed down the government to pass a shitty ass healthcare bill Nobody can afford no not, not a sound from the crickets in the media or the dumbass sheep  followers. Face it you are stupid!
Cindy Schmucker Yoder no, call the White House & remind Trump of his lie that “Mexico will pay for the wall.”
Marie Adame Trump is demented, cheats in business, molests women & brags about it, peers at little girls dressing for his “pageants” partners with a Russian enemy of America to interfere in fixing our election-  some of his perversions. UNFIT.
Derek Lisa Harris I dought that BIGGLEY
Timothy David Cannon how can he do something good it don't matter what he does democrats are putting him down before he can do anything.
the dems need to be eliminated from any kind of decisions as they are nothing but immoral and corrupt...…..we the people deserve better.
John Baron  that's really getting old man. The wall pays for itself by keeping illegals off our welfare system.
Diane Wade lol fuk off Diane
Timothy David Cannon Keep dreaming flake that spot is taken by number 1 obummer and number two Carter!
Albert Kojo Kyekye you have a right to express your opinion ....America protects that right. We all here  have that right. Trump is simply unfit to be America’s President...he is an unstable, crude, childish, unqualified man without qualification s necessary to lead this great country. Also,  he has partnered with Putin, an enemy to America. We need a rational loyal American as our leader. Trump is not.
Albert Kojo Kyekye you have a right to express your opinion ....America protects that right. We all here  have that right. Trump is simply unfit to be America’s President...he is an unstable, crude, childish, unqualified man without qualification s necessary to lead this great country. Also,  he has partnered with Putin, an enemy to America. We need a rational loyal American as our leader. Trump is not.
Albert Kojo Kyekye  please stay there we have too many morons already....
I guess you haven't read too many books
moron #2
Diane Wade lol fuk off Diane
Marian Jones you should take your own advice
Albert Kojo Kyekye please take him, we make it a gift to you!
John Baron
Albert Kojo Kyekye good opinion
Lmao wow okay...
Unless something drastically changes he will go down as top 5 worst all time. He's already there but he has time to do something good
Kevin Gramble God bless you
Albert Kojo Kyekye take him
Albert Kojo Kyekye you can say that again you are so right.
John Baron not seeing facts from you John!
Johnny Ripps You would have fit right into the Nazi party. You could have helped make anti-Jewish films for schoolchildren.
Albert Kojo Kyekye take him
Peggy Adams he can speak on it
Albert Kojo Kyekye you really should stfu
Thank you Albert, you are a smart man! I like him too!!! Great President!!!
https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10215860589402465&set=a.1264115717818&type=3&eid=ARA3aE4lnepZ10qxmi1hMMCRQV_LSadC7RJ3WiywKbTWOtL_bHrqTZrLlJb96sz-qtgyaJL5k4V53OC0
You can't argue with James  Bond.  https://www.facebook.com/500244993324344/photos/a.500246376657539/2487723154576508/?type=3&eid=ARBe3KweyTo_Q0bMiboKtbbu7ckFjXEzQms7xympWxxr7f5Ak-rCevbizh4VT8f6rDEOIkus_8iTUMsG&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARACwzcqokDw-RHcy1-o7eC_gNeEaz-5e7KI9T_n7dYl-dTw0ZP4YFfxQ7t6_HR4LKrp-s2jFuq9gz6c3OhwACWPblqT1W-FfaB71fMat_tMvaKIwpXgQ8ma2TriQ4bFuRdSkzGgvhUTvnEbMm6hhffmo20e26KEtdZK6-db11JzfANhLUyJDUXfM3xqjj9FP2zEQBpC6MhVV9tpeCOxXGblhA4HR36atcM4sn8QJRP-CUQn4Ft9w_Ou6vINCOyP8fVy7dNzMtB14giiz6cnTssBp6K0VvtNrEaFjH0mH8RJS-y3qir80W07VSqj870Nul5j1hOdfrYEs31ycBpQ&__tn__=EHH-R
Albert Kojo Kyekye stay in your lane!
stay where you are.
Joanne Christie you're ate up you can't be that stupid
I couldn't agree more ❤Trump❤
Kevin Roadcap pretty sure i remember fox news doing the same thing to one certain president cant remember who though 😂😂 your just as bad as liberals are
Elisa Farina DiCarlo 💩
Joanne Christie 💩
You are right, but darkness does not like the way President Trump's light shines.
Candy Jeffers thank you
Albert Kojo Kyekye STFU and stop kissing ass the wall is meant to keep Africans out as well you don't get a pass for kissing ass
It is meant to keep all illegals out, come in the right way, their are laws in place, look up illegal, if you don't know the difference.
Albert Kojo Kyekye  You are not alone. Many people from other countries like Trump; North Koreans, Saudi’s and Russians-just to mention a few
Karen Cadden All LIES!!
Dolly Paez maybe you need to check your sources to what you're reading.
Joanne Christie, i know for a fact when i have watched the president give a speach, and the next day cnn turns around what he says, to be a bought off democratic network. Use your eyes and ears, not some b.s. facts check the democrats have put in place...
Susan Stalla Sure he would if he did followed the proper immigration procedures. #justcantbustin
DiCarlo apparently neither do you!
Albert Kojo Kyekye He's a joke
I think each country needs a president like mr. Trump !!
Ilene R Mindlin Dementia,  like what all the Congress people have who voted to fund border security and a wall just a couple of years ago?  That kind of Dementia?
Elisa Farina DiCarlo  neither do you so shut up.
Albert Kojo Kyekye He's a joke
Ilene R Mindlin No where near losing.
Brenda Childress how the F do you know that! !!! Fox news.  Lol lol lol lol lol
Teresa Smith lol lol lol lol lol. Idiot
John Baron absolutely. He said he could feel for them 😂😂😂. He never had to work I mean real work In His life , so how could he feel for them. He was a millionaire by age 8 thanks to his corrupt daddy. The whole family was and is corrupt.
My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Elisa Farina DiCarlo “What’s going on here” is that we have a sitting President who actually CARES about OUR country. I don’t know who you are or where you came from, but if you don’t like the upturns we have had, then you are more than welcome and free to leave. I’m sick to death of liberal BS, and those who “think” they are the future of the USA. This mentality is what is killing it to begin with. Just go.
Leigh Miller well said, its truly a shame that so many chose to allow sloppy media to interfere with common sense and independent thought.

James Hunt nothin' worse than a drunk Hillary
Albert Kojo Kyekye u are nothing but a house negro albert kojo...
My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Jim Coleman when they going to do this
Dolly Paez learn how to speak English. You're a baffoon
Albert Kojo Kyekye u are nothing but a house negro albert kojo...
Deborah Hathaway King you’re sad that I’m right
Ken Whitinger yep 👍 try telling them this they don’t have the vote!!! Than they say  nope not true fake news!!! O this ?? The different between people come in illegally and asylum-seekers!!! Man you got your work cut out!!! For sure!!!
Bot identified
Shawn Peterson  just like you , he had an opinion!
Same here. Love from Australia 🇦🇺
You’re fricking stupid
Chris Colehouse omg Chris the illegal Mexicans are not coming in like before !! Says homeland security!!! What we have are Asylum Seeker!! Do you know the deferents!!! Thinking not! Instead of wasting your time listening to that orange buffoon read!!! Omg !!
George Mendes so you probably came over illegally near your border and just Are squatting!!
Awwwwwe, sorry Hazel, did you want Trump to “grab you by the pus_y???”  Sorry, his words, not mine.
Glen Butler meth dealer Gus
Anne Garcia right but we are not talking about Democrats, Biden, Gore, Obama or Hillary!
The same from Denmark, Usa have a President whit bolls, the best President ever <3
Timothy Kershner lol
Tommy Marsh If that Airhead AOC can get elected with her dumb ass bullshit, then so can i.
It is time for a rise up of the American People or for them to just continue to lay down and let thier asses get run over by the likes of Ocasio Cortez, Pelosi and Chuck the Schmuck!
Albert Kojo Kyekye thats
Albert Kojo Kyekye Dems lose it when a black man likes Trump haha. Good on you Albert, stand strong against the hypocritical hate of the Left.
Maik Schrank Yes, pay more taxes, support more illegals. I think not
Alanna Phizacklea You have to stay dizzy with a mind like yours.
Richard Hawkins...It takes stupid to know stupid.
That’s because you’re a fucking dipshit.
Albert Kojo Kyekye For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants.   There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Albert Kojo Kyekye thank you though you should not waste your time. There are too many bigots that are so simple minded that they cannot even recognize their own bigotry. In our country, we have become too soft, so there is a lot more disrespect for ones self and for others then the rest of the world believes. The worst part is their hubris prevents them from seeing it and/or admitting it. I wish both the liberals and conservatives would see that their beat interest is to genuinely work in our best intereat, and not for some stupid agenda or for money or corporate power. Its sad. But that is the country we of the U.S. live in today. Welcome to Corporate America!
Albert kojo kyekye who the F are you to say he the Best
Albert Kojo Kyekye Stop showing your face now we now wich 45 cult member from Africa is using that dating site to con poor and lonely white 45 female cult members out of their hillbilly inheritance.
John Baron : the Nancy Pelosi who can’t construct a sentence moron. This is what dementia looks like. https://www.facebook.com/182919686769/posts/10155944343106770/
Michelle Davidson they are all Russian.  You're Russian. I'm Russian.  If anyone disagrees with this,  it's prob cause you're Russian too.
Carol Loveland  what the hell you talking about if Michael Obama is a man then First lady Trump is a Transgender Bitch
Albert Kojo Kyekye, come here Trump will happily deport you..and if you're not deported you'll pay double In health care..and live paycheck to paycheck...
Art Gage ...he is a troll.   I guess the Democrats won't text him so he has to look elsewhere.
Albert Kojo Kyekye thank you,
Carol Loveland  what the hell you talking about if Michael Obama is a man then First lady Trump is a Transgender Bitch
Albert Kojo Kyekye 🤦🏻‍♀️🤦🏻‍♀️
John Baron proof please
Albert Kojo Kyekye but what did he do though?!?!? What did he do??
John Baron if that’s your name!
Sam Jacob Yani Victor Yannick Artur goude
Hes a mggot
Either is Putin lol
Albert Kojo Kyekye  Russian Troll !
John Baron if that’s your name!
Albert Kojo Kyekye  bot
Cindy Nelson,DITTO!
Albert Kojo Kyekye  Russian Troll !
https://m.dailykos.com/stories/2019/1/6/1824075/-Trump-s-Steel-Slats-Wall-Would-Cost-100-Billion-Steel-is-39-Bil-FOB-the-Mill-Land-Over-32-Bil
Albert Kojo Kyekye atukoo tukoo tukoo, what's does that mean in English m
Which part of:  "Donald Trump is a lying piece of garbage" were you too stupid to comprehend?  https://youtu.be/ud0f3eJTo54
Albert Kojo Kyekye Amen
Jay Bilong Please don't presume to speak for me or anyone but yourself.
Martha Dillon  you're from California. Don't expect your elevator goes to the top floor. Your opinion is not important. Look what you've done to your state. Socialism n communism. Stay there..
Trump is a Christian, therefore he has deliberately committed adultery with Stormy Daniels
My GOD!!!  ...just listen to this whiny little baby!!! Would you like a plate of cheesy poofs to go along with your daily whine, little Donnie?  Ridiculousness. https://aol.it/2LWHeqQ
Timothy Bourke you mean Fox News.  The No real news shitbags. Build your own jail cell wall trump. America will survive your trump Mafia
Idiot.
Albert Kojo Kyekye lmfaoo
SPEAK FOR YOURSELF WE THE MAJORITY OF AMERICANS  DO NOT WANT A STUPID WALL  I CAN FLY OVER A WALL, CLIMB OVER A WALL OR TUNNEL UNDER   I CAN ALSO TAKE A BOAT,  OR I CAN COME IN THROUGH EUROPE AND CANADA.
Albert Kojo Kyekye.  Guess Trumpy didn't know how to exchange PESO'S
Albert Kojo Kyekye Russian troll
Morpheus three words for you idiot. WORLD WIDE WEB
Cindy Nelson I agree
Ricky Wallace .. he stated..  come in legally n you're welcome. That's the law n how it's been done all over world. Aren't you smart enough to understand ????
Token right here.
Albert Kojo Kyekye gay
Albert Kojo Kyekye all you are doing is repeating his false talking points.  Are you being paid?
😂😂😂😂 sorry not visa for you
Jesse McMurray no I have a damn brain it’s called obey the laws
Enio Caldeira you obviously are an idiot!
George Mendes are you in the coal industry? Are you concerned? Or just finding negative things to post?
Albert Kojo Kyekye take him
😂😂😂😂 sorry not visa for you
Trump and his supporters hate people like you though
Trump troll idiots 😂 in full force. But yes Trump is great dont let the Trump trolls tell you otherwise 😂 ❄ ❄ ❄
Maria Vardakas wow, the only thing I heard was blah, blah , blah I hate Trump. Try to post something intelligent beside your personal hate. I like how one person can cause you to hate. LMAO.
Shannon Malcom former journalist? Are trolling?
Ginger Soakimi Am from Ghana. One of the few people who supports him here. I read a lot on US politics/economy. Trump has done far more than his predecessors in just 2years.  That’s why he’s my best president ever..
John Baron 🤣 TO FUNNY!!!!
John Baron real smart
John Baron fake account!! 🤨👎
Thank You!
Michelle Brown Korb 🤮🤮🤮
Ricky Wallace If this is what you believe then you are narrow minded.
LaVerne Avenatti You need to see a Dr. very soon and get off what ever your smoking and or drinking. Every thing you just said was ALL LIES All of that was Obama.. Obama Ruined our country Obama has no idea what the truth is because he don't know how to tell the truth. Every thing that has every come out of Obama mouth was and still is all lies
Ricky Wallace If this is what you believe then you are narrow minded.
Martha Dillon especially the part where he says the government shutdown will last until he gets funding for the wall. I’m sorry, but please get over it, he is your POTUS...and mine.
Jeremy Nixon  Because he is! 👍
Thank you brother. God bless you! This President is genuine at all cost.
Ricky Wallace not what Trump says at all, he has no problem with immigration. Go thru the process correctly and you are afforded all the things that you and I are afforded. If not, you are correct, he will send you back and you are not welcome here.
Janet Lee , bless your heart.
Albert Kojo Kyekye  that’s why you’re a  Kyekye or Agege “the village idiot.
John Baron you do
Jacinta Boulding   We can’t Spare him...He Fights for the American People!!  👍
Dolly Paez, oh bless your heart.
Albert Kojo Kyekye  yes!
Ricky Wallace bullshit! He doesn’t want anyone here ILLEGALLY.  Seriously what part do you NOT understand?
Why do you think he is the best
You are a fool and danger to our democracy!  Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Lol! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Tell that to the CBP officer who can’t pay rent. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment. Those USSS agents that guard Trump and put their lives on the line everyday are working for free as is the Coast Guard and more! Trump could care less! This is a crisis caused by the liar in the WH and a GOP that is spineless.
Donna Price, why is he going to jail?
Donna Price apparently you have not been paying attention.
John Baron you do
Martha Dillon, so who would you have voted for that wouldn’t tell a lie?  We all lie.  We are humans.
Jim Coleman, for what exactly?
Larry Siegel no Larry comedy hours starts after the speech with the left turds.they are the only liars and they count on sheeple like you to be there.

Maria Nichols you're a discussing human☝️ that is rude
Donna Price Trump isnt blocking every asylum request. Hes following / enforcing law that already exists. Most of these  " immigrants" dont even qualify for asylum from pre-existing standards set long before Trump.
Karen Kempa, how can that be When He Is Blocking Every Asylum Request!!?
Lil Anne Garcia Go Crawl Back Under Your Rock
Be careful saying that your going to piss off alot of fellow African Americans.
Fuckhead
Maria Nichols you're a discussing human☝️ that is rude
Thank You!
Denah Colette Campbell You make no sense at all.
Most of the people on this post are not from the United States so you fit right in.
Fuckhead
Where did you come from, moronville??.
Lillian Weisberg he doesn’t know what work is. Your also accepting a liar. But that’s who you want to support shame on you
Ricky Wallace  stupid and false comment
Where did you come from, moronville??.
Maria Vardakas Albert is welcome! You, Maria Vardakas are not
Ricky Wallace  stupid and false comment
John Graydon typical
Ken Whitinger, He Did!! He Even Said It On Live TV!! He Told Nancy Pelosi That He Could Get 60 Votes Easily!! She Said, "Go Do It Then"!!
Ricky Wallace that's a lie.
Maria Vardakas Albert is welcome! You, Maria Vardakas are not
Denah Colette Campbell how so darling?
Ricky Wallace that's a lie.
Sandie Harris good thing I don't adhere to any political party.
Shannon Malcom He wishes
Then keep your mouth shut
Albert Kojo Kyekye  You're a good and intelligent man, Albert.
You stupid
And you don't
Nyet, Comrade!
I mean, especially when he considers Ghana a “shithole” country- you ain’t the best to him.
Then keep your mouth shut
Sandie Harris Sure they got morals ! They got the morals of an alley cat.
Mary Miracle exactly
Great answer!! Thank you Albert Kojo Kyekye for being a very smart person. Don't listen to these other idiots!!!
Albert Kojo Kyekye are you a US citizen?
Ricky Wallace  Proof, Ricky?
Shannon Malcom bahaha if ya live in the united states  then he is your president too lmao get over it
Guy Striano you’re troll.
Martha Dillon you are a retarded fat ass women. Find a diet.
Sandie Harris What do you mean by your statement?
Albert Kojo Kyekye  yes he is.  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
You're funny
George Mendes fake ass account.
Ricky Wallace you are an ignorant troll. He doesn’t want people that are here illegally. You can apply for a visa that would make you legal you moron.
Shannon Malcom   No he can’t! He’s OURS, lol!
Tx u Albert Kojo Kyekye..ur not of USA.. but u see a great President..:)
Lisa Carbone wake up fool.  Your wannabe dicktator wants to give us all to Russia.
Albert Kojo Kyekye troll bot, goodbye.
Albert Kojo Kyekye you can have his ass!
If you were to disagreee with trump, all these people would’ve started insulting you.
Albert Kojo Kyekye I’m going to admire him when they put him in jail.
Baron Von Brztekkenburg bot.
Martha Dillon Give me a damn break, Obama, Hillary, Pelosi, and other Dems have lied to the American people over and over again.  Ask the mothers of the men that died in Benghazi.  Obama lied about the cause of their deaths.  He was a traitor to our constitution by supporting the Muslim Brotherhood, and here's a list of some other lies he told.  You are a gullible idiot. https://www.politifact.com/personalities/barack-obama/statements/byruling/false/
George Mendes what the hell ever-so do I and anyone with half a brain sees the devastation of the drugs that come in, or the communities turning into barrio shitholes full of illegals! Get the hell out with that bullshit!
George Mendes erm,,, its spelt ' smocking' 😂
Shannon Malcom  Ha ha , he is your President too if you are an American , suck it up . That's what i was told when we had the fake President 8 years .
Albert Kojo Kyekye nigga quit actn like a coon..
Albert Kojo Kyekye true
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=525888297784110&id=100010888335031
Enio Caldeira You mean rinos.
Shannon Malcom its one thing to be ugly on the outside,  but to be a piece of crap on the inside as well hard life for you. Please seek a therapist asap.
Albert Kojo Kyekye you are drunk ??
Lillian Weisberg Conway: Sarah Sanders made 'unfortunate misstatement' about terror suspects at border  ￼BY BRETT SAMUELSTWEET SHARE EMAIL  White House counselor Kellyanne Conway on Monday downplayed the Trump administration's misrepresentation of the number of suspected terrorists apprehended at the southern border, arguing press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders made "an unfortunate misstatement" a day earlier. Fox News host Laura Ingraham asked Conway if the White House's inability to get its facts right on immigration at the U.S.-Mexico border hurts its credibility after Sanders said on "Fox News Sunday" that "nearly 4,000 known or suspected terrorists come into our country illegally, and we know that our most vulnerable point of entry is at our southern border." Anchor Chris Wallace challenged Sanders on her comments, noting that the State Department had said there haven't been any terrorists found coming across the border and that most were captured at airports. Conway on Monday acknowledged that most of the nearly 4,000 terrorists apprehended in fiscal 2017 were found at airports, citing a report from the Department of Homeland Security.  "It got unfortunately conflated by a colleague," she said. Ingraham went on to criticize the media for "cherry-picking" statistics and argued that "we all kind of make mistakes." "That was an unfortunate misstatement and everybody makes mistakes, all of us," Conway said. "The fact is, it's corrected here and anybody who turns a blind eye to the actual numbers of human trafficking, the increase in the drugs, we are concerned about your children here in the United States not being subject to all these drugs and we're concerned about their children."  Trump administration officials, including the president and Homeland Security Secretary Kirstjen Nielsen, have in recent months stated that thousands of terrorists attempt to enter the country, but have generally not elaborated on where those individuals are apprehended. NBC News on Monday obtained data showing that, in the first half of 2018, Customs and Border Protection stopped a total of six immigrants at the southern border who are now in the terrorism database. President Trump is set to deliver a prime-time address on Tuesday discussing the situation at the border, which he has referred to a crisis. The president has pushed for more than $5 billion in funding for a wall along the southern border, which has precipitated a partial government shutdown that has lasted 18 days and counting.
https://youtu.be/56V6r2dpYH8
Shannon Malcom boohoo..Keep being brainwashed from the liberal ideology.  They have you believing everything will be for free...Nothing EVER is for free....They only want total control, power and votes.......Wake up and see the light.
https://youtu.be/56V6r2dpYH8
Albert Kojo Kyekye good for you.
Albert Kojo Kyekye good for you.
History shows .... what??? Fake account from Russia!
What an Uncle Tom
Calvin Wright God Bless You.
Matthew Kentner --APRIL??? Try polling them tomorrow.
Karen Harvey Trump said he would never sign it. This was after claiming he would sign any bipartisan legislation that came across his desk.
Karen Harvey Ah, so sad about the 60 needed votes. Where are Trump's much vaunted negotiating and deal making skills? Didn't he campaign on being the best deal maker in the history the world?  And speaking of obstructionist: The Senate passed the VERY SAME BILL the Democrats just passed in the House to reopen the government -- passed it by 90 to 10, a bipartisan vote. But oh, that was before the new House came in. Now Mitch McConnell won't even put THAT SAME BILL to a Senate vote.
Calvin Wright God Bless You.
Karen Harvey ask yourself why didn’t it pass?
Karen Harvey why didn’t we take that money to build the wall last year?
Read this John Mutyaba :  “False Says Sen. Chuck Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican." ​ — Bloggers on Monday, December 17th, 2018 in a blog post Meme mischaracterizes Chuck Schumer's record on border security funding  By John Kruzel on Thursday, December 20th, 2018 at 11:10 a.m.  A meme gaining traction on social media claims Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-N.Y., supported a border wall deal during Barack Obama’s presidency but then flip-flopped once President Donald Trump took the White House.  The post contains a photo of Schumer and a mock first-person confession revealing the Senate minority leader’s partisan reason for the apparent policy pivot.  "In 2014, I helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall," reads the post from a group called The Right View Of Washington State. "Now, Trump wants $5 billion for a border wall. Well I’m gonna b----, cry, piss and moan just because he’s a Republican and wants it."  The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  The meme is swimming in factual errors and fishy interpretations.  No border wall deal in 2014 The post says Schumer helped put together a border wall deal in 2014. That’s wrong — there was no border barrier deal that year.  It’s possible the creator of the post was thinking of a 2013 proposal that Schumer shepherded through the Senate. But characterizing the 2013 legislation as a $25 billion deal to fund a "border wall" runs into factual hurdles.  That proposal, a comprehensive immigration plan Schumer sponsored and voted for, cleared the Senate in 2013. But the Republican-controlled House did not take up that bill after that. (It’s worth noting that presidents, not lawmakers, as the meme suggests, sign bills into law.)  The package included more than $46 billion for border security. The vast majority of that money ($30 billion) was for hiring more U.S. Border Patrol agents along the southern border. Around $8 billion would have gone toward building or repairing 700 miles of fencing (including some double-layer fencing) along the U.S.-Mexico border.  That’s not $25 billion for a wall, as the meme claimed.  Fence vs. wall It would be a stretch to say the fencing Schumer supported in 2013 fits the same description as Trump’s "impenetrable, physical, tall, power, beautiful southern border wall," with "precasts going up probably 35 to 40 feet in the air."  Schumer’s office insisted a border fence is very different from Trump’s promised wall. The senator’s office pointed us to a Trump tweet from the election when then-candidate Trump scolded his opponent Jeb Bush for conflating the two.  "Jeb Bush just talked about my border proposal to build a ‘fence.’ " Trump tweeted. "It's not a fence, Jeb, it's a WALL, and there's a BIG difference!"  Daniel Yoken, a Schumer spokesman, said, "Sen. Schumer supported fencing where it makes sense then and still does today."  Schumer has also argued that border security isn’t limited to a wall, and that there are other, more effective ways to secure the border. The meme claims Schumer opposes a wall "just because" Trump is a Republican.  One more point to clarify: Schumer in January 2018 said he offered to back funding for Trump’s border wall in exchange for a broader immigration package that included a deal for so-called Dreamers, young immigrants living in the country illegally.  Schumer reportedly made a $25 billion offer for the wall during a private meeting with Trump, as lawmakers negotiated a way to avert a government shutdown. Schumer rescinded his offer just a few days after making it, saying it was off the table because Trump rejected the broader immigration package.  The New York Times reported that while the White House refused to acknowledge that Schumer made the wall offer, Senate leaders on both sides of the aisle confirmed it.  An offer on behalf of Schumer’s part to fund a border wall undermines the meme’s notion that he’s automatically ruled out the wall simply because Trump wants it.  Our ruling The Facebook post says Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican."  There are numerous factual errors here: there was no border barrier deal in 2014. A 2013 legislative package proposed $8 billion for border fencing — not $25 billion for a border wall.  More importantly, the border fencing Schumer backed in 2013 is different than how Trump has described his border wall. And the meme glosses over Schumer’s previous support for border wall funding earlier this year, in exchange for protections for Dreamers.  We rate this post False.”
Karen Harvey nailed it
Read this John Mutyaba :  “False Says Sen. Chuck Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican." ​ — Bloggers on Monday, December 17th, 2018 in a blog post Meme mischaracterizes Chuck Schumer's record on border security funding  By John Kruzel on Thursday, December 20th, 2018 at 11:10 a.m.  A meme gaining traction on social media claims Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-N.Y., supported a border wall deal during Barack Obama’s presidency but then flip-flopped once President Donald Trump took the White House.  The post contains a photo of Schumer and a mock first-person confession revealing the Senate minority leader’s partisan reason for the apparent policy pivot.  "In 2014, I helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall," reads the post from a group called The Right View Of Washington State. "Now, Trump wants $5 billion for a border wall. Well I’m gonna b----, cry, piss and moan just because he’s a Republican and wants it."  The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  The meme is swimming in factual errors and fishy interpretations.  No border wall deal in 2014 The post says Schumer helped put together a border wall deal in 2014. That’s wrong — there was no border barrier deal that year.  It’s possible the creator of the post was thinking of a 2013 proposal that Schumer shepherded through the Senate. But characterizing the 2013 legislation as a $25 billion deal to fund a "border wall" runs into factual hurdles.  That proposal, a comprehensive immigration plan Schumer sponsored and voted for, cleared the Senate in 2013. But the Republican-controlled House did not take up that bill after that. (It’s worth noting that presidents, not lawmakers, as the meme suggests, sign bills into law.)  The package included more than $46 billion for border security. The vast majority of that money ($30 billion) was for hiring more U.S. Border Patrol agents along the southern border. Around $8 billion would have gone toward building or repairing 700 miles of fencing (including some double-layer fencing) along the U.S.-Mexico border.  That’s not $25 billion for a wall, as the meme claimed.  Fence vs. wall It would be a stretch to say the fencing Schumer supported in 2013 fits the same description as Trump’s "impenetrable, physical, tall, power, beautiful southern border wall," with "precasts going up probably 35 to 40 feet in the air."  Schumer’s office insisted a border fence is very different from Trump’s promised wall. The senator’s office pointed us to a Trump tweet from the election when then-candidate Trump scolded his opponent Jeb Bush for conflating the two.  "Jeb Bush just talked about my border proposal to build a ‘fence.’ " Trump tweeted. "It's not a fence, Jeb, it's a WALL, and there's a BIG difference!"  Daniel Yoken, a Schumer spokesman, said, "Sen. Schumer supported fencing where it makes sense then and still does today."  Schumer has also argued that border security isn’t limited to a wall, and that there are other, more effective ways to secure the border. The meme claims Schumer opposes a wall "just because" Trump is a Republican.  One more point to clarify: Schumer in January 2018 said he offered to back funding for Trump’s border wall in exchange for a broader immigration package that included a deal for so-called Dreamers, young immigrants living in the country illegally.  Schumer reportedly made a $25 billion offer for the wall during a private meeting with Trump, as lawmakers negotiated a way to avert a government shutdown. Schumer rescinded his offer just a few days after making it, saying it was off the table because Trump rejected the broader immigration package.  The New York Times reported that while the White House refused to acknowledge that Schumer made the wall offer, Senate leaders on both sides of the aisle confirmed it.  An offer on behalf of Schumer’s part to fund a border wall undermines the meme’s notion that he’s automatically ruled out the wall simply because Trump wants it.  Our ruling The Facebook post says Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican."  There are numerous factual errors here: there was no border barrier deal in 2014. A 2013 legislative package proposed $8 billion for border fencing — not $25 billion for a border wall.  More importantly, the border fencing Schumer backed in 2013 is different than how Trump has described his border wall. And the meme glosses over Schumer’s previous support for border wall funding earlier this year, in exchange for protections for Dreamers.  We rate this post False.”
Mike Shusterman yes I did read the article. The figures are based on steel prices and approximate measurements. It may not be the exact total, but show me one single construction project that comes in right on budget.  27 Billion in savings.. you get that number from Trump's blathering? There is NO accurate measure of what effect illegal immigration has on the economy.  Meanwhile, Trump's lie count goes up every single day... and you're just sucking it up like a 2 dollar hooker..
Karen Harvey why didn’t we take that money to build the wall last year?
Jake Kanton Of course they have.
pay check hell, cut off the kick backs
No it won’t
Wanda Jett exactly it would be built real fast
Doug McLemore because they are the ones who make the rules
Too bad for us.....they make their billions in other ways....crooked,  sick, Wrong!!!!
Tom Voss....We are not here to attack each other, so if we make a mistake, so what?
Why don't they vet Fascists before allowing them into our Great United States???
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Svend Erik Lund OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
Tom Voss....We are not here to attack each other, so if we make a mistake, so what?
Svend Erik Lund OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
Christy Grubbs Explain why ALL Republicans wanted the funding bill until Dumpster had a tantrum
Britney Joray you talk about his daughter and your so stupid you cant read
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Steve Hopson of course they did

Brian Morrison if she teaches her English would you learn to change your eating habits. After all if demonrats get their healthcare it will be single payer. I dont want to have to pay higher premiums because of shitheads like you.
Way to brainwash your 8 year old!!!! Statewide, 61 percent of Texans oppose building a wall, while 35 percent support it and 4 percent don’t know or declined to answer, according to a poll conducted in April by Texas Lyceum, a nonprofit leadership organization. Residents of the Lone Star State who live, work and play along the international boundary with Mexico say they are happy that the Trump administration’s plans to quickly build the wall have encountered complications in Washington. A dispute over whether to fund the wall nearly led to a federal government shutdown in March, until the president agreed to delay the plan possibly until September. On Tuesday, Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney unveiled a 2018 budget that includes $2.6 billion for stepped-up border security, including $1.6 billion for a wall.  Read more here: https://www.star-telegram.com/news/state/texas/article152402734.html#storylink=cpy
Stephen Pierson you should be tested for Rabies.
Harry Panella she’s in a special class right? Please keep your challenged children from here.
You have a wise daughter.
Terri Pryde move!
Bill Westerlind did Obama or Clinton serve ? Pretty weak argument snowflake

Walls are OLD defensive tools!
John Robert We the People have power and we should use that power whenever we can right now the Democrat Party is being nothing but obstructionist and we can give them our opinion by calling them. Here are the phone numbers  Nancy Pelosi in Washington DC. (202)225-4965 In San Francisco (415)556-4862  Chuck Schumer in Washington DC (202)224-6542.  or FAX (202)228-3027  I don't have a fax machine but wouldn't it be wonderful if there was a whole room full of paper in his office tomorrow? If you call and leave a message try to be civil but aggressively push 4 a barrier at our Southern border. Thank you
Greg Haase and they work. Just ask Israel or the Vatican or Nancy Pelosi
John Robert what fucking service?
You have a wise daughter.
Oh yes very proud 🤥🤥🤥
Draft dodging is not serving...
Sickening.
Monica Locke I never said I agreed with shutting down the government with any President, and not paying workers so they can't pay their bills and take care of their families.
Diane Ruckdeschel They are part of that criminal enterprise, so get over it.
Timothy Kershner obama shut the us government down for the crappiest obama care bill
John Robert what fucking service?
Simona Dana Rusu   Simply because they brushed off the whole immigration crisis. They buried it. How foolish for the Democratic’s to not have taken advantage of the situation. Carter 4 years, Clinton 8 years, Obama 8 years.  Wall :not any ideal of how to take control.
What service?
John Robert No wall
My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
https://pbs.twimg.com/media/Dwcr3TdWkAAhGjk?format=jpg&name=900x900
Find a better paying job and then someone will actually be very proud of you!
Cam go look in the mirror, you know nothing of what your speaking of. If it cost 5.6 billion dollars to build the wall, and it cost more than that to the taxpayers in one year to allow them to come in. You can't build half a wall, idiot, then police the other half. I hope for people like you, an illegal rapes or kills someone you love, maybe they will escape back to Mexico like the man who killed my nephew's friend. You democrats and liberals needed your asses whipped, go see if you can sneak into another country, and what theyed do to you if you got caught. If we'd allow everyone to come here and help them, we'd all have to work 24 hrs. a day to support all the freebies your political party keeps handing out. People like you amaze me at the lack of brains you have...
Sorry Cam,these messages are meant for Arev Neerg.
Timothy Kershner obama shut the us government down for the crappiest obama care bill
Benjamin Becker   No. I do think you are missing a comma.
Joanne Hodor   So, security is now labeled a vanity wall?? Let’s all move you closer to the border and see how that works.
Bing Heet  no. You are wrong, again
Ligma Asswhole  the intelligence level just bottomed out on this comment. Say, are you the speech writer for Pelosi or Schumer?
Ligma Asswhole   The intelligence level just dumped well below normal. Even for a liberal. It must be the vagina hats worn at the last protest.
Izzy Delgado   Hon , just shut up 🤐
Roger Cary  I take it you don’t appreciate a patriot.
Roger Cary you don’t like patriots?
Sorry Cam,these messages are meant for Arev Neerg.
You gotta pay the Troll Toll if you want to get in that boy's hole!
What total ignorance!  That wall will not stop the terrorism that will arrive on American soil after we cede control of the Mideast to Russia.
Ligma Asswhole works at Walmart.
John Robert well said. We are Proud of President Trump. Secure our borders Trump 2020
Lynn Fox they need to come to America legally and not illegally.
Janet Lee   Secure our borders. Keep America and Americans safe
Bing Heet ???
Izzy Delgado ummmmmmmmmm...what??????
Terri Pryde  oh well. That’s how the people voted.  Every four years for President. Yep 👍  the conservatives had to endure eight years of Clinton and the other one.
Majic pen sir. This is a crisis.
John Robert , how dare you thank fat ass for service. That's a slap to all veterans who did serve, this motherf.cker's daddy paid his doctor to avoid the draft. Fat ass played sports in college. GUTLESS  DRAFT DODGER.
John Robert OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
Alison Edwards Lorentz you're soo soo smert.🤢🤮
John Robert For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants.   There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Diane Ruckdeschel I guess it was completely moral when the other Presidents shut down the government though? They should cut the pay of Congress!
John Robert Troll
Izzy Delgado ummmmmmmmmm...what??????
Bill Westerlind  he attended a military academy. Of course you won’t admit this if you knew of it. Unlike Clinton who received deferments, five in all because his draft number was 311.
Renee Duckworth Milliken ummmmmmmmmmmmmm.... what?
Karen Tysen Your logic is right, we will have to wait and see, we have no control over this.  I just want it resolved to the best of everyone's ability.  We can't seem to work together anymore, I have no answers either.
John Robert gay
John Robert Troll
Amanda Marioni Hunt same as using drones or other security methods for border security. You have to apprehend the illegal immigrants. Common sense says catching them as the come through gates is much easier than mass groups coming over open land or insufficient fencing. Like wise apprehending a boat is easier than swimmers.
Matthew Kentner and of the 61% that oppose - how many are here LEGALLY? https://nationaleconomicseditorial.com/2017/04/07/illegal-immigration-costs-analysis-texas/
Diane Ruckdeschel the Democrats could fix it all and "save the daca kids" in ONE VOTE....let's wait and see what they do...they don't care about the daca kids or the federal employees...they only care about votes....they voted for the wall in 2006 (Obama, shumer and Hillary Clinton, they only are opposing now because they hate Trump. They change their policies as often as they change their underwear.wake up people...they don't care about you....if they did they would make policies that didn't keep people stuck on food stamps and welfare. They WANT YOU DEPENDAND ON ON THEM!
John Robert another fool!
Glen Beltz  she said why because another person thinks this is another route illegals will take .
"I have held the hands of those weeping mothers..."  You lying piece of crap!!!
Amanda Marioni Hunt  it’s simple. Border patrol or coast guard.
Brian Halbrooks Loss of life doesn't bother you?
John Robert , man what kind of stupid are you??
Diane Ruckdeschel why not Obama did for 17 fucking days....stop listening to fake unsupported unfactual news

Diane Ruckdeschel did you say the same thing for the Clinton and Obama shutdowns? Hypocrite!
Izzy Delgado  you go and get the message that was sent and try again.
Michael Roesch, how can you support a scumbag who ran a sham charity?
John Robert ur a dumb ass
Diane Ruckdeschel did you say the same thing for the Clinton and Obama shutdowns? Hypocrite!
Michael Roesch and when they've landed?
Judge Jude says liar liar pants on fire he better keep a close eye on him self
Naomi Boyer Borderfact.com
Do you think he lies more then Obama did? That great speaker that was all BS.
Amanda Marioni Hunt  the coast guard sends them back. There’s your answer
https://www.gofundme.com/thetrumpwall?utm_source=facebook&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=fb_dn_cpgnsharebartop_r
John Baron irrelevant question. But he is your President and your paychecks  and your 401k benefit financially from his tax & economic policies so maybe that will help you pay that. Think about him every time you gas up your car.
From what
Barbara Hansen says who, you? Oh no let me guess CNN told you that
Barbara Hansen and I guess that's the first time in history?
Janet Wood yup, we all die problem solved.
https://www.gofundme.com/thetrumpwall?utm_source=facebook&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=fb_dn_cpgnsharebartop_r
Cinda Beinert  he’s protecting ignorant people like you I got bills to pay 💰 and am working for free ok enough with the fucking bullshit and tell your president to pay me my money
Syddonney Successful Raymond . Hmmm when I get laid off @ my job I don't get back pay when recalled. If you are working and not getting paid I applaud you and sympathize with you. I hope this gets settled soon.
Janet Wood yup, we all die problem solved.
Ahmd Ali  Could you please write in English instead of Muslim? No American knows wth you're talking about.
Karla Lanch BeDell  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1928236563965358&id=100003370994761
Barbara Hansen  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1928236563965358&id=100003370994761
John Baron the pay is indirect- and he has kept more campaign promises than any other politician in my lifetime
Barbara Hansen it will save billions of dollars.. article from may of 2016: “Criminal aliens — non-citizens who commit crimes — are a growing threat to public safety and national security, as well as a drain on our scarce criminal justice resources. In 1980, our federal and state prisons housed fewer than 9,000 criminal aliens. Today, about 55,000 criminal aliens account for more than one-fourth of prisoners in Federal Bureau of Prisons facilities, and there are about 297,000 criminal aliens incarcerated in state and local prisons. That number represents about 16.4 percent of the state and local prison population compared to the 12.9 percent of the total population comprised of foreign-born residents.
Angus Crawford get a life
Angus Crawford nope- passed with flying colors thanks
Cinda Beinert we are legion? That’s what the Demon said to Jesus wasn’t it. So Trump supporters are the spawn of Satan? Thanks for clearing that one up.
Cinda Beinert break down and fall you evil man! That’s your trump!! Evil disgrace to us all!!
Joy Z Cohen he did NOT demand a shutdown but he has said he would do it- Democrats need to work for the American citizens- walls work!
Joe Galvan nothing good enough to believe the Dems
Cinda Beinert Great minds discuss ideas.  Average minds discuss events.  Small minds discuss people."  ~Eleanor Roosevelt   (and name caling is included in small minds ...
Jacquelyn Strickland so is arguing with a stranger when said stranger has said enough already
Diane Glauber I don’t know what you mean by that
William French us people?
Joy Z Cohen he did NOT demand a shutdown but he has said he would do it- Democrats need to work for the American citizens- walls work!
Michael Fuerst and an opinion is like an a&@hole- everyone has one
Cinda Beinert, just like the dumb that wants to stay Dumb!!
Cinda Beinert   Yes...spreading information without FACTS is your job ?
Jacquelyn Strickland nope- I commented on a post- get a frickin life off my comment
William French us people?
Mike Decker Yes, me too ... especially the tRump supporters
Jacquelyn Strickland nope- I commented on a post- get a frickin life off my comment
“Opinion is really the lowest form of human knowledge. It requires no accountability, no understanding. The highest form of knowledge… is empathy, for it requires us to suspend our egos and live in another's world. It requires profound purpose larger than the self kind of understanding.”  -- Bill Bullard
Bill Westerlind not daft or Russian
then you and donald should leave the country now and we will be safer
Cinda Beinert  https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DwbJi-ZVsAAlTGs?format=jpg&name=900x900
Barbara Hansen At least he knows we don’t have 57 states
He tweeted last month the "border is secure"   why did he send the military home? Why has used only 6% of what the Congress gave him last year?  You know he can't just put up a wall on private land right? It will take decades in court...You know all this right?  trump supporter logic= No Logic
Why you mad Dianna Postek Six ? It’s the truth! He lies more than a rug
Also, if you literally  can't afford the fine, or the premiums you file this form with your taxes...and you're exempt.....the fine is much less costly than the premiums for the cheapest insurance you  can buy....but...here is the link: .https://marketplace.cms.gov/applications-and-forms/hardship-exemption.pdf
Heather Gurtlinger what's it like thinking you are superior to everyone who doesnt agree with you?
Elderly all live off the government? I paid taxes up the ying yang when i worked and i collect Social Security and that was money paid in. Now that I'm elderly and disabled i guess I'm supposed to die.
Kasha Alverson Obambam caused the National Crises!
Vicki Zamow ^^^
Amanda Lynn nope far from it babydoll;) but thank u darling. I just provide facts
Why you mad Dianna Postek Six ? It’s the truth! He lies more than a rug
Vicki Zamow thanks. Busy raising kids while posting! Anything else? Get a life. Lmao
Robin Bridget  😘
Retha Ricketts I would agree with you if we were talking about sane people, but they aren’t. They are putting their party over the American people, and they are beyond reasoning with.
Vicki Zamow Executive ORDER!!!!
Vicki Zamow good was the best thank god
It's a fake emergency.  The facts say illegal immigrants are far more likely to come by plane not Southern borders.  The wall is nothing more than a dog whistle to bigoted supporters that just want a fight to coverup Trumps other legal issues
That blathering idiot obama is the reason this is happening now, the wanna be celebrity did nothing
Ronald Penn fast check that
Jessica Cecilia Motley, The aca helps more people afford medical care... period... protecting you and myself from preexisting conditions and a host of other things...the fact is, the individual state governments decide whether or not they participate fully....i.e, Alabama doesn't expand Medicaid, therefore making the pool of insured people much smaller...less people in the pool means less distribution of costs which causes prices to go up . insurance companies pull up roots and leave the market place and go to stated where there's some competition....blue Cross is the only available insurance company in our market place for people under 65.   ...so they ( blue Cross blue shield) have Monopoly over the insurance market....  They don't have any reason to be competitive with pricing ........the governments don't mind because we are paying 20 times for their gold insurance than the cost of  Medicaid expansion..they'd receive grant funding for expanding Medicaid...but since they choose to not participate, the cost comes back to us...sir, ma'am taxpayer. Now...what makes more sense? Get grant funding to pay for Medicaid for the folks who need it ..or just not doing it at all and paying extra for healthcare premiums???
Amanda Lynn nope far from it babydoll;) but thank u darling. I just provide facts
John Baron so then would u clothes and feed the illegals coming in? Would u let them dine with ur kids and sleep in the same house? U wouldn’t. Would u allow them to do drug trades in ur house as well round ur kids? Naaa ya wouldn’t so now my dear little looney liberal tell me again we don’t need the wall🙄 AND  let me guess if Obama did this u would be ok with it right? Of corse I would. And just like u support that joke of a congresswoman🤦‍♀️ shall I go on?
John Baron but it’s been really fun trying to dumb down a liberal. But I must go to work:) unlike half of the people mooching off the government:) blessings doll🙏🏻😘
Robin Bridget Pelosi and Schumer own this one now. They are acting like 2 year olds.
Mary Hallermann Herzog yeah! It’s not like I’m his advisor!😂
Jessica Cecilia Motley, The aca helps more people afford medical care... period... protecting you and myself from preexisting conditions and a host of other things...the fact is, the individual state governments decide whether or not they participate fully....i.e, Alabama doesn't expand Medicaid, therefore making the pool of insured people much smaller...less people in the pool means less distribution of costs which causes prices to go up . insurance companies pull up roots and leave the market place and go to stated where there's some competition....blue Cross is the only available insurance company in our market place for people under 65.   ...so they ( blue Cross blue shield) have Monopoly over the insurance market....  They don't have any reason to be competitive with pricing ........the governments don't mind because we are paying 20 times for their gold insurance than the cost of  Medicaid expansion..they'd receive grant funding for expanding Medicaid...but since they choose to not participate, the cost comes back to us...sir, ma'am taxpayer. Now...what makes more sense? Get grant funding to pay for Medicaid for the folks who need it ..or just not doing it at all and paying extra for healthcare premiums???
Jyn Ludd but I’m richer than u bc all u looney liberals are still bitching 2 yards later bout trump 😂
Timothy Kershner daily whine😂 come in now my loony liberal. I guess u guys are really that stupid🤦‍♀️
Lorilynn Bauer  I know there's some big words in this, but it's from Forbes magazine, which is a lot more accurate than your photoshopped pictures, see if you can get someone to read this to you and then you'll understand, and I'm not your baby girl, bitch.
Kasha Alverson unnecessary? Hmmmm well then hun, can u please take off ur doors to ur house and feed and clothes the illegals pouring in please. Can u make them dinner with ur family while they so their drug trades?🤔 I’ll wait for ur answer 🙂 blessings darling
John Baron 😂😂😂😂 awww someone’s a little mad and triggered. That’s the best u got babygirl? Try harder my looney liberal 😘😘
Lesley Carson Hamann yes I know it was Obama who sent all that money to Iran
Mary Hallermann Herzog yeah! It’s not like I’m his advisor!😂
Kasha Alverson,do you call housing, feeding ,medical care ,educating the children,ten's of thousands each month a manufactured crises,when does it STOP,we have enough Homeless Americans that we cannot provide for.
Kasha Alverson no he did it for worthless Obamacare...costs billions and did nothing
Eddie Cook check your facts then get back to us
Eddie Cook ya cause he sent it all to Hillary Clinton and overseas
Randy Fitzell hmmm maybe if the government worked with trump it wouldn’t be an issue my little snowflake:) u guys are causing this. If u and your cult leaders just gave in no one be in the situation their in. And my loony liberal caps isn’t needed. It makes u look like a child which that’s what u loons are acting like:))
Lesley Carson Hamann yes I know it was Obama who sent all that money to Iran
Kris Knight, That's funny as hell.
Liar!
Tommy Marsh they are screaming that anyway. So your logic astounds me. In other words "don't do what's right and needed because some ppl will cry."
No.  Leave the executive overreaches to the Obama administration.  It was wrong then, and it would be wrong now.
Randy Fitzell hmmm maybe if the government worked with trump it wouldn’t be an issue my little snowflake:) u guys are causing this. If u and your cult leaders just gave in no one be in the situation their in. And my loony liberal caps isn’t needed. It makes u look like a child which that’s what u loons are acting like:))
Vicki Zamow Troll
Ronald Penn what did they lie about?
What total ignorance!  That wall will not stop the terrorism that will arrive on American soil after we cede control of the Mideast to Russia.
"A shutdown falls on the president's lack of leadership. I mean problems start from the top and they have to get solved from the top. A shutdown means the president is weak". - Donald J. Trump, 2013.
Kris Knight wow how ignorant can you be? Do you have any idea how many of your fellow syphocantic 45 worshippers have screamed about "the civil war" they will start and indiscriminately kill people because 45 is a gd joke and we let him know it?
This sums up the shutdown from the framework of our government. It lays out the facts. I am sharing this from another person who posted and please do share as well. I am not normally political. This post will be an exception because I am an American and I am concerned. Please allow me to frame the issues involved with "the wall" in its actual terms. Despite what the media is saying, this is not about Democrat vs. Republican. In short, the executive branch of our government is threatening to declare a national emergency since the legislative branch will not authorize the seizure of private American property for a federal works project nor will fund it. The executive branch has already shut down the federal government. It is currently threatening to extend this government shut down for however long it takes for the legislative branch to cave. Let us break this down. First of all, the framework of our government is based on checks and balances. Power is divided into three branches: the Executive, the Legislative, and the Judicial. The Legislative branch controls the purse strings of government and creates laws. The Executive branch carries out those laws. The Judicial branch tells us whether the laws are constitutional or not. Each branch was designed to be able to balance the other branches. Why? As shown by our original rebellion, Americans didn't want a King or a Dictator when we were setting up our government. We were not particularly thrilled with a House of Lords telling us what we could or could not do either. In this case, the executive branch wants to: (1) take governmental cash,  (2) create its own law,  (3) take away private property from American citizens  (4) create its own federal works project. At least three of these functions fall within the power/ responsibility of the legislative branch. So, what is the problem? This is one of the most naked power grabs by the executive branch over the others in recent history. Once that power is exercised, it is going to be difficult or impossible to regain any balance again. The executive branch was never meant to have that much power (see our country's previous concerns about Kings and Dictators). Is this constitutional? Very doubtful. Should all Americans be concerned? That is a question for you to answer yourself. Second, a "National Emergency" is generally declared under these general conditions:  (1) Natural disasters including hurricanes, tornados, and earthquakes to name a few.  (2) Public health emergencies such as significant outbreaks of infectious diseases.  (3) Military attacks.  (4) Civil insurrection. (5) Any unusual and extraordinary threat, which has its source in whole or substantial part outside the United States, to the national security, foreign policy, or economy. Now the first 4 aren't applicable. The last category was meant to be short-term only. It was designed to be reviewed by the legislative branch every year after it’s enacted (because again; the check and balance is fundamental to how we operate). So, what is the problem here? If national emergencies can be declared by the executive branch for non-emergency purposes which vest power in one branch of the government why would that branch ever let go of that power again? Third, the seizure of private property (known as “eminent domain”, a body of law which says the government cannot just take your home without due process). You are joking, right? No. The US/Mexican border is 1,933 miles long. It runs through 4 states (California, Arizona, New Mexico, and Texas). Only 33% of that land is actually owned or managed by the Federal Government. A sizable percentage of that land is owned by the Indian nations. It is land preserved for those tribes by treaty and land given under treaty is not land owned by the United States. These tribes already have a lot of reasons to be angry at the Federal Government. This would be pouring additional gas on an open flame. The other 64% of that land is privately owned. How much land would have to be taken? The amount of land that the Federal Government would have to take would likely run 1,237 miles long to 12,371 miles deep (assuming a 1 to 10-mile DMZ from the border into the United States). Even if we could only take 100 to 500 ft of land in densely populated areas, that is a lot of private property that is going to be seized by the Federal government. The land necessary for this project would also run through some highly populated areas in the US such as San Diego, Calexico, Nogales, El Paso, and Laredo. There will be a lot of Americans who are going to have their homes and businesses taken by the federal government. Which will also mean a lot of lawsuits. In terms of the federal works project, these types of works include hospitals, bridges, highways, walls and dams. These projects may be funded by local, state, or federal appropriations. If they are federal, they are funded by the legislative branch of our government (the same branch that our executive branch is currently trying to take power from). Is the seizure of power constitutional? Not likely given the separation of powers discussed above. Finally, these considerations do not take into account the sheer cost, human and monetary, that will be involved. The Department of Homeland Security estimates the current cost at $21 billion for construction alone (not counting costs of maintenance or costs associated with increased military/federal patrolling). Ask yourself a simple question. When was the last time that you saw a governmental project brought in under time and under budget? Does anyone remember the “big dig” in Boston, Mass? The actual costs are likely to be much higher. This estimated cost also does not include compensating folks for taking their land or the associated impact upon their businesses. The Federal budget deficit grew to $779 billion dollars in 2018 according to the Treasury Department. How are we, as a country, going to fund this project? How are we, as a country, going to deal with the additional debt? Unlike private businesses, our country cannot declare bankruptcy. This is not about Democrat vs. Republican. It is not about who has the best zingers measured in 10 second sound bites. It is about our country. The core of this issue deals with the profound and immense changes the outcome will have on the structure of our national. This is the way that we, as a country, should be framing these issues. Please think about it." Please share!
Read some of that syphocants. If you actually dare too.
Vicki Zamow yes he was! He made up the rules as he pleased! But He was a Bought Democrat
Steven Reeves I was raised Republican and then I grew up and RANAWAY
Vicki Zamow You’re hilarious Vicky. Let build a big wall of cheese because it will not only protect America but it will make the Mexicans fat and lazy so they won’t tunnel under the big Wall of Cheese. American Cheese on our side and Mexican Blend On theirs!
Susanne Conley please go back to Russia. They have an amazing wall I hear
Rita Abrahamson you are are a complete moron.  Name one living President that doesn't live behind a wall?  Snowflake
Vicki Zamow you’re an idiot!  Way more people were killed by good old American boys at Parkland and Las Vegas, but President Stupid didn’t mention that did he???
Vicki Zamow yes he was! He made up the rules as he pleased! But He was a Bought Democrat
"I have held the hands of those weeping mothers..."  You lying piece of crap!!!
Which part of:  "Donald Trump is a lying piece of garbage" were you too stupid to comprehend?  https://youtu.be/ud0f3eJTo54
Greg Merz that's because drugs drug money and cheap labor runs through that state as the illegal immigrants arrive.
Shaun Dillavou okay I'll play lets do it.  FUN FACT: On Dec 18th, McConnell said there was no more money for the border and wouldn't be. The house version had more for the border and Trump tweeted that he would sign. Then Limbaugh and the pointy heads at FOX NEWS cried and cried all day until they goaded him into reversing himself.  BONUS FACT: He would have got 12.5 billion for his wall in early 2017 if he would have gave the DACA's citizenship. The "Deal Maker" doesn't seem to understand how to make "Deals", it's not just holding your breath until you get your way.
They are ate up with  Bad Case of the Dumbass !!
LOLOLOLOL I just won $100.00 because you mentioned Obama.
Vicki Zamow and that's their biggest regrets but who cares people who want the wall are nothing but a bunch a bully redneck trashy Americans
😂😂😂
Greg Merz that's because drugs drug money and cheap labor runs through that state as the illegal immigrants arrive.
Rachelle Tanzil lol no the didn’t tell me where republicans stopped obama on anything?
You cried that Obama was going to deploy the military and enforce good rules on everyone. Trump literally does exactly that and crickets from you hypocritical idiots.
Vicki Zamow not very smart are you?
Lauren Anne Doane Tell us about your emergency everyday so we understand
Vicki Zamow he wants it to remain in force. Not be undone like Obama's EOs.
Robin Bridget Supreme
Randy Fitzell Lol, Trumpanzees, what is it with demented leftists and their "puns"?
Jackie Capps did he ever wants to clear a national emergency when there was actually no emergency illegal border crossings are at an all time low and the amount of illegals in the United States is also at an all-time low, so where exactly is the fucking crisis?
Heather Gurtlinger Nate from Trump is the first president stupid enough to ever shut the government down
Janet Braden Duvall so sorry you have no clue as to how funding works.
Robin Bridget Supreme
Rita Abrahamson idiot
Thomas Steed and yet another typical leftist rebuttal... laced with insult and lacking any fact or true content.
Becky Geyer Price  Like ruin this country Becky!
Greg Merz Typical leftist tactic again.... can't produce fact, statistic, insightful opinion or intelligent thought... No problem - call someone "stupid" instead. Thanks for contributing.
Heather Gurtlinger What lies?What an idiot. Better to ask when has he ever spoke the truth. All he ever does is lie.
https://www.bbc.com/news/world-us-canada-46784315
Heather Gurtlinger he lied about the 4000 people that were criminals arrested at the southern border, only 12 of those 4000 came from the southern border, he lied to the American people every day he lies to his wives about how many times he cheats on them, then he lies about paying off the whores that he cheated with, he lies about hiring the best people, he hires crooks and that's it. He lies about knowing the most about everything he ever possibly talks about, because he doesn't know a damn thing about anything, except for running businesses and countries into the ground and bankrupting them. He lied about getting a one million dollar loan from his father to start his business because he already had over 8 billion dollars at that point from all the tax fraud him and his father committed. He lied about being a Christian, the only time he's ever been in a church is for a photo op or to try to talk the hypocritical evangelist into supporting him. I could go on and on, but you've obviously drank the kool aid and you're too stupid to realize when you're being lied to, that's why Trump says he loves the poorly educated he likes them stupid, so they believe his lies.
Vicki Zamow One hundred fifty billion to Iran, Benghazi, fast and furious, etc.!
Greg Merz please say you’re not a MSM sheep.
Rachelle Tanzil don’t even go there
Guy Striano   Tissue?
Heather Gurtlinger
Mike Wallet I understand it very well and have research it,  maybe you should
Correction:over 270 times!
Matt Smith the drugs are coming through in tunnels that go under walls and through legal points of entry that is well known fact that every border agent has stated.
Vicki Zamow hell yeah he was!!
Vicki Zamow only difference is that Obama was smart, this guys an idiot!
Barbara Weber it’s amazing how you cling to falsehoods.
Matt Smith yes but only problem is that is not true
Correction:over 270 times!
Vicki Zamow like ........
Vicki Zamow like?
Matt Smith yes but only problem is that is not true
Russian Troll MORON !!!!
Vicki Zamow he let in the country.
Greg Merz you are the stupid one
Like what Vicki??
Obama a Saudi Zionistt Nwo puppet no African American
Barry Burritt yeah like what!?? And I believe what ever Obama did it was over turned by Trump to make America great again!!!!!!
Obama a Saudi Zionistt Nwo puppet no African American
Right. Just like the pallets of cash dropped in the middle if the bight to Iran.
Right. Just like the pallets of cash dropped in the middle if the bight to Iran.
Mike N Caron Dios ???
Greg Merz the only one who put those kids in "cages" are their scumbag families trying to enter our country ILLEGALLY, To skirt the system and receive the free benefits then keep making babies to stay here... Well that's no longer allowed. Get over it. You want them here open your home doors..  Unlock the doors leave them wide open and let them live off YOUR PAYCHECK
Gina Mcknight, I'm so thankful for the sovereignty of God in my life and in the affairs of nations.  I am thankful to God with all my heart we were spared a presidency by HRC who has "values" which are counter to mine in countless areas.
Greg Merz, our differences probably stem from what we read and listen to rather than some of the other things you suggested.  My sources include Kerby Anderson with Point of View Radio Talk Show, the ACLJ, the The Daily Signal, etc.  I'm aware of the positions presented by the MSM, but I don't use any of them solely as my source as I want both sides as I make decisions.  Also, the Bible is a source of knowledge and wisdom for me as well, and it's timeless and helpful to all.  (Caron)
RudiToonen...at the very least, it usually means that there is very little trust between them.
Adeline Fraticelli Rangel whose doing anything illegally?
Mary Apollonio I'd say a majority of people against the wall have children or grandchildren. If you are for the wall and have kids, you're a shitty parent.
Vicki Zamow please say you are a bot, no human can be this stupid.
gods wisdom ---do not lie
Mike N Caron you're not religious then, you're deluded.
Brenda Williams Dennis another delusional religious hypocrite joins the conversation?
Jesus would be against the wall. He would welcome the refugees in and help them.
Mary Apollonio I'd say a majority of people against the wall have children or grandchildren. If you are for the wall and have kids, you're a shitty parent.
Mike N Caron so you - as a person - are for barring the downtrodden from a potentially better life?  I thought you were supposed to live according to god's teachings and resist evil?
Greg Merz, my goodness, what have I said that makes you assume that?  (Caron)
Jesus would be against the wall. He would welcome the refugees in and help them.
Mike N Caron 💯
Oh only Congress you're an old man get in the game you  are done no one cares what you think....how do you feel now
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Joan Porter just McConnell.
Chris Humenik he doesn't need a paycheck, he is making a load of money off his golf course.  Each meeting he holds there earns him a lot of money....food/accommodation/cleaning service/security/phone/internet/electricity/etc...all cost money  he's a snake
Joan Porter sad but so
Mike N Caron 💯
Joan Porter sad but so
Joan Porter we can't do anything to Congress paycheck until the next election cycle per constitutional amendment, but we do need it changed for in the future.
Lisa Palmer Fleming ----BS propaganda & you know it!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Yeah, I'm sure you have children and grandchildren to think about.
How many people here has children and grandchildren to think about.
Joan Porter we can't do anything to Congress paycheck until the next election cycle per constitutional amendment, but we do need it changed for in the future.
How many people here has children and grandchildren to think about.

He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Annie Jacobs Stevens For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants for years, without even producing ANYTHING!!!  There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Janet Braden Duvall the government is of We The People... educate yourselves! If you are a federal employee..you are the people funded by the people and if the people dispute the purse that funds security and protection for the people... yes.. some people will not be paid for a while or a long while... if you don’t like it... don’t work for the “people”!!! This is what happens when We The People are too grand.... and we the people become the bargaining “chip” !! Hold firm - #WeThePeople want #TheWall  this wall will save us money in so many ways!! Health costs, housing costs, educational cost, food costs, and more jobs for American teenagers! #Winning good job President Donald J. Trump
Emil Dörr your actually in that park. I’m self sufficient and more likely providing all your benefits.
Maik Schrank enough is enough. Tear down your wall or your fence around your home.. let them in! Oh wait... you probably don’t own! So we’re supporting all your needs! $$$$ is costly feeding, housing, healthcare, educating all these illegals.

Annie Jacobs Stevens Who is going to pay for the wall?
Sherry Carruth President Trump is trying to do all he promised but the demos will not stop oh, who cares who pays for it us taxpayers pay for every other damn corrupt thing in this country, so I say if we have to pay for something this wall would be a nice change. Just my opinion but I'd rather my tax paying dollars go to building this wall then feeding people that don't belong here and don't have to abide by the laws that I have to abide by.
Annie Jacobs Stevens Who is going to pay for the wall?
Mark Rolston For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants.   There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Mark Rolston No wall
Mark Rolston Amen to that
Mark Rolston  no creo que  Dios bendiga a quien separa alos niños de sus padres,para Dios este mundo es de todos.
Dan Shill Please Explain an give details
https://www.facebook.com/randy.weber.1675/videos/10161440828065089/UzpfSTc0Nzk3MjgwNzoxMDE1Njg2OTk5MzE4MjgwOA/
I guess the 2 year point is the time for the Democrats to act up just like they did when he was elected. Note to Dems.....The Democrat leadership wants a civil war under Trump and YOU want to give it to them. Just letting you know.
The Dems found a wedge issue to try and pit us against each other. You fell for their game!!! BWAAAHAAAHAA!!! You've been played!
Statewide, 61 percent of Texans oppose building a wall, while 35 percent support it and 4 percent don’t know or declined to answer, according to a poll conducted in April by Texas Lyceum, a nonprofit leadership organization. Residents of the Lone Star State who live, work and play along the international boundary with Mexico say they are happy that the Trump administration’s plans to quickly build the wall have encountered complications in Washington. A dispute over whether to fund the wall nearly led to a federal government shutdown in March, until the president agreed to delay the plan possibly until September. On Tuesday, Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney unveiled a 2018 budget that includes $2.6 billion for stepped-up border security, including $1.6 billion for a wall.  Read more here: https://www.star-telegram.com/news/state/texas/article152402734.html#storylink=cpy
Stephen Pierson And you know for a fact that he didn't repent and, of course, you also know he committed this sin.  OMG," let he who is without sin cast the first stone".  Doesn't matter what the sin is.  Let's not forget about Pres. Billy Boy!!!!!!
Dan Shill right there says your a hater and you think it's alright your also saying whatever you say is what goes and to inform you  old age professor you remember when Obama was in office he and his goonies basically banned God because they were offended you got that how are  you keeping up there's more and who the He-- are you to say Trump is a fool of Satan are you as demon in disguise
Mark Rolston another gool
Mark Rolston wish god are you talking about
Mark rolston your one of the deplorables is clear why white EDUCATED american didnt vote for trump.. only the trash did
The Dems found a wedge issue to try and pit us against each other. You fell for their game!!! BWAAAHAAAHAA!!! You've been played!
The demon may bless Trump?
Janet Braden Duvall at this rate you'll have enough for a wall in about 50 years... That's if you maintained the rate you had in the first 3 days... It's no where close to that now...😂😂😂
Greg Merz you a crack head ?
Mark Rolston Impeach the MoFo!!
Larry Luce Jr nope, but you certainly appear to be.
Ralph Hornsby... keep making a fool of yourself.
Statewide, 61 percent of Texans oppose building a wall, while 35 percent support it and 4 percent don’t know or declined to answer, according to a poll conducted in April by Texas Lyceum, a nonprofit leadership organization. Residents of the Lone Star State who live, work and play along the international boundary with Mexico say they are happy that the Trump administration’s plans to quickly build the wall have encountered complications in Washington. A dispute over whether to fund the wall nearly led to a federal government shutdown in March, until the president agreed to delay the plan possibly until September. On Tuesday, Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney unveiled a 2018 budget that includes $2.6 billion for stepped-up border security, including $1.6 billion for a wall.  Read more here: https://www.star-telegram.com/news/state/texas/article152402734.html#storylink=cpy
Sherry Carruth No it does not matter to them....
Roofs on airports!
Mark Rolston when Mexico pays for it maybe.
Statewide, 61 percent of Texans oppose building a wall, while 35 percent support it and 4 percent don’t know or declined to answer, according to a poll conducted in April by Texas Lyceum, a nonprofit leadership organization. Residents of the Lone Star State who live, work and play along the international boundary with Mexico say they are happy that the Trump administration’s plans to quickly build the wall have encountered complications in Washington. A dispute over whether to fund the wall nearly led to a federal government shutdown in March, until the president agreed to delay the plan possibly until September. On Tuesday, Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney unveiled a 2018 budget that includes $2.6 billion for stepped-up border security, including $1.6 billion for a wall.  Read more here: https://www.star-telegram.com/news/state/texas/article152402734.html#storylink=cpy
Mark Rolston when Mexico pays for it maybe.
Roofs on airports!
With a medevil time wall?
Diana Acosta  Is that all Americans or only his base.
Bethany Kessel  actually by building the wall it will free up billions of dollars that are used to house, feed, medical and legal fees that are used on illegal immigrants when they are caught. So by lowering the amount of illegal immigrants that are flooding into this country will free up money that can be used to help the American citizens.
Bethany Kessel are you taking care of them? I donate. My father served.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin At the moment you insult people anything you say is worthless.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you don’t support it. Don’t say we.
Donna Snowden Protect Americans. Everyone.
Janet Braden Duvall... you realize that is a scam? The money collected will never go to fund the wall
Alison Edwards Lorentz DACA recipients won't pay $5,000 most of them don't have $5
Cant protect americans by only covering less than a fourth of our border
Diana Acosta wow does that mean you too???
Bottom line is yall dont care about americans bc if you did yall would take the time to help our homeless, children and vets but yall dont ever try too but when it comes to this wall it has to be done......i really dont wanna hear we gotta protect americans first when you could care less
Diana Acosta Why do the Trump Zealots always make False Claims and False Accusation with great regularity??? Why do they have such an obsessive detachment from the Truth???
Charity Nolan We The People do not support the Wall but if the duped Trump Cult want to waste their money paying for it......so be it!!!
Alex Traynor the great wall of china worked pretty well for a while
Donna Snowden Protect Americans. Everyone.
Georgiann Gonsalves your wrong. Citizens want illegals immigrants to stop entering the US.
Georgiann Gonsalves stop drugs, criminals, and gangs. You don’t live near the border. You seem not to care about citizens dying .
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Diana Acosta OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
https://www.callmycongress.com/callmycongress.com
Maik Schrank do you live in the US?
Alison Edwards Lorentz DACA was unconstitutional. I really think DACA will not benefit America in anyway. All of them including all visa overstays and illegals immigrants need to be deported.
Alex Traynor the great wall of china worked pretty well for a while
Protect Americans from Americans with Assault Rifles, who goes in schools, churches, synagogues, night clubs, movie theatres, etc, and BRUTALLY SLAUGHTER INNOCENT AMERICANS BY THE DOZENS, INCLUDING TODDLERS AND CHILDREN LIKE IN SANDY HOOK , CT,, HOW ABOUT YOU BUILD A FREAKING WALL AROUND THEM TOO HUH?? HOW ARE YOU PROTECTING YOURSELF FROM HOME GROWN TERRORISTS AND MURDERERS??
Diana Acosta Morons,  i would say PROTECT IMMIGRANTS BEFORE NAZIS AND RACISTS AND KILLER
Kelly Dunham Hardin so what is your proposition for all those illegals flying in here?  if you are truly concerned of illegals....why aren't you fighting for the president to stop those coming in with their f1/j1 visas?  you do know those are the ones who take our higher paying jobs, right?  they speak more than one or even two languages,,,,they take high paying jobs from us easily....you think that's right?
Protect Americans! Pray every night before you go to sleep that the ANTI-CHRIST in the Oval Office drops dead in his sleep!!!
Diana Acosta ABSOLUTELY....THE WALL IS NOT THE ONLY SOLUTION....PEOPLE WILL ESCAPE INTO US WHEN THEY REALLY WANT TO,..SECURE BORDERS..,PERIOD!!!!
Alison Edwards Lorentz DACA was unconstitutional. I really think DACA will not benefit America in anyway. All of them including all visa overstays and illegals immigrants need to be deported.
Janet Braden Duvall https://www.facebook.com/reallyamerican/photos/a.942157972506564/2024361984286152/?type=3&eid=ARCI6g9Yxp4ffU-3WGhJJqWr4dU7Hp3dQNQGIHHmrZ5g4k2yk50Cw5kW9tyoMqA3o-4K8PMH9HNeT8H_&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARAXFe7eB9oeIc90Es0ZjoUnsZcbDDrqx1OMk-1LNLLfisk4KAy-HBTxrvWbVDplgRi4SSrZeWsDMvQ4IodFzIpVlzCBLwHrl2XxIH0WcXMoAgR30DcthX-aVIkAerciIDARtB0WWmWD6xeO7I58fYBPQNsVxpAqrPGggRoMVH0qF-YUvIkg5QARGl1QcLmAwqzrH8ce-hLb9uApCxprI2P4ktayeQEm429ZPRYJcsH71LbAEJ4FeHsG1nJHMv2vARGO3PfXN-zoLsAup5t_Jc37zYSkOY97C-CzcW-s-s9hzyNZMm1hMdMDCtAMpco4axJykZUMSNcVc6I6OTisPHvcdhhqxkANr5f_1uyzuhSMvyUu-fTK2IQsA7a0P3zRkP57pluQ41tZUt6idnRQCNFVP5RxIx-3uPf2sYh9ADZlPmd_XDrmMOaGjcU7LanEdMzn3dcaLckhYfR7O6dmJI_2Biwv-KaWtaizJp_HyPacs4EGytqbR1T7pwRotHfusl7AtejX66PTEnub_BeZCA&__tn__=EEHH-R
Build the wall!!!!! Do you really want all your taxes to pay for caring for the illegals instead of American's?
Nels Peterson I doubt you either.
Beverly A Lewis not always...
Diana Acosta ABSOLUTELY....THE WALL IS NOT THE ONLY SOLUTION....PEOPLE WILL ESCAPE INTO US WHEN THEY REALLY WANT TO,..SECURE BORDERS..,PERIOD!!!!
Beverly A Lewis not always...
Kelly Dunham Hardin That's right, Kelly!
Sarah Jobe maybe she should have gotten a better education in something like this happen to you..If YOU ,,Yourself cant take care of what you bore for let's say 20 yrs ,cant afford them dont have them .if YOU Afford 1 have 1 ,2 have 2 an so forth.Dont bore them if you cant feed educate housing electric water .clothing any an all care for that say 20..makes since to me an it's all pretty simple if you think about it..us tax payers are not your babies daddy ...oh but what did he die from? Never mind it really doesn't matter..no one give real details
An if you didnt read what I said ...I said she WAS doing as she should ,in so many words without looking back
Is*...
Maria Rodriguez your a true piece of feces... Do u speak English?? Do you understand your a nothing??? And to the rest of you IDIOTS Gina Walker never once said she was on govt assistance.... Y'all are are so stupid... She is working 3 jobs that are funding illegals to get help that belongs to our country... #BuildTheWall
Enrique Miller commiefornia figures.
Honey, that's your local government raping you blind.
Dianne Camper how do you know her circumstances? She may be a widow for all you know.... How do you know she is on welfare? She didn't state that she was. Maybe it was her way of saying that her money would be better spent going to get own kids.. this is nuts
I haven't met anyone that works 3 jobs qualify for welfare.. unless you count the illegals which are getting paid under the table and not paying taxes
So assuming that she is getting aid, is on you. But you can plan children you can afford and then something can bring your life crashing down.
Kelly Dunham Hardin That's right, Kelly!
So assuming that she is getting aid, is on you. But you can plan children you can afford and then something can bring your life crashing down.
Gina Walker YES!
Debra West just wait, trump will get help her.....not
Ron Johnson cowgirls suck....and your an idiot
John Baron Nope they fund illegals.
Hey idiot your children should be getting his social security $$$$$.
Maria Rodriguez grow up
Gina Walker wow! Another single mom who is working her butt off to support her kids, paying taxes, paying tuition and getting no help!  Why? Cuz we have a job.
Mark Pasquerella why you pesky lil durp durp durp dur dur dur durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝Buuuzzzzzz!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo oooo ahhh ahhh!!! Here ya go 🍌 lol
Vincent Swanson Who cares about the slick talking, Sodom and Gomorrah promoting , muslim loving, cop hating, terrorists funding, pricks popularity. Woopty damn doo . He gave medals to Hollywood celebs like are you kidding me fricking scumbag .
Carol Yancey why you little durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrp!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒 oooo ooooo aaaaahhh aaaahhh!!! Here you go lil fella 🍌
Mark Pasquerella Why you pesky little durrrrrrppppp !!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝Buuuzzzzzzz!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo aah aah !!! 🍌
Carol Yancey why you lil durrrrrrrrrppppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhhh heres your 🍌 lol
You have a great point, it’s better to shutdown the country to provide healthcare services to US citizens rather than a Wall that won’t stop the problem since more illegals are due to overstayed visas that come through airport and not by the border 👍
Gina Walker wow! Another single mom who is working her butt off to support her kids, paying taxes, paying tuition and getting no help!  Why? Cuz we have a job.
Rae Etta Mazi  DRUMBF'S ARE NAZI'S!! HOW WE SKEW THINGS AROUND WHEN SCARED!!!
Rae Etta - gets the facts before you spew crap!
Rae Etta Mazi CRY AND WHINE!! HOW DID THAT DRUMBF TAX BREAK HELP YA? OMG THE HYPOCRISY!!
Rae Etta Mazi STOP PARROTING DRUMBF!! IT'S TIRED ALREADY!!!
Rae Etta Mazi the only times my house or car have been broken into was by white American males... so your point is??? A large majority know the wall is a lame useless 'bright shiny object' for trumputin to dangle in front of his gullible base to keep you distracted from his corruption.
You have a great point, it’s better to shutdown the country to provide healthcare services to US citizens rather than a Wall that won’t stop the problem since more illegals are due to overstayed visas that come through airport and not by the border 👍
Rae Etta Mazi as soon as Mexico pays for it! tRump promised! We just waiting!! Duh!
that is not the definition of a democrat.  It is absolutely absurd how everyone now believes that one democrat's behaviour represents all.  A white male Christian murdered a group of people in a church at prayer. Does that mean that all white male Christians are evil murderers?  Do you see how ridiculous it is to group everyone into one pile?  This divisiveness by the president is dangerous, and you are the perfect example to the danger....so much anger...winning yet so full of anger and unhappiness
Gordon Ashackersson no that would be forced or get penalized
Rae Etta Mazi the only times my house or car have been broken into was by white American males... so your point is??? A large majority know the wall is a lame useless 'bright shiny object' for trumputin to dangle in front of his gullible base to keep you distracted from his corruption.
Gordon Ashackersson no that would be forced or get penalized
DaDawg House just borders
Aldo Guzman does your neighbors have a fence to keep your dogs from bothering them?
retard alert
DaDawg House Libtard ass hat
Difference IS....a HUGE part of the Country wasn't HATING Obama's GUTS like they do Trump's.
DaDawg House Libtard ass hat
Aldo Guzman very different! Wow! As soon as Mexico pays for it!
Michael Hale you realize by definition those are two different things right? Oh, nevermind
Aldo Guzman very different! Wow! As soon as Mexico pays for it!
lowes record
Keri Ann Tucke the steel mills that the steel companies said aren’t happening?
Ryan North not yet
Gwen Fiebelkorn keep your friends close and enemies closer! Most people in Government and power are Globalist Traitors. Now he’s weeding them out. Just look even forced out the head of the world bank.
Ryan North not yet
Wow......  Bet you like those child tax credits...  Ken....
Kenneth McIntyre you r such a clueless idiot
Remember Obamacare repeal? Republican House and Senate, Republican president, and Donald whiffed, twice. As I said, the Democrats are not the reason he constantly fails.
Remember Obamacare repeal? Republican House and Senate, Republican president, and Donald whiffed, twice. As I said, the Democrats are not the reason he constantly fails.
Diane Gippetti Those came by plane, months and months earlier
Kenneth, your head still up your moms uterus?
The real problem with people over staying their visa's are the people who say nothing if they know someone who is over staying their visa's.
No, that isn’t at all what it is like. A wall is a moronic idea that will never happen with or without the funding because the land is privately owned. It will be tied up in courts for decades! It is an unnecessary waste of resources. Since you people resist reliable news sources, I strongly suggest you start looking at objective data. Court filings, the US Army Risk Assessment..,etc. Or, don’t and be gobsmacked when you find out just how idiotic your comments were, and how close you came to losing the country you profess to love.
Kevin Couture yer still upset Trump Happened?  Get over it buttercup!!  MSM has, and continues, to lie to you!!  You want to see what immigration policies should be like...try crossing into Mexico illegally, or for that matter...all the things you would need to prove and provide to the Mexican government before you could move there LEGALLY!!
David Heard  (hurts their little fragile feelings)....
Go suck a big fat DICK!!
Kevin Couture wow, CNN talking points, impressive.........
You suck...move to Russia Biaaatch!
Kevin Couture the wall will stop caravans of illegals from walking across the border. You think
Kevin, you're just plain ignorant.
Jenny McFarland Believe it!  😂
If you'd look in the right direction you'd figure it our for yourself, we can't do everything for you
Kevin Couture how would the wall hurt?
Lol polling data isn’t classified information
Manaforts case has nothing to do with trump. Wake up dems are scared they will lose there money cow. chucky stopped the negotions dec 23. his shutdown
Look At The Crimes The One,s In Office Do Now And Get Away With It? There In Office.They All Need To Get Out. Thank God For President Trump. .
Smith Helen Jessica  deluded person!!!
Kevin Couture how would the wall hurt?
Smith Helen Jessica duh wuh happen
Gary Abbott no, it’s worse.
Smith Helen Jessica  deluded person!!!
Smith Helen Jessica eh..  Canadian crutch
Vi Christensen more successful than u ...great family no drugs or drinking hmmm little Obama daughter sucking on cigarettes and weed  hmmm Trump 2020
Smith Helen Jessica, you're a moron.
Roger Rose 🤦🏻‍♀️🤦🏻‍♀️🤦🏻‍♀️
Smith Helen Jessica I guess you've been living in a cave and didn't know Hillary is the one who rigged the election against Bernie and paid for the fake dossier on Russian collusion. It's sheeple like you that are the true threat to this great country.
Snowflake
Smith Helen Jessica Hillary bleached.... nothing to hide there. Lock her up!! Bill won’t mind.
Bye
Angus Crawford but he was coerced and him and his family threatened with jail time after he wouldn't go along with Mueller. All these trials and admitting crimes has been forced by Mueller. His actions are not  allowed toward murders but he's getting away with it for the so called collusion bs.
Smith Helen Jessica only because you don’t like the outcome
Smith Helen Jessica if you let a Russian in the voting booth with you that is your stupidity. The American citizens voted for Donald Trump.  No Russians were in the booth with them. Live in your fairytale Russian collusion that they put Trump into office.  The only ties to Russia is the fake dossier paid for by the Hillary Clinton campaign, which was used to open an investigation. I do not give a crap about anything Manafort did.  The citizens of the United States voted but the democrats cannot accept the election of Donald Trump.
Rigged? So was your birth Smith Helen Jessica... The best part of you ran down your moms leg. She should’ve swallowed.
Smith Helen Jessica No one is responsible for this shut down by President Trump he is on tape saying that he would take the responsibility what else do you need as proof that this man is a jack ass
She gives you proof but, you still don't care...
June Norrell who me? Or him? https://drive.google.com/file/d/1L8AAMho5cUxHl28zc1H--jEKUDteyuX7/view
Its like living with a five-year-old.
Georgia Wass my career was in healthcare. $5.6B doesn’t touch what is invested in healthcare. You just like to hear yourself talk.
Doug Reiselt Did I say it 'touched it'? Not exactly relevant is it. You surely can't be saying that the current expenditure is the absolute perfect maximum required.
Georgia Wass haha. So you’re such an expert, how much more is the right number😂
This conversation is going nowhere. Let me know when you can comment without including an insult 👋
Doug Reiselt https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
June Norrell who me? Or him? https://drive.google.com/file/d/1L8AAMho5cUxHl28zc1H--jEKUDteyuX7/view
Doug Reiselt https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Doug Reiselt Um or you could save heaps of lives (real ones, not hypothetical ones) by investing the money in something useful, like healthcare.
Kevin Couture how many illegal immigrants are you willing to take into your household?
Trump knows how ridiculous this wall is..he knew democrats wouldn't go for it because of how ridiculous the amount of money he wants..he knew this would happend..and he let it because he knew you guys would fall for the "this is the democrats fault" and you guys are really biting rhe bait. At least we can see people true colors now. Smh
Carol Roberts Soutar Socialism.
Kevin Couture Build the wall!
Kevin Couture says the traitor that cares more about the illegal aliens than your own fellow citizens.
Diane Sanchez LOL Did your California physic tell you this? Or your crystal ball? Maybe your magic eight ball? No matter which you used, you most definitely need to get more educated forms of information! Hilarious! Bless your little heart!
Kevin Couture you’re an idiot.
Somone call the mensa hotline....we've got a live one!🤣😂
Doug Reiselt Um or you could save heaps of lives (real ones, not hypothetical ones) by investing the money in something useful, like healthcare.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you just a durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrpppp durp durp !!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooh ooooooh ah ah ahhhh!!!


Loser loser
What an idiot
Somone call the mensa hotline....we've got a live one!🤣😂
Kevin Couture I just looked at Kevin's profile pics lol. I have never seen a more unattractive family lol. Kevin you should have all been sterilized at birth. One is uglier than the next. Gross
Kevin Couture dumbass
Kevin Couture your a idiot
Commie traitor
January 2017 - Trump inaugurated - GOP majorities in both houses of Congress January 2017 Wall not an emergency February 2017 Wall not an emergency March 2017 Wall not an emergency April 2017 Wall not an emergency May 2017 Wall not an emergency June 2017 Wall not an emergency July 2017 Wall not an emergency August 2017 Wall not an emergency September 2017 Wall not an emergency October 2017 Wall not an emergency November 2017 Wall not an emergency December 2017 Wall not an emergency January 2018 Wall not an emergency February 2018 Wall not an emergency March 2018 Wall not an emergency April 2018 Wall not an emergency May 2018 Wall not an emergency June 2018 Wall not an emergency July 2018 Wall not an emergency August 2018 Wall not an emergency September 2018 Wall not an emergency October 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Democratic majority elected in House January 2019  EMERGENCY
Tim Vander Meer And they still have people break in with a wall. Plus most Hollywood stars live in gated communities.  That doesn’t stop them either.
Carol Roberts Soutar Schumer s number isn't right...the last 4 is 6542
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin your a special kinda stupid
What an idiot

How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin your a special kinda stupid

Jackie Brickey, all you have to do is look at the figures U.S. Customs and Border Protection puts out. The "emergency crisis" was manufactured by Trump.  https://www.axios.com/reality-check-trumps-border-crisis-b5e43a70-94d1-40b2-be48-b4a523a57c57.html
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???



”FEAR, FEAR, HYSTERIA, FEAR!” Its all you idiots have.  Prepping the public for Trumps lies, lies, lies, yeah...https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?utm_term=.cef9ae46d43c
Kevin Courture Since you feel that way, why don't you take another couple thousand and add to your "backyard". https://mainefirstmedia.com/2018/05/gang-of-somali-kids-attack-park-goers-in-lewiston/
Joe Stark what a small comment.
Chris Cjkodaharianna made me laugh outloud! Well said!!
Jackie Brickey, we actually read and go to college in NY.
Joe Stark awesome
Victor Manuel that may be but until you've visited the border you have no idea what it's like.  I'm sorry but it depends on who you ask as to which story you will get
”FEAR, FEAR, HYSTERIA, FEAR!” Its all you idiots have.  Prepping the public for Trumps lies, lies, lies, yeah...https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?utm_term=.cef9ae46d43c
AJ.... then we better add a roof to the wall. I’d say floor and ceiling help just a little no?
Slow your roll cuck. Don't cry yourself to sleep. You have 6 more years.
Kevin Couture Russian bots are easy to spot. Nice try pos
Tonight's speech is BS. Nothing but a manufactured crisis.

Roberta Hayes apparently it works for Democrats.
Victor Manuel that may be but until you've visited the border you have no idea what it's like.  I'm sorry but it depends on who you ask as to which story you will get
Kevin Couture. He is a troll that looks like a child molester.
Kevin Couture you liberal moron, no matter what you think TRUMP IS STILL YOUR PRESIDENT ! MAGA ! GO TRUMP ! TRUMP 2020 !
Aquaman for President in 2020
Kevin Couture all I see from you is that your only uneducated comments are name calling. I'm guessing you're way too stupid to have an adult conversation. You're a typical unintelligent liberal.
Roberta Hayes apparently it works for Democrats.
Dennis Brewer the police don’t protect they run... look at the school shooting in Florida
Kevin Couture what about a wall for America??!!!!
Bert Bowers if his mom did anal we wouldn't have to deal with him
Kevin Couture all I see from you is that your only uneducated comments are name calling. I'm guessing you're way too stupid to have an adult conversation. You're a typical unintelligent liberal.
Fact is you dumbocrats started it all with the wall. We are gonna finish it. Go ahead click the link pussy....  https://www.facebook.com/100001873735362/posts/2436751456397288/

No wonder you think you don't need a wall up there in Maine, but you could be fooled and care about the rest of us.
So this is how you try to feel relevant, you must not have any children with special needs. You lose all credibility when you use the word Tard, take a look in the mirror scumbag.
Bert Bowers if his mom did anal we wouldn't have to deal with him
Hes just concerned about vengeful lobsters
Kevin Couture  Remember when President Trump said"if you like your insurance you can keep your insurance. Period?" Oh wait.  Remember when President Trump told the story of being shot at by snipers? Oh wait.   So how many illegals live with you? No I didn't think so.  You don't lock your doors, home or car ever do you? No I didn't think so. Hypocrite.
Kevin wants unregistered immigrants in this country.  He loves the fact that he can exploit the labor and he supports corporations doing the same.  His hatred for immigrants is deep,  he wants to use them and give them no access to the privileges actual citizens enjoy.  He'd own slaves if he could.
Kevin Couture eat dick asshole.
Kevin Couture  Remember when President Trump said"if you like your insurance you can keep your insurance. Period?" Oh wait.  Remember when President Trump told the story of being shot at by snipers? Oh wait.   So how many illegals live with you? No I didn't think so.  You don't lock your doors, home or car ever do you? No I didn't think so. Hypocrite.
All the men that dont support the wall or the president sit down to pee. All the women who dont support him are hung like male orangutans. Thanks Obama for your roles reversing gender crisis
you're a dumbass braindead POS Kevin
Kevin Couture DOTARD? Kevin have another drink.
you're a dumbass braindead POS Kevin
Kevin Couture retard you are.
Sarah Jobe, Expecting people to work without pay is never gonna fly no matter how you spin it.
Teresa Franklin Yep we see this every day with people ( illegals and legals) we work they play.
Bing Heet must be looking at your fake profile
LaVerne Avenatti yeah, thanks. I've sacrificed plenty. Dipshit.
Teresa Franklin lol I Understand  Not being paid However President Trump has Tried and Tried to negotiate with her and she Consistently Says NO! I don’t care What you think She’s Not willing to negotiate! What would you have him do? He Wants to Keep America Safe! We the people Want that steel barrier! Wonder How Many cons at your husbands prison are illegals? Wonder how many have murdered Americans? You don’t care? Well I’m Sorry for you! I like Many millions of Americans ARE Praying for these people not getting paid but these Dems HAVE to be willing to compromise!!!
Just a lie by trump
Kevin Couture retard you are.
Whit Toby Gannaway where is the. Wall being built that trump is lying about like nancy say no wall
Cut other spending. Not fair to hold back paychecks from those that are with him.
Just a lie by trump
Stockholm Syndrome is a bitch, ain't it?
Bing, no, actually, Charles is one of the most generously kind, big hearted humans walking planet Earth. He is bigger than life, and has a love for America that should inspire everyone.  He has friends from all walks of life, all over the world. So, no, he isn't a troll. He is a living legend.  #ChuckRocks
Charles Shuck you dumbass!!
Take it out of congresses ass!
No one is holding us (feds) hostage. We will get paid regardless. WALL.
No one is holding us (feds) hostage. We will get paid regardless. WALL.
That was the dumbest comment I've ever read. I'm now stupid from reading it thanks libtard
You forgot to name American cars! We need to consciously buy American products.       Buying American supports our country, our citizens and our economy! It’s a Homerun!
Corey Monette the only hope America has is Trump
Kevin Koppmeier says the libtard ass hat
Kathleen O'Connell add closer
Kathleen your a special kinda stupid
Brenen Oakley Dukeman, yes indeed, you are so right, the blame should be placed on the parents!  But they're always shifting the blame to the US!
Kathleen O'Connell what has he lied about?? please post some examples of what he actually said that turned out to be alive? And I don't mean Little White lies like the size of his crowd. big lies, that have impacted people's lives, kind of like the Beau Bergdahl story and Benghazi, fast and furious and the money that was sent to Iran in the middle of the night . You know all that stuff that happened under Obama that the mainstream media never told you about.  Please, please post something that backs up what you say. You Liberals are all the same. You have nothing, you know know facts, you just parrot whatever your cult, the mainstream media shovels down your throats. It's people like you that are going to get us all killed.
Sandra Dodson Rankin 100%!
Corey Monette the only hope America has is Trump
Jill Travassos The victims of Trump's phoney university and charity might disagree with you. So would his wives. But you just keep proving P.T. Barnum right.
And then? Pleass tell me more.
Kathleen O'Connell says the stereotypical libtard
Sandra Dodson Rankin 100%!
Reni Isufova Let’s get one thing straight we don’t like the Russians
Jean Dudley how much time do you have?
Kathleen O'Connell says the stereotypical libtard
Tom Bieler its easier to blame the russians. For one thing I agree with Trump- thats our love for Vladimir Putin
Edward Odine  Obama said "if you like your insurance you can keep your insurance. Period"  Obama said "The average family will save $4500 a year" with his massive lie known as Obamacare.
Kathleen O'Connell stop watching CNN
Richard McGrath They mayor of NY just announced free medical care for all illegals in NYC,,,,,,They will probably flock here so the rest of NY can again pay for NYC's stupid crap. '
James Cuneo your stupid!!!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
James Cuneo For 5,6 Bn you could built 10 big factories and give work to thousands of Americans AND Immigrants for years, without even producing ANYTHING!!!  There is no CRISIS at the boarder  A Crisis is what he is telling about IS beaten....
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin  if you don’t live in America you don’t matter .. so hush!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin Not you again omg yooooouuuuu!!!! Durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrpppp !!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buuuuzzzzzz!!!! Killer bees 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo ahhh ahhh ahhh ahhh. Here ya go 🍌
Obama does not have any concept about Christianity. You must know Christ.
Kathleen O'Connell stop watching CNN
https://www.gofundme.com/thetrumpwall?utm_source=facebook&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=fb_dn_cpgnsharebartop_r
Obama does not have any concept about Christianity. You must know Christ.
Richard McGrath who cares?
Missouri stands with him too!!
Laura Holland quit letting them overstay the visas....that is a start
Marcie Pavy  Obamas Border Chief, who Trump let go, says differently! Try reading it, you might actually learn the truth! https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.bizpacreview.com%2F2019%2F01%2F08%2Fobamas-border-chief-who-was-let-go-by-trump-breaks-his-silence-and-dems-are-not-going-to-like-it-711615&h=AT2MlPgc0Imr9ZaYI0mvAQqxxNeaCJTkrny22ovB7ZssaqPagcDAy_ele2dMs84gbhtXGOW5CK5C5mvJETuefw7XvT3QC7JIuNkzUr5aTQRvkXAfjpoM259uJJ4Bh-Z8QgzeAsZ2Pg8&s=1
Laura Holland most illegals fly into America according to the statistics
Barb Radd. Especially if you live near the border. If you are from the North you wouldn't understand unless you see it in the border states.
Laura Holland https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Missouri stands with him too!!
Lisa Palmer Fleming you really are stupid you pathetic libtard ass hat
Barb Radd says the libtard ass hat
Laura Holland AMEN.  Drugs and illegals are crossing the border in large numbers .. #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
Marcie Pavy what is then?
Laura Holland https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Marcie Pavy what is then?
Lisa Palmer Fleming thank you for calling me a dimwit - it shows how kind you are
Becky Geyer Price nobody is perfect. Only Jesus Christ, and he knows that! Its whats in your heart.
Davita Levao Jesus would confront him like he did the Pharisees. Except the Pharisees didn’t actually teach hate and intolerance. So Jesus would have a field day with teaching the president
Davita Levao Really?  Read the Good Book...KJV... Ephesians 5:5. ..there is no room in the kingdom of God for a whoremonger
Davita Levao.. Who are you to judge? That's Gods Job..Not Yours. I know you cannot Walk on Water. Shame on You!!
Becky Geyer Price , who did he murder? David committed adultry and murdered her husband, who was David's loyal servant, yet God still used him for his own purpose.
Davita Levao but Jesus would not be a pussy grabbing lying adulterer more likely Trump is the spawn of Satan
Kelley McComb are you really going to compare the god of the old testament with the God of the new testament, you want all the genicide, slavery, stoning and incest...really you must miss the old days (3000 years ago)🤣
Lisa Palmer Fleming thank you for calling me a dimwit - it shows how kind you are
Davita Levao dear lord, it seems Davita was born without a brain - please lord give her one with the intelligence to realize that the cult 45 and it’s sinners are a bad thing bigly.  Jesus please help the retarded Davita realize praying on FB is not only stupid it’s completely and epically sinful !! Thanks god for the Democrats that now rule the house and soon the senate and presidency - send all the sinful Trumpanzees straight to their hell - thanks dear lord !!
🤢🤮🍆💦

Kelley McComb are you really going to compare the god of the old testament with the God of the new testament, you want all the genicide, slavery, stoning and incest...really you must miss the old days (3000 years ago)🤣
Are you really comparing Trump to Jesus?  You must be joking.
Davita Levao... you speak blasphemy. T-rump is a tool of Satan.
Davita Levao... you speak blasphemy. T-rump is a tool of Satan.
Michael Wilson  https://www.facebook.com/groups/donaldtrump4president2016/permalink/2833496133343618/
We have a massive defense budget already. What's fiscally responsible about spending more money when we have some 50% of the budget is already for defense?
Johnnie Powell unlike most spending, this would pay itself back in a year; even if it’s only 10% effective
Its not about the money it's because Miss NANCY has a chip on her shoulder for the President... For some reason the woman has a power problem an maybe a bit of a control freak. (Honestly wear would she get maids an lawn boys for the price she puts in Americans laps...lol)
Sean McPhee Interesting, very valuble input. Please, share more of your knowledge.
Are you really comparing Trump to Jesus?  You must be joking.
That us MATH.  You encroach on the Algebraic; you confuse the simpleton -DemocRAT...
Michael Wilson Stfu you durp durp durp dur dur duuuurrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo aaaaah aaaah!!! Here you go lil 🐒🍌
Sean McPhee Interesting, very valuble input. Please, share more of your knowledge.
Michael Wilson they were for it before they are now against it; why?! The issue is the same. What Obama and Schumer said in 2009 is just as true (if not more so) as it is today.   In other words the only thing that changed is the politics of if. They don’t like the person saying it, so they must resist like Trump is the Borg queen or something. Not even Captain Janeway could negotiate with people who argue against themselves! Lol
Jody Radtke Vie learn how the government works.  You need 60 to pass.  It requires bipartisan support.
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10156746863402278&id=772847277
Treava Lancaster he must be a battle star galactic warrior, still living in cartoon world and believes bunnies and kitties died for him. His intelligence just oozes out of his comments.
The walls and fences around people's homes are there more to distinguish property lines, than to keep people out.   If someone was really determined to get in to your property. How long do you think it would take for someone to jump your wall or fence, my guess is not very long.   What really deters people from entering is survelience equipment, like cameras and security lighting or a dog, which acts as a pseudo guard.   The 2 billion that has been agreed on by the house and senate is by far more than enough money. To spend on more border patrol agents, increasing security features at the southern border and other ports of entry where the most illegal drugs, come in through.   But why can't the members of Cult 45 comprehend that.
Michael Wilson they were for it before they are now against it; why?! The issue is the same. What Obama and Schumer said in 2009 is just as true (if not more so) as it is today.   In other words the only thing that changed is the politics of if. They don’t like the person saying it, so they must resist like Trump is the Borg queen or something. Not even Captain Janeway could negotiate with people who argue against themselves! Lol
Treava Lancaster absolutely they must all have fences and doors that don’t work on their houses and they took God out of country back when Obama was in office
Kevin Fo-Shizzle Oravits Don’t forget about these shutdowns... just saying!   December 5, 1995, to January 6, 1996 President: Bill Clinton  Senate: Republicans (53-47), Majority Leader Bob Dole  House: Republicans (235-198), Speaker Newt Gingrich  Why: This shutdown, which lasted the better part of a month, was all about whether to use economic forecasts from the Congressional Budget Office or the Office of Management and Budget to determine whether the White House’s budget plan would balance. The CBO was more cautious, and projected that Clinton would still have a $115 billion deficit in seven years under his plan. Republicans eventually caved after 21 days, and Clinton then proposed a plan that the CBO agreed balanced the budget. Some 284,000 workers were furloughed, in the longest shutdown in history.  October 1 to 17, 2013 President: Barack Obama  Senate: Democrats (54-46), Majority Leader Harry Reid  House: Republicans (232-200), Speaker John Boehner  Why: Ted Cruz, basically. While House Republicans, led by Boehner, had pressured the White House into agreeing to lower levels of discretionary spending, and conservatives in the House led by Rep. Tom Graves (R-GA) demanded that any funding bill delay implementation of Obamacare by a year. It was set to roll out the following year, and conservatives, most vocally led by Cruz and Heritage Action, were desperate to stop it before it gained beneficiaries who could defend it politically. Enough House conservatives got on board with the plan to make it impossible to pass a continuing resolution, and the government shut down.  After 17 days, Boehner folded and passed a funding bill that did not defund Obamacare and that most of his caucus opposed. Roughly 850,000 workers, or about 40 percent of the federal workforce, were furloughed.  Oh, how the left loves to forget! 🤦🏻‍♀️
Old news
President Trump, ask the Democrats Pelosi, Schumer, Clinton, Obama if they would be OK with illegals/migrants climbing over their walls and entering their houses illegally, if they would be OK with it?
The walls and fences around people's homes are there more to distinguish property lines, than to keep people out.   If someone was really determined to get in to your property. How long do you think it would take for someone to jump your wall or fence, my guess is not very long.   What really deters people from entering is survelience equipment, like cameras and security lighting or a dog, which acts as a pseudo guard.   The 2 billion that has been agreed on by the house and senate is by far more than enough money. To spend on more border patrol agents, increasing security features at the southern border and other ports of entry where the most illegal drugs, come in through.   But why can't the members of Cult 45 comprehend that.
Kevin Fo-Shizzle Oravits very true
President Trump, ask the Democrats Pelosi, Schumer, Clinton, Obama if they would be OK with illegals/migrants climbing over their walls and entering their houses illegally, if they would be OK with it?
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
James McCaskill If you support the wall call this number 800-350-6647 then press 1 it tells the government we want the wall. I just did it.  Copied and reposted Nancy's number 202-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck's 202-224-7433. Be professional, but demand the wall funds.  Repost numbers. Let's do this. Leave a message, Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!! If mailboxes are full PRESS 3 and leave a message.
James McCaskill comparing the southern border to a house is moronic..
James McCaskill there’s a lock on my house, but if someone wanted to get in, they could. The border is no different. I don’t have a fence around my house. One isn’t needed because if someone wanted to come over it to break into my house, they would. The fence wouldn’t stop them, but I’d be out a lot of money. See the similarities?  The only way to keep out intruders would be with other methods, like a watchdog or obvious cameras. The point is, there are more effective methods.
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
James McCaskill because the idiots that cause most crime statistically are already here. Mexicans can get through my fence as I gave them a key so they can rake my leaves and clean the pool.
Vinnie Paul no it isn't moronic. If you are so against a wall, then take in 3 families of illegal immigrants, provide fiid, shelter, healthcare, etc and be held responsible for any crimes they commit.
James McCaskill because the idiots that cause most crime statistically are already here. Mexicans can get through my fence as I gave them a key so they can rake my leaves and clean the pool.
Greg Van Beek what he said
Ruth Gum So smart eh?
Samuel Gillette you sure seem brilliant give me the adress you seem like an easy enough victim for me . You durp durp durp dur dur  durrrrrrp durp durp !!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzzzzz!!!!!!!!!!!
Who ever pays for the wall will build the wall. You really want Mexico to build your wall?  Lmfao
He NEVER said they would write a check! Omg. Stop it already.
He lied as usual
Anissa Thomas yea, we need to protect idiots like you that can’t spell MAYBE!!! 🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️
You dems have the same weak talking points!! Dearing his campaign he said I know Mexico wont cut a check for the wall but we will be reimbursed threw trade!! You bems love tell half truths!!
Another simpleton weighs in...Jesus Christ. That has got to be deliberate. People cannot be that stupid. People who cannot construct a simple sentence are calling other people weak and stupid. Wtf is even going on here?! It’s just embarrassing.
Like I said, embarrassing.
Good idea. Reverse psychology. It always works on the weak minded.
When trump was asked who was paying for the wall, he said “Mexico is going to pay for it”  If you want to spin it to fit your narrative than that’s up to you. I prefer to take what he says at face value and believe none of it. He’s a fraud and a liar.
He lied as usual
Donald Trump promised that Mexico was going to pay for the wall. Now he is demanding that we pay for it or else. I don’t disagree that we need border security.
Peggy Scott..do you?
Anissa Thomas drumpf loves the uneducated 😂  Time for English class comrade
When did I say it was ok to break campaign promises?
Nancy Calzada Pelczar, I pay taxes, a lot of taxes, do you?
Sure do.
When trump was asked who was paying for the wall, he said “Mexico is going to pay for it”  If you want to spin it to fit your narrative than that’s up to you. I prefer to take what he says at face value and believe none of it. He’s a fraud and a liar.
So are all of you ok with this shutdown AND paying for the wall out of your taxes?
Wtf does healthcare have to do with that dumb wall?
Your original post is rude. So....yes? You’re all ok with having funds for the wall come out of your taxes?
Sure do.
Republicans again. You can tell by their inability to construct a sentence. Simpleton.
Do you get that if you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor, or that healthcare costs will go down? Kinda the same thing.
I would too!
Do you get that if you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor, or that healthcare costs will go down? Kinda the same thing.
I would too!
Jesse McMurray yes but they knocked first
How about this Nancy Pelosi just added 12 billion extra dollars to Foreign countries for abortion, so why can’t we get the 5 billion from that money.
Vanessa Nguyen  But a wall is not a door. A wall doesn’t have locks.
Diane Smith  Omg, are you brainless.  Do I have to literally explain everything to you.   Think  Locking your door will not guarantee the thieves won’t break in your house, but not locking your house will greatly increase chance of having thieves breaking your house Having a border wall will not eliminate 100% of illegal immigrants, but it will greatly reduce the number of illegal immigrants.   Doing nothing will not eliminate illegals  The truth is all those liberals against border wall are making excuses so that we will not have the border, and the illegals from all over the world are free to sneak in America any time they want.
Debbie Derenthall you're so Pretty
Cora Pantoja SO true
Jason Grader me!! I would donate 2 weeks as well
James Smith do you lock your door when people come and ask you for help?
Jesse McMurray , not if they come the right way, not by jumping my fence.
Cora Pantoja SO true
Jesse McMurray  First, you don’t leave you door open so anyone can get into your house. Second, if someone knocks on your door, you have to screen him first.  If you have your door open, then anyone, including murderer, and thieves will live in your home.
We stand with u and the Singh family who lost their loved one and the city of Newman who lost an amazing human being and law enforcement officer
Scott Wolf DEMOCRATS want 54billion for foreign affairs...
Lora Pettiford thanks
We stand with u and the Singh family who lost their loved one and the city of Newman who lost an amazing human being and law enforcement officer
Lora Pettiford thanks
Matt Bachugan ,  typical demo, I WANT, IWANT, I WANT!
Matt Bachugan so donate your tax check to help nuild the wall
Holly Buchholz your right I could but a trampoline makes you bounce higher
Dale Rice well ye I want my tax return I pay my taxes unlike your dumb president lol
Matt Bachugan Hey youngster, don’t call my president names. How do you rate a tax return when you’ve probably never earned a pay day in your short life. Let the adults comment while you go play.
Ray Wolfe this was two days ago your late buddy
Ryan Wasajewski 1. A large trampoline is around 500 to 600 dollars 2. Itd make trump a criminal to not pay taxes 3. Damn son wered you get that diss almost hurt my feelings
Also I dont have to call don  cheeto, president just to make you cucks happy sorry if that hurts your feelings but its freedom of speech so I'll address the oompa loompa ambassador as I please
Scott Wolf DEMOCRATS want 54billion for foreign affairs...
Why I gotta love meth ? You must be  out your damn mind lol. You dont even know me . Furthermore its Which Not witch you must be into broomsticks lol.
Yeet, Salem 1693 I'm one of the ones that lived, and being a witch would still be better than trying to hit on a methheead over the internet buddy
For the last time I am not a meth head . You not gonna get me to curse you out and get put in fb jail . Not today satan .
Who is hitting on meth heads ?
Micheal Marceaux sure you aren't buddy
Yay, finally an intelligent American ...  My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
I aint your damn buddy dude wtf . 🐒🐒🐒🐒 you and your trampoline lol .
Micheal Marceaux bounce bounce bounce bounce buddy guy friend pal
Also I dont have to call don  cheeto, president just to make you cucks happy sorry if that hurts your feelings but its freedom of speech so I'll address the oompa loompa ambassador as I please
Matt Bachugan tax returns will not get affected by this shut down. IRS employees will be called back in to process returns.
Matt Bachugan your the most disgusting human being...why would you say something so stupid and ignorant.....you Democrats are the dipshit dumbasses of America....
Breanna Bunner I like your 🐱 meeeeeeeeowwwww!!!!
Breanna Bunner well if your the owner of the cat good cause I'm sure it looks three times worse than you, Micheal Marceaux and here we have the neanderthal unable to get past racial barriers, Tina Magaro FoustFoustand most of you are stupid so good on you,
Micheal Marceaux your in to meatheads, you can see the tracks lol
Matt Bachugan I pay taxes I dont get a refund, I'm a working American who pays for dipshits like you to get a refund you dont deserve
Matt wtf are you talking about strange dude . I found away to curse yall out without getting banned lmao
I cant say what I really want to say lol .
Witch is what? That you love meth?
Micheal Marceaux bounce bounce bounce bounce buddy guy friend pal
Hey asshat you are getting your refund jerk off.. stop crying
Matt Bachugan difference is apparently you are counting on yours.. for some of us it's just a bonus, some of us don't count on money that isn't in our hands.
Nah heather it's just I want to get a trampoline I have a pay check but it would be much easier to pay for one in full with my tax return
I'd rather put my checks into my Bill's something I'm sure you dont understand cause I'm sure you live off your husband
Durp durp durp dur dur durrrrr durp durp !!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzz!!!!!!!
I highly doubt you even get a tax return
🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooooh ooooooohh ahhhhh ahhhhh!!!!
Matt Bachugan well now ya look real smart....not
Witch is what? That you love meth?
Matt Bachugan jump on your bed....
Wow, guess this one is not going to be a front line defender for his country when a wall gets in his way of a trampoline he is not going to take a bullet for freedom.
Matt Bachugan well now ya look real smart....not
Wow, guess this one is not going to be a front line defender for his country when a wall gets in his way of a trampoline he is not going to take a bullet for freedom.
Moats only work on level ground.  Think about it.
Ben Herbst Fill it with liberals that have been refused their meds! Rats with rabies!
Matt Bachugan jump on your bed....
Ben Herbst Fill it with liberals that have been refused their meds! Rats with rabies!
Joan Weaver Krieg who says????? Trump???? The lier
GOD BLESS YOU!
Jill Walker do you have children?
Ben Herbst - Hypocritical don’t you think, or is it only ok for the Pussygrabber In Chief to insult women?   🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Jill Walker do you have children?
Courtney Syester states are doing that now trump dosent have to
Jacob Bright that’s not working & needs fixed federally liked he said he would do! Again he doesn’t keep his word.
GOD BLESS YOU!
Jacob Bright that’s not working & needs fixed federally liked he said he would do! Again he doesn’t keep his word.
Troll somewhere else demonrat
Mark Levasseur I bet you and all the others that liked your post, doesnt have children or grandchild.
Mark Levasseur you must be from the twilight zone lol . Aliens are among us .
Courtney Syester states are doing that now trump dosent have to
Mark Levasseur you must be from the twilight zone lol . Aliens are among us .
Both sides of Congress should go without salary for a year it would solve all of our financial issues.
Richard Smith He can declare a national emergency but like his other executive orders will be struck down by the courts & he can’t have Pelosi or Schumer arrested. Obviously by your posts the US is grossly underfunding mental health.
I think you're thinking of Russia or North Korea--we are nation of laws--not tyranny.Here, there are three EQUAL branches of government--not one is above the rest. If you don't like it, well, I suspect you know how that phrase ends.
Barbara Stockwell, The Dems just took control of the House. The Republicans had all 3 branches for 2 years. If it really was an emergency don't you think they would have passed A bill for the wall?
Dems there coming for u
My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1155510014605234&id=227505360917068
Both sides of Congress should go without salary for a year it would solve all of our financial issues.
Barbara Hunter under a  executive order he can
just build the wall with them two on the other side of it!
Heil Trump
Richard Smith so your nurse quit?
Stephen Pierson poor snowflake you mad bro
Greg Merz poor snowflake no you can have your mom back
Saige Turner quite snowflake troll
If he does that.. The funding comes from our military budget which also includes us veterans
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1155510014605234&id=227505360917068
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Richard Smith for the party that claims law and order you sure don’t seem to know much about either
Matthew Kentner And who did that poll, and who was polled? Really? Polls dont work, just ask Hillary.
Dan Zwicke Donald is the biggest snake in the swamp. Yes, we’ll clean the swamp!!!
Sherry Carruth it doesn't matter to him....just look at his responses...he's so full of anger and cannot even have an adult conversation or debate.  As for the snowflake, everyone already knows that those who must hold rallies for the sole purpose of whining about people who are mean to them and look for praises and to be coddled by cheers, are the biggest snowflakes of them all.
Loyda M. Riley Yes!!!!  He IS the biggest snake in the swamp.  He continues to lie and his supporters are so full of hatred and anger towards those who are different and/or have different point of views, that they will swallow all he says without even checking for truth  I always check what either party states because I learned long ago that ANY media and ANY politician can twist words and information around ..... as i've seen this myself......it is just so sad how they are allowing him to treat them like unintelligent children, manipulated for control....feel sorry for them
Fatter Beast in the SWAMP than President Hoax!!!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Crissy Blades Dan isn't that bad, but you are unwelcome in adult conversation. Take some nappie time.
OH BOY YOU'RE A REAL PATRIOT!!!! YOU SUPPORT THE PEOPLE YOUR PROPHECY PUT OUT OF WORK!!! ANOTHER COLD HEARTLESS KNOW NOTHING!!!
You liberals have spent billions of our tax payer money on abortions, killing babies yet you clowns don't want to spend 5 billion on boarder security. The only immoral thing in America is the Democratic party.
Richard Smith for the party that claims law and order you sure don’t seem to know much about either
You socialist communists prove how stupid half of America is
Statewide, 61 percent of Texans oppose building a wall, while 35 percent support it and 4 percent don’t know or declined to answer, according to a poll conducted in April by Texas Lyceum, a nonprofit leadership organization. Residents of the Lone Star State who live, work and play along the international boundary with Mexico say they are happy that the Trump administration’s plans to quickly build the wall have encountered complications in Washington. A dispute over whether to fund the wall nearly led to a federal government shutdown in March, until the president agreed to delay the plan possibly until September. On Tuesday, Office of Management and Budget Director Mick Mulvaney unveiled a 2018 budget that includes $2.6 billion for stepped-up border security, including $1.6 billion for a wall.  Read more here: https://www.star-telegram.com/news/state/texas/article152402734.html#storylink=cpy
What they poll 100 people. Texas is only one of 48 other states affected by this. Texas is now the voice of all America. What is Texas trying to be California and New York. I love when I hear about polls cause nobody asked me. Fake news!
You liberals have spent billions of our tax payer money on abortions, killing babies yet you clowns don't want to spend 5 billion on boarder security. The only immoral thing in America is the Democratic party.
Crissy Blades "Great minds discuss ideas.  Average minds discuss events.  Small minds discuss people."  ~ Eleanor Roosevelt -- (and this would include name calling...


Thats what this all boils down to.
Yep, makes perfect sense in rural West Virginia.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Yet another FAKE NEWSER..........the Trump Cult has so many members participating.
William Searle Patton try voting in a blue state sometime... Most of them, you only need to tell them your name. You don't even need an ID card! It's dead simple to check the obituaries and see who won't be voting this year, since they update the voter rolls about once a decade.
Christopher Kralovec exactly!
Crissy Blades "Great minds discuss ideas.  Average minds discuss events.  Small minds discuss people."  ~ Eleanor Roosevelt -- (and this would include name calling...
When California is letting them "count" in the census? That's hardly legit.
Christopher Kralovec exactly!
William searle snider They do in California in 6 counties we had more voters then residents.
Frankie Urban  he's trying very hard, but the democraps are blocking him at every move.  At his speech tonight I am hoping he will declare a national emergency due to the invasion of the illegal aliens, the drugs pouring over, the rapes, the murders and the cartel traffickers.   It really is an INVASION and a national security issue.  Get er done and build that wall/fence whatever!!!!!    #MAGA
Frankie Urban, you may not like the source, but the gambling site Bookmaker really is taking bets.
Dave Condit and that’s exactly what discredits its legitimacy
Frankie Urban, that's makes no sense. Whether you like it or not, there really is a gambling website that's taking bets on the number of Trump lies tonight. It's a sad commentary on Trump's integrity.
Dave Condit no its a demonstration of the level of propaganda the site is willing to shovel out.
What site?
Dave Condit the propaganda outlet you sourced
Frankie Urban stay in your Trailor Park Drink Beer and Drunk Primate of a the Human Race. Greetings from the free World  Unbelivable what naive uneducated Brainless People live in USA
William searle snider They do in California in 6 counties we had more voters then residents.
why?
Frankie Urban stay in your Trailor Park Drink Beer and Drunk Primate of a the Human Race. Greetings from the free World  Unbelivable what naive uneducated Brainless People live in USA
"Gambling site takes big odds on how many times Trump will lie in his national address"  https://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html?fbclid=IwAR1wOPookXBK6t4nNlbfQjxNHPDkVSllve7n9wlQqjpqzVJmDkocpBJxGu0
No we don't Tina!!! You supporters pay for the wall!!!!
Where would trump be without ignorant, scared, white women?
"Gambling site takes big odds on how many times Trump will lie in his national address"  https://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html?fbclid=IwAR1wOPookXBK6t4nNlbfQjxNHPDkVSllve7n9wlQqjpqzVJmDkocpBJxGu0
Where would trump be without ignorant, scared, white women?
William Bieke wrong!  Try again.
Right!, don't need a 2nd attempt.
“Opinion is really the lowest form of human knowledge. It requires no accountability, no understanding. The highest form of knowledge… is empathy, for it requires us to suspend our egos and live in another's world. It requires profound purpose larger than the self kind of understanding.”  -- Bill Bullard
William Bieke he keeps his Campaign lies at the expense and the suffering of the American citizen. Pull your head out of your ass.
William Bieke I got a bridge to sell you in London! Cheap!
Tonya Conway it's a wonder he can talk with that Mushroom in his mouth hahaha
Tonya Conway no you try first.
Janice Edwards oh yes we do 🐒here have a 🍌
Tonya Conway no you try first.
Angus Crawford Australia? Shut up!
Stephanie Parrish why? We allow you to have joint military facilities here. You also take illegal Iranian immigrants from here to be resettled in the US. Thanks for that.
Dave Schnepel too bad. Supporting this man is supporting dishonesty! Lies lies lies lies lies is who your people are if trump is your man
Jeff Rockwell And the "polls" declared Hillary President before the votes were even made! Facts you may have missed... https://www.whitehouse.gov/trump-administration-accomplishments/
Jeff Rockwell says the CNN ass hat libtard 🤣🤣🤣
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin listen here ankle bite dick tard lapacockasucka. Your a libtard
Angus Crawford says the ass hat libtard
L.A. Reid no. The polls are a snap shot of voter intention. The polls don’t declare anything. They are a survey. If the polls indicate that candidate A has a 99% chance of winning and candidate B has a 1%  chance of winning it still indicates candidate B may win but has a statistically less chance then A. That’s all polls indicate.
Aaand  just now, Manaforts own lawyers just messed up and revealed that he colluded with Russia...while he was Trumps Campaign Chair.   Russia. Collusion. So much winning!
Dave Schnepel not me
Tonya Conway it's a wonder he can talk with that Mushroom in his mouth hahaha
Dave Schnepel not me
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin they are already putting out fact check lists so you can tick of Trumps BS.
Harry Panella That's a cute little poem for an 8 year old who's probably in about 3rd grade.  It seems she's paying attention to what's going on around her; little ones listen and are much brighter than some folks realize.  On another note, it's such a shame that some adults feel the need to poke fun at a child... Just goes to show who's more mature.
Amedeo Corey make it easier? My god you're an idiot
Idiot
Amedeo Corey  tear down the wall you say..........we all can put signs with arrows pointing the way to your house. You deal with them. Feed them, care for them for the rest of their lives. Let all the criminals go see you and your family instead. Put your loved ones at risk.  That's how you want it?  If a wall is mideval how come Obama has a wall around his house? Hmmmmmmmm🤔
Time to care about our homeless Vets first!
United States can't take care of the whole world. People staying on food stamps and welfare for the rest of their lives.
Mary Christine King 😂
Hazel Ramey 😂
Harry Panella That's a cute little poem for an 8 year old who's probably in about 3rd grade.  It seems she's paying attention to what's going on around her; little ones listen and are much brighter than some folks realize.  On another note, it's such a shame that some adults feel the need to poke fun at a child... Just goes to show who's more mature.
Not mr. Trump Amed eeo Corey
We will build the wall and throw you stupid ass over it.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Hazel Ramey 😂
You're delusional
We need to start shooting
You're delusional
President Crook is the one going to jail!!! He is the ringleader of the the Trump Felons!!! The Real Don!!!! The Real Thug!!!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Your going to have a wall pretty soon----in jail
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin  you are the next to go to an asylum! 🤦🏻‍♀️ keep on
Your pathetic lesbian bias has been noted.  So we're going to call it a heavy duty fence.     You've never built anything, and you're not tearing anything down.     Remove your front door,  minion.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you really should look up the information you want to know rather than getting it from TV.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin oh its you again why you lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooooh ohhhhhh ahhhh ahhhh heres a 🍌
Read this Jan Houck :  “False Says Sen. Chuck Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican." ​ — Bloggers on Monday, December 17th, 2018 in a blog post Meme mischaracterizes Chuck Schumer's record on border security funding  By John Kruzel on Thursday, December 20th, 2018 at 11:10 a.m.  A meme gaining traction on social media claims Sen. Chuck Schumer, D-N.Y., supported a border wall deal during Barack Obama’s presidency but then flip-flopped once President Donald Trump took the White House.  The post contains a photo of Schumer and a mock first-person confession revealing the Senate minority leader’s partisan reason for the apparent policy pivot.  "In 2014, I helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall," reads the post from a group called The Right View Of Washington State. "Now, Trump wants $5 billion for a border wall. Well I’m gonna b----, cry, piss and moan just because he’s a Republican and wants it."  The post was flagged as part of Facebook’s efforts to combat false news and misinformation on its News Feed. (Read more about our partnership with Facebook.)  The meme is swimming in factual errors and fishy interpretations.  No border wall deal in 2014 The post says Schumer helped put together a border wall deal in 2014. That’s wrong — there was no border barrier deal that year.  It’s possible the creator of the post was thinking of a 2013 proposal that Schumer shepherded through the Senate. But characterizing the 2013 legislation as a $25 billion deal to fund a "border wall" runs into factual hurdles.  That proposal, a comprehensive immigration plan Schumer sponsored and voted for, cleared the Senate in 2013. But the Republican-controlled House did not take up that bill after that. (It’s worth noting that presidents, not lawmakers, as the meme suggests, sign bills into law.)  The package included more than $46 billion for border security. The vast majority of that money ($30 billion) was for hiring more U.S. Border Patrol agents along the southern border. Around $8 billion would have gone toward building or repairing 700 miles of fencing (including some double-layer fencing) along the U.S.-Mexico border.  That’s not $25 billion for a wall, as the meme claimed.  Fence vs. wall It would be a stretch to say the fencing Schumer supported in 2013 fits the same description as Trump’s "impenetrable, physical, tall, power, beautiful southern border wall," with "precasts going up probably 35 to 40 feet in the air."  Schumer’s office insisted a border fence is very different from Trump’s promised wall. The senator’s office pointed us to a Trump tweet from the election when then-candidate Trump scolded his opponent Jeb Bush for conflating the two.  "Jeb Bush just talked about my border proposal to build a ‘fence.’ " Trump tweeted. "It's not a fence, Jeb, it's a WALL, and there's a BIG difference!"  Daniel Yoken, a Schumer spokesman, said, "Sen. Schumer supported fencing where it makes sense then and still does today."  Schumer has also argued that border security isn’t limited to a wall, and that there are other, more effective ways to secure the border. The meme claims Schumer opposes a wall "just because" Trump is a Republican.  One more point to clarify: Schumer in January 2018 said he offered to back funding for Trump’s border wall in exchange for a broader immigration package that included a deal for so-called Dreamers, young immigrants living in the country illegally.  Schumer reportedly made a $25 billion offer for the wall during a private meeting with Trump, as lawmakers negotiated a way to avert a government shutdown. Schumer rescinded his offer just a few days after making it, saying it was off the table because Trump rejected the broader immigration package.  The New York Times reported that while the White House refused to acknowledge that Schumer made the wall offer, Senate leaders on both sides of the aisle confirmed it.  An offer on behalf of Schumer’s part to fund a border wall undermines the meme’s notion that he’s automatically ruled out the wall simply because Trump wants it.  Our ruling The Facebook post says Schumer in 2014 "helped put together and signed a $25 billion deal to fund a border wall" and now opposes Trump's $5 billion request for a border wall "just because he's a Republican."  There are numerous factual errors here: there was no border barrier deal in 2014. A 2013 legislative package proposed $8 billion for border fencing — not $25 billion for a border wall.  More importantly, the border fencing Schumer backed in 2013 is different than how Trump has described his border wall. And the meme glosses over Schumer’s previous support for border wall funding earlier this year, in exchange for protections for Dreamers.  We rate this post False.”
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you really should look up the information you want to know rather than getting it from TV.
Jan Houck works for me...I am sick of this crap. I think their money should be cut off and paid to the ones not getting their pay checks. I promise this would end immediately.
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=267552747272207&id=1655189171441232
You laugh, Dave Condit, but in their own words?? So. Yes, they wanted it before... Now it is suddenly anathema..
https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/2013-all-senate-dems-voted-to-build-border-fence-kill-visa-lottery-end-chain-migration
Jan Houck works for me...I am sick of this crap. I think their money should be cut off and paid to the ones not getting their pay checks. I promise this would end immediately.
🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽
They willingly went for a 700 mile wall...
🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽 🇲🇽
All former sitting Presidents today refuted that they supported a wall built of renters who also receive meals, Tedi. :-|  Just setting the record straight on that.
because they never spoke about walls, they spoke about fences or other physical barriers on several locations where needed
Tedi Lockmiller unfortunately most in Congress are millionaires and their congressional salaries are a drop in the bucket to them.
Becky Geyer Price actually, it should very much matter. Let's see... If attachments that spent taxpayer money on abhorrent things were attached, I would not sign it either. And believe me, there's plenty of crap attached to budget bills.
Tedi Lockmiller unfortunately most in Congress are millionaires and their congressional salaries are a drop in the bucket to them.
https://www.facebook.com/reallyamerican/photos/a.942157972506564/2024361984286152/?type=3&eid=ARCI6g9Yxp4ffU-3WGhJJqWr4dU7Hp3dQNQGIHHmrZ5g4k2yk50Cw5kW9tyoMqA3o-4K8PMH9HNeT8H_&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARAXFe7eB9oeIc90Es0ZjoUnsZcbDDrqx1OMk-1LNLLfisk4KAy-HBTxrvWbVDplgRi4SSrZeWsDMvQ4IodFzIpVlzCBLwHrl2XxIH0WcXMoAgR30DcthX-aVIkAerciIDARtB0WWmWD6xeO7I58fYBPQNsVxpAqrPGggRoMVH0qF-YUvIkg5QARGl1QcLmAwqzrH8ce-hLb9uApCxprI2P4ktayeQEm429ZPRYJcsH71LbAEJ4FeHsG1nJHMv2vARGO3PfXN-zoLsAup5t_Jc37zYSkOY97C-CzcW-s-s9hzyNZMm1hMdMDCtAMpco4axJykZUMSNcVc6I6OTisPHvcdhhqxkANr5f_1uyzuhSMvyUu-fTK2IQsA7a0P3zRkP57pluQ41tZUt6idnRQCNFVP5RxIx-3uPf2sYh9ADZlPmd_XDrmMOaGjcU7LanEdMzn3dcaLckhYfR7O6dmJI_2Biwv-KaWtaizJp_HyPacs4EGytqbR1T7pwRotHfusl7AtejX66PTEnub_BeZCA&__tn__=EEHH-R
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin just go away!! ✌🏻
Trump is already a failure.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin when the wall gets built I hope someone throws you over it.. 🤷🏻‍♀️
because they never spoke about walls, they spoke about fences or other physical barriers on several locations where needed
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin so you realize almost every President before him has said the same thing. You realize there is wall and fence started all over down there right. You know that right. Barrack Clinton all of them have said this. He must be great he made all that appear out of thin air I guess... Wow but I'm the brainwashed one. I've never cursed a sitting president . but I feel bad for your next one now....
Rex Blake they gonna all die from annual fires and mudslides anyhow, might as well wall them off from the rest of society.
Fred Dickey we'll outlive you and the Douchebag in office.
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Sherry Carruth not really, no. It needs to be built, making Mexico foot the bill was just cherry on top. Besides, if it stops even a tenth of the Illegal Aliens, it'll pay for itself in no time!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin so you realize almost every President before him has said the same thing. You realize there is wall and fence started all over down there right. You know that right. Barrack Clinton all of them have said this. He must be great he made all that appear out of thin air I guess... Wow but I'm the brainwashed one. I've never cursed a sitting president . but I feel bad for your next one now....
Sherry Carruth not really, no. It needs to be built, making Mexico foot the bill was just cherry on top. Besides, if it stops even a tenth of the Illegal Aliens, it'll pay for itself in no time!
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Tawnya Marcum Trunnell  add closer
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Tawnya Marcum Trunnell  add closer
I'm with you Mr. President.  #Buildthewall
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Gayle Bailey pretty nasty language for a woman!
“Opinion is really the lowest form of human knowledge. It requires no accountability, no understanding. The highest form of knowledge… is empathy, for it requires us to suspend our egos and live in another's world. It requires profound purpose larger than the self kind of understanding.”  -- Bill Bullard
4) Gayle Bailey.
Gayle Bailey good one!
4) Grab her by the pussy
I have news: a wall won't keep any of those out. Nice try though.
Not really you could scare the Democrat with the unloaded gun to play with the bulls tits to go on tv and blame everything wrong in the world on Trump hahahahahaha
I'm with you Mr. President.  #Buildthewall
you mean a wall?
Not really you could scare the Democrat with the unloaded gun to play with the bulls tits to go on tv and blame everything wrong in the world on Trump hahahahahaha
You misspelled #3, it's t-r-u-m-p.
He's a libtarb!  Of course he'd say that 🥴
Oscar Olszewski oh yes we are lil 🐒here have 🍌
Linda Bertino https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
You misspelled #3, it's t-r-u-m-p.
Linda Bertino https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Trump is all about misinformation and leading his brainless Cult around like sheep.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Keep sharing! https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Oscar Olszewski oh yes we are lil 🐒here have 🍌
Keep sharing! https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
😂😂
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin why you little durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrppp durp durp !!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooooh oooooh ahhhh ahhh 🍌!!!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buuuuuzzzzz!!!!!!
...Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin ...Please Do Not Breed...
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
...Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin ...Please Do Not Breed...
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buuuuuzzzzz!!!!!!
Kory Sutherland although you have made me laugh, I shall pray for you also.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin zero! Do you know anything? Pelosi is drunk again and neither she, schumer, or the democrat party use critical thinking skills! I do not want to fund the mooch illegals, and neither do the millions of taxpayers that support the BEST PRESIDENT EVER.
Wendy Long stfu WORLD CLASS IDIOT!!!! GO GET PELOSI A COCKTAIL,  WILL YA?? THE WITCH IS GONNA FAINT FROM HER COVER UPS AND LIES.
Corinn Elizabeth no Corinn that’s not true, you might. Speak for yourself
Ann de Roo-Daly sorry smart isnt your strong point. But here, only you,  wendy whats-her-face, and the legendary henk  are haters that need attention.  Since it's necessary to point it out to you. Go talk to that murder suspect hillary
Kory Sutherland although you have made me laugh, I shall pray for you also.
Ann de Roo-Daly sorry smart isnt your strong point. But here, only you,  wendy whats-her-face, and the legendary henk  are haters that need attention.  Since it's necessary to point it out to you. Go talk to that murder suspect hillary
PROUD OF A TRAITOR---- you and trump should move to russia and you will have another best friend Putin
Corinn Elizabeth no Corinn that’s not true, you might. Speak for yourself
Deniece Allen ... Move on Troll. Go try and bait someone else. Gotta earn your paycheck. Hahahahaha
Aiden Jacob Catron shut up jackass
Deniece Allen ... Move on Troll. Go try and bait someone else. Gotta earn your paycheck. Hahahahaha
There was collusion https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/08/paul-manafort-robert-mueller-plea-deal-russia-investigation/2485091002/
There was collusion https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/08/paul-manafort-robert-mueller-plea-deal-russia-investigation/2485091002/
Build the WALL  Mr President.
Pass a bill to stop salaries, pensions and healthcare payments to Congress - they’re not working anyways.
Cindy Lind an other Primate  😂👎😂👎 Greetings from the free World
Pass a bill to stop salaries, pensions and healthcare payments to Congress - they’re not working anyways.
Cindy Lind an other Primate  😂👎😂👎 Greetings from the free World
My bet is his "8 minute" speech will be 14 mins and 22 lies. But I'm probably lowballing the lies.
So anything that you libturds dont agree with is an lie?   Triggered Snowflakes!! Lmao   Sucks to suck..losers!!
Guy Striano Stfu  you you lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrppppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo aaaaaah aaaaah!!! Here have a 🍌
Guy Striano yes you sure are lol .
James Flatmo Low ball this you durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrppp!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buuuuzzzzzzz!!!!

Reptilians are among us !!!
Guy Striano bet you have children to protect and grandchildren also.
Mary Apollonio makes zero difference. This wall is an act of egoism.
Micheal Marceaux go BBQ something. Leave the political talk to the educated adults. Ok Gomer?
RIP GOP
🤥🤥🤥👎👎👎
Jacquelyn Strickland 🤥
Ritzie Ann oh and btw, you’re a BOT.
Guy Striano you’re a libtard
Neil Vaillancourt and you’re a RIGHTWAT.
Neil Vaillancourt STFU you hillbilly. The village called and want their IDIOT back, so get going Gomer
Micheal Marceaux go BBQ something. Leave the political talk to the educated adults. Ok Gomer?

Guy?  Get an education and add-on some and political science coursework to that.  Your comments don't even exceed junior high-level.  Wait, scratch steps 1 and 2.  Build up that single-digit-I.Q... THEN... all the other will fall into place more readily~
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Ftruthout.org%2Farticles%2Fmayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless%2F%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2ZlZqLXNLQbpZQuAN6kaBM68Zz9UvyF8X2wUxbze9DrLNBWLscDKe2-cc&h=AT3DCTVxZY_wu0CW6_rNa7S6S5cJJxb8UPbxVIZmU3Jj_YaAAucc2bQrqwsYna7c5cFpkgnqIBON1jYuQUQtVY_FfZeIfXRDtsAU7Yja0NFaCJnXnFTnhFg9jZXYV0RMY3ZRepK__noyL4V_2ojdXXO2q93Dzooe7YMrXfhZpd1Wy7S6Dzx-UQxTHeouUGn2m6Pp3ievwBCQLC6J2PbNRdw_6tyWm-Ppkpr3ssc9-hQ0kekjFgRpZKl3LsldspzbwQcggI4G_eEVzdiVE4r-1fhbKtdqXfI-FEniuGw2f7uiIjQZ7XEkEhL4MDvmwkyVgJee5k5kWVj3gsFdXWu9-Iny5mik0qtn1qE6C68QCGMjrfQ_A5kqwNgfWQ2Csh6wtf5LUGqs8BzkTokMp8bMeNzi6-jyNjqNW0JIX33yi2k_dVwiAtKDZCdr95atzQ18V2Gl1xgh9r11GLUuR64MvD6R-ZQX8r_s9nsy-IJtwElfDCV4ilIizOQsbAhYRYTiw78EF6IE2RQRPAClWzppf8YLrKnsjAtPEV959sFf5ZZHOyCIWdWkzWMSdS4glP1HfrFxuoMkOOynmRtbfpoMzN1TykNqXgKOTXQ49ax51ayuxcgIMGl3o4FPEA9JHW5riceJc2rGjKiQH2e6t_DynicPl0KlA3IJV2jYOMjd
Try getting information from unbiased sources!  from Wikipedia:  Truthout truth-out.org Truthout is a 501 nonprofit, progressive news and commentary website.More at Wikipedia Type of site:News, political analysis & commentary, Left/Liberal/Progressivism
Ron Erhardt tRump shut down! I own it! And Mexico is paying for it! We’re just waiting! tRump promised!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Ron Erhardt Trump die it already  Low Minded naive Brain Limited Trumpee
Guy?  Get an education and add-on some and political science coursework to that.  Your comments don't even exceed junior high-level.  Wait, scratch steps 1 and 2.  Build up that single-digit-I.Q... THEN... all the other will fall into place more readily~
Ron Erhardt Trump die it already  Low Minded naive Brain Limited Trumpee
Lisa Palmer Fleming get out of here
Emil Dörr you guys are hallucinating my god this is entertaining
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Emil Dörr you guys are hallucinating my god this is entertaining
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin why you pesky lil 🐝🐝🐝🐝
Michael Fox Yes he get it done he get a Wall he wear Orange and the Prison has many Walls. Low Minded naive Brain Limited Trumpee
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin why you pesky lil 🐝🐝🐝🐝
Tess Calomino it's also called ...why couldn't they call their own press conference. These particular Dem leaders can't do work just want to ride other coat tails or obstruct. I left that party years ago!!!
Joni Preuss  everything they do will backfire tonight, Pres Trump will gain the trust of the American people in those 8 mins on prime time. I say let them failed and say what they have to say bc the American people do not want to be put on a back burner and the liberal leaders have not learn this lesson still since the lost of  the election. hate and bitterness and scare tactics rule their party that split 3 ways.. I ran as well entire family did along with 250,000 people in northeastern P.A. and that is only part of P.a.
Lisa Palmer Fleming.   YOU WANT PESOS ???  AMERICA NEEDS TO QUIT PAYING AND GIVING A FREE RIDE TO EVERY ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT.  PERIOD !!!!   IT'S A SHAME AMERICAN CITIZENS INCLUDING ELDERLY, WOMEN, CHILDREN & VETERANS ARE LIVING ON THE STREETS OR TURNED DOWN FOR SERVICES, BUT A ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT GETS A FREE RIDE AND EVERYTHING ON OUR TAX DOLLARS.    IF THEY CAN'T DO IT LEGALLY THEY DON'T DESERVE TO BE HERE.  SO YES, STOP LETTING ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS BLEED THE SYSTEM DRY AND THERE WILL BE MORE THAN ENOUGH FOR THE WALL.   AND ANOTHER ANSWER.  WHY WAS OTHER COUNTRY'S NOT GOOD ENOUGH FOR THEM ???   RULES, REGULATIONS AND HAVE TO EARN THEIR OWN WAY.
Tess Calomino add closer
Jah Jah Man  what..
Tess Calomino Most mass shootings in recent history were committed by home grown Caucasian men not immigrants 🤷🏽‍♂️
Tess Calomino You have to fact check a pathological liar.But real facts don’t matter to trump sheep Lol
Eddie Sturgis scared of the success .. your party better grasp what is happening to the heartland and entire running of our nation.
Eddie Sturgis  we want unity and government working together with good faith to help all American people.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
SHOW ME THE PESOS.
Tess Calomino Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
After Dumpy Trumpy Gets done  with His Liars On National TV then the Real Honest Politicians will be on to tell the Truth...The Only Crisis we have is in Donnie little Bird Brain Head.....
Tess Calomino no, that happens with all presidential addresses.
Wendy Long this will back fire on the democrats like everything they do. the American people  indeed walk with common sense and as well could discern the truth. Democrat leaders fear you could sense it and feel it abundantly. well I could probably many other do as well.
Pres Trump will gain the people Trust tonight.
Eddie Sturgis  we want unity and government working together with good faith to help all American people.
Pres Trump will gain the people Trust tonight.
Barbara Burleigh See Yes Barb I have! You need your birth certificate & a photo I.D. or a passport! And I never saw a wall! Don’t forget Barb that I am from the same town that you are from! I really don’t recall many illegal immigrants walking around Titusville!
He will, by the trade deal he got with them.. and it will pay for itself when we stop paying for illegals to live here.
We have to build the wall to find out who's paying for it.
Abby Schmidt The Immigrants....in the town might be different in todays world there.     Just seeing and saying.....
Robert Malik Well explain how his wall is going to get built with his new trade deals when they haven’t even been approved by Congress yet?
Abby Schmidt who cares who pays for it I don’t all I know to many Americans have lost so much due to the illegal immigrants that have know right to be here invading our country and our security the has to build the wall
You All Listen To Fake News. Try real researching.  Trump @020 The Greatest President We Had for Years. Its Been In A Great Mess Till President Trump Came Along.Thank God For Him Trump 2020.
Wendy Long this will back fire on the democrats like everything they do. the American people  indeed walk with common sense and as well could discern the truth. Democrat leaders fear you could sense it and feel it abundantly. well I could probably many other do as well.
Katie Mercado How can something be mine if it doesn’t exist? Lady!
Robert Malik Well isn’t that what your dear leader told you at all of his hate rallies? Didn’t Mexico say that they were not going to pay for any wall right from the start? I am not against border security, but didn’t you republicans have 2 years to get this wall done? What happened? How is a wall going to stop terrorists like the ones on 9/11? You do realize that they have caught more people that are on “suspected terrorists list” coming in from the Canadian border don’t you? Are we going to build a wall between us & Canada also? Where is the caravan that was supposed to show up in November? They magically vanished!
How many money do you need to build the wall lady??   😂🤣
Dale Frost, name one politician that's not lied to us? It shouldn't matter how it gets paid for as long as it gets built.
So he never said that Mexico was going to pay for his wall? Were all of hate rallies that he screamed it at was fake news?
Dale Frost, name one politician that's not lied to us? It shouldn't matter how it gets paid for as long as it gets built.
Abby Schmidt they will with all the lost cartel revenue you Idiot
Robert Malik Really? Mexico already said 2 years ago that they would not pay for any wall!  He promised you that Mexico was going to pay for it! What happened to that? By the way I have done a very good job at keeping my family safe for the last 44 years & I didn’t need a wall to do it! Get it,Got it?
Abby Schmidt about that caravan:   https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-immigration-caravan/many-us-bound-caravan-migrants-disperse-as-asylum-process-stalls-idUSKBN1O62IF
Greg Merz YOU SHOULD TRY RUSSIAN VODKA & CRANBERRY
Jason Reger explain to me how you got into this country if you are not native american?
Abby Schmidt Nobody cares  any more it has become to dangerous.    between the gangs , ISSI , the illnesses a lot of which are fatal & the rapist, Drunks, & Drugs coming through the borders its time to close them.  lord forbid  one of them should kill one of your family members. then you would understand. I raised my kids on my own.  i got welfare for 6 months i took a cut in pay to get off it. it was not designed to be a way of life. Kids now get pregnant now so the Tax payers have to pay for their kids .  if you can't afford to buy insurance then don't have kids.  when they are raised on it they don't even try to get off it, we don't owe other people a living especially from other countries that is communism go to Cuba  Russia North Korea ,  they are starving ,  if your sickly, disabled or old they let you die.  your only allowed 2 kids in China & Japan.  if you get a job your paying for others medicine, housing, food, How do you want to live just getting by or have a chance to have nice things, travel give your kids nice clothes , take them out to eat. afford a safe place for them while your at work. the rich democrats who all voted for the wall before Trump won are not going to give you anything. they all have wall, gates, armed body guards. & they would have you arrested if you dared to come near them
Abby Schmidt 😂🤣😂👎never ever.  Dump Donald must pay
Abby Schmidt they are indirectly through tariffs.
Abby Schmidt  I don’t think Mexican pay for the wall ..we need to pay 😞 taxes


Jason Reger a lot of people care! He was very loud and aggressive he would see to it that it wouldn't cost the US a dime! That seems to have totally been forgotten by some.
Jennifer Cromwell Well he lied & if you tell people that you get attacked!
Abby Schmidt 😂🤣😂👎never ever.  Dump Donald must pay
Kinda stupid everyone is chewing this girl out, if anyone remembers the basis for Trumps campaign was were gonna build a wall and Mexico will pay for it, now I'm all for the wall and i knew when he was running that Mexico wasn't going to pay, I personally want the wall but him shutting down the government and using Federal workers as ponds to get what he wants is kinda sad, we already have 2 prisons taken over by the National Guard because they have no staff due to this shutdown. He wont get his way unless he declares a state of emergency, which is what I want I wish he would go ahead and do it so families can have money flow back. Dont hate on me because I proved a point and you dislike my opinion, try having a father who works for the Federal govement and who doesnt know when his next check will come. This is damaging the Federal Govement not helping.
Only a moron would believe Mexico would pay for a wall. But then again, if you think Trump is good for America, describing you as a moron is far too kind ;)
Michael Hill what does that mean?
Jennifer Cromwell Well he lied & if you tell people that you get attacked!
Dorothy Dawson-Spencer LMAO I don't get free handouts, I work for EVERYTHING I have ...Trump is a dick and not fit for presidency...
Keith Hamilton , finally someone who gets it!!
build the Wall do not back down
Lillian Weisberg it's **you're**.. But your president is immature and he will put everyone in a recession, including your dumbass !!!
Abby Schmidt wah wah shut up dumb dumb
Tonya Justice Sweetie how do you figure? I am almost 62 years old , I got a job 3 days after I turned 18! Never received anything from welfare you ignorant ass! My husband has worked the same job for 31 years for the state! I am a welfare mooch ? Sit the fu*k down honey!
Here we go another one that does not understand 5.6 billion verses 200+billion every year on illegals it’s just plain dumb the tariff will pay for it in the long run but the money we will save in illegals as well as diseases and outbreaks along with drugs is enough alone some people’s reaction just plain dumb
Michael Hill and they sure as hell won't.
Abby Schmidt wah wah shut up dumb dumb
easy cuck
Abby Schmidt. STFU ❄❄❄❄
Mike Goyim #FuckTrump !🤷🏾‍♀️🤷🏾‍♀️💁🏾‍♀️
easy cuck
The US is a business and should be run as such not run on feelings 🤦‍♀️
Abby Schmidt  how much was the trade deficit with Mexico with NAFTA? How much is it projected to be with new USMC deal? Give me a number.
Brian Jones  Quite! Liberals and Democrats don't want people to know that!   R.I.P  Officer ☹️
Saige Turner excellent point, thank you.
Saige Turner , you mean this shooting? He was Anti-Trump & Anti-Jewish. https://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-6323781/Active-shooter-Pittsburgh-synagogue.html
Greg Merz how about the one that just killed some one in Tenn...is ignorance your forte ?
Saige Turner fake profile +fake opinion= don't matter...but just for the record what does one have to do with the other?
Abby Schmidt  how much was the trade deficit with Mexico with NAFTA? How much is it projected to be with new USMC deal? Give me a number.
Saige Turner fake profile +fake opinion= don't matter...but just for the record what does one have to do with the other?
Oscar Olszewski didn’t vote for either. Had an acquaintance who went to a farenthold event and was shocked at his level of “partying”. And McQueen was in and out very quickly and abruptly and during Hurricane Harvey no less. No respect for either. What I realized was that politicians are useless. No matter what their affiliation. Some do good, some do bad and some are really bad. So we are forced to accept levels of “acceptable corruption”. At least that’s what I’ve found down here.
Sherry Carruth you are forgetting the influx of revenue from the new trade deal with Mexico.
Medea Helsel here in San Diego also. You can always tell who hasn't been effected by illegals or don't live in a border town. RIGHT?
Medea Helsel https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Greg Merz how about the one that just killed some one in Tenn...is ignorance your forte ?
Oscar Olszewski in addition to that, this city is run on favors and promises. They keep raising our taxes, say they’ll fix things then they never do. The city infrastructure itself is crumbling. Streets are awful, crime is up, they want to cut fire and police pay. Meanwhile....our taxes keep getting increased with no results. It’s nuts down here.
Medea Helsel https://www.facebook.com/chandalynn33/videos/607274869717779/
Oscar Olszewski in addition to that, this city is run on favors and promises. They keep raising our taxes, say they’ll fix things then they never do. The city infrastructure itself is crumbling. Streets are awful, crime is up, they want to cut fire and police pay. Meanwhile....our taxes keep getting increased with no results. It’s nuts down here.
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Losing..so much losing.  The Hill”. 56% no, 44% yes.  Gallup poll: 57% no, 43% yes.  Quinnipiac:  54 No, 43 yes.  Harvard CAPS/Harris:  56 No, 44 yes.  A poll by NPR, PBS, and Marist found 2/3rds of this polled don’t think the wall should be a priority.
If Trump and his Cult want the Wall so bad bad then they should step up to the plate and pay for it!!!........do not burden We The People with your DAMN OBSESSION!!!
Jeff Rockwell these are the same polls that made the crooked president on the 8th of Nov 2016
Joseph Saab If trump had kept his promise he wouldn’t need the American taxpayers money, he would have collected the funds from Mexico, he hasn’t. He needs to keep that promise Joseph
Ann de Roo-Daly he already did with nafta....
Ann de Roo-Daly  also he can do extremely well if he stops the benefits for illegals welfare, housing, medical, education...these benefits open the door for more to come...I want them to apply legally and wait their turn...think about it.
Patti Vargas I have both, but thank you for your concern. In addition to those, I have beliefs, morals and resolve. But thanks again.
Ann de Roo-Daly  also he can do extremely well if he stops the benefits for illegals welfare, housing, medical, education...these benefits open the door for more to come...I want them to apply legally and wait their turn...think about it.
Ann de Roo-Daly he already did with nafta....
Joseph Saab If trump had kept his promise he wouldn’t need the American taxpayers money, he would have collected the funds from Mexico, he hasn’t. He needs to keep that promise Joseph
Thank you Mr. President  for not giving up on us !!
Do you support stealing from those who have earned it? I don’t understand. Stealing is stealing no matter how you do it and stealing is wrong
Victoria Hall Davids libtards are so uneducated
Rita Abrahamson where are you getting your information?
Victoria Hall Davids YES! INFRASTRUCTURE. It is crumbling all around us.  Roads suck. Bridges are badly in need of repairs and we want to waste money. Go visit Buffalo.  Half the roads feel like they were bombed.
Christopher are you really that stupid. Research before you think you understand. Please Google who is responsible for road repairs lmao
Victoria Hall Davids why not both? We can fix the system for the ones looking to work to make a better life for themselves and make a barrier to stop the ones just looking to live off the system/sling drugs/flee prosecution.
Christopher Meadwell pretty sure the infrastructure issues in NY are more of a "state is run by absolute assholes" issue than a federal one. Emperor Cuomo needs his campaign money!
Christopher Meadwell THAT should have been taken care of years ago. You know with some of the Presidents in the past....
New York's infrastructure issues, like California's, stem from decades of failed Democrat policies.
Victoria Hall Davids maybe we can sprinkle fairy dust on the border ...and then we can all frolic together... in the fields ...with butterflies! Daw!😂
Thank you Mr. President  for not giving up on us !!
Glenn Maling someone with a brain that doesn’t listen to Fox News!
Hope Lester Weston you are so wrong, border patrol agents do not want a wall!
Mike Neary reworking immigration policies is not the same as banning guns...however, adding new walls is most definitely like banning guns, and as you already stated, people will find a way.    There are reasons why certain sections remain open...and obviously we will always have a budget to repair/replace those that are already there.  A more advanced system is what is needed..perhaps even hire more border patrol along these sections.    We have illegals coming in from other means and they eventually take our high paying jobs from Americans.  This is something no one is even discussing.  I've seen this happen myself, and it's far easier by plane.    I don't understand why we cannot have a new system at eh airports where tourists are registered into the system....make sure they have a return flight ticket...make sure they show where they will be staying (hotel reservations helps), monitor college students making sure they do not stay continue to stay once they have graduated
Hope Lester Weston You really think those four CBP agent Trump put in front of a microphone speak for the entire CBP? They don’t.
Victoria Hall Davids you dont understand how tax cuts on the wealthy help the poor people do you..
Victoria Hall Davids maybe we can sprinkle fairy dust on the border ...and then we can all frolic together... in the fields ...with butterflies! Daw!😂
you dont live near the boarder,, where these fucking illegals , steel anything they can get their hands on..break into your house..or your car,cause damage to the towns near by..and the insurance companies keep raising their rates for every claim you make...just to mention the little things they do
And who are you?
Reworking immigration policies?  This is not different than banning guns.  Bad people will always find a way to have guns.  Reworking the immigration policies doesn’t do anything for the illegals.  Having a wall creates a funnel that limits the influx to specifically controlled areas.   Many people support affordable healthcare but what we have now isn’t affordable.  I don’t support a balanced budget.  I support a budget that has us bringing in more than goes out.  Stop sending money to undeserving countries for no reason.  Every broke person in the world doesn’t support tax cuts for the wealthy.  I don’t support them but I do recognize that certain taxes, like business income tax, must remain low so we can generate jobs and keep the jobs in this country.  We all support infrastructure spending so let’s stop spending 150B on illegals each year and build a wall for 5B so we can save 100B.  We then can use that money for infrastructure.
Victoria Hall Davids you dont understand how tax cuts on the wealthy help the poor people do you..
Reworking immigration policies?  This is not different than banning guns.  Bad people will always find a way to have guns.  Reworking the immigration policies doesn’t do anything for the illegals.  Having a wall creates a funnel that limits the influx to specifically controlled areas.   Many people support affordable healthcare but what we have now isn’t affordable.  I don’t support a balanced budget.  I support a budget that has us bringing in more than goes out.  Stop sending money to undeserving countries for no reason.  Every broke person in the world doesn’t support tax cuts for the wealthy.  I don’t support them but I do recognize that certain taxes, like business income tax, must remain low so we can generate jobs and keep the jobs in this country.  We all support infrastructure spending so let’s stop spending 150B on illegals each year and build a wall for 5B so we can save 100B.  We then can use that money for infrastructure.
Why?
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Ftruthout.org%2Farticles%2Fmayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless%2F%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2ZlZqLXNLQbpZQuAN6kaBM68Zz9UvyF8X2wUxbze9DrLNBWLscDKe2-cc&h=AT3DCTVxZY_wu0CW6_rNa7S6S5cJJxb8UPbxVIZmU3Jj_YaAAucc2bQrqwsYna7c5cFpkgnqIBON1jYuQUQtVY_FfZeIfXRDtsAU7Yja0NFaCJnXnFTnhFg9jZXYV0RMY3ZRepK__noyL4V_2ojdXXO2q93Dzooe7YMrXfhZpd1Wy7S6Dzx-UQxTHeouUGn2m6Pp3ievwBCQLC6J2PbNRdw_6tyWm-Ppkpr3ssc9-hQ0kekjFgRpZKl3LsldspzbwQcggI4G_eEVzdiVE4r-1fhbKtdqXfI-FEniuGw2f7uiIjQZ7XEkEhL4MDvmwkyVgJee5k5kWVj3gsFdXWu9-Iny5mik0qtn1qE6C68QCGMjrfQ_A5kqwNgfWQ2Csh6wtf5LUGqs8BzkTokMp8bMeNzi6-jyNjqNW0JIX33yi2k_dVwiAtKDZCdr95atzQ18V2Gl1xgh9r11GLUuR64MvD6R-ZQX8r_s9nsy-IJtwElfDCV4ilIizOQsbAhYRYTiw78EF6IE2RQRPAClWzppf8YLrKnsjAtPEV959sFf5ZZHOyCIWdWkzWMSdS4glP1HfrFxuoMkOOynmRtbfpoMzN1TykNqXgKOTXQ49ax51ayuxcgIMGl3o4FPEA9JHW5riceJc2rGjKiQH2e6t_DynicPl0KlA3IJV2jYOMjd
Demitris Petrides Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Demitris Petrides First off, there's a vast difference between "need" and "want".   Second, at this point we're pretty much just watching a spoiled brat throwing a temper tantrum because he can't have his way, and he's screaming bloody murder about it because he knows his reputation is not only in the crapper, but is on it's last swirl before the drain.  Sure, we all know politicians are liars, but Trump was supposed to be the antithesis of "politician", and now here we are with the greatest pathological liar in human record sitting in the White House. :-/  I mean honestly, do YOU see Mexico paying for the wall?
Rachel- You have proven my point. What we have doesn't work.
Demitris Petrides First off, there's a vast difference between "need" and "want".   Second, at this point we're pretty much just watching a spoiled brat throwing a temper tantrum because he can't have his way, and he's screaming bloody murder about it because he knows his reputation is not only in the crapper, but is on it's last swirl before the drain.  Sure, we all know politicians are liars, but Trump was supposed to be the antithesis of "politician", and now here we are with the greatest pathological liar in human record sitting in the White House. :-/  I mean honestly, do YOU see Mexico paying for the wall?
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin  ok I will bite; LIES, FARCE, CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY, explain.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin troll
Another of Trump's lies! The DNC does want border security; but not a stupid, unaffordable wall!
Demitris Petrides Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Another of Trump's lies! The DNC does want border security; but not a stupid, unaffordable wall!
Barby Bird only children and immature people hate Barby. You appear to be confusing opposition with hate. I do agree with you there does seem to be a sense of immaturity in the White House, but that of course has nothing to do with the Democrats. They are opposing trump’s willingness to squander Americans hard earned taxes. trump has promised the Mexicans would fund his wall, so why does he need the Democrats to approve? Makes no sense at all.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin troll
Barby Bird only children and immature people hate Barby. You appear to be confusing opposition with hate. I do agree with you there does seem to be a sense of immaturity in the White House, but that of course has nothing to do with the Democrats. They are opposing trump’s willingness to squander Americans hard earned taxes. trump has promised the Mexicans would fund his wall, so why does he need the Democrats to approve? Makes no sense at all.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Delois Weathington the border is already in place Delois
The replies from Pelosi and Schumer were filled with hate, outright lies and malice.  Their extreme hatred for President Trump is overriding their responsibility to the American people.  We need to protect ourselves and we can only do that with a border.  Nancy and Chuck can take their lies back to their lairs.  Anyone with half a brain can see through the dems.
Delois Weathington the border is already in place Delois
ROFL.  The ACA was a compromise, and included 140+ GOP amendments and changes.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
You don’t build walls because you hate the people on the outside, you build walls because you love the people on the inside. ❤️ BUILD THE WALL!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
What a ridiculous statement by Godfrey.   All the people in our country killed by illegals is something to be taken very seriously.   Those are the facts.     I pity a person who believes any of the lies that the Democrats push.   They are the ones who are truely sick people.   They want to protect a criminal over a decent, good American citizen.   There is something very sinister about their agenda.   It is an agenda of power....all power....absolute power corrupts.   Communists is what they have turned into.  The  old Democrat party of Kennedy is dead.
Jason N Gabriel cause I can
Mitchell James lol didn’t bother looking did you
Cindy Ann Godfrey, your a special.kind of DUMB
Eva Wallace if it gets built will count how many times he praises himself it a shame ppl lol don't understand do you console liars first it was Mexico wil pay for wall and I heard all cheering Mexico pay for wall then it was I (trump) will pay for it with my own money  now ? It's the ppl will pay for wall US ! What don't you get 5.7 million dollars how hard is that to understand ! the point !
Cindy Ann Godfrey do you have children and grandchildren?
BUILDING WALL and watched the snowflakes melt.

You don’t build walls because you hate the people on the outside, you build walls because you love the people on the inside. ❤️ BUILD THE WALL!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Amanda Bell how grown up you act lol
Ken Stec lol ummm no, they want updated security equipment  Show me proof that democrats wanted to spend 5 billion dollars on a fing wall
Ken Stec get your head out of trumps ass
No he just doesn’t want your name on a wall. A memorial wall when your murdered by an illegal immigrant
Cindy Ann Godfrey if you hate are President so much why are you following him Troll Much
Cindy Ann Godfrey you are definitely brainless


Cindy Ann Godfrey
Cindy Ann Godfrey you are definitely brainless
It would cost a lot less money to put his draft dodging Grandfathers name on the monument at Ellis Island! ;-)
Jill, straight up..yes..based simply on the fact that I do research on the topic at hand..actual research not simply listening to Fox and calling that research.
Jill Travassos Just because you can shout at people doesn't mean they'll listen to you. :-|
You are a liar!  Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Lol! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Tell that to the CBP officer who can’t pay rent. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment. Those USSS agents that guard Trump and put their lives on the line everyday are working for free as is the Coast Guard and more! Trump could care less! This is a crisis caused by the liar in the WH and a GOP that is spineless.
Delusional
Mark Blackmore why you lil durp durp durp dur dur  durrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooooo ooooooo ahhh ahhhh here you go 🍌
Mark Blackmore nice try , get some facts then step up
Micheal, that's a good one.  Typical snowflake trump supporter.  You come to the discussion with no facts or information just verbal attacks...so very much like Trump you are in that way.
It would cost a lot less money to put his draft dodging Grandfathers name on the monument at Ellis Island! ;-)
Wanda, I am sorry you are so scared of what Trump lies about but yes the reality is that illegal border crossings are at a historic low.
Micheal, that's a good one.  Typical snowflake trump supporter.  You come to the discussion with no facts or information just verbal attacks...so very much like Trump you are in that way.
Wanda, I am sorry you are so scared of what Trump lies about but yes the reality is that illegal border crossings are at a historic low.
Common sense says ya gotta protect your perimeter just like you naturally do or wanna do at your home. Maybe need to let them know that they are straight up missing some chromosomes and don't need to be involved with making decisions in regards to security period, ya know.
Many people would cry if it was laid out that blunt and direct, but somebody probably gonna have to do it sooner or later. Wow, this is crazy..........
MARK.  SO YOU THINK KNOW MORE ABOUT THIS SITUATION THAN THE PRESIDENT AND THE BORDER PATROL?  BLESS YOUR HEART. ;)
Many people would cry if it was laid out that blunt and direct, but somebody probably gonna have to do it sooner or later. Wow, this is crazy..........
Common sense says ya gotta protect your perimeter just like you naturally do or wanna do at your home. Maybe need to let them know that they are straight up missing some chromosomes and don't need to be involved with making decisions in regards to security period, ya know.
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Diane Mathieu you might think this is about defeating trump, but that is not the case. trump could have had his wall built already. He had both houses and two years time to do it. What stopped him? It’s clear he never had the backing, not from congress and not from the Republican party, but now he wants the Democrats to back the plan his own party wouldn’t. That is ridiculous!
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Diane Mathieu you might think this is about defeating trump, but that is not the case. trump could have had his wall built already. He had both houses and two years time to do it. What stopped him? It’s clear he never had the backing, not from congress and not from the Republican party, but now he wants the Democrats to back the plan his own party wouldn’t. That is ridiculous!
Just build the wall. Those opposed will never change their minds. Its all about defeating Trump. Dont give them that! Most are behind you!
Danny Leonard They sold out to globalism. Build the wall with cartel money.
There is no Emergency or Crisis on our borders............the only Emergency and Crisis is occurring in the White House!!!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Yay, another intelligent American !!!  My message to Donald Trump:  “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Why you pesky lil durp durp durp dur dur dururrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝Buuuzzzzzz!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo oooo ahhh ahhh here ya go 🍌
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin go to bed
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin 🐝buzzzz bye !!!
Dee Wilson that Dee,  is the long and the short of it
Danny Leonard They sold out to globalism. Build the wall with cartel money.
Dee Wilson that Dee,  is the long and the short of it
Jerry Risner Amen
Jerry Risner, read this :  My message to Donald Trump:  “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Jerry Risner Exactly and that there is good old fashion common sense folks .👏
Jerry Risner with both houses of congress since trump took office two years ago, he couldn’t get the wall funded. Could that be because he lied about Mexico paying for it? How many times was he filmed saying that? Who knows, but he had his chance and blew it
Arev Neerg i'm sure your stern message will change his ways. the dems. plan of let them all in isn't a border security plan
Ann de Roo-Daly wow he must be the first politician who said something that wasn't true
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin 🐝buzzzz bye !!!
Ann de Roo-Daly wow he must be the first politician who said something that wasn't true
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin didn’t I say go away 🤔 Yup!! That’s definitely what I said.. ✌🏻
Arev Neerg i'm sure your stern message will change his ways. the dems. plan of let them all in isn't a border security plan
Tiffany Davis yep i agree back in the day it would mean war
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Tiffany Davis yep i agree back in the day it would mean war
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Build the wall The American people will help fund it.
Build the wall The American people will help fund it.
I stand Proud with you Mr. President
I stand Proud with you Mr. President
Take the money from defense fund call an emergency for security and let the military build the wall. Get this over with. We have over 600 miles of Border Fence/wall already up. Let’s finish the job.
Mistey did you say that when President Obama was in office or do you just fight for nonsense and bullshit!!!? Karma? Yeah right!
Take the money from defense fund call an emergency for security and let the military build the wall. Get this over with. We have over 600 miles of Border Fence/wall already up. Let’s finish the job.
Mistey did you say that when President Obama was in office or do you just fight for nonsense and bullshit!!!? Karma? Yeah right!
We The People only give President Hoax the RESPECT he deserves!!!
I'd be more scared of Jesus karma for you "Christians"
We The People only give President Hoax the RESPECT he deserves!!!
I’m sorry that the government shut down is causing people a hardship!   What did you all do when Obama shut down the government for 21 days as he forced Obama care down r throats??   Stand behind the office and stand for and respect our President!!!
Sandra Hundley amen Cuz !
Sandra Hundley amen Cuz !
Build the way !!!!!! State of emergency!!!!!! Why do we have to fight with fellow Americans to protect Americans????!!!! Down with the dems....build the damn wall
Karol L Smith BUDGET RECONCILIATION DOESN'T NEED 60 VOTES! JUST A SIMPLE MAJORITY! TIME TO GET A NEW CIVICS BOOK!!! Geez Louise.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Joseph Nobles Really??? Get a grip on life. Your Democratic leadership stinks. I bet they are all comfortable in there high security houses with walls to keep them safe. You must not live around a state that has border problems or you would see the need!
Joseph Nobles you pesky lil durp durp dur dur duuuurrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo ahhhh ahhhh!!!! Here you go lil 🐒🍌
Joseph Nobles:   Yes, we had the House and Senate.  From day one of this Presidency Chuck (Senator) minority in Senate and Nancy (house) minority,  vowed to not work with the president.  Look back to Chuck saying, before any name was mentioned for Supreme Court said Dems would not vote to confirm. They made fools, during the hearing, of themselves. Remember we now need 60 votes in Senate to pass anything further.  Chuck said No Way do Dems vote yes to anything!!   😡😡😡😡
Build the way !!!!!! State of emergency!!!!!! Why do we have to fight with fellow Americans to protect Americans????!!!! Down with the dems....build the damn wall
Joseph Nobles:   Yes, we had the House and Senate.  From day one of this Presidency Chuck (Senator) minority in Senate and Nancy (house) minority,  vowed to not work with the president.  Look back to Chuck saying, before any name was mentioned for Supreme Court said Dems would not vote to confirm. They made fools, during the hearing, of themselves. Remember we now need 60 votes in Senate to pass anything further.  Chuck said No Way do Dems vote yes to anything!!   😡😡😡😡
Well said, Joseph!
Deb Lilred Arrowood I hear you. Its shameful what is going on in North Carolina in the House race. Talk about cheating. So bad, that there may be another election.
Deb Lilred Arrowood Yes. Still waiting for the caravan to arrive. Cant wait to see our first military parade.
Kory Sutherland you’re rude. But hey, I’m sure all the illegals you want to let in speak and write with perfect diction and punctuation in English. Right? No? Hmm.
Timothy Mueller idiot
Timothy Mueller why you pesky lil durp durp durp dur dur dur duuurrrrrrrrppp!!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzz!!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo ooooo ahhh ahhh here ya go 🍌
Yay, finally an intelligent American ...  My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Timothy Mueller stfu 🐝Buzzzzz!!!
Well said, Joseph!
Tess Calomino There were actually more votes for Democratic Senator candidates than for GOP.  Go ahead and check; it's public record.  GOP gained seats due to gerrymandering.
Timothy Mueller 😭
Tim Gilbert . No crying here. Im satisfied with the results.
Tess Calomino Do all Republicans go to school to learn grammar and punctuation like you do?  If you're going to be all "WUHL HURDUR THIS ARE 'MERICA!" at least learn how to write the English language. :-/ For the love of God, lady...
Timothy Mueller.   Well when certain states let ANY ONE VOTE LEGALLY  OR ILLEGALLY AND DON'T REGULATE, CARE AND COVER IT UP WHAT DO YOU EXPECT !!!!   You are so "good" at math take a look at how much $$$ are spent on illegal
Timothy Mueller stfu 🐝Buzzzzz!!!
Did anyone see Schumer in the rebuttal?  I'm pretty sure his homosapian costume was loose in a few places revealing his repulsive reptile scales.
Deb Lilred Arrowood illegals verses what $$$ towards helping our own citizens first.  And the Democrats have the nerve to request more $$$ for foreign aid than what is already being allocated but no concern towards the safety and security of the citizens they took a oath to serve and protect.  Whatever,  some sheep keep their blinders on.
Yes we need a border! Thank you to our President to continue his very intelligent process. We support you and lets get this done! Protect and Defend! Finally we have a good leader in office lets support our President Donald J. Trump!
My message to Donald Trump, Connie Holman Sportsman ... take. It’s !!!  “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Arev Neerg... Just the opposite. Trump is far from acting like a child !! The real children are Pelosi and Schumer, refusing to do the adult thing and negotiate a deal. They don't want to budge. Pelosi saying she would only give a dollar? They can't see past their bitterness and hatred to put something on the table. This is not Trump acting like a child, it's the left using the wall against Trump and holding Americans hostage with their refusal to work with our President because it would enterfere with their political agenda,  shame on them!!
Pelosi slurs and can't even talk right. So what diagnosis do you give her?
Yes we need a border! Thank you to our President to continue his very intelligent process. We support you and lets get this done! Protect and Defend! Finally we have a good leader in office lets support our President Donald J. Trump!
Pelosi slurs and can't even talk right. So what diagnosis do you give her?
Jeff Stone exactly
Karen Hollis you probably live close to an area that has some kind of barrier/fence. There are hundreds of miles that has nothing!! You can just walk right into our country.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin put a sock in it 🐒boy here's a 🍌
Vida Marte not being a naive nitwit makes you a wimp now? Lmao here you go 🐒have a 🍌
Arev Neerg... Just the opposite. Trump is far from acting like a child !! The real children are Pelosi and Schumer, refusing to do the adult thing and negotiate a deal. They don't want to budge. Pelosi saying she would only give a dollar? They can't see past their bitterness and hatred to put something on the table. This is not Trump acting like a child, it's the left using the wall against Trump and holding Americans hostage with their refusal to work with our President because it would enterfere with their political agenda,  shame on them!!
Vida Marte not being a naive nitwit makes you a wimp now? Lmao here you go 🐒have a 🍌
A comedian!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin What planet are you from ? Is it Zeldar?
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin put a sock in it 🐒boy here's a 🍌
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin What planet are you from ? Is it Zeldar?
Cindy Gregg I'm about sick of lazy, entitled types like you. If you want something, you have to WORK for it.  Get off of your dead behind and go build it yourself if that's what you want so bad.
Barbara Balding Garlic it's a 3-prong approach. It's strategically placed and not coast to coast so why can't you compromise on it?
Kory Sutherland do you kiss your boyfriend with that mouth. Funny how you can pretty much already know what a snowflake is like before even having to look at their profile.
Barbara Balding Garlic are you that stupid. How many people who own that land do you think would complain about a wall when  people are coming through and shitting on there land leaving trash and even die on that land because of lack of preparation for the long trip. There is also a thing called imminent domain.
Matt Farus interviews with landowners in Texas show they will fight it.
Matt Farus ever hear of inverse condemnation.??  Regardless, it is going to take years to sort out all of that. Don’t hold your breath for that wall of yours.
A comedian!
Kelly Dunham Hardin what polls are you referring to?
https://www.nytimes.com/2018/03/22/us/politics/border-patrol-wall-immigration-trump-senate-democrats.html
Kelly Dunham Hardin here is a poll from the conservative pollster, Rasmussen   http://www.rasmussenreports.com/public_content/politics/current_events/immigration/july_2017/most_voters_say_no_to_border_wall
Kelly Dunham Hardin  https://www.npr.org/2018/12/11/675334306/poll-americans-want-trump-to-compromise-on-border-wall-amid-possible-shutdown
Kelly Dunham Hardin  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/most-americans-support-daca-but-oppose-border-wall-cbs-news-poll/
Kelly Dunham Hardin  https://hotair.com/archives/2016/03/31/pew-poll-support-for-border-wall-with-mexico-drops-to-3858/
Kelly Dunham Hardin http://fortune.com/2018/12/12/trump-border-wall-poll/
Matt Farus ever hear of inverse condemnation.??  Regardless, it is going to take years to sort out all of that. Don’t hold your breath for that wall of yours.
BUILD the WALL TALL & STRONG!
BUILD the WALL TALL & STRONG!
And a palette if cash to Iran, and 20% of our uranium to Russia....  I could go on and on and on.
And a palette if cash to Iran, and 20% of our uranium to Russia....  I could go on and on and on.
Once the wall is built, you win another 4 years in the office. That's why they are afraid.
LeeAnn Leonard we? No LeeAnn, you might be, but you cannot speak for other Americans
Once the wall is built, you win another 4 years in the office. That's why they are afraid.
LeeAnn Leonard we? No LeeAnn, you might be, but you cannot speak for other Americans
Christopher Warehime you would love that, seeing people without food? You Trump supporters are ignorant assholes.
We are standing with you President Trump! DO NOT backdown, MANY are praying for you!
Christopher Warehime you would love that, seeing people without food? You Trump supporters are ignorant assholes.
Build the wall. The democrats wanted it a few years ago, and now are backing down. They need to look out for the American people for a change.
They are doing it because of US . They think we will drop you. But i never will. They Wall is for the american people but they are drying to drive a wedge between you and us.
Build the wall. The democrats wanted it a few years ago, and now are backing down. They need to look out for the American people for a change.
West Walker you're absolutely right but true Trump supporters will never leave him
Mickey Murcudgeon so 7,000 people are standing down there in Tijuana demanding asylum right now? Yeah that makes a lot of sense..... SMH
Will Croom Do you normally just say peoples' names back to them instead contributing to the conversation? :-/
Kory Sutherland I can't see what he said LOL
Mickey Murcudgeon yes it seems really ridiculous to lock your doors on your house at night? just because we want a wall doesn't mean we're not putting a door in it dumbass.You want to come into the country you do it legally or don't come at all
Mickey Murcudgeon keep in mind this conversation is coming from a man that has a muppet as his profile pic LMAO
Mickey Murcudgeon Muppets LoL
West Walker you're absolutely right but true Trump supporters will never leave him
William Searle Patton
Mickey Murcudgeon Muppets LoL
William Searle Patton
Look to the other politicians!!! They are the ones who have lied to us for years! I have a MIND and I think for myself and use it to see the truth, not be told what I am supposed to believe!!!
illegal crossing is down to lowest levels in years
Look to the other politicians!!! They are the ones who have lied to us for years! I have a MIND and I think for myself and use it to see the truth, not be told what I am supposed to believe!!!
Mike Giorgi you just like the Idiot 45 of USA  Primate
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Mike Giorgi you just like the Idiot 45 of USA  Primate
Hello dear
Nancy Pelosi is just like Hillary Clinton !!! it's all about the money to them.
Hello dear
Ramona Menard hahaha.  Ged?
Ramona Menard try googling. Ask some one if u don't know what that is and then get back to us after learning the FACTS
The way I see it is the Democratic Party is putting the American people in danger.  They aren’t agreeing on the border because Trump wants it.  They are just making themselves look really bad.  Yea, but their homes are surrounded by a wall.
Ramona Menard try googling. Ask some one if u don't know what that is and then get back to us after learning the FACTS
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Schumer and Pelosi don’t care about us. They need to be removed from offices.
DRUMBF IS LYING AND MAKES UP NUMBERS!! ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION HAS GONE DOWN, FACT!!! DON'T BE BAMBOOZELED!! HE SCARES YOU INTO OBEDIENCE!! SAD!!!
Cindy Nelson YOU BETTER THINK ABOUT THAT!!! DRUMBF IS DEMANDING THE SHUTDOWN CONTINUE!!! WHO CARES ABOUT US? YOU THINK DRUMBF DOES? LOL!!! YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN BIGLEY!!! YOU WILL SEE!
Build the wall...illegal immigration is rising due to our thriving economy. We want it stopped.
Ramona Menard hahaha.  Ged?
Build the wall...illegal immigration is rising due to our thriving economy. We want it stopped.
Cindy Nelson YOU BETTER THINK ABOUT THAT!!! DRUMBF IS DEMANDING THE SHUTDOWN CONTINUE!!! WHO CARES ABOUT US? YOU THINK DRUMBF DOES? LOL!!! YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN BIGLEY!!! YOU WILL SEE!
Grateful that our president is protecting us.  God Bless you in your upward battle.
Democrats ONLY care about rejecting ANYTHING you propose. No matter the topic.
Sheila Martinez  Most of our elected officials are independently wealthy. That is how they got elected. Withholding their salaries would have little impact on their lifestyle.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
And I promise you, most of them won't even notice.
Sheila Martinez These are all very WEALTHY people. He could  freeze their wages for a year and it wouldn't phase them. It's wielding power that is their high. The Dumborats and Turncoat are in Ecstasy hindering Trumps efforts to save this country and keep it a Sovereign Nation.
Democrats ONLY care about rejecting ANYTHING you propose. No matter the topic.
Sheila Martinez These are all very WEALTHY people. He could  freeze their wages for a year and it wouldn't phase them. It's wielding power that is their high. The Dumborats and Turncoat are in Ecstasy hindering Trumps efforts to save this country and keep it a Sovereign Nation.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you are the problem of this great nation
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin gonna repeat that again? Everyone read it, nobody cares
And I promise you, most of them won't even notice.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin gonna repeat that again? Everyone read it, nobody cares
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you are the problem of this great nation
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Kathy Stryffeler does that even make any sense? Kill American babies but welcome Illegals?? These people are stupid
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
Kathy Stryffeler does that even make any sense? Kill American babies but welcome Illegals?? These people are stupid
Because the Democrats really are a Communist party now. Life means nothing to a Communist.   Look at all the people Stalin had killed in Russia.   There are repeated examples in history.   The young people in the colleges and universities are not learning this history.
Honor the USA and secure the border.
Paula Jewell Gowen that's what the hippocratic party wants lock their gates and let us deal with the crime
Honor the USA and secure the border.
Paula Jewell Gowen that's what the hippocratic party wants lock their gates and let us deal with the crime
They want to stop you but stand your ground - majority are with you.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin enough out of you lil durp durp durp dur dur duuuurrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo ooooo ahhh ahhhhh !!!!Here you go lil 🐒🍌
They want to stop you but stand your ground - majority are with you.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin enough out of you lil durp durp durp dur dur duuuurrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo ooooo ahhh ahhhhh !!!!Here you go lil 🐒🍌
Sherry Carruth The caravan is costing Tijuana $30k/month! Yes if they don't come here, Mexico pays. Illegals cost us well over $150 billion a year! That's the wall plus homes for American homeless, job training for those on welfare and 100s of animal shelters, a million pounds of plastic out of the oceans and more in the next few years! Think how much it will save us and what we could do with that $
Sherry Carruth consider this. The money we will not have to spend to take care of illegals would pay for the wall in only a few years.
Clinton Alexander good thing the job market is so good and most are off them now.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Clinton Alexander good thing the job market is so good and most are off them now.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin not sure, but I'll guarantee it will still be way less than Obama told. Nobody's the prolific.
Sherry Carruth consider this. The money we will not have to spend to take care of illegals would pay for the wall in only a few years.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin not sure, but I'll guarantee it will still be way less than Obama told. Nobody's the prolific.
Yet another FAKE NEWSER!!!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin who operates sanctuary cities? Democrats or republicans?
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin who operates sanctuary cities? Democrats or republicans?
SHOW ME THE PESOS!!!!
The Democrats want to help the country by stopping Trump from destroying it!
Janet Wood its the Dems destroying by not wanting to secure the border! We can't take in all of Mexico and central America and give them benefits!!!
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin  Liberal media is making you more ignorant
Janet Wood its the Dems destroying by not wanting to secure the border! We can't take in all of Mexico and central America and give them benefits!!!
The Democrats  don't  stand for America, but for foreign countries  obviously.  Their policies are not for building a better America,  but their aim is headed for SOCIALISM GOVERNMENT controlling your lifestyle.  American people must fight to keep your nation from dictatorship.  Freedom is solidarity  and we must fight to keep America for our children and grandchildren to experience  without dictatorship a hardship they don't  need to experience.
The Democrats want to help the country by stopping Trump from destroying it!
The Democrats  don't  stand for America, but for foreign countries  obviously.  Their policies are not for building a better America,  but their aim is headed for SOCIALISM GOVERNMENT controlling your lifestyle.  American people must fight to keep your nation from dictatorship.  Freedom is solidarity  and we must fight to keep America for our children and grandchildren to experience  without dictatorship a hardship they don't  need to experience.
It appears to all Americans that Democrats care more for illegal aliens and foreign countries and they do for American citizens. Keep going Donald you’re doing a great job.
JJ Orton what’s the emergency?
Thomas Morton OK buddy have you been over to the borders yet?
It appears to all Americans that Democrats care more for illegal aliens and foreign countries and they do for American citizens. Keep going Donald you’re doing a great job.
Kim Miller go live in California for a while. You’ll see where your taxes go
Randy Pomeroy that would of KILLED ME
Kim Miller go live in California for a while. You’ll see where your taxes go
Randy Pomeroy that would of KILLED ME
Franco Corso trump republicans deplorable🙄
During Trump's talk tonight he should show cmlips o Schumer, Clinton (Both), and Obama stating we need to secure the border to keep illegals out of the country so the world can see. Not just facebook but televised.
Franco Corso trump republicans deplorable🙄
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin did you have your dog do a copy paste for you...damn bots...fb needs to step up their game
Donald J. Trump==>just make an announcement we don’t need the wall and be reassured the Dems will backfire You that we need the wall.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin did you have your dog do a copy paste for you...damn bots...fb needs to step up their game
Build the wall Mr. President. We support you and want our families safe.
Pat Turner Hubbard I have said the same thing!!!
Build the wall Mr. President. We support you and want our families safe.
Pat Turner Hubbard I have said the same thing!!!
Philip Schrimpf Well said! The democrats have become spiteful and vindictive like spoiled little children. They aren't going to play unless they  get everything their way but Trump can't play. RIDICULOUS!!! CONGRESS, YOUR IN A TIME OUT FOR IDIOTIC BEHAVIOR.
President Trump, please, please haul those people by bus to Pelosi ' house and the rest to Schumer and tell the people on the bus to get off and go inside because they will take care of them.
Philip Schrimpf Well said! The democrats have become spiteful and vindictive like spoiled little children. They aren't going to play unless they  get everything their way but Trump can't play. RIDICULOUS!!! CONGRESS, YOUR IN A TIME OUT FOR IDIOTIC BEHAVIOR.
The dems.are not going to do anything good for this country...the only laws they will pass ere  ones to keep their voters dependent on them .so they will continue to vote for them....the rest of the time they keep a stink going that gives the illusion of accomplishing something......President Trump you are the only chance this country has..They talked  about us needing to secure our country and Obama was in office for 8 yrs..nothing was done ,
The dems.are not going to do anything good for this country...the only laws they will pass ere  ones to keep their voters dependent on them .so they will continue to vote for them....the rest of the time they keep a stink going that gives the illusion of accomplishing something......President Trump you are the only chance this country has..They talked  about us needing to secure our country and Obama was in office for 8 yrs..nothing was done ,
Karol L Smith
Karol L Smith
Carmen Rosa Rodriguez yes!!!
Build it ya self Trump! Write it off on ya tax return 🎯  🚂💨🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Jesse Fuller cry harder

Build it ya self Trump! Write it off on ya tax return 🎯  🚂💨🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸

John Scott  I'm telling my story to educate the American people and President Trump. This only touches the iceberg. The wall has to be built to protect Americans.
Jesse Fuller cry harder
John Scott  I'm telling my story to educate the American people and President Trump. This only touches the iceberg. The wall has to be built to protect Americans.
Tony add some heat to a tall metal fence, yikes that would work. Build military bases along the Borders. 🇺🇸🙏🏼
Kim Miller and you are the recipient  of the idiot of the day award.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Donna Barnes, Are you really trying to compare a home privacy fence or wall with a 2,000 mile 30’ wall that’s supposed to secure our borders ? Besides the fact that Obama does not have a wall around his home it would not stop serious criminals nor would Trumps wall. The wall around the Vatican was built in  the year 848, over 1,150 years ago. Probably was the latest technology at the time. Very silly and childish comparisons.
Tony Stewart the wall structure in the area where the most problems are is 423 miles. The wall in question is not the whole length of the border.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you just a durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzz!!!!
Donna Rinerr, Great then tell Trump his Great Wall is only 423 miles long because that is not what he is saying.
thanks for posting a book
Donna Rinerr, Great then tell Trump his Great Wall is only 423 miles long because that is not what he is saying.
Tony Stewart you’re confusing them with facts! tRump supporters have a problem with facts!
Trump says he is told a lot of things that aren’t true. Trump said his predecessors told him they supported his wall and all said they had no discussions with Trump about the wall and none support the building of a wall. So we can hardly believe Trump when he says border control agents want a wall or think it would work.
In 2013 the Dems voted to give $46 billion to secure the borders!! Why not now? It’s time to Stop the crime
Etta Ejg Moss then why didn't he do it at any point over the last two YEARS when Republicans had FULL control?
Heather Love Leffel Durp durp durp durp dur dur dur durp durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝!!! Buzzzzzzzzz!!!!
Heather Love Leffel that is a silly statement
Heather Love Leffel if we can not afford to throw 5 billion at a wall how come we can spend 54 billion on foreign aid?
In 2013 the Dems voted to give $46 billion to secure the borders!! Why not now? It’s time to Stop the crime
Michelle Breen then why didn't it happen when Republicans had full control?  Why wait until Dems take over KNOWING we aren't going to sign off on wasting 5 BILLION dollars on a ineffective wall?  Please explain
Republicans could have passed it the first week Trump took office......or anytime over the past two years without needing Dem support.
Wayne Denny absolutely
Jason Gardner would you like to answer the question then? Why wasn't it don't while Republicans had control of literally EVERYTHING? Why wait to fight Dems over it and shutdown the government?
Heather Love Leffel <- democrat slave troll, ignorant of how stupid they sound even when it is explained to them. The democrats will lose the house and fail to get senate, the republican majority will likely be large enough to destroy any filibuster, democrats will lose everything :) And there is nothing you can do about it. Illegals will be sent back, they will be forced to compete with the homeless and when they show up either dead from self defense when they try to rob a citizen or arrested they will get justice, the countries they came from will also be left to die as nature intended. And if you want to use the "European settler" defense, ask the Spanish who birthed the Mexican ethnicity what they did to the natives of literally half of america, all of central America and half of south America and the over 10 million African slaves they brought over, as American had merely 300k, how did mexico become such a shitty country? What is your excuse for these people who descended from soldiers who raped and murdered native people?
Heather Love Leffel if we can not afford to throw 5 billion at a wall how come we can spend 54 billion on foreign aid?
Rodney Martin we are not against better than we currently have. Walls are proven not to work, it's a fact, it would be a waste of billions of dollars then we would still have to enact other saftey precautions later. No need to waste that money! We have and will give funds to basically any other form of border security.....just not a giant wasteful ineffective wall.  I have been a democrat all my adult life and have only met ONE democrat who actually wanted open borders. To say we want open borders is false and used to create division and fear.
Rodney Martin because that is basically like taking 5 BILLION dollars and catching it on fire. We have homeless vets, hungry children, crumbling infrastructure.....this is not a time to waste that kind of money. Also, I appreciate you having a civil conversation about it with me. I enjoy speaking with adults who act like adults.
We do want a wall
Jonathan Burgsteiner and you are the prime example of a White Republican radical “Christian” male. Only Christian when you want to be. Treating females like lower class. Christianity isn’t a buffet, you’re not supposed to take what you like and leave the rest.
Jill Travassos I am a 38 year old woman with two kids AND a mortgage so maybe get your facts together before you open your mouth.
You noticed
Ecoli Nizzi shut your lame ass up . Its past your bedtime . Your mom told me to let you know its lights out .
Micheal Marceaux, you (snowflake) should move out of your parents basement!!
Eolo Nizzi II pay attention to to facts...fulfilled a hell of a lot more than other previous Presidents
Eolo Nizzi II are you frickin high? You lil durp durp durp dur dur duuuuuurrrrp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhh!!! Here ya go lil 🐒🍌
Ummm... You vote a President into office in hopes they'll fulfill the campaign promises you voted them in for. So yeah, he would have bragging rights, considering most other Presidents did nothing or screwed us over.
Jill Travassos I am a 38 year old woman with two kids AND a mortgage so maybe get your facts together before you open your mouth.
With a name like DB Cooper you are a Troll
Eolo Nizzi II trump has actually surpassed our expectations for employment.  I don’t care if a wall gets built or not.
Helen Selgren Lyman our? you mean my
DB Cooper where is the money?
I am not against a wall around Impeach Trump
DB Cooper, I can say this, after Mueller is finished with his investigation it will be no good for Trump!!
Ummm... You vote a President into office in hopes they'll fulfill the campaign promises you voted them in for. So yeah, he would have bragging rights, considering most other Presidents did nothing or screwed us over.
DB Cooper, I can say this, after Mueller is finished with his investigation it will be no good for Trump!!
Violet Sky very! They never did this to that joke Obama. Take her pay she spends to much on plastic surgery from the look of that tight face and shriveled neck! Old hag....I dare both of these jerks to hang out at a convenience store or Hell even walmart and just count how many they see. Buying beer at 7am going to work by van loads building our homes! Drunk driving with stolen identities. Makes me sick!! Our people legal citizens come first.
And ironically, it was only a promise because his campaign staff considered him too scatterbrained to remember his immigration talking points, so they gave him a one syllable word he could use.  It was only when the crowd cheered that he decided to make it a campaign feature and a promise.
Violet Sky very! They never did this to that joke Obama. Take her pay she spends to much on plastic surgery from the look of that tight face and shriveled neck! Old hag....I dare both of these jerks to hang out at a convenience store or Hell even walmart and just count how many they see. Buying beer at 7am going to work by van loads building our homes! Drunk driving with stolen identities. Makes me sick!! Our people legal citizens come first.
Here in California Democrats want to give free medical to illegal aliens instead of helping the homeless, Veterans and the American people. They are not for Americans but for those who are not Americans. I also hope the US AG will get involved and arrest them as well for aiding them.
Here in California Democrats want to give free medical to illegal aliens instead of helping the homeless, Veterans and the American people. They are not for Americans but for those who are not Americans. I also hope the US AG will get involved and arrest them as well for aiding them.
High treason, multiple counts...
High treason, multiple counts...
Empathy is not your greatest gift eh ? Just like Trump. Apparently you've got as many brain cells as you've got pesos.
Hold strong and build that Wall. We voted for you because you're the only Republican with a backbone!! #Trump2020 #MAGA #VoteInAllNewRepublicansNextTermTheOnesInOfficeNowAreWorthless
Hold strong and build that Wall. We voted for you because you're the only Republican with a backbone!! #Trump2020 #MAGA #VoteInAllNewRepublicansNextTermTheOnesInOfficeNowAreWorthless
Patti Fjerstad looks cut and dried to me. Time to start invoking “No Confidence” and start draining the swamp !!
Patti Fjerstad looks cut and dried to me. Time to start invoking “No Confidence” and start draining the swamp !!
IBroshay Kent-Williams 🙌 tell them!
IBroshay Kent-Williams 🙌 tell them!
Go after them quit playing defense go on offense. Get some big name arrests. Take down the deep state. If they are fighting for their own lives in court they won’t have time to fight you. Pretty simple concept.
Tim Baldwin ive waited 3 years for someone to have proof .. Please share !!
Micheal Marceaux I love bananas! I'm sorry! How many teeth do you have? 😬
Micheal Marceaux Wow! You Trump lovers don't get it. Border security is the least of Trump's problems so when he all but resigns at the end of this year then your little last hope will be over.
Tim Baldwin lmao dream on you foolish foolish little man .
Tim Baldwin Hillary did the colluding Einstine lol . Uranium one rings a bell ? If you even have a bell to ring . Dur durrrr dur durrrrrrrppp !!!
Go after them quit playing defense go on offense. Get some big name arrests. Take down the deep state. If they are fighting for their own lives in court they won’t have time to fight you. Pretty simple concept.
Tim Baldwin Hillary did the colluding Einstine lol . Uranium one rings a bell ? If you even have a bell to ring . Dur durrrr dur durrrrrrrppp !!!
Earlene Bryant When a president's policy making is based on what Sean Hannity, Rush Limbaugh and Fox News say? It's over   😂🤣
Tim Baldwin lmao dream on you foolish foolish little man .
Earlene Bryant When a president's policy making is based on what Sean Hannity, Rush Limbaugh and Fox News say? It's over   😂🤣
Thomas Morton close the boarder and they will pay. Good thing I ain't president you folks would love me lol.
Mike Bowers please, explain to us all in detail how Mexico will pay.
Kim Miller you're right they would laugh at us if we close the border, because they already have all our big companies there. We lost thousands of jobs to Mexico so let's give the rest of them to Mexico too.
The Democrats want our President to fail.  Plain and simple.
Kim Miller you're right they would laugh at us if we close the border, because they already have all our big companies there. We lost thousands of jobs to Mexico so let's give the rest of them to Mexico too.
I'll donate my tax return to the wall, just get it built!
Bob, I am concerned about this too, that is why my comments are about working together, not digging in our heels, not blaming one or the other, and I have commented on the unfair furloughing of government employees who need their paychecks.  They are doing their jobs and have families to support and are stressed and need the light at the end of the tunnel.  I wish we could get back to respect and sit down for the good of the country, no one being all right or all wrong.
I'll donate my tax return to the wall, just get it built!
Killlllll em alllll !!!!!! What makes the green grass grow blood blood bright red blood makes the green grass grow!!!!
Why is it that people like you who live nowhere near the boarder have you panties in a knot?
John Decker i live in Florida I know all about illegals
John Decker  you must be a dummy crat
Stephen Pierson   Another brilliant saying from another dummy crat
Killlllll em alllll !!!!!! What makes the green grass grow blood blood bright red blood makes the green grass grow!!!!
Stephen Pierson   Another brilliant saying from another dummy crat
Yeah, auto correct on a phone will be better than guns to win a war... Makes sense... 😂
John Decker  you must be a dummy crat
Yeah, auto correct on a phone will be better than guns to win a war... Makes sense... 😂
Build the wall. Take the billions confiscated from drug bust use that for the wall. Remind others that Obama closed the government to get his Obamacare. Clinton shut it down. Thanks for all you have done and will do for us
Well thanks.
Build the wall. Take the billions confiscated from drug bust use that for the wall. Remind others that Obama closed the government to get his Obamacare. Clinton shut it down. Thanks for all you have done and will do for us
Well thanks.
Good idea! Or we could cut foreign aid to countries that hate us.
Glen Koenig You are absolutely right. It was foolish not to have built the walls right away.
Good idea! Or we could cut foreign aid to countries that hate us.
If we legalized marijuana it would allow us to ....tax and obtain revenue for the wall, cut down on illegal smuggling across the mexico border, reduce incarcerations, fund opioid rehabilitation and generate new jobs.  ......just a thought
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Obama says “things are going to get worse”. Why do Dems think record jobs, tax cuts, great economy, people thriving...are “getting worse”?  Can they define what they think is “better”?   We hear Dems say they want everything Trump is doing or trying to do, including transparency, but they resist it all!  Can they define their “better” in detail? I’m tired of hearing the generic claims and want details.  I want transparency and know who paid people off with tax dollars.  I want to know how and from where their wealth is coming from.  I want THEIR tax returns.  Open borders = trafficking = slavery = $$$$$$$$$$$$$.  Dems are fighting for open borders = trafficking = slavery = $$$$$$$$$$.
If he resigns bet he gets an even bigger thank you :-)
John Decker yeah ok Einstine from the pos that are plauging this country maybe . I look forward to civil war and taking cupcakes out . Funfeti gonna be flying everywhere . Brrrrrrrrraaaaaappp!!!!
Obama says “things are going to get worse”. Why do Dems think record jobs, tax cuts, great economy, people thriving...are “getting worse”?  Can they define what they think is “better”?   We hear Dems say they want everything Trump is doing or trying to do, including transparency, but they resist it all!  Can they define their “better” in detail? I’m tired of hearing the generic claims and want details.  I want transparency and know who paid people off with tax dollars.  I want to know how and from where their wealth is coming from.  I want THEIR tax returns.  Open borders = trafficking = slavery = $$$$$$$$$$$$$.  Dems are fighting for open borders = trafficking = slavery = $$$$$$$$$$.
John Decker yeah ok Einstine from the pos that are plauging this country maybe . I look forward to civil war and taking cupcakes out . Funfeti gonna be flying everywhere . Brrrrrrrrraaaaaappp!!!!
If he resigns bet he gets an even bigger thank you :-)
You promised Mexico would pay for it.  Liar!
Amen. Spare no feelings of the wicked.
You promised Mexico would pay for it.  Liar!
Amen. Spare no feelings of the wicked.
Jason Acheson so true amen
GIVE THEM HELL TONIGHT MR. PRESIDENT !!!
Jason Acheson so true amen
To Pelosi and Schumer, it's all about stopping Trump, it has nothing to so with a wall.  They both supported a wall until Trump wanted it, except they called it a physical barrier.
To Pelosi and Schumer, it's all about stopping Trump, it has nothing to so with a wall.  They both supported a wall until Trump wanted it, except they called it a physical barrier.
Keep fighting Mr. President!  We want the wall!
Karen Bailey Yost yep they are traitors to americans time for a gallow democrats hung like we did saddam
Keep fighting Mr. President!  We want the wall!
Karen Bailey Yost yep they are traitors to americans time for a gallow democrats hung like we did saddam
Howard Bushart that's funny s*** right there do you have any family I have to stand there to protect that wall and you know what's really going on at that wall since you live down there or do you believe what you see on CNN
Howard Bushart yes there is
Howard Bushart I think machine guns would be better and cheaper
Karen Keele He's RIGHT THERE but YOU choose to believe the propaganda. And you think HE'S deluded? Good God.
Chester Nabours Did your mother have any children that lived?
Sara Margaret no I spelled it right, I'm sorry you never learned to read.
Chester Nabours Did your mother have any children that lived?
John Tanksley better yet give me your address ill stop by you don't have a fence do you ? Or a gun. I have some friends that can swing by and chat as well ok deary
Karen Keele He's RIGHT THERE but YOU choose to believe the propaganda. And you think HE'S deluded? Good God.
John Tanksley better yet give me your address ill stop by you don't have a fence do you ? Or a gun. I have some friends that can swing by and chat as well ok deary
Buchwald Kevin I don't have to finance their fears and Mexico isn't going to either (fences do keep dogs safe but I don't need one for my 4 )
...then fund the full $25B and come up with a better solution. All the democrats do is refuse... no better solutions or money.  They were all for it when Obama was in office. Stupid politics plain and simple!
Well, well, well...remember the 2010 Southwest Border Security Bill that obama signed?...                                                                            "The President signed into law a comprehensive plan to secure the Southwest border, including $600 million in supplemental funds for enhanced border protection and law enforcement activities, offset by cancelling $100 million from the SBInet program within DHS. Though not specifically provided in this bill, the President has also authorized the deployment of up to an additional, requirements-based 1,200 National Guard troops to the border, a deployment that has already begun."    I guess the Dims just sat on their thumbs and did nothing once again to secure our safety.
...then fund the full $25B and come up with a better solution. All the democrats do is refuse... no better solutions or money.  They were all for it when Obama was in office. Stupid politics plain and simple!
Barbara Warrell Jones YA THINK!!! Then why hasn’t it been done!!!🤮🤮🤮
then you are a fool
Yes
then you are a fool
Yes
Don't give in to the democrats. Stand your ground. I'm 63 years old, and the FIRST TIME I VOTED IN MY LIFE WAS FOR YOU, MR. TRUMP. Now, President Trump, I'm counting on you to keep your promises! Build the wall, and force them to come legally.
Cathy Collins Huhn Yes we do!
Don't give in to the democrats. Stand your ground. I'm 63 years old, and the FIRST TIME I VOTED IN MY LIFE WAS FOR YOU, MR. TRUMP. Now, President Trump, I'm counting on you to keep your promises! Build the wall, and force them to come legally.
Cathy Collins Huhn Yes we do!
Lisa sorry but your "we" is a rapidly shrinking minority, . Didn't you get the memo?
John Decker  maybe you should read the comments
Lisa Rudloff: reading the comments here is like using a klan rally crowd to convince yourself that everyone hates blacks.  The reality, from a half dozen polls, is you're in the minority.   Does the majority of America Want a Wall? Nope:  The Hill”. 56% no, 44% yes.  Gallup poll: 57% no, 43% yes.  Quinnipiac:  54 No, 43 yes.  Harvard CAPS/Harris:  56 No, 44 yes.  A poll by NPR, PBS, and Marist found 2/3rds of this polled don’t think the wall should be a priority.
Thank God for a true American President!  We stand behind you no matter what!  BUILD THE WALL! TRUMP 2020!
Lisa Rudloff: reading the comments here is like using a klan rally crowd to convince yourself that everyone hates blacks.  The reality, from a half dozen polls, is you're in the minority.   Does the majority of America Want a Wall? Nope:  The Hill”. 56% no, 44% yes.  Gallup poll: 57% no, 43% yes.  Quinnipiac:  54 No, 43 yes.  Harvard CAPS/Harris:  56 No, 44 yes.  A poll by NPR, PBS, and Marist found 2/3rds of this polled don’t think the wall should be a priority.
David McRoberts your source is fabricated.
David McRoberts you durp durp durp durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooohhh oooohhh ahhhh ahhhh!!! Have a 🍌
John Decker  maybe you should read the comments
David McRoberts you durp durp durp durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooohhh oooohhh ahhhh ahhhh!!! Have a 🍌
Yes we do! I just watched ABC News promoting lies and spin, everything they could think of to go against our President! But we are wise to their tactics! Stand strong President Trump!
AMEN!!!!
Yes we do! I just watched ABC News promoting lies and spin, everything they could think of to go against our President! But we are wise to their tactics! Stand strong President Trump!
AMEN!!!!
BUILD KATES WALL! NO MATTER WHAT IT TAKES!
Kevin Fo-Shizzle Oravits seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Mike Mullen agreed
Kevin Fo-Shizzle Oravits seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Mike Mullen agreed
It’s not about a wall. It is about our National Security.  Sad that Democrats continue to  pontificate
Shelly Newton how do we start a GoFundMe? I would donate in a minute!!!
I guess someone in his circle can start it.... I’m ready
Shelly Newton don't kneel down to their insane obstruction. It's America's tax dollars.
It’s not about a wall. It is about our National Security.  Sad that Democrats continue to  pontificate
Tammy Hanlon there is already a go fund me page that has raised close to if not more than 20 million already
No, we don't want it.
you want him----  by a trump bear if you want him that bad
Tammy Hanlon there is already a go fund me page that has raised close to if not more than 20 million already
you want him----  by a trump bear if you want him that bad
Joni Preuss financial 1tenth of 1% Of the US budget. Then where do we start.
No, we don't want it.
Joni Preuss financial 1tenth of 1% Of the US budget. Then where do we start.
Arthur Roberts yuck on financial and land and resource and social policy in Hollywood area. Yes on majestic views and outer state residents held hostage by ludricous policies!
The Democratic party know they going to lose in 2020 they want the people to come in and not build a wall so they can vote for them they don't care about other people down here it's suffering from the pain that the immigrants give to us
The dems just want to destroy this country that is their agenda it seems.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Russians are in mexico and so is the chinese tanks look it up on youtube
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you sound like a stupid dumb record playing over and over....
The dems just want to destroy this country that is their agenda it seems.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin you sound like a stupid dumb record playing over and over....
oh yes it does
Russians are in mexico and so is the chinese tanks look it up on youtube
oh yes it does
That makes no sense
Yea...I'm old enough to remember him saying that too.  :)
BUILD THE WALL MR PRESIDENT  ... FORGET THE DEMS
BUILD THE WALL MR PRESIDENT  ... FORGET THE DEMS
Even if it's taking all your money and leaving everyone to the streets bc they dont have a paycheck to pay their bills or fees their kids? Yea do whatever you say till it effects you. Then I'll see everyone like you bitch. 800,000 people are goin without pay bc of him.
Deb Beachem Lewis 20 for treason and 20 for incompetence?   I'm on board!
Greg collusion is not illegal remember obama 2012 russia favor to putin in his election oops obama colluded,with russia election 2012,in asia
Even if it's taking all your money and leaving everyone to the streets bc they dont have a paycheck to pay their bills or fees their kids? Yea do whatever you say till it effects you. Then I'll see everyone like you bitch. 800,000 people are goin without pay bc of him.
Greg collusion is not illegal remember obama 2012 russia favor to putin in his election oops obama colluded,with russia election 2012,in asia
If you aren't able to fulfill the promise of building the wall, which I sure hope you can because we need it badly, but if you can't the blame is on them. It's nothing against you. You're doing all you can but you can't do it alone. The Dems are the ones keeping our border unsafe.
If you aren't able to fulfill the promise of building the wall, which I sure hope you can because we need it badly, but if you can't the blame is on them. It's nothing against you. You're doing all you can but you can't do it alone. The Dems are the ones keeping our border unsafe.
Karen Binns Allen sad but true
The aggregate world debt is 238 trillion dollars, with cyber security threats adding a trillion dollars a year to that alone. Unsustainable.
Karen Binns Allen sad but true
The aggregate world debt is 238 trillion dollars, with cyber security threats adding a trillion dollars a year to that alone. Unsustainable.
This a reps job to make a mess bring in the dems for a whileblame then for their inability to clear up yearsbeyond years of rep damages and get played as the puppet for the chaos so a rep can stand back in and act like a hero so fucking abusive man
Lmao dur dur durp durp durp durrrrrrrrrrpppppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo ahhhhh ahhhhh here ya go 🍌 lmao!!!!
Lizzie Mars been hanging out to long on mars
Micheal Marceaux  too *
The only question that remains now is, have the Democrats fundamentally transformed America enough, to accept that we do not hang people anymore for, High Treason.
Micheal Marceaux  too *
After your speech I donated to your "Official Secure the Border Fund"!! Thank you for putting American citizens first!! I noticed that nancy peolsi's little speech was still putting non-citizens ahead of the safety and security of Americans.
We don't need any more voters, we are the majority right now you pin head
John Decker Sure, if you count all of the dead people voting.
After your speech I donated to your "Official Secure the Border Fund"!! Thank you for putting American citizens first!! I noticed that nancy peolsi's little speech was still putting non-citizens ahead of the safety and security of Americans.
John Decker Mob Rule Rocks! and Let's throw in Sharia Law and Democratic Socialism. I'm All In!
John Decker Mob Rule Rocks! and Let's throw in Sharia Law and Democratic Socialism. I'm All In!
Rua Wihongi I’m sure the people not getting a paycheck feel the same way
Aaron Benjamin Better than the situation now. Pres. Obama and Clinton wanted the WALL..
No they didn’t.
Rua Wihongi I’m sure the people not getting a paycheck feel the same way
All the Dems, are telling Nancy Pelosi to say no to the border. You can tell she is Coached.
No they didn’t.
Good luck Mr President, by the way on Feb 12, 2013 obamas state of the Union talked about his belief in security at the border. And on 5/25/10 Obama also ordered 1,200 National Guard troops to the border. On Sept. 29, 2006 U.S. Senat confirmed law HR 6061 authorizing and partially funding construction of 700 miles of physical fence , barriers at the border. Secure fence act of 2006. Public law 109-367.
Alison Reeder seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Good luck Mr President, by the way on Feb 12, 2013 obamas state of the Union talked about his belief in security at the border. And on 5/25/10 Obama also ordered 1,200 National Guard troops to the border. On Sept. 29, 2006 U.S. Senat confirmed law HR 6061 authorizing and partially funding construction of 700 miles of physical fence , barriers at the border. Secure fence act of 2006. Public law 109-367.
Alison Reeder seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Stand strong Mr Trump, liberals are slow
Amy McWeiss Your so ignorant and sound like a FOOL..GO AWAY TROLL
Amy McWeiss fear mongering.
Trump hates all average Americans, has zero empathy for the working class American.  Trump thinks Fed workers are Dems so he can screw them. Trump is supposed to be the Pres of the US, not Fox News! Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. FDA workers aren’t showing up to inspect our food. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Lol! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment, he’s clueless and amoral. Trump is crap!
Stand strong Mr Trump, liberals are slow
Donna Patty you cannot spell lady
Israel uses the USA military for protection for their borders. Bring home the military and send them a massive bill for free protection
James W Davis 😂
Donna Patty you cannot spell lady
James W Davis 😂
Stephen Pierson I guess you're for open borders.
Desmond Lawrence ok creepy guy rubbing Buddha
Stephen Pierson Why you pesky foolish little durp durp durp dur dur duuuuuurrrrrrppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhhh!!! Here you go lil 🐒🍌
Israel uses the USA military for protection for their borders. Bring home the military and send them a massive bill for free protection
Stephen Pierson Why you pesky foolish little durp durp durp dur dur duuuuuurrrrrrppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhhh!!! Here you go lil 🐒🍌
It should all be a concern.
Gina Mcknight every major act of terrorism came from the sky.   Maybe we should build a roof
Trump hates all average Americans, has zero empathy for the working class American.  Trump thinks Fed workers are Dems so he can screw them. Trump is supposed to be the Pres of the US, not Fox News! Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. FDA workers aren’t showing up to inspect our food. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Lol! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment, he’s clueless and amoral. Trump is an amoral pig.
Desmond Lawrence ok creepy guy rubbing Buddha
Trump hates all average Americans, has zero empathy for the working class American.  Trump thinks Fed workers are Dems so he can screw them. Trump is supposed to be the Pres of the US, not Fox News! Mexico was supposed to pay for the wall, not the US taxpayer. TSA workers who aren’t getting paid are starting not to show up, putting our aviation industry in danger. FDA workers aren’t showing up to inspect our food. The workers need to feed their families. Trump said “I can relate to federal workers not getting paid”. Lol! This from a guy who inherited millions of dollars from his dad. Trump has never had to pay rent or make a car payment, he’s clueless and amoral. Trump is an amoral pig.
We are with you Mr President! Wrote to my Senator and Congressman. Thank you for all you do!
Elaine Herrmann he had to get the Economy and the Military rebuilt first
And they didn’t have time to pass legislation in TWO YEARS to secure our borders? That’s was one of his first promises.  Think about it,  TWO YEARS and nothing standing in his way.  He could have had a slam dunk, a done deal. I just don’t think it’s that important to him.
Don't you remember him trying to get wall funding and they kept saying 'we will work on immigration reform' ? But they WILL NOT get it done. He's sick of it...shut it down. Even on tv tonight they said 'we will work on it...'  NO...TIME IS UP
It’s called governing and part of that is compromising for the Greater Good. The Left wanted DACA, the Right wanted the Wall.  Time for them to go to work. Listen to the other side they’re not ALL crazy and they just may have valid points. Listen to Learn not Argue.  We all want the same outcome, a safe country, why would  we not?
Elaine Herrmann ok so why won't they back him now ?  If they supported it then they should still support it.  They need to give up and let him do what needs to be done
Melissa Eads Parker let's face it former Speaker Paul Ryan and Mitc McConnell are where the blame should be placed
Tim Finch no the entire Party is responsible. They could have had it but they waited ( for what?) Now they have a great excuse Not to, Don’t have the votes anymore.  They are playing us.
We are with you Mr President! Wrote to my Senator and Congressman. Thank you for all you do!
Tim Finch no the entire Party is responsible. They could have had it but they waited ( for what?) Now they have a great excuse Not to, Don’t have the votes anymore.  They are playing us.
Melissa Eads Parker let's face it former Speaker Paul Ryan and Mitc McConnell are where the blame should be placed
Please please please show the videos tonight or the Dems saying we need a wall.  Everyone o talk to thinks that would be mindblowingly impactful.
In 2006 Hilary Clinton says- build the wall and deport anyone who is convicted of a crime   https://www.infowars.com/hillary-in-2006-lets-build-a-wall-deport-illegals/
Linda Morrell not until you get your keyboard fixed, love.
In 2006 Hilary Clinton says- build the wall and deport anyone who is convicted of a crime   https://www.infowars.com/hillary-in-2006-lets-build-a-wall-deport-illegals/
Linda Morrell not until you get your keyboard fixed, love.
Dave Catton THEY (Democraps)are lying 🤥 what are you blind?
Lisa Ude Andersen 🤮
NOT GOING TO HAPPEN!!! WE THE PEOPLE WANT A GREAT BIG WALL AND WE'LL THROW YOU OVER IT!!
The Dems don't care about the American people and what they want or need......stop with the game playing with them......do whatever it takes to BUILD THE WALL
Lisa Ude Andersen 🤮
Damn straight! The dems have proven time and time again that they don't give a crap about the American people!!!
RIP GOP
Dumb!
Damn straight! The dems have proven time and time again that they don't give a crap about the American people!!!
Take your pills, Bob
Bob Long republicans cant read anything that long.  Well written though👍
Christopher Meadwell lol its not my writing but ty
Christopher Meadwell lol truth
Christopher Meadwell they still block the EQUAL RIGHTS AMENDMENT IN LIKE 6-8 states its crazy in 2019 this is a issue
Democrats,are traitors to our country and constitution oath law throw them in gitmo us military plz
Heidi Dudek you are delusional you need to chk facts you are literally talking outa your asss !! Show me sources that state such bullshit !! Do you even know who blocked women’s Equal rights amendment to our constitution? Republican conservatives! Dont be mislead by stupidity! Trump n his campaign managers and chosen cabinet members are literally either in prison or on their way to it for criminal activity on behalf of your cult leader !! Omg the stupidity on this feed ffs ! History has shown economy has always done better under dems national debt has been decreased by more dems !  Trump has increased it !  And just a fyi im not a dem ive been registered republican for yrs ! but after them backing this moronic  idiot in the house now ! Never again !
Take your pills, Bob
Heidi Dudek you are delusional you need to chk facts you are literally talking outa your asss !! Show me sources that state such bullshit !! Do you even know who blocked women’s Equal rights amendment to our constitution? Republican conservatives! Dont be mislead by stupidity! Trump n his campaign managers and chosen cabinet members are literally either in prison or on their way to it for criminal activity on behalf of your cult leader !! Omg the stupidity on this feed ffs ! History has shown economy has always done better under dems national debt has been decreased by more dems !  Trump has increased it !  And just a fyi im not a dem ive been registered republican for yrs ! but after them backing this moronic  idiot in the house now ! Never again !
GOD Bless you President Trump! Stay strong We Support you!!!
Oh for pity's sake. Google the Hyde Amendment.
Kristi LaBiche, is that request specifically for Donald J. Trump? Because I’m sure he’s funded his fair share. In fact, he has stated on record that he wishes he would have aborted one more...his son, Eric (the severely intellectually challenged one)
GOD Bless you President Trump! Stay strong We Support you!!!
Kristi LaBiche, is that request specifically for Donald J. Trump? Because I’m sure he’s funded his fair share. In fact, he has stated on record that he wishes he would have aborted one more...his son, Eric (the severely intellectually challenged one)
STOP ILLEGALs from getting Anything FREE from us, the Taxpayers! 😡😡😡
STOP ILLEGALs from getting Anything FREE from us, the Taxpayers! 😡😡😡
Emmanuel Lusardi take the monies that Congress wants to give to Central America and use it for border security, including the wall/steel rods/fencing & RAZOR WIRE/barrier, just get it done.
Adams Aziz  i know 😂😂😂
Micky Renteria they will if we stop giving they foreign aid.
Emmanuel Lusardi take the monies that Congress wants to give to Central America and use it for border security, including the wall/steel rods/fencing & RAZOR WIRE/barrier, just get it done.
Micky Renteria they will if we stop giving they foreign aid.
Susan Elmes 💕
Adams Aziz  i know 😂😂😂
Susan Elmes 💕
The wall has been a no brainer since before recorded time. How about exposing who profits from not having a border wall since drug deaths, human trafficking and cost dont seem to make the people understand common sense.
Martin Sr.-- Sure, there is a high structure up by the ports of entry but there is only falling down 5 foot wire fencing across miles after that. And miles of NO fences, where evil people can sneak in. I've watched the documentation's of it. You need to get more informed about this subject.
Karen Harvey  ok Republican
The wall has been a no brainer since before recorded time. How about exposing who profits from not having a border wall since drug deaths, human trafficking and cost dont seem to make the people understand common sense.
Karen Harvey  ok Republican
Tim Gilbert spoken like the the sheepeople you must be. Way to sit up and pay attention like a good little boy. You would do well being a citizen of North Korea. I’m not screaming...just making fun of the folks like yourself that lack the ability to think critically or at all.... in many cases. It’s ok your parents didn’t teach you to think. Shouldn’t you be consuming blindly or shopping at Walmart? At least you can hunt.
Martin Sr.-- Sure, there is a high structure up by the ports of entry but there is only falling down 5 foot wire fencing across miles after that. And miles of NO fences, where evil people can sneak in. I've watched the documentation's of it. You need to get more informed about this subject.
Tim Gilbert spoken like the the sheepeople you must be. Way to sit up and pay attention like a good little boy. You would do well being a citizen of North Korea. I’m not screaming...just making fun of the folks like yourself that lack the ability to think critically or at all.... in many cases. It’s ok your parents didn’t teach you to think. Shouldn’t you be consuming blindly or shopping at Walmart? At least you can hunt.
Kentner---BS!
Karen Harvey  https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/legal-issues/paul-manafort-shared-2016-polling-data-with-russian-employee-according-to-court-filing/2019/01/08/3f562ad8-12b0-11e9-803c-4ef28312c8b9_story.html?utm_term=.1df631bef6bd
Matthew Kentner Haha, wah, wah, wah. Still your President! I can just hear the screaming coming off the screen, silly Snowflake.
Karen Harvey  https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/legal-issues/paul-manafort-shared-2016-polling-data-with-russian-employee-according-to-court-filing/2019/01/08/3f562ad8-12b0-11e9-803c-4ef28312c8b9_story.html?utm_term=.1df631bef6bd
They are by the trade deals that is bringing money to us. Mexico is giving us money!
Oh no, a triggered trump turd.
Kentner---BS!
Oh no, a triggered trump turd.
Dems are still mad about HRC losing. SAD
Dems are still mad about HRC losing. SAD
Fred Dickey Oh! Bless your little heart Freddy! You’re adorable!  Longest shutdown in history! Biggest deficit in history! And a failed reality TV star President who has lied more than any President in history. Enjoy. More Republicans are turning against the politically motivated so-called crisis that just one month ago Trump Tweeted “the border is now secure”! Buckle up Fred. Contribute to that go fund me and chill. You’ve been suckered, so Donald would be thrilled with you.
Mike Caffes no your stupidity is
Micheal Marceaux no you're stupidity is
Fred Dickey Oh! Bless your little heart Freddy! You’re adorable!  Longest shutdown in history! Biggest deficit in history! And a failed reality TV star President who has lied more than any President in history. Enjoy. More Republicans are turning against the politically motivated so-called crisis that just one month ago Trump Tweeted “the border is now secure”! Buckle up Fred. Contribute to that go fund me and chill. You’ve been suckered, so Donald would be thrilled with you.
Micheal Marceaux no you're stupidity is
Same polls used in 2016 election ? STOP BELIEVING ANYTHING MSM IS FEEDING YOU
Jerry Robinson ---Communist published Time? Man, have you been indoctrinated, sad one.
Robinson---You have a terrible comprehension problem, with no common sense to boot. Your post is BS!
Lannette Syck Yeah, don't believe facts dug up by thousands of journalists! Trump gullibles must only believe him, the great white nationalist liar -- a politician who have a general believability index of one notch above used-car salesmen. See no truth. Hear no truth. Speak no truth. Good luck!
Karen Harvey Name-calling really is really childish and makes you look dumb, Karen. Do you have any intelligence to debate on relative facts to the subject at hand?
Mike Caffes no your stupidity is
Karen Harvey Name-calling really is really childish and makes you look dumb, Karen. Do you have any intelligence to debate on relative facts to the subject at hand?
TIME to exercise your Emergency Power as POTUS...quit dealing with hypocrites in DC. AMERICA FIRST 🇺🇸
And Cathy they are coming directly to your house to do unimaginable things to you and your trash cans. :-)
John Decker yes they should crawl into them where they belong. They will be home.
TIME to exercise your Emergency Power as POTUS...quit dealing with hypocrites in DC. AMERICA FIRST 🇺🇸
John Decker yes they should crawl into them where they belong. They will be home.
And Cathy they are coming directly to your house to do unimaginable things to you and your trash cans. :-)
They’re always lying!
Once the wall is up and the opiate supply is sharply reduced, the epidemic will drastically improve. You will 100% own that huge accomplishment that impacts people of all walks and party affiliation. Big win in 2020
your paranoia and bigotry are showing.
Rick Sooy His promise was that MEXICO would pay for it!
It's ashame you feel that way, we as Americans have seen too much crap thrown at us for so long people can no longer see straight. I'm in fear for my kids and everyone else's. And bigotry has nothing to due with my feelings. John Decker answer this please - Bigotry, If someone is accused of bigotry then the accusing party must also be intolerant of the accused persons intolerance; therefore, it is self evident that the term bigot in a sense, can not actually exist in a free society or open debate because of it's self-destructive, self-imploding and hypocritical nature.
Josh your right, but this is no longer about money. The one side hates the other side and will do what ever is needed to destroy our POTUS. Like it or not he's our leader, he beat 16 Republicans and Hillary to get this position. Like it or not, Trump won.
Once the wall is up and the opiate supply is sharply reduced, the epidemic will drastically improve. You will 100% own that huge accomplishment that impacts people of all walks and party affiliation. Big win in 2020
Josh your right, but this is no longer about money. The one side hates the other side and will do what ever is needed to destroy our POTUS. Like it or not he's our leader, he beat 16 Republicans and Hillary to get this position. Like it or not, Trump won.
look it up on youtube they are there especially hillary. otherwise  go back to msnbc..troll
It's ashame you feel that way, we as Americans have seen too much crap thrown at us for so long people can no longer see straight. I'm in fear for my kids and everyone else's. And bigotry has nothing to due with my feelings. John Decker answer this please - Bigotry, If someone is accused of bigotry then the accusing party must also be intolerant of the accused persons intolerance; therefore, it is self evident that the term bigot in a sense, can not actually exist in a free society or open debate because of it's self-destructive, self-imploding and hypocritical nature.
look it up on youtube they are there especially hillary. otherwise  go back to msnbc..troll
the dems are in the pockets of the cartels
while addressing the nation tonight they should play the clips of all the hypocrite dems endorsing the wall in the past.
the dems are in the pockets of the cartels
You bet we do!  Let’s take a vote .   My Democratic Friends 👫 voted for Trump Because of our lackluster  Immigration  Laws !  And can’t stand California’s Stand on Immigration .  Newly elected Governor Newson just said Healthcare for Illegals , why’ll tax paying Californians  Work and scrimp to pay for Coverage.    This has to Stop and Stop Now !
Phuc Nguyen what the phuc are you talking about..
You bet we do!  Let’s take a vote .   My Democratic Friends 👫 voted for Trump Because of our lackluster  Immigration  Laws !  And can’t stand California’s Stand on Immigration .  Newly elected Governor Newson just said Healthcare for Illegals , why’ll tax paying Californians  Work and scrimp to pay for Coverage.    This has to Stop and Stop Now !
Phuc Nguyen what the phuc are you talking about..
Elaine Stewart Ignorant, wake up
Please build the Wall ASAP! You’re the greatest President ever, in my opinion! You are a fine example for many future generations to come to learn from! Be grounded!
Elaine Stewart Ignorant, wake up
Phillip Hanneman YUP! RIGHT ON. YOU READ UM RIGHT!
Actually, what Americans REALLY want is a new president.
Phillip Hanneman YUP! RIGHT ON. YOU READ UM RIGHT!
Yes and just like Trump Mortgage, Trump University, Trump Casinos he is rapidly bankrupting America too. Some businessman.
Where is he bankrupting us. just because he wants to spend and make thing right. look at the debt Obama left us.
I'll bet that if President Trump says that building the wall is stupid and we should invite as many Illegals in as we can hold. The Dems would build the wall for less than the proposed 5 billion dollars.
Where is he bankrupting us. just because he wants to spend and make thing right. look at the debt Obama left us.
Yes and just like Trump Mortgage, Trump University, Trump Casinos he is rapidly bankrupting America too. Some businessman.
Stopping you at whatever cost..that's the dems plan....build the wall....
Maryellen Petrilla White He was the first president I ever voted for. I miss him too.
We are with you Mr President. Dimms are in destructive mode. Do what you have to do to build the wall.🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
We are with you Mr President. Dimms are in destructive mode. Do what you have to do to build the wall.🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Right on CUZ, 👍

Larry Lavallee you’re so incredibly tiny.
Hmmmm....Larry wants a Wall and ole Hillary locked up. How about Healthcare? Clean water? Infrastructure? You are full of ignorance sir. By 2020 that traitor will be in jail.
Right on CUZ, 👍
Hmmmm....Larry wants a Wall and ole Hillary locked up. How about Healthcare? Clean water? Infrastructure? You are full of ignorance sir. By 2020 that traitor will be in jail.
Larry Walker and we will continue to fight back. Stay strong.
Larry Lavallee you’re so incredibly tiny.
Larry Walker and we will continue to fight back. Stay strong.
Aside from it being a common sense approach to an ongoing issue of illegal immigration and a deterrent,  the cost is the same as a handful of military planes (of which we have hundreds and hundreds) there’s also the added benefit of American jobs for American citizens... I don’t see the downside at all.    Frankly I’d much rather spend my tax dollars on walls, roads, and infrastructure than federally funded abortion programs and aid to countries that can’t get their act together.  Why Democrats are opposed when their very leadership just a handful of years ago were in support of the same actions is beyond me.    Whether you like this president or not, national security is the only real function of the government that means anything to me, and therefore you have my complete support!  When you’re done with this, let’s put the same amount of money into cyber security.  You’ll have my full support there too.    America First!
Yes,you are right
Aside from it being a common sense approach to an ongoing issue of illegal immigration and a deterrent,  the cost is the same as a handful of military planes (of which we have hundreds and hundreds) there’s also the added benefit of American jobs for American citizens... I don’t see the downside at all.    Frankly I’d much rather spend my tax dollars on walls, roads, and infrastructure than federally funded abortion programs and aid to countries that can’t get their act together.  Why Democrats are opposed when their very leadership just a handful of years ago were in support of the same actions is beyond me.    Whether you like this president or not, national security is the only real function of the government that means anything to me, and therefore you have my complete support!  When you’re done with this, let’s put the same amount of money into cyber security.  You’ll have my full support there too.    America First!
Yes,you are right
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
It’s Not about who pays for the wall, Democrats, Republicans, TaxPayers it’s about the safety of our country.
those that matter appreciate all that you do.
The Dems were ALL FOR border security, until....
It’s Not about who pays for the wall, Democrats, Republicans, TaxPayers it’s about the safety of our country.
The Dems were ALL FOR border security, until....
Don Darby so forget the hard working people in America that won't receive a paycheck for their family huh smh
Honey Jar how many people lost love ones from drugs from open boarders save your smh .
Dont troll people for opinions different then yours. Regardless of popular belief.  I can have an opinion
Good luck President Trump!  You have the American people behind you.  Hopefully,  you can find a way to solve this problem without the democrats! God Bless.
Dont troll people for opinions different then yours. Regardless of popular belief.  I can have an opinion
Call a National Emergency and build it!
Call a National Emergency and build it!
Yes, by all means! Destroy the American Economy by closing down the Mexican Border!
It’s funny that Obama has a shutdown for his sucky Obama Care and got away with it, but when you do a shutdown they want to cry about it . GREAT JOB TRUMP for sticking up with the Americans. build that wall
Then move idiot
Terry Keene I left looong time ago ;)  because Europe is better than where you live ;)
It’s funny that Obama has a shutdown for his sucky Obama Care and got away with it, but when you do a shutdown they want to cry about it . GREAT JOB TRUMP for sticking up with the Americans. build that wall
Support Senator Braun's (IN) bill to furlough Congressional members pay when the government is shut down!!
The democrats do not care about we the people.
Reni Isufova, if it’s so good then go, and don’t let the door hit ya asshole.
Thank you Mr. President for keeping your promises!
Thank you Mr. President for keeping your promises!
The Dems do not care about anything except their shiny new voter block and POWER!
I called Pelosi’s Office & left her  a message to build the Wall & give this President the money.  This woman, Nancy has a Vendetta against this President along with the whole  Democratic Party. I cannot believe the Disrespect of a head of the  Country like this  Party is doing to this President And Us Citizens who support him and his Agenda for America.  We pay this Congress, so instead of hurting the people who are not getting a paycheck, change that status & hold Congresses pay instead?  I find that the best solution, and you would see them wanting to settle & build the wall. Even with their crooked Billions they have by using our money for their own gain.  What if we refused to quit paying any Taxes.  I think we are better off without Government!!!
🗣Mr President, you are wasting time waiting for your democrat enemies to fund the Wall.  They won’t!!! Time to: - Declare Nacional    Security Emergency  - or use CHAPO’S    $14billion  - or use  money from    the Defense - or give in to Nancy    and Schumer, do    nothing and lose    2020  🗣You also promised to defund santuary  CITIES.... what happened with that Mr President?  Forget about congress and do what you have do to Build AMERICA’s BORDER SECURITY WALL.   😡Illegals continue crossing the border, no good! We appreciate your hard work, tolerance & perseverance.  🇺🇸You are indeed  the best President America has had and we love  you.... millions do ❤️👍🏼🇺🇸🍀
I called my congressman!!  SUPPORT OUR PRESIDENT! SECURE AMERICA! 🇺🇸❤🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
Pass it on.................... Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!…
The Democrats wanted a wall until Trump came along.  Just a little suspicious.
Pass it on.................... Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!…
I called my congressman!!  SUPPORT OUR PRESIDENT! SECURE AMERICA! 🇺🇸❤🇺🇸❤🇺🇸
All Republicans of the House and Senate need to STAND with Our President on this issue!
Democrats are not patriotic, just look at California!! Good grief, they should not be allowed anywhere near our government!
Well the Dems are helping secure a Trump 2020 win. Too bad they can’t help solve any issues and are hurting The American People ! Greedy Rich Dems !
SHT I HAVE NO COLLEGE EDUCATION AND KNOW THE RIGHT ANSWER TO THAT QUESTION
The Dems want you out & they don’t care who get hurt in the process
We the People have power and we should use that power whenever we can right now the Democrat Party is being nothing but obstructionist and we can give them our opinion by calling them. Here are the phone numbers  Nancy Pelosi in Washington DC. (202)225-4965 In San Francisco (415)556-4862  Chuck Schumer in Washington DC (202)224-6542.  or FAX (202)228-3027  I don't have a fax machine but wouldn't it be wonderful if there was a whole room full of paper in his office tomorrow? If you call and leave a message try to be civil but aggressively push 4 a barrier at our Southern border. Thank you
Democrats want America to FAIL because they hate Trump and All the people that voted for him and the end of the SLOW movement of congress.    Democrats Love Illegals and open Borders more than helping and working for America and AMERICANS.    End the hate filled liberal Democrat and vote the Democrats that HATE America out of office.
We need to extend that wall right up the California border.
I always voted for the most qualified candidate for political office. I promise I will never vote for another Democrat again in my lifetime. Never 🐽👎
I'm curious if 3 years ago, if I had said that conservatives, in this nation, would advocate the seizure of private land by the federal government, you would have called me crazy. If I had said that the government, without a real plan, would propose an inflated building project with no outline regarding overall cost, material, budgeting for upkeep or added security, and that conservatives would gladly throw money at it, you would call me crazy. And if I had said it was liberals who were advocating responsible federal funding, you would have called me crazy.
Why waste money on a wall when they'll just tunnel under it?  Spend the money on our veterans instead!!!
I'm curious if 3 years ago, if I had said that conservatives, in this nation, would advocate the seizure of private land by the federal government, you would have called me crazy. If I had said that the government, without a real plan, would propose an inflated building project with no outline regarding overall cost, material, budgeting for upkeep or added security, and that conservatives would gladly throw money at it, you would call me crazy. And if I had said it was liberals who were advocating responsible federal funding, you would have called me crazy.
I always voted for the most qualified candidate for political office. I promise I will never vote for another Democrat again in my lifetime. Never 🐽👎
It’s mind boggling how their supporters know they wanted and funded a wall, yet they bash the president for wanting the same.
You know with education ignorant can be cured but your kind of stupid is for life.
It’s mind boggling how their supporters know they wanted and funded a wall, yet they bash the president for wanting the same.
I’m getting tired hearing about this wall.  FYI. We don’t need a Wall it’s impossible where trump wants to be build. N who’s going to pay for n I know Mexico not paying for it.  Trump is lying to you  no-not many is entering in the United States illegally. Where’s the proof of that?  Look it up research it.  A wall won’t fix immigration problems etc.
How about Trump agreeing to open the government if the democrats agree to an election that let's the American people decide on a wall or not?
In an article that appeared Tuesday on Just Security, a website about national security and the law, Nicholas Rasmussen decimated Trump’s argument for a border wall — and made it known he thought the president and others in the administration are lying about the extent of a crisis.  “There is no wave of terrorist operatives waiting to cross overland into the United States. It simply isn’t true,” he wrote. “Anyone in authority using this argument to bolster support for building the wall or any other physical barrier along the southern border is most likely guilty of fear mongering and willfully misleading the American people.”
You should open up with clips of Schumer, Obama, Clinton, Pelosi demanding border security and funding for a wall.  Go...
You know with education ignorant can be cured but your kind of stupid is for life.
You should open up with clips of Schumer, Obama, Clinton, Pelosi demanding border security and funding for a wall.  Go...
Stanley Hammer, bottom line collusion is NOT  a crime!!!
YES MISTAY like Trump called Obama a non American for nearly 8 yrs!
Stanley Hammer moron!
Sean Patrick McCarthy
The Democrats are showing their immaturity such stupidity I have never heard they used to just lie now they are being comical trying to be bullies. They have lost their minds. Please don't let this BS ruin our United States of America.
I stand with the President and Border Patrol... fund security and build the wall immediately!
Build The Wall No Matter What You Have To Do, The Dems Are Playing Games, Enough!
Sean Patrick McCarthy
Absolutely Build the Wall 👍🇺🇸👍🇺🇸🙏
Mike Sikora yeah! You're comments are devoid of both truth and facts!
Absolutely Build the Wall 👍🇺🇸👍🇺🇸🙏
Mike Sikora yeah! You're comments are devoid of both truth and facts!
Nothing but a piece of propaganda
Build that wall Mr President we support you
Democrats are so hell bent on trying to make Trump fail but what are they doing in return to make this country better? Right now, absolutely nothing. Don't blame Trump for the shutdown. Blame the House for not passing a bill that will not pass the Senate.  Turnabout is fair play. The democrats refused to make the necessary votes to pass a bill that the House (when republicans had the House) and now the Senate republicans are saying "No". Kinda sucks when the other teams is using your playbook against you.
President Trump and our team will WIN if we want it more than whining Democrats.  We will see. Republican establishment types usually FOLD.
President Trump is serious about fulfilling his campaign promises . While democrats are playing petty politics with our nations security our President is doing whatever it takes to protect our borders. Contrary to bogus political talk saying he wants the wall to keep out black and brown people whom he does not like, the truth is as President of the United States of America it is his duty to protect and defend our country from illegal immigrants.
Build that wall Mr President we support you
The Dems aren’t stopping him. They offered another $1.6 billion and he turned it down. The original $1.6 billion from 2017 still has not been spent. So this shutdown is ridiculous.
The Democrats want to see America destroyed to get back at the President.  Can’t the democrat & liberals see this?
Barbara Combs--The democrat's want democrat illegal votes & Trump gone. PERIOD!
The Dems aren’t stopping him. They offered another $1.6 billion and he turned it down. The original $1.6 billion from 2017 still has not been spent. So this shutdown is ridiculous.
Barbara Combs--The democrat's want democrat illegal votes & Trump gone. PERIOD!
The Democrats want to see America destroyed to get back at the President.  Can’t the democrat & liberals see this?
Republicans need to pull the convention out of Charlotte, NC due to criminal illegals being released to the streets instead of being turned over to ICE
Do not open the government until you get a border wall ...... hell fix DACA while you are at it do an Obama “use your magical pen “ if you have too! The Dems DO NoT want you to fix DACA because then you can take credit for it! Tired of Dems holding our country hostage!
How come it was decided to build the wall 30 years ago, the money was appropiated and the wall was built across CA but petered out near Arizona.. did the funds run out or was it decided that no man would cross the desert to get here, or was the money just squandered an run out??
Tony Carlos---Yes, Trump needs to have them unsealed soon but I'm sure he's waiting for the Mueller report to be finally finished.
How come it was decided to build the wall 30 years ago, the money was appropiated and the wall was built across CA but petered out near Arizona.. did the funds run out or was it decided that no man would cross the desert to get here, or was the money just squandered an run out??
Agreed, We pay tolls.
The dems only agenda is obstructing you, President Trump!  They are afraid the idiots who support the socialists will want to jump the democrat's dinghy and get onvthe yacht with you.
Agreed, We pay tolls.
David George, if I’m wrong, then we could save a ton of cash by restructuring all of the prisons in our Criminal Justice System to nothing but fences. And with that money we save, we could build more and more walls...You are brilliant, sir.
So our nation should be like a prison?
Well all we have to do is Ask other Country's that has Walls if they work , Israel said 98% of Suicide Booming's has Stopped Because of there Walls … Walls work … Come into the United States of America ALL IS WELCOME … Just come Legally . Keep America Safe  … Trump 2020
Karen Hollis  keeping dangerous criminals ,and drugs out the best we can
Matthew Cloward ya I guess prison wall are just for looks  … ya right
How to get Mexico to pay for the wall ? Charge a toll of one US dollar  pre person to drive or walk across the Border. A border wall is a matter of National Security Therefore allocate the money from the defense fund and get on with it. Charge a 19.65 peso toll at the border to drive into America... there you go! Mexico is well on its way to paying for the Wall!  According to Google, in 2017 2,016.42 people crossed into the united states using 16 pedestrian bridges. 350 million people drive into the United States with 330 ports of entry. I say Charge a Toll of $19.16 Pesos pre person... Wall Paid For!  Charge one US Dollar toll per person to drive or walk across into the U.S. at the border. Wall paid for!
Matthew Cloward ya I guess prison wall are just for looks  … ya right
Harrah---BS! The House passed it big time. It was the Senate that didn't because of the stupid 60 vote rule!
I did not say that.  The repubs had the chance.  Now are balking.  trump is a fool and traitor.
Karen Hollis  keeping dangerous criminals ,and drugs out the best we can
I did not say that.  The repubs had the chance.  Now are balking.  trump is a fool and traitor.
Harrah---BS! The House passed it big time. It was the Senate that didn't because of the stupid 60 vote rule!
Ann MacGregor Roberts yes!  Use the military to help build the wall!
Patton---Yeah and that electrical grid can be tampered with by terrorist's sneaking in through unsecured border miles!!! Use your brain!
Ann MacGregor Roberts yes!  Use the military to help build the wall!
Keeping you from being successful. The democrats would rather see America fail than you succeed. The anti American Democratic Party, enemy of the United States 🇺🇸
Schumer and Nancy Pelosi are putting their hatred of you before serving the PEOPLE. I stand with our President Trump
Maybe if President Trump says we should have open borders, the dems will want a wall.  They just oppose ANYTHING he says.  They should be arrested for obstruction!
The Democrats through Soros manufactured this crisis
Patton---Yeah and that electrical grid can be tampered with by terrorist's sneaking in through unsecured border miles!!! Use your brain!
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
Mr.President of the United States: Sudanese police kill protesters in streets ... Stop shooting people in the streets of Khartoum (Sudan) in Africa
Please crack down on companies hiring ilegals this will also help. And banks getting rich off cartel. Build the wall and build up our border patrol in florida
How can we go over Nancy Pelosi's head Mr.PRESIDENT trump
The Democrats through Soros manufactured this crisis
Just Stand Firm for the Right thing that’s why we voted for You
Just Stand Firm for the Right thing that’s why we voted for You
Every time the dems say “no” to the wall, Trump should raise the price by a billion $.
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
If  The Communists at NBC ABC CBS CNN MSNBC do not Show the Address to the Nation Alex Jones  is airing it they have a preliminary show now at 8pm EST  infowars.com/show
I think the other reason is that there afraid of the radical fraction of the Democratic Party and possibly promises made To them to get there vote.  The other would be companies that don’t want to stop the flow of cheap labor.  And what do these same companies donate to there campaines .  How much is the speaker worth.
Then why didn't you pass a bill that did just that when Republicans controlled every branch of government?
VOTE Donald Trump 2020!!  Let's Keep America Great!!  GOD Bless Our First Family & U.S.A.
Build the wall and include California
Alice Hitch - The Wall Must be Built!!!  The People want it done ✅
President Trump, it seems you have to offer the Dems something they WANT in order for the country to get the wall WE deserve. Stay the course.
Can’t worry about the Dems .. you’re doing a great job
I am not an american...but Donald Trump beats Hillary for this wall election promise, he wants to fulfill what he promised to americans who voted him and got elected. Republicans, democrats and independent must choose to work together to raise the United States of America! End the shutdown and restore the greatest nation on earth!
And what the Border Patrol has asked for and needs to keep us safe! Also why do hard working Americans have to pay for illegal immigrants! We have sent Millions to their countries to help them,and we have 20 trillion dollar deficit. We borrow from China putting us in a bad situation. Why? We have no common sense!! Thank God for President Trump!
Build the wall and include California
And what the Border Patrol has asked for and needs to keep us safe! Also why do hard working Americans have to pay for illegal immigrants! We have sent Millions to their countries to help them,and we have 20 trillion dollar deficit. We borrow from China putting us in a bad situation. Why? We have no common sense!! Thank God for President Trump!
Jill Diberardino-Coggin exactly! Bet they even have big gates up around their property? Why?? Take them down so the strangers can come in. Oh and get rid of your guns too! 🙄🙄🤣🤣🤣
I am not an american...but Donald Trump beats Hillary for this wall election promise, he wants to fulfill what he promised to americans who voted him and got elected. Republicans, democrats and independent must choose to work together to raise the United States of America! End the shutdown and restore the greatest nation on earth!
Two faced liberals...  The Secure Fence Act of 2006, which was passed by a Republican Congress and signed by President George W. Bush, authorized about 700 miles of fencing along certain stretches of land between the border of the United States and Mexico.  **Obama, Clinton, Schumer and 23 other Democratic senators voted in favor of the act when it passed in the Senate by a vote of 80 to 19.**  Political politics Pelosi?   Every immigration bill she voted on since 1992,,, Was a NAY!  Sure she’s an American?   https://votesmart.org/candidate/key-votes/26732/nancy-pelosi/40/immigration#.XDX_vKROmEc
For 2 years, Republicans had a majority in the House and the Senate. So tell me, why did they not vote to build the WALL?
THIS IS THE REAL TRUTH!!!!!   A thorough and thoughtful post regarding the cost, and impossible challenges of Trumps “wall”.  Why it won’t happen, while still he will paralyze his country:   Please allow me to frame the issues involved with "the wall" in its actual terms. Despite what the media is saying, this is not about Democrat vs. Republican. In short, the executive branch of our government is threatening to declare a national emergency since the legislative branch will not authorize the seizure of private American property for a federal works project nor will fund it. The executive branch has already shut down the federal government. It is currently threatening to extend this government shut down for however long it takes for the legislative branch to cave.  Let us break this down.   First of all, the framework of our government is based on checks and balances. Power is divided into three branches: the Executive, the Legislative, and the Judicial. The Legislative branch controls the purse strings of government and creates laws. The Executive branch carries out those laws. The Judicial branch tells us whether the laws are constitutional or not. Each branch was designed to be able to balance the other branches.  Why? As shown by our original rebellion, Americans didn't want a King or a Dictator when we were setting up our government. We were not particularly thrilled with a House of Lords telling us what we could or could not do either.  In this case, the executive branch wants to: (1) take governmental cash,  (2) create its own law,  (3) take away private property from American citizens  (4) create its own federal works project.   At least three of these functions fall within the power/ responsibility of the legislative branch. So, what is the problem? This is one of the most naked power grabs by the executive branch over the others in recent history. Once that power is exercised, it is going to be difficult or impossible to regain any balance again. The executive branch was never meant to have that much power (see our country's previous concerns about Kings and Dictators). Is this constitutional? Very doubtful. Should all Americans be concerned? That is a question for you to answer yourself.   Second, a "National Emergency" is generally declared under these general conditions:  (1) Natural disasters including hurricanes, tornados, and earthquakes to name a few.  (2) Public health emergencies such as significant outbreaks of infectious diseases.  (3) Military attacks.  (4) Civil insurrection. (5) Any unusual and extraordinary threat, which has its source in whole or substantial part outside the United States, to the national security, foreign policy, or economy.  Now the first 4 aren't applicable. The last category was meant to be short-term only. It was designed to be reviewed by the legislative branch every year after it’s enacted (because again; the check and balance is fundamental to how we operate).  So, what is the problem here? If national emergencies can be declared by the executive branch for non-emergency purposes which vest power in one branch of the government why would that branch ever let go of that power again?  Third, the seizure of private property (known as “eminent domain”, a body of law which says the government cannot just take your home without due process). You are joking, right? No. The US/Mexican border is 1,933 miles long. It runs through 4 states (California, Arizona, New Mexico, and Texas). Only 33% of that land is actually owned or managed by the Federal Government. A sizable percentage of that land is owned by the Indian nations. It is land preserved for those tribes by treaty and land given under treaty is not land owned by the United States. These tribes already have a lot of reasons to be angry at the Federal Government. This would be pouring additional gas on an open flame.  The other 64% of that land is privately owned.   How much land would have to be taken? The amount of land that the Federal Government would have to take would likely run 1,237 miles long to 12,371 miles deep (assuming a 1 to 10-mile DMZ from the border into the United States). Even if we could only take 100 to 500 ft of land in densely populated areas, that is a lot of private property that is going to be seized by the Federal government.   The land necessary for this project would also run through some highly populated areas in the US such as San Diego, Calexico, Nogales, El Paso, and Laredo. There will be a lot of Americans who are going to have their homes and businesses taken by the federal government. Which will also mean a lot of lawsuits.  In terms of the federal works project, these types of works include hospitals, bridges, highways, walls and dams. These projects may be funded by local, state, or federal appropriations. If they are federal, they are funded by the legislative branch of our government (the same branch that our executive branch is currently trying to take power from). Is the seizure of power constitutional? Not likely given the separation of powers discussed above.  Finally, these considerations do not take into account the sheer cost, human and monetary, that will be involved. The Department of Homeland Security estimates the current cost at $21 billion for construction alone (not counting costs of maintenance or costs associated with increased military/federal patrolling).   Ask yourself a simple question. When was the last time that you saw a governmental project brought in under time and under budget? Does anyone remember the “big dig” in Boston, Mass? The actual costs are likely to be much higher. This estimated cost also does not include compensating folks for taking their land or the associated impact upon their businesses.   The Federal budget deficit grew to $779 billion dollars in 2018 according to the Treasury Department. How are we, as a country, going to fund this project? How are we, as a country, going to deal with the additional debt? Unlike private businesses, our country cannot declare bankruptcy.   This is not about Democrat vs. Republican. It is not about who has the best zingers measured in 10 second sound bites. It is about our country. The core of this issue deals with the profound and immense changes the outcome will have on the structure of our nation. This is the way that we, as a country, should be framing these issues. Please think about it.  ~ Deb Narten
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
Keep egging and telling the Democrats and Republicans to suck it up and deal with the border wall.
A quick civics lesson:  Just before the government shutdown began, the Senate, led by Majority Leader Mitch McConnell (a Republican) overwhelmingly passed a bipartisan bill that would have kept the government open.  The then-Speaker of the House Paul Ryan (a Republican) refused to allow the House to even vote on that bill knowing it would likely pass with a veto-proof majority.  For those who might not know, if a president vetoes a bill, if two-thirds of both the House and the Senate vote against that president’s veto, they can override it, thus enacting that bill.  That’s called “checks and balances,” a key component our Founding Fathers put into our Constitution.  Fast forward a few weeks to when Democrats took power in the House of Representatives. They passed essentially the same exact veto-proof bill the Senate had overwhelmingly approved just a couple of weeks earlier that would reopen the government.  Only now, the same Sen. McConnell who let the passage of that bill before, won’t allow the Senate to vote on it — because he knows it would pass, thus forcing Trump to veto it, which would embarrass the party and expose their incompetence.  Keep in mind, this all centers around a lie Trump repeatedly told during his campaign (and even now) that Mexico was going to pay for his stupid wall, a wall he now wants the American taxpayer to fund.  Republicans controlled all of Congress and the White House for the past two years. If funding this wall was such a major issue, they would have done it — they didn’t. Repeatedly, his own party refused to pass spending bills that gave Trump money for that pointless wall.  This isn’t about border security, no matter how many time Trump tells that lie. This is about his ego and his pathetic attempt to distract people from the constantly-growing list of scandals, legal troubles, and embarrassing administration departures he’s been dealing with over the last several weeks.  If our government was functioning how our Founding Fathers meant for it to, our government would have never shut down.  First it was a Republican, Paul Ryan, refusing to let the House vote on the bill the Senate passed. Now it’s hypocritical Sen. Mitch McConnell, a Republican, doing the same thing with the recently-passed House bill.  Two frauds who refused to allow a bill to be voted on to keep the government open/reopen it, not because they opposed it, but because they were afraid it would pass and embarrass their party’s “president.”  This is not how democracy works. This is not how our government is supposed to work.  Donald Trump and the GOP are the only ones to blame for this political stunt.
LOL...I thought it was a beautiful and effective point in his address. We do not build walls because of hatred of those on the outside, but for the  love of those on the inside, I am over this WALL nonsense. They need to secure our borders. It is not a racial issue. They need to call it a Place of Entry. Every country deserves this.
A quick civics lesson:  Just before the government shutdown began, the Senate, led by Majority Leader Mitch McConnell (a Republican) overwhelmingly passed a bipartisan bill that would have kept the government open.  The then-Speaker of the House Paul Ryan (a Republican) refused to allow the House to even vote on that bill knowing it would likely pass with a veto-proof majority.  For those who might not know, if a president vetoes a bill, if two-thirds of both the House and the Senate vote against that president’s veto, they can override it, thus enacting that bill.  That’s called “checks and balances,” a key component our Founding Fathers put into our Constitution.  Fast forward a few weeks to when Democrats took power in the House of Representatives. They passed essentially the same exact veto-proof bill the Senate had overwhelmingly approved just a couple of weeks earlier that would reopen the government.  Only now, the same Sen. McConnell who let the passage of that bill before, won’t allow the Senate to vote on it — because he knows it would pass, thus forcing Trump to veto it, which would embarrass the party and expose their incompetence.  Keep in mind, this all centers around a lie Trump repeatedly told during his campaign (and even now) that Mexico was going to pay for his stupid wall, a wall he now wants the American taxpayer to fund.  Republicans controlled all of Congress and the White House for the past two years. If funding this wall was such a major issue, they would have done it — they didn’t. Repeatedly, his own party refused to pass spending bills that gave Trump money for that pointless wall.  This isn’t about border security, no matter how many time Trump tells that lie. This is about his ego and his pathetic attempt to distract people from the constantly-growing list of scandals, legal troubles, and embarrassing administration departures he’s been dealing with over the last several weeks.  If our government was functioning how our Founding Fathers meant for it to, our government would have never shut down.  First it was a Republican, Paul Ryan, refusing to let the House vote on the bill the Senate passed. Now it’s hypocritical Sen. Mitch McConnell, a Republican, doing the same thing with the recently-passed House bill.  Two frauds who refused to allow a bill to be voted on to keep the government open/reopen it, not because they opposed it, but because they were afraid it would pass and embarrass their party’s “president.”  This is not how democracy works. This is not how our government is supposed to work.  Donald Trump and the GOP are the only ones to blame for this political stunt.
That is your problem and Democrats. Hate rules common sense.  Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
The Democrats aren’t interested in protecting Americans do we Americans that want a safe country must come together to keep America safe and keep our freedom. I do believe the Democrats want Socialism.  Build the wall to keep people from entering our country illegally.
Donna Morton absolutely true!  It’s not about the border at all. It all about going against our President!
There is a go fund me page for the wall if everyone of us who voted for trump gave to it we could tell the dems no one needs them
its a triple amputee vet running it he went to get the 1 dollar the speaker said shed give and she wouldn't even come out an face him shes pathetic
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Donna Morton absolutely true!  It’s not about the border at all. It all about going against our President!
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
its a triple amputee vet running it he went to get the 1 dollar the speaker said shed give and she wouldn't even come out an face him shes pathetic
Thank you for having the courage to take a stand for our country, Mr President. I am a federal employee. The only congressman from my state who is keeping his paycheck is the democrat.
How can you be against border security of your own country. Do  You know how many levels of stupid the dems are with this.
Thank you for protecting our USA Mr President!!!!! Please don’t budge on building that wall.... America NEEDS the wall!!! I support you 100%!!!!!
Mr. President, I understand why you shut down the government, and I agree to a point. The problem is that the wrong people are being "punished" for the Democrats stubbornness. Instead of taking pay away from the military, postal service, and other people in necessary jobs, why not stop the pay for the Democrats in Congress, the Senate, and the House.? When their wallets are affected, I truly think we will see that wall go up in a hurry.  I appreciate all that you do for us. Thank you. President Trump in 2020!
Build the Wall! Don’t give in to the Dems. They do not stand for what Americans want! Keep the government shut down and call a National Emergency. We’re behind you!
If it isn't a priority then why did democrats vote for it when there was a Democrat president
Karen Harvey that's right, they have no intention of fixing the border they just want shutdown over. Stand your ground Mr President.
They just want to oppose for the sake of opposing even if it means a complete government shutdown for years.
Yes Dummy, we do want border security. Border security does not equal wall. Several other polls and research show that the people DO NOT WANT A WALL OR EVEN EXPANSION OF THE FENCING. It is pretty overwhelming too average of around 55% oppose the wall. Average of only 45% want the wall. But no please continue with the strawman arguments.
They just want to oppose for the sake of opposing even if it means a complete government shutdown for years.
Yes Dummy, we do want border security. Border security does not equal wall. Several other polls and research show that the people DO NOT WANT A WALL OR EVEN EXPANSION OF THE FENCING. It is pretty overwhelming too average of around 55% oppose the wall. Average of only 45% want the wall. But no please continue with the strawman arguments.
If it isn't a priority then why did democrats vote for it when there was a Democrat president
The people who put the haha faces don't know how stupid they look
Jon Haugen , the $$$ comes from everyone.  We should have a say in how its spent.  Majority do NOT want a wall.  (And, yes, I lived in San Diego for years).  Far more effective, cost efficient ways to secure the border.
Lisa Stewart Fero obviously youve never had children in school there or had to go to the hospital there. Or pay taxes there.
The people who put the haha faces don't know how stupid they look
Lisa Stewart Fero obviously youve never had children in school there or had to go to the hospital there. Or pay taxes there.
Matt Walker  That would be awesome but there is too many unelected deep state big money greedy globalists sitting in DC that does not care one thing about anyone but themselves and how THEY want to see this country ran.
Then it is time to rise up, grow some balls like out founding fathers and remove them all, place them on trial and inprision everyone of them.  Sometimes it is just time to grow a pair and make a change.
Jon Haugen , the $$$ comes from everyone.  We should have a say in how its spent.  Majority do NOT want a wall.  (And, yes, I lived in San Diego for years).  Far more effective, cost efficient ways to secure the border.
Then it is time to rise up, grow some balls like out founding fathers and remove them all, place them on trial and inprision everyone of them.  Sometimes it is just time to grow a pair and make a change.
Communists
Matt Walker  That would be awesome but there is too many unelected deep state big money greedy globalists sitting in DC that does not care one thing about anyone but themselves and how THEY want to see this country ran.
He gave the facts and the Dems need to listen. Our country matters. Great Speech MR. PRESIDENT. THANK YOU ❤❤
To the party of Democrats please should working together to secure the border....Sir Donald Trump is unique President with more capabilities to make America Great Again and God bless USA !
Communists
To the party of Democrats please should working together to secure the border....Sir Donald Trump is unique President with more capabilities to make America Great Again and God bless USA !
democrats hate the president more then they love this country
He gave the facts and the Dems need to listen. Our country matters. Great Speech MR. PRESIDENT. THANK YOU ❤❤
democrats hate the president more then they love this country
God Bless you President Trump!
Mr President   i voted for you to do what you are doing over border security    i want to ask you  when you reach an agreement with the democrats   that it INCLUDE A BONUS CHECK FOR ALL FEDERAL EMPLOYEES WHO ARE BEING AFFECTED BY THIS SHUTDOWN
How about giving the Dems their supreme Court nominee instead of the Republican game of obstruction. Work with us to work with you.
Trump, your “PROMISE” .. as stated by YOU many times: “Mexico will pay for the Wall”!!  So, it’s not Dems preventing you from fulfilling your “Promise”, you are!  Also, prior to the recent midterm elections .. you and Republicans controlled Congress .. yet your own Party wouldn’t vote to give you the Wall.  Both Dems & Republicans want Border Security, but most believe advanced technology and more personnel on the ground is more cost effective than building a Monument to the “TRUMP” name!
Ever heard of executive orders? Bush and Obama used it all the time to get what they wanted and bypassing congress saying they didn't have time to consult them.
MY POTUS! Please stand strong! The Dems are an embarrassment. You can take their pay checks and build OUR border security.! Loved your Points! We need this security.
Freeze congress and senate pay till this is resolved, since they supported the wall and changed after elected
It's more important for the Democratic party to stop trump than to care if America is safe because trump has exposed so much corrupt in Washington DC from both sides
That is exactly why we have made 2 contributions to the "go fund me" Trump wall fund. Almost 20 million so far. 330,000 people have donated so far. That sure should send a message that people want it.
They don't want you to succeed.  Stand your ground and don't back down.  Quitters never win!
Stephen Pierson actually, the majority DO want the wall.  You’re listening to fake news again.
You're the fake news Joyce. Only a minority, like you, want the wall. The majority of We The People know it's a farce.
Jeff Rockwell you can cite poll after poll.  Anyone can manipulate polls to say what they want.  Trump ran on building a wall and won big....the people want a wall.  I am sick to death of people worrying more about people who are here illegally than they do about American citizens, and I am tired of paying for them.  If you believe walls don’t work, tell Obama, Pelosi and even the Pope to take down their walls.
They don't want you to succeed.  Stand your ground and don't back down.  Quitters never win!
Jeff Rockwell you can cite poll after poll.  Anyone can manipulate polls to say what they want.  Trump ran on building a wall and won big....the people want a wall.  I am sick to death of people worrying more about people who are here illegally than they do about American citizens, and I am tired of paying for them.  If you believe walls don’t work, tell Obama, Pelosi and even the Pope to take down their walls.
You're the fake news Joyce. Only a minority, like you, want the wall. The majority of We The People know it's a farce.
The National Emergency isn't the Mexican border, it's a corrupt US President under the control of Putin who's using the border as a distraction from his crimes. Btw where's your tax returns?
Sadly the democrats hate the POTUS more than they love their country.
I've been impressed by the number of things accomplished by Trump. Seemed like every president elected took 3 years to do anything. Only reason Obama got a second term. Was because the dude literally did nothing. Unless you call Obama care something. Even then that was stuffed down our throats with a 17 day government shutdown. All personal bs aside Trump has addressed everything every president tried before him within the first 2 years. Wake up... you don't have to like him to realize what he's doing is working.
You have a phone and a pen, does that ring a bell?  Obama did so much without congressional approval.  Build the W A L L!
The Dems only care about stopping President Trump.  NOTHING else matters!
Since congress does not want to do their job..  How can a member of Congress be removed from office?  Under Article I, Section 5, clause 2, of the Constitution, a Member of Congress may be removed from office before the normal expiration of his or her constitutional term by an “expulsion” from the Senate (if a Senator) or from the House of Representatives (if a Representative) upon a formal vote on a resolution agreed
WE WANT & NEED A WALL....don't cave to the hypocrites!
Please shutdown CNN also. They spreading false information about the wall.
What's important to Americans is pay for work.  Stop all Washington DC politicos checks and leave the working peoples pay as it is. This country is hitting rock bottom. TSA especially. Security is security no matter where it is. Shame on you trump. Release the pay already. You got my vote the first time but won't be getting it again cause u hate the middle class
What about all the tunnels and all the crooked border patrol that are crossing people to the United States there's border patrol that cross people through the checkpoints for a few thousand dollars..heler
I stand by you President Trump. If the Dems won’t get on board . Make Mexico pay for the wall. I know you know how to do this. Cut them off. No deals. No more aid or help. No protection. Deport illegals now!! Cut off any aid and all aid to illegals now. Raise tariffs . They will be begging to pay for the wall.
Since congress does not want to do their job..  How can a member of Congress be removed from office?  Under Article I, Section 5, clause 2, of the Constitution, a Member of Congress may be removed from office before the normal expiration of his or her constitutional term by an “expulsion” from the Senate (if a Senator) or from the House of Representatives (if a Representative) upon a formal vote on a resolution agreed
I stand by you President Trump. If the Dems won’t get on board . Make Mexico pay for the wall. I know you know how to do this. Cut them off. No deals. No more aid or help. No protection. Deport illegals now!! Cut off any aid and all aid to illegals now. Raise tariffs . They will be begging to pay for the wall.
Mr. President, please help newyorkers. Corrupted mayor De Blasio is going to rob our tax payer money to provide health care for the illegals.
Mr. President I know people offer advice everyday, so I won't do that, but if given the opportunity as a citizen of the United States, I would use my constitutional rights to help fix the corruption in Washington. I know the solution, if interested someone please contact me. I've been researching this since the day you took office. Ready and willing.
Thank you Mr. President for taking this country's safety and well-being seriously! The Dems have vowed since day 1 to not work with you and the only reason they won't is because of their vile hatred for you. They continue to throw a big temper tantrum because they didn't get their way and the country is suffering because of it
Most of the drugs come directly through U.S. ports of entry — the official border crossings. Smuggling engineers use constantly evolving tactics to hide the contraband in fake vehicle panels, secret compartments or deep inside engine parts. Cartel chemists have learned to liquefy meth to make it look like water. And super-potent fentanyl is so compact that pedestrian couriers can walk it through border gates hidden in clothing, shoes or body cavities  They are also playing the odds. San Diego’s main crossing at San Ysidro, the southern terminus of U.S. Interstate 5, is the busiest land border in the Western Hemisphere, where 70,000 vehicle passengers and 20,000 pedestrians enter the United States each day. For smuggling high-value narcotics, blending in is a better bet than sneaking around.  While seizures of hard drugs are at record levels — indicating an unprecedented volume of narcotics entering the United States, experts say — arrests of illegal border crossers dropped last year to the lowest level since 1971.  The money would be better spent using hi tech monitoring and hiring more U.S. customs officers whose job it is to facilitate trade and travel while stopping narcotics and other threats.
Mexico could have saved themselves Billions if they would have built the wall themselves.
Build the "We the people' Wall. It is not Trumps wall it's "We the people" wall. Stand strong Trump!!! #MYPRESIDENT❤
Stephen Pierson  Nancy Pelosi - the reason I crossed the aisle
Stephen Pierson https://www.prageru.com/videos/why-i-left-left
Stephen Pierson and there is the typical left response, make fun of someone instead of talking or debating as adults. Seems like bullying to me
Build the "We the people' Wall. It is not Trumps wall it's "We the people" wall. Stand strong Trump!!! #MYPRESIDENT❤
Waterbury Republicans with President Trump. The best President... EVER! MAGA
Schumer, Pelosi and these Obstructionist Democrats are ti be held accountable for their actions.holding up the building of this Border Wall and.Sabotaging the Security of our Republic.
I was before for Democrats now I will vote for republicans democrats not for poor people they for voters to help them to got “warm” places
The dems? Not letting Trump accomplish ANYTHING. Even if they agree with it.
Stephen Pierson and there is the typical left response, make fun of someone instead of talking or debating as adults. Seems like bullying to me
Build the wall!! Thank you for all you do.
Amber Dagata I don't think the Democrats are even politicians it's all about hating the president
Build the wall!! Thank you for all you do.
People with NO KNOWLEDGE crack me up.. Secure Fence Act 2006 Voted for by Obama and Clinton ,praised by Democrats ...  Double wall chain link fences almost 700 miles... Projected cost 1.7 billion TOTAL COST ALMOST 50 BILLION ... Get a freaking clue sheep ... Why is everything so great when it's the Dems agenda but when it's Trump's Agenda it's ALL WRONG ??????  Come on people common sense please ...
YES WE DO!!! The Dems need to just give the American People what we deserve a sense of security!!!!
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
This Veteran, immigrant and proud US citizen says... build it, Mr President.
Don’t give in, just stop the Dems paychecks and see how fast they come to the table with a great deal for the American people and this great country
Mr president you take your supporters republicans for stupid & ignorant Why you don’t build the wall when you had majority in Congress & representatives
Amber Dagata I don't think the Democrats are even politicians it's all about hating the president
Mr president you take your supporters republicans for stupid & ignorant Why you don’t build the wall when you had majority in Congress & representatives
They hate President Trump and they will go against anything that he wants to do.  They are hypocrites!
Look at the eyes of Pelosi and Schumer  This is vindictiveness If it was Obama demanding the wall they would be kissing his ring
The reason why they don’t the wall is because they want the immigrant votes to keep them in power.  If they turn two states to blue, like Texas and Florida, then it would be over for the Republican Party for many years.  There is no compromise with them with this kind of agenda.  I’d say just call for national emergency security or use the money from El Chapo and get the wall built.  That’s the only way to block them, as well as providing the border security we desperately need.
I am a Native American ! I was born here. Doesn't that count ?
Build the wall Mr. President and if the dems dont cooperate then shut down the border declare emergency.
The Dems were 100% on board with funding the wall until not so long ago. Their position flipped a 180 and no matter how you look at it, the Dems were wrong then or they are wrong now... They are suffering from Trump Derangement Syndrome and they are wrong now!.
How can the Democratic Party argue that the wall is immoral honestly the president is trying to protect not only the us but others in creating a wall to end human ,drug , firearm trafficking, potential terrorist and gang assaults In all levels of the word barbaric in addition the democrats say oh that not going to end anything they will just get visas and come in and do it anyways how ironic and yet they don’t want to accept any reform he proposed 🤔I still don’t understand if they are just against anything he says or they could care less about improving national security
We are not blind. The Dems don't care about their fellow Americans, and they don't want you to succeed.
They hate President Trump and they will go against anything that he wants to do.  They are hypocrites!
We are not blind. The Dems don't care about their fellow Americans, and they don't want you to succeed.
Do not cave into the Dems  If you do not fix the borders now it will never get done. This is the only way you will get reelected
Sharon Varner I agree!
How can the Democratic Party argue that the wall is immoral honestly the president is trying to protect not only the us but others in creating a wall to end human ,drug , firearm trafficking, potential terrorist and gang assaults In all levels of the word barbaric in addition the democrats say oh that not going to end anything they will just get visas and come in and do it anyways how ironic and yet they don’t want to accept any reform he proposed 🤔I still don’t understand if they are just against anything he says or they could care less about improving national security
Don't understand why so many people of influence fight your attempts at bettering the United States........
How come They Never tell the Democratic Offer!!!??? & What steps have Dem's taken to negotiate a Compromise!!???? How can U Compare 2 different offers if All They do Is Keep talking about Trump's Offer
Thank you President Trump for wanting to protect the most precious country in the world. I am proud to call you President of the USA
#BULDTHEWALL oh and stop the dems checks and pay everyone else they make 6 figures they got without pay for a bit
Declare Emergency, put troops on the border...be done with it.  If the Dems won't fund it ....Field of Dreams.....BUILD IT.  They will come.
Please go ahead with your executive order. You will never please the dems Too much time spent trying to pacify these cry babies. Get it done we are behind u all the way
If we could get rid of the mentally sick Democrats I have no doubt President Trump would be the greatest President in history!
Sharon Varner I agree!
There just made that crooked Hillary Clinton got beat.  Get over it and build the wall
We all know the answer to that question.  The dems dig their heels in no matter what  campaign promise President Trump tries to fulfill.  Yes, even the ones the dems were all for until he was elected.  the upside to digging their heels in is eventually they will bury themselves.  HALLELUJAH, HALLELUJAH!!!!
Democrats and Pelosi in particular, are so hung up on what President said about getting Mexico to pay to build the wall. I've seen numerous posts of CITIZENS saying they would contribute to a fund to get the wall build and I'm sure a good majority would contribute!   Personally, I wish Pres. Trump would issue an EMERGENCY ORDER to Build the WALL and circumvent Congress altogether. Obama circumvented Congress plenty of times as I recall!
The Dems don't want you to be successful in any way. Yes we need the wall.
Finally a President that tries to do what he promised. He could do great things if the dems would stop fighting him.
Why did the Dems flip flop the way they did, first full support, now none??? What changed?
Fund the wall!  Also stop the mandate Jimmy Carter made to require American Companies to give away technology to the Chinese.
We see what the dems are trying to do!!!! We’re behind you potus🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️
Thankyou Mr. President for your perseverance and dedication. ❤❤❤
We see what the dems are trying to do!!!! We’re behind you potus🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️
Jim MacKey believe nothing you hear and only half of what you see!
That ship has already sailed for Donnie.
THE DEMS HAVE PROVEN THEY HATE AMERICA. ALL WE NEED TO KNOW.  #BUILDTHEWALL
EXPLAIN THE LOWEST UNEMPLOYMENT IN 50 YEARS. RISING GDP. LOWER TAXES. MORE MINORITIES WORKING THAN AT ANY TIME IN HISTORY. LONGEST RUNNING BULL MARKET IN HISTORY. HMM. SOUNDS TO ME LIKE TRUMP KNOWS EXACTLY WHAT HE IS DOING AND HE IS DOING IT VERY WELL. #KAG
THIS PRESIDENT IS WINNING. WAKE UP KIDS.  GET COMFY. ONLY 6 MORE YEARS. ;) LOVE YOUR PAIN
Jill Travassos GAS LIGHT ALERT...GAS LIGHT ALERT On  Dec. 28, Lyin Jillie Travassos texted:   “THE DEMS, ONCE AGAIN, VOTED AGAINST PAY RAISES FOR OUR VETS.. TYPICAL. SHAME ON THEM AND ALL WHO SUPPORT THEIR SOCIALIST WAY!  #MAGA2020”    WHAT LYIN JILLIE DIDN’T SAY WAS...  “The Senate voted 85-7 to approve a $857 billion spending package for the Defense, Labor, Education, and Health and Human Services departments, confirming the biggest raise for military personnel in nearly a decade and avoiding a proposed freeze on civilian pay at the Labor Department.”  If  the Senate voted approval 85-7, DEMS HAD TO VOTE FOR IT because there weren’t 85 Republicans in the Senate! Beware of Lyin Jillie Travassos
Jill Travassos  Lyin Donnie....Lyin again  One part of last night’s address which caught my eye was that he also used it as a fund raising mechanism.  Most disappointing in a leader...for him to request media time from what he considers fake news sources, so he could talk to the nation about an emergency...and he uses it as a fund raiser!
Fund the wall!  Also stop the mandate Jimmy Carter made to require American Companies to give away technology to the Chinese.
Jill Travassos  Lyin Donnie....Lyin again  One part of last night’s address which caught my eye was that he also used it as a fund raising mechanism.  Most disappointing in a leader...for him to request media time from what he considers fake news sources, so he could talk to the nation about an emergency...and he uses it as a fund raiser!
Dean Mathoorasing the Venezuela argument just shows what a dumbass you are.
Kim Well when you don’t know how mafia works then you are just making a fool of yourself!Do you have an example of socialist country anywhere  with ressources that is prosperous? The wall is going to bring a lot of savings once built but the point why some people don’t want it to be built? Keeping chaos fit the agenda of mafia organisations in any part of the world
Jill Travassos GAS LIGHT ALERT...GAS LIGHT ALERT On  Dec. 28, Lyin Jillie Travassos texted:   “THE DEMS, ONCE AGAIN, VOTED AGAINST PAY RAISES FOR OUR VETS.. TYPICAL. SHAME ON THEM AND ALL WHO SUPPORT THEIR SOCIALIST WAY!  #MAGA2020”    WHAT LYIN JILLIE DIDN’T SAY WAS...  “The Senate voted 85-7 to approve a $857 billion spending package for the Defense, Labor, Education, and Health and Human Services departments, confirming the biggest raise for military personnel in nearly a decade and avoiding a proposed freeze on civilian pay at the Labor Department.”  If  the Senate voted approval 85-7, DEMS HAD TO VOTE FOR IT because there weren’t 85 Republicans in the Senate! Beware of Lyin Jillie Travassos
Kim Well when you don’t know how mafia works then you are just making a fool of yourself!Do you have an example of socialist country anywhere  with ressources that is prosperous? The wall is going to bring a lot of savings once built but the point why some people don’t want it to be built? Keeping chaos fit the agenda of mafia organisations in any part of the world
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Dean Mathoorasing the Venezuela argument just shows what a dumbass you are.
Question for anyone willing to answer if the democratic party will not do their jobs to protect the people they serve couldn't the President and the Republican party ask the citizens to step in since they work for the people. I mean read this. Declaration of Independence: In Congress, July 4, 1776. The unanimous Declaration of the thirteen united States of America, When in the Course of human events, it becomes necessary for one people to dissolve the political bands which have connected them with another, and to assume among the powers of the earth, the separate and equal station to which the Laws of Nature and of Nature's God entitle them, a decent respect to the opinions of mankind requires that they should declare the causes which impel them to the separation.  We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.--That to secure these rights, Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just powers from the consent of the governed, --That whenever any Form of Government becomes destructive of these ends, it is the Right of the People to alter or to abolish it, and to institute new Government, laying its foundation on such principles and organizing its powers in such form, as to them shall seem most likely to effect their Safety and Happiness. Prudence, indeed, will dictate that Governments long established should not be changed for light and transient causes; and accordingly all experience hath shewn, that mankind are more disposed to suffer, while evils are sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms to which they are accustomed. But when a long train of abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same Object evinces a design to reduce them under absolute Despotism, it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such Government, and to provide new Guards for their future security.--Such has been the patient sufferance of these Colonies; and such is now the necessity which constrains them to alter their former Systems of Government. The history of the present King of Great Britain is a history of repeated injuries and usurpations, all having in direct object the establishment of an absolute Tyranny over these States. To prove this, let Facts be submitted to a candid world.
Democratic let these people live in your homes. See if you cry out build the wall. Senators should not be paid, and let these people live in your home.
Mr. Pres. I have a great idea to solve this shutdown and stickier boot into the Democratic Party's mouth. Tell them that you will give them the hundred and $150 billion in foreign aid, And make sure they give you the $5.8 billion for the wall. Here's the deal breaker, but I think this might work. The $54 billion if they want to add to that foreign aid, and you should do this like on camera so the whole world can see, that that $54 billion will be spent at home here in America to take care of and fix the homeless problem. Damn I need to be in politics. Because not only the Republicans would be satisfied, the Democrats would be satisfied and now America would be satisfied that is both parties would be spending $54 billion to help solve the homeless issues. Damn I'm good. Let me know what you think Mr. Donald J. Trump !... let me know if you want me to come work for user :-)
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Mr. Pres. I have a great idea to solve this shutdown and stickier boot into the Democratic Party's mouth. Tell them that you will give them the hundred and $150 billion in foreign aid, And make sure they give you the $5.8 billion for the wall. Here's the deal breaker, but I think this might work. The $54 billion if they want to add to that foreign aid, and you should do this like on camera so the whole world can see, that that $54 billion will be spent at home here in America to take care of and fix the homeless problem. Damn I need to be in politics. Because not only the Republicans would be satisfied, the Democrats would be satisfied and now America would be satisfied that is both parties would be spending $54 billion to help solve the homeless issues. Damn I'm good. Let me know what you think Mr. Donald J. Trump !... let me know if you want me to come work for user :-)
Sue Byrne bullshit
We did not put Nancy or Chuck in the Presidential office, or the Democratic party.
Sue Byrne bullshit
Is lying breaking a law? If so, he should be UNDER the jail.
Build the wall!!! Keep our borders secure just like every other country does. Once again the Democrats would rather have illegal immigrants and any other crime ,if need be , just to disagree with President Trump. Stand strong!!
Is lying breaking a law? If so, he should be UNDER the jail.
Kim Miller , The 6,000 Migrants Caravan rushing the border that was televised Nationally and others coming say you are delusional and out of touch with reality...MS-13 members are intertwined with the Migrants.. Wake up. They cost American taxpayers over $ 200 Billion per year... 👎🏻👎🏻and what do you say to the families of the California police officer who was just murdered by a Mexican Illegal.??
Kim Miller , one Killing by And “Illegal “ is way too many. Kate Steinlie was also murdered by a Migrant. Domestic violence is more broad but with over 300 Million Americans it will be more Duh... Why does America owe Illegals Anything? The videos did not stop either, well unless your watching Fake News like CNN. I’ve seen others on OAN..
Kim Miller , since you seem to be for Open Borders, how many are you willing to take in and care for Education, Housing, Medical???
Kim Miller , well I’m feeling so sorry for your Blind Delusional CNN Fake News ideas. That won’t believe your own eyes when seeing the Tent Cities in Tijuana right now. You think the 6,000 came to have a big party??🤣😂👎🏻🤐
Kim Miller , come on Kim how many will you take in and care for?? They come here with just the clothes on their backs.. So step up already?? I see you Won’t just cry about it..😂🤣
President Trump are they breaking the law not protecting our country when they took the oath to protect our country
That's not how you can call the Democrats by telling them that you can open the government as long as they can approve the wall. The president of USA is negotiating with the Democrats to open the government who's the boss, who suppose to make sure that the government is running?  Is it the president or the democrats.
Democrats are obstructionists and always blame Republicans no matter who is the president
MR president take all pic hillary n obama ill gotten gain n incarcerate them the wall will b paid for, then go for PODESTA n crew
Kim Miller , come on Kim how many will you take in and care for?? They come here with just the clothes on their backs.. So step up already?? I see you Won’t just cry about it..😂🤣
Listen to our voices we're tired of you guys arguing back-and-forth we the people should vote for this
Listen to our voices we're tired of you guys arguing back-and-forth we the people should vote for this
SSiirrr...Send all the dems and liberals to California and build the wall around it....
The Dems in charge are disgusting and only care about their own power. You, my President, have the hand of God on you. Do what you have to do. Build that wall. We will stand by you!
"A shut down falls on the president's lack of leadership. He can't even control his party and get people in a room. A shut down means the president is weak".    ~DONALD J. TRUMP 2013.    You are weak. Where are the pesos?????😂
Here is the answer. The Senate and Congress needs to have term limits. Just like the President...let’s get new blood in..no more deep roots and hand shake deals..🥴🥴, party lines...we are getting no where with the old timers
He LIED. Doesn't that matter to you?  “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Here is the answer. The Senate and Congress needs to have term limits. Just like the President...let’s get new blood in..no more deep roots and hand shake deals..🥴🥴, party lines...we are getting no where with the old timers
THIS IS NOT ABOUT THE BORDER, THIS IS ABOUT TRUMP-HATE. #BUILDTHEWALL
♥️♥️♥️♥️my president ♥️♥️♥️trump !!!!build the wall 🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂
We need term limits on Congress to make changes! Can we start with Nancy Pelosi?!
Declare a national emergency to end Obama's national emergency then use the military to build the wall
show videos of what the left said when they were for the border..do this before you start reading what has been written..do not go off script..time will be short..good luck..the country needs to see those videos !!!!!
RIPGOP
Dimms just want to stop you from succeeding,  Mr President.   We need security for our country.   Strange how they were for security until you were elected.  Please continue to fight for the American people.   #Lovemypresident
Linwood Coleman ever since 2016!
LOL... I never thought about that before, but you may be right.  LOL
Dimms just want to stop you from succeeding,  Mr President.   We need security for our country.   Strange how they were for security until you were elected.  Please continue to fight for the American people.   #Lovemypresident
Pelosi only believes her data! She disregards those who are in control DHS Secretary and border patrol agents past and present. How about disregarding angel moms too by calling a barrier immoral? Elections matter!
LOL... I never thought about that before, but you may be right.  LOL
AMERICA FIRST!!!! BUILD THAT WALL!!  PROTECT OUR NATION FIRST!!!!
AMERICA FIRST!!!! BUILD THAT WALL!!  PROTECT OUR NATION FIRST!!!!
MEXICO WILL PAY FOR IT HONEY. THROUGH TRADES AND TARIFFS. YOU MISSED ECON 101. ;)  AND THE MELT DOWN IS COMING FROM PIGLIOSI AND SCHUMBAG. THEY ARE OBSTRUCTING. BLESSS THEIR LITTLE HEARTS.
Ferris---BS! The House passed the bill but there are not 60 republican's in the senate to pass it. Schumer with many democrat's "voted" for wall funding last yr but they didn't want to give up "chain migration" or "the lottery system", so the bill failed. The democrat's want 1 immigrant to also get 25 of his relative's to get in at the same time & that's OUTRAGEOUS!!!!!!!
Alyssa Ferris  I’m one of the contractors affected by this.  I’m thankful that I’m moving on soon from being an EPA contractor.   I’m glad they are shut down.  I’ve never seen more reckless spending in my life.   I’ve witnessed it for over 10 years, and it’s bad.   Hurricane Maria?   They spent  hundreds of thousands of dollars on a “dog deterrent system” for their employees for stray dogs, which was an umbrella that you “open aggressively” and every employee had a class over how to operate it.    I’ve seen residential yards excavated that exceeded the action level for lead at 0.1 mg/kg over cost 1 million dollars or more.  And if you take one speck of dirt to the left, it’s below that level.   I saw epa employees jobs being highlighting calendars for hurricane Maria and they had to take off Thursdays.   I saw meetings over where to hang a sign, that involved 100 epa employees, that make 100k or more.  1/10 epa employees are worthless.
Patrick Buster I'm all for making the EPA better and more efficient.
Karen Harvey they allocated money for it that Trump still hasn't used.  Now he wants more US taxpayer money for it. Chain migration? Kind of like Melania and her ENTIRE family? Republicans only care about chain migration when the people coming are brown. What do you suggest is put in place as an alternative to the lottery system? No legal immigration at all? We need a better legal immigration process to help address the illegal immigration problem.
Jill Travassos he's on camera saying he'll shut the government down and not blame it on Pelosi and Shumer.  Besides,  they passed a bipartisan temp spending deal to keep the government open and he's rejected it.   This is squarely on Trump.
Patrick Buster totally! I disagree on politics with some of my best friends... even my husband sometimes. 😂😂
Alyssa Ferris  either way, I’m glad Jill and I met you, and we can have differing opinions and are friends!
They only care about going against Pres Trump no matter what he does.  Even if they like it they will still disagree with him
They only care about going against Pres Trump no matter what he does.  Even if they like it they will still disagree with him
Martha H Mackay border. It’s BORDER. And what options for security do we have for drug trafficking and human trafficking to keep people safe. There is a large expanse if rural area that border control cannot maintain every minute of the day. BUILD THE WALL.
Martha H Mackay border. It’s BORDER. And what options for security do we have for drug trafficking and human trafficking to keep people safe. There is a large expanse if rural area that border control cannot maintain every minute of the day. BUILD THE WALL.
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in Canada
Damn !!! What a bunch of hypocrites !!!
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in Canada
Damn !!! What a bunch of hypocrites !!!
Democrats wanted a wall and border security when Obama was President.... https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10213323598587789&id=1332770392President Trump FansDemocrats wanted a wall and border security when Obama was President....Play Video
Yes we stand behind u President TRUMP..build that wall..
Thank you Sir God bless and protect you
Steve Johnson dont care
Thank you Sir God bless and protect you
Steve Johnson dont care
POINT OUT THE FACT THEY ARE MORE CONCERNED ABOUT GIVING THEMSELVES A PAY RAISE!!
Matthew Chavez the people on the ground are saying build a better wall, fence, or some type of barrier.
Buchwald Kevin Not a 30 ft stretch across the entire length. Barriers in some areas, and mainly for BP protection. What the agency is recommending has been thrown in the trash can with no explanation or superior solution.
POINT OUT THE FACT THEY ARE MORE CONCERNED ABOUT GIVING THEMSELVES A PAY RAISE!!
But Fox News you let Democrat’s get on there and say MOST Americans don’t want the wall without calling them out in it. You let them go on and on  about a concrete wall he has said it’s not going to be! You let them go on and on about Mexico is not going to pay for the wall when you know very well he plans to get through tariffs. Call them out when they lie !
Stand strong President Trump....WE stand with you.
Buchwald Kevin Not a 30 ft stretch across the entire length. Barriers in some areas, and mainly for BP protection. What the agency is recommending has been thrown in the trash can with no explanation or superior solution.
Mueller is coming before the wall.
You stated Mexico 🇲🇽 was gonna pay for the wall ?! Did you forget
Jeff Lucier Actually I do and they make $15 an hour just I’m just saying remember how you felt when you didn’t have a job this person feels the same way
TSA employees on average start at 12 to 13 bucks an hour
You know what the guy makes in 5 years and benefits you or me will.never see. Most city worker make upwards 45-120k and can retire with 15yrs with a full pension the we as taxpayers foot the bill. Me myself I've work 35 yrs full time. These people aren't out of a job, most are on furloughs still cashing in on your dime.
Erik Biggs were you this upset when Obummer shut down the government for 17 days to force his stance on shitty Obamacare? Probably not!
Brent Gordon No because my family has healthcare now that’s a weak argument
And Brent does your family work for the government or friends did you have anybody calling you asking how they were in a pay their bills and if you could help them
Erik Biggs not a weak argument because, although I am glad your family now has healthcare hence why that topic is easy for you to brush off! Obamacare really fucked up the rest of healthcare for others including myself. The border needs secured for so many reasons Drugs,illegals,terrorists etc. And im sorry we need a wall because we just dont have enough manpower to constantly monitor it at all times.
Erik Biggs occupational risks! No different than Ford or Gm laying people off.weak argument
Brent Gordon Occupational risk what kind of bullshit is that dude you need to go on somebody else’s post
In the 40 years I’ve been alive I’ve only been laid off from one job government jobs should be secure in our presidents should not be playing with people’s jobs may be Obama or Trump for some reason you’re coming on this post and trying to pick a fight I don’t know you you need to go somewhere else
Mueller is coming before the wall.
Erik Biggs I think you forgot. Remember when they said they wouldn't pay, what did trump say. The wall just got 10 ft taller, pepperidge farms remembers.
https://youtu.be/0wk6rswxQro
Jeff Lucier Furthermore why would you even say Mexico was going to pay for it when he knew they weren’t and then you’re going to layoff all your government Employees honest people who didn’t do anything wrong doesn’t make any sense to me and I’m sorry you have a difference of opinion
You know a government employee that dont make good money, I dont, and if they can't manage their money that's on them. Everyone seems to not save for a rainy day anymore, and spend more then they have. Also when you hire into those government positions, one must always expect this to happen, it happened many, many times before and know one screamed bloody murder.
In the 40 years I’ve been alive I’ve only been laid off from one job government jobs should be secure in our presidents should not be playing with people’s jobs may be Obama or Trump for some reason you’re coming on this post and trying to pick a fight I don’t know you you need to go somewhere else
You know a government employee that dont make good money, I dont, and if they can't manage their money that's on them. Everyone seems to not save for a rainy day anymore, and spend more then they have. Also when you hire into those government positions, one must always expect this to happen, it happened many, many times before and know one screamed bloody murder.
Jeff Lucier Furthermore why would you even say Mexico was going to pay for it when he knew they weren’t and then you’re going to layoff all your government Employees honest people who didn’t do anything wrong doesn’t make any sense to me and I’m sorry you have a difference of opinion
Build the Wall or shut our borders down!
Build this wall  America  will stand behind you
I honestly don’t think anyone opposes the wall. Many people don’t want to solve the immigration issue for political reasons. Not just democrats! It’s like a war. Many people profit from the chaos
Build this wall  America  will stand behind you
William Parker Jr. That Mexico will pay for the wall?
Greg Merz yeah that wall. That's the one. Did I mention that I liked my doctor, but I didnt get to keep my doctor. Come to think of I didn't get to keep my insurance plan that i liked either.
We all know the answer to that question, and the wall needs to go up, and DO IT NOW!!!
Greg Merz yeah that wall. That's the one. Did I mention that I liked my doctor, but I didnt get to keep my doctor. Come to think of I didn't get to keep my insurance plan that i liked either.
Bobbi Walker Bobbi...love your comment!😉
William Parker Jr. That Mexico will pay for the wall?
Bobbi Walker Bobbi...love your comment!😉
I was wondering he wants 5 billion for a wall but Government workers cant get a raise..HMM!
Kevin Shanks 🙄
BUILD THE WALL THEN THROW THEIR  ASSES OVER WHEN DONE
Kevin Shanks 🙄
I was wondering he wants 5 billion for a wall but Government workers cant get a raise..HMM!
There is no disagreement on the need for border security.  However, there is much disasgreement on how to achieve border security.  More Americans (54%) oppose building a new wall.
Billy D. Conn thank you.  That’s exactly true
They want to stop anything that don't fill their pockets...
They want to stop anything that don't fill their pockets...
Jane Knowles Dobson 😂
Ron Wissler Now that’s intelligent ..
Jessica-Chris Armstrong  he promised Mexico was  going to pay for? And, rude??
Ann Stevens said the news last week
Ann Stevens Mexico will pay eventually or our president will stop the flow of US dollars into Mexico.
Ann Stevens one way or another, Mexico pays
Kirk Herres So another example of “bait and switch “??
I am Canadian he is a great President and you should all proud of him!
Earle William Oickle WAKE UP 🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️
Jane Knowles Dobson 😂
Earle William Oickle WAKE UP 🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️
You will do what you said you would. I have no doubt about it. The Democrates may try to stop you, but you will find a way!!
Kirk Herres says who?
Please ...build the wall..fix medical!! This is why I voted for you!!! Show them all that you will not back down!!
Ursula Markey Lang Durp durp durp dur dur durp durp durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzz!!!!
Please ...build the wall..fix medical!! This is why I voted for you!!! Show them all that you will not back down!!
Ursula Markey Lang Durp durp durp dur dur durp durp durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzz!!!!
They are but it still has to be released from the treasury by law
Kathy Matlock they are through new trade deal. Pretty simple. Maga
Kathy Matlock seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
No wall! You suck! Can't wait till Mueller perp walks you (and your whole administration) out of our house.
Build it. No more time spent on opposing side witch has only 27% of population on there side. We the people command the wall.
Kathy Matlock seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
All they want is to stop President Trump from being successful. Shame on them ,they should do a good job and be proud for America.
Lissa Marie Zettergren there is also a pesky fact that he only want 800 million for this country’s healthcare. But wants to spend part of the 5 billion to make more tent camps - enough to hold up to 52,000 immigrants.  Another portion us yo hire a slew of immigration judges. He’s bullshit.
Kim Miller I cannot see your comment
All they want is to stop President Trump from being successful. Shame on them ,they should do a good job and be proud for America.
Kim Miller I cannot see your comment
Lissa Marie Zettergren there is also a pesky fact that he only want 800 million for this country’s healthcare. But wants to spend part of the 5 billion to make more tent camps - enough to hold up to 52,000 immigrants.  Another portion us yo hire a slew of immigration judges. He’s bullshit.
Our elected officials have totally forgot about us the people. We can no longer trust them. Washington needs an enema.
The Dems should donate their check to the workers not getting paid. You don’t even take a paycheck but that never comes up.
For the love of God ... Keep trying to PROTECT US don’t give up !!! 🍃🇺🇸🍃❤️🍃
Johnny Mars there is talk of using money confiscated from Mexican drug Lords for the money.
To do so would require Congress to authorize it.
For the love of God ... Keep trying to PROTECT US don’t give up !!! 🍃🇺🇸🍃❤️🍃
To do so would require Congress to authorize it.
Johnny Mars there is talk of using money confiscated from Mexican drug Lords for the money.
Linda Dubbs GO GiRL!!! 👍😘
We’re with you, Mr. President!  Build that wall
We’re with you, Mr. President!  Build that wall
Trump, you are an embarrassment to the human race.
yes both are needed!
dems will be extinct without the illegal vote. its that simple.
Build the wall, keep your foot on their throats until they give you the money. 800,000 govt workers not working and nothing is different 🤣 we don’t need all these people
As you well know they will stop at nothing to see you fail at everything you do. They are jealous, petty, divisive, hateful hypocrites. Desperate people have desperate ways and they are showing their true colors. Hang in there President Donald J. Trump the common sense majority of Americans have your back! Love & prayers to you and your family.
You my President Trump stand strong an keep us safe an God bless you for loving us all.
Tony Adrian . 3 prong approach. Not coast to coast. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process. Why can't you understand it's reasonable
You my President Trump stand strong an keep us safe an God bless you for loving us all.
Joni Preuss How is it after 200 years we're just "discovering" how to secure our borders? I think we figured this out a while ago, yeah?
Hugo Konigs seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Joni Preuss How is it after 200 years we're just "discovering" how to secure our borders? I think we figured this out a while ago, yeah?
Cut funding to sanctuary states and cities and you'll have more than ample funding for a border wall and then some.
Hugo Konigs seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Why, why aren’t you speaking about how once the wall is built we will save money by not bringing in as many immigrants. We shouldn’t be using any money from Social Security for anyone not a citizen either.Keep fighting however, do it presidentially and you’ll get more respect. Think you’re great overall!
Jamie Stowell Short my girl!!
Why, why aren’t you speaking about how once the wall is built we will save money by not bringing in as many immigrants. We shouldn’t be using any money from Social Security for anyone not a citizen either.Keep fighting however, do it presidentially and you’ll get more respect. Think you’re great overall!
Jamie Stowell Short my girl!!
Keith Hamilton LoL very true. MSNBC my friend. And unless you believe Fox is fake news as well, you have no reason to call that network as such. Interesting how you how you want free speech to remain unadulterated but look forward to shutting down any media you disagree with.
Build the wall!! I support you President Trump!
Keith Hamilton LoL very true. MSNBC my friend. And unless you believe Fox is fake news as well, you have no reason to call that network as such. Interesting how you how you want free speech to remain unadulterated but look forward to shutting down any media you disagree with.
And they will find out when enough people stand up and say NO MORE! from them.
I wonder what the concessions were in the recent USMCA pact.
And they will find out when enough people stand up and say NO MORE! from them.
I wonder what the concessions were in the recent USMCA pact.
Stephen Pierson Only in your mind, as small as it is.
Wasn't it the campaign promise that Mexico was going to pay for the wall?
Stephen Pierson Only in your mind, as small as it is.
If you doubt, look at GoFundMe.com!!  Build the wall!!gofundme.com
If you doubt, look at GoFundMe.com!!  Build the wall!!gofundme.com
Stephen Pierson Show us yours then.
Stephen Pierson Show us yours then.
never gonna happen, they have to realize that half of the people voted for Trump.
Austin Aust Garrett  he will just say fake news
never gonna happen, they have to realize that half of the people voted for Trump.
No the fake news will make fake news Katrina Kidd
Declare a national emergency,  secure the border and build the wall. Please don't cave in.
Some of us remember you repeatedly promising that Mexico would build your wall. No win
Declare a national emergency,  secure the border and build the wall. Please don't cave in.
Some of us remember you repeatedly promising that Mexico would build your wall. No win
Build the wall . We want legal immigration. We want national security. Thank you for staying strong! 🇺🇸
Katharine Kelly I agree with you.
Build that wall high and strong... we shall call it "THE GREAT WALL OF AMERICA"
Rick Grout Me, too!!  BUILD THAT WALL!
Build that wall high and strong... we shall call it "THE GREAT WALL OF AMERICA"
Rick Grout Me, too!!  BUILD THAT WALL!
The Demonuts are not for the American people, build the damn wall
They will do all they Can Mr. President. To overthrow you. I'm your wing man 100 percent.
The Demonuts are not for the American people, build the damn wall
Kathy Moseley When a president's policy making is based on what Sean Hannity, Rush Limbaugh and Fox News say? It's over   😂🤣
They will do all they Can Mr. President. To overthrow you. I'm your wing man 100 percent.
Kathy Moseley When a president's policy making is based on what Sean Hannity, Rush Limbaugh and Fox News say? It's over   😂🤣
https://www.callmycongress.com/   I Called!callmycongress.com
Delma Jackson they are NOT in it for the American people.  It is all vendetta
https://www.callmycongress.com/   I Called!callmycongress.com
Delma Jackson they are NOT in it for the American people.  It is all vendetta
We want the wall!! We want border security!! We want to stop supporting illegal immigrants with our tax dollars !! We support President Trump!! #MAGA #Trump2020
We want the wall!! We want border security!! We want to stop supporting illegal immigrants with our tax dollars !! We support President Trump!! #MAGA #Trump2020
So Mexico is paying for the wall
I thought the promise was Mexico was paying for the wall. 🤷‍♀️
Just by patient, you gona win, Mr. President....
I voted for you and I’m a Law Enforcement Officer. I deserve to be paid and not used as a political hostage. I go to work everyday despite the dangers of working in “the most violent and assaultive penitentiary in the federal prison system” (Mr. Carbajal)
I vote we stop paying all federal govt senators and congresspeople entirely to fund the wall. And I think we should do it long enough to fund a northern wall too. None of them deserve their salaries and Trump has already been forgoing his salary. So let the rest of them pony up!
I voted for you and I’m a Law Enforcement Officer. I deserve to be paid and not used as a political hostage. I go to work everyday despite the dangers of working in “the most violent and assaultive penitentiary in the federal prison system” (Mr. Carbajal)
Larry Williams Costing Americans 275 billion to pay for illegals. Not right. They are criminals breaking our laws.
Stand firm Mr. President.  You are right.  Thanks for standing firm on this issue and exposing the double standard of elite globalists.
Larry Williams Costing Americans 275 billion to pay for illegals. Not right. They are criminals breaking our laws.
The only fake news is Fox News.
The only fake news is Fox News.
Yes we do!! Protect our Country President Trump! Do give in to those low lives!
Julia Whatman Put them in Mexico for a few days with the bad aliens, rapists, have a few rocks thrown at them.....
Yes we do!! Protect our Country President Trump! Do give in to those low lives!
Julia Whatman Put them in Mexico for a few days with the bad aliens, rapists, have a few rocks thrown at them.....
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Chuck & Nancy would rather see this country burn to the ground before they give you another win.
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Play the various Democrats talking about the need for border security from years ago on national TV tonight. Let them rebut that.
Play the various Democrats talking about the need for border security from years ago on national TV tonight. Let them rebut that.
Build the wall!
But you promise Mexican  would pay for it  why don't you  keep that promise
Diane Dodge because if we  pay the want pay  promise  will not be
Build the wall!
Diane Dodge because if we  pay the want pay  promise  will not be
Karen Rice Humes NON-ESSENTIAL employees are not getting paid. Let that sink in a moment. #walkaway #theprivatesectorwantsYOU
Karen Rice Humes, then they should think of us who are working above and beyound to pay our government, you, them, & illegals to live here.  David Vice, it sinks in every time DMV tells me I have to call a 3rd party to DMV to pay something...that should be paid right there. One of MANY
But you promise Mexican  would pay for it  why don't you  keep that promise
Karen Rice Humes, then they should think of us who are working above and beyound to pay our government, you, them, & illegals to live here.  David Vice, it sinks in every time DMV tells me I have to call a 3rd party to DMV to pay something...that should be paid right there. One of MANY
Frank Eie this guy is the worst! I pray we don’t have another 4 years of this bs.
Frank Eie seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Karen Rice Humes NON-ESSENTIAL employees are not getting paid. Let that sink in a moment. #walkaway #theprivatesectorwantsYOU
Joni Preuss No, that was certainly an unfulfilled campaign promise.  "we are going to build a wall...and who is going to pay for it". then you replied...Mexico is going to pay for it!  Come on...you remember!
because he has no idea what it means to go without food, pay his bills, etc. holding the government workers hostage is his only move. How is this MAGA???
Joni Preuss No, that was certainly an unfulfilled campaign promise.  "we are going to build a wall...and who is going to pay for it". then you replied...Mexico is going to pay for it!  Come on...you remember!
We’ll all feel more secure once you’re gone.
because he has no idea what it means to go without food, pay his bills, etc. holding the government workers hostage is his only move. How is this MAGA???
Legalize marijuana proceeds got o building the wall.  That would really piss off the dems.....
Dum Dems, don't want to educate themselves. Instead they believe the fake news. BIILD THE WALL!!
The president who promised jobs for Americans could hire thousands of border patrol agents . It would be a tough job but there are those who would gladly do it.
As he shares the completely unbiased and nuanced “reporting” of FOX “News”
Stand strong Mr President! Democrats seem to think winning house made them Supreme rulers! Wrong! America needs secure borders with walls!
Trump2020, MAGA, Build The Wall, Secure Our Borders
Stand strong Mr President! Democrats seem to think winning house made them Supreme rulers! Wrong! America needs secure borders with walls!
Shawn Moore Drumpf is also asking for $4.5 billion for more beds
The delusional dems say no crisis  Over 15 million illegals here draining our resources  that's a crisis
Where were the Republicans during the midterm elections?
Shawn Moore Drumpf is also asking for $4.5 billion for more beds
I don't understand why Americans that want the Wall, can not use money that is...given, donated, or raised by different organizations to build the wall! There has been enough money raised to cover much of what is needed to start building!  Americans are going to pay for the Wall some way, likely by taxing us until we get it built. We can build a Wall. We need to really show it and stand with our president no matter what. #AMERICANSBUILDTHEWALL
Build the wall. Don 't give in the American people are behind you. Thank You for for being on the front lines for the true American people.  We are praying for you and your family everyday!
You're blabbering last night was not about National Security it was about politics all you want to do is complain about Democrats you're causing this country to equate the word Democrat with bad nasty the cause of all problems you are inciting hate grow up
Build the wall !     Pfuck the Democrats.   Don't bring any of their bills to the Senate for consideration.   Harry Reid  did the same with the Republicans.  Fair is fair.
Mr president  If you tell all these liberals how much it will cost to let all those people at the border they might give you the money for the wall
The Democrats have taken over the house investigations are coming.
As a federal employee, stand strong Mr. President. You’ve got this.
The Democrats have taken over the house investigations are coming.
Republicans controlled both the White House and Congress up until a few days ago. How was this simply not legislated sometime over the last 2 years? Hmm. 🤔
P. S. Steel Seizure is stare decisis.
I see there is over 300 people on this thread that thinks this is funny. Well let's see how funny it is when an illegal immigrant takes one of your family members life. I guarantee it won't be then.
P. S. Steel Seizure is stare decisis.
Keep your stupid nose out of our business.  You have plenty of problems in your country.
Republicans controlled both the White House and Congress up until a few days ago. How was this simply not legislated sometime over the last 2 years? Hmm. 🤔
I don't get it. Chuck and Nancy actually voted for funding border security in 2018 and also during the Obama & Bush administration.  They just need to release the funds they voted for in 2018. It is obvious this is a ploy because they can't stand to see President Trump succeed at another promise to our country that voted him in office! Shame on them!
Yes we do. The whole state of California is about to turn into Baja California (Mexico) we need your help!😢
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall?pc=fb_dn_cpgntopstickysmall_r.  Trump wants everyone to donate $5 before the news to night.
Keep your stupid nose out of our business.  You have plenty of problems in your country.
Trump2020 re-elect that motherf--er
Justin Cramer he was offered 25 billion already. There were conditions. He said no, pandering to his swamp. He blew it.
Justin Cramer seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Trump2020 re-elect that motherf--er
Justin Cramer seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Paul W Mayer that's helpful
Justin Cramer he was offered 25 billion already. There were conditions. He said no, pandering to his swamp. He blew it.
Don’t forget to tell the American people that 95% of Republicans voted to open the government, and that 92% of democrats voted to keep the government shut down.
Paul W Mayer that's helpful
Stopping you is their ultimate goal, they do not love America or the people of America,  Pelosi,  Schumer want what they want evil ,vicious ,obnoxious  , hate we don't need this, fire them both
Maury Masalin no one uneducated here but if you need to feel superior you keep telling yourself that maybe one day you will be
Roberta Hayes ....right...dim wit
Stopping you is their ultimate goal, they do not love America or the people of America,  Pelosi,  Schumer want what they want evil ,vicious ,obnoxious  , hate we don't need this, fire them both
Roberta Hayes ....right...dim wit
https://www.cato.org/publications/commentary/why-wall-wont-work
Facts don't compute here.
Maury Masalin no one uneducated here but if you need to feel superior you keep telling yourself that maybe one day you will be
A WALL IS A DOOR.  A DRONE IS A DOORBELL.
Facts don't compute here.
Trump, you have no idea what it is to "work together" with anyone.  It's your way or the highway.
Trump, you have no idea what it is to "work together" with anyone.  It's your way or the highway.
Kathryn A Wilder  oh but you are paying..... for their welfare, their education, their emergency room trips........educate yourself.
Juliet Castille wow ok you about one dumb b lol . Hey I have an Idea for you . Invite them in your home to stay with you . Leave them there alone when you go to work and sleep with your doors unlocked . If someone rings your doorbell dont hesitate. Just open the door for anyone lol .
Kathryn A Wilder  oh but you are paying..... for their welfare, their education, their emergency room trips........educate yourself.
We all know they just want to stop you!  They hate that you are accomplishing things they should have done 30 years ago!  They promised President Reagan if he gave amnesty to 11 million illegals they would address border security and immigration!  THEY HAVE DONE NOTHING!!  AND NOW THEY SYMPATHIZE WITH THE ILLEGALS!!!
I will bet Barak Obama would agree to a giant electric fence if it was powered by " his peoples" wind generators !! 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Juliet Castille wow ok you about one dumb b lol . Hey I have an Idea for you . Invite them in your home to stay with you . Leave them there alone when you go to work and sleep with your doors unlocked . If someone rings your doorbell dont hesitate. Just open the door for anyone lol .
Simple solution = 1% (your donors) pay for the wall out of their trillion $ + tax savings. It’s a no brainer.
Tom Murphy too late for that, though. The wall is simply going up.  It’s already been started
Juan Adamo must be private contractors doing it since the government isn't getting anything done these days. Even private guys will stop working when the cheques stop flowing though.
Simple solution = 1% (your donors) pay for the wall out of their trillion $ + tax savings. It’s a no brainer.
Juan Adamo must be private contractors doing it since the government isn't getting anything done these days. Even private guys will stop working when the cheques stop flowing though.
Fay Johnson me to....praying he goes to hell
Fay Johnson God will not listen Bigotic Trumpee he don't like Liars Coruppt and Criminal Mafiosi and Traitor and Nazi and Racists KKK Members Felon Cheaters Pussy grabber Kidnapper Blackmailer, Trumpsupporter,  destroyer of his Creation the Enviroment  Shutup with dump naive Bigotic Comments  Proof : Read Bible Low Minded Trumpee
Mike Holub so sad you saying something like that
Tom Murphy too late for that, though. The wall is simply going up.  It’s already been started
Trump in his address said that Sen. Charles E. Schumer “has repeatedly supported a physical barrier in the past along with many other Democrats. They changed their mind only after I was elected.”  Schumer, Hillary Clinton and many other Democrats voted for the Secure Fence Act of 2006, which authorized building a fence along about 700 miles of the border between the United States and Mexico. It passed 283-138 in the House, with 64 Democrat votes, and 80-19 in the Senate, with 26 Democrat votes.  But the fence they voted for is not as substantial as the wall Trump is proposing. Trump himself has called the 2006 fence a “nothing wall.”
Fay Johnson for sure. Well God would never listen to a prayer like that.
Build the Wall. You have the authority. Build it....
Rachel Pennells President Trump isn't afraid for himself but for the country! I'm the one that's afraid, these invaders cost a lot of bucks when they get here for social programs! And that, my goof ball, is MY tax dollars!
Where the comment at tho where the comment at? 🤣🤣🤣. I love people that either make a comment and then block me from responding or make a comment then delete it. “I love it”. -Kayne
Build the Wall. You have the authority. Build it....
What seems to be important to the Democrat party is whatever opposes the will of the citizens. We're a republic. Let's vote on it!
Stopping you at any costs to the citizens of this country.  #BUILDTHATWALL
Where the comment at tho where the comment at? 🤣🤣🤣. I love people that either make a comment and then block me from responding or make a comment then delete it. “I love it”. -Kayne
Stopping you at any costs to the citizens of this country.  #BUILDTHATWALL
Hahahahahah are you fucking high???
Victoria A. Deobald amen!!
What seems to be important to the Democrat party is whatever opposes the will of the citizens. We're a republic. Let's vote on it!
Victoria A. Deobald amen!!
Sidecar Bones agreed!!
Hahahahahah are you fucking high???
Sidecar Bones agreed!!
Huber---You are just incapable or don't want to understand the savings from Trump's new trade deals with Mexico, where we were losing billions every year. He never said Mexico would be sending a check!! The savings from those trade deals will be paying off the wall many times over in the years to come. It's that simple!
Karen Harvey he never said that on the campaign trail. NOT ONE TIME. So, he is a liar.
So we will save $12B in trade from Mexico in just this year? I don't think so.
Build the Wall.... Not answering any response.     Have a great day!!
So we will save $12B in trade from Mexico in just this year? I don't think so.
Karen Harvey he never said that on the campaign trail. NOT ONE TIME. So, he is a liar.
Just found out that Nancy, Chuck, Hillary, Obama were diagnosed with Political Dementia...!!!...NONE of them REMEM Trump BER wanting the WALL before President was elected...!!!!....Hope they find a nice lock down nursing home for themselves..!!!
Tired of Dems. Instead of unifying they keep dividing. Ridiculous.
Mr. President take the money for the wall out of congresses pension funds. This will be a small payback for the money they stole from "We The People" social security funds.
Well I live in Arizona and I'm not.
Well complacency is the leading cause of not being prepared 👍🏼
Mr. President take the money for the wall out of congresses pension funds. This will be a small payback for the money they stole from "We The People" social security funds.
Rep. Raúl Grijalva, D-Arizona, said Tuesday on CBSN that the border crisis which President Trump will address in his speech this evening was not a true emergency. Grijalva, who represents the largest stretch of the U.S.-Mexico border in Arizona, called it a "manufactured crisis."  "This is a manufactured crisis, and a crisis that is manufactured by the Trump administration," Grijalva said, arguing that Mr. Trump's speech Tuesday night was going to be about an issue which the president helped to create. "So now we find him giving a speech today that is self-fulfilling."  Every congressperson along southern border opposes border wall funding Views on southern border wall have been consistent since Trump became president Democratic congresswoman after border visit: Trump administration fabricating national security crisis
Security is paramount to stop the funding of the wall (border) is a gamble to our country security and financially
Well complacency is the leading cause of not being prepared 👍🏼
Security is paramount to stop the funding of the wall (border) is a gamble to our country security and financially
Walter--BS! The left wing media is lying & making fools of themselves!
Stopping you unfortunately - do they ever do an honest days work?
Walter--BS! The left wing media is lying & making fools of themselves!

Kim Jafelice Walter  your a 🐑

Must be a bunch of bots on this page. I refuse to believe most of the comments here are from Americans.

David Leonard  Republicans have been the majority for almost 2 years. They DIDN’T  fund the Wall. They know it’s a waste of money.
Barbara Hansen no, they were playing politics just like the dems... that's why Trump won.
David Leonard  Trump won the Electoral College vote. He actually had 3 million less votes than Hillary.

David Leonard  Trump won the Electoral College vote. He actually had 3 million less votes than Hillary.
You know the answer, and it's an easy choice.. Stop YOU . There is a huge difference between boarder security, and a wall that uselessly spends money, to secure ONE boarder. A logistical nightmare, and highly improbable.
nobody other than a small percentage of right wing uneducated idiots want a useless, overpriced wall that will have zero effect on anything!!!
Judy Conrad I’m curious, how do you like your pussy grabbed?
Mark Glass,  I see, a class act you are not.  Don’t be so bitter just because no one wants to grab yours.
Judy Conrad well I’d be an acceptable pick for president for you still.
Mark Glass,  President Trump is a gentleman and a success.  From the looks of your profile pic and the sound of you I doubt you’ll get very far in life.
Judy Conrad are you a product of marrying a citizen to come here?
You know the answer, and it's an easy choice.. Stop YOU . There is a huge difference between boarder security, and a wall that uselessly spends money, to secure ONE boarder. A logistical nightmare, and highly improbable.
The Democrats will never let you build the wall. Thank goodness.
Please note your stupidity is affecting our most effective security. The tsa
Judy Conrad are you a product of marrying a citizen to come here?
Ummm your promise was that Mexico was paying for the wall 🤷‍♀️
Joyce Myles Robertson learn about politics. Yes, there is a difference in having the majority and the exact number of votes needed.
Hope Lester Weston ...he never asked for a wall ..learn about history , politics and truth !
Ummm your promise was that Mexico was paying for the wall 🤷‍♀️
Hope Lester Weston ...he never asked for a wall ..learn about history , politics and truth !
Zavala---BS! The democrat's walked away & wouldn't talk about it. Pelosi even insulted our Sec. of Homeland Security & told her, she didn't believe the facts she put out. Trump stayed at the WH during Christmas & New Year, to work on this but Pelosi went to Hawaii to vacation. The House passed the bill in Dec & now Schumer & the dem's own the shutdown!
Karen Harvey you forgot the part where the president said he owned it!  In fact he said he was Proud to own it!
Joyce Myles Robertson learn about politics. Yes, there is a difference in having the majority and the exact number of votes needed.
Isn't it interesting that all Congress people from the southern border states are against the wall REGARDLESS of being a Democrat or Republican.
Karen Harvey you forgot the part where the president said he owned it!  In fact he said he was Proud to own it!
Your promise was "Mexico will pay for the wall" what happened to  that promise??
Yup !
Your promise was "Mexico will pay for the wall" what happened to  that promise??
Yup !
Yes we do!!! Build it and they WON'T Come! And I'm the son of legal immigrants.
Hammer---Yeah, finally giving them some truth!!!!
Yes we do!!! Build it and they WON'T Come! And I'm the son of legal immigrants.
Hammer---Yeah, finally giving them some truth!!!!
Sean Patrick McCarthy Is she for real?
He calls the news and TV news fake. Yet he is making his ignorant speech on the networks.
Sean Patrick McCarthy Is she for real?
Wagner---Because guess what?....The democrat's have to vote on that too!
Kim Miller false!
Wagner---Because guess what?....The democrat's have to vote on that too!
God help me. Tariffs are passed on to the purchaser aka customers. Mexico will be passing on the taxes to us. In other words, we will be paying for the tariffs. Your Trump University econ 101 class was a waste of money sweetie.
Why not just make it a condition of providing Mexico the $5.8 Billion in foreign aid that they use it to build the wall?
Mr. President no matter what u do or say they are going to oppose u. So just forget what everybody thinks. Get the job done. Declare national emergency and build that wall. Our safety comes first. The democrats need the illegals to win in 2020 and plus those drug cartel and human trafficking kickbacks are nice. Do it!! 💪💪🇺🇸🇺🇸
God help me. Tariffs are passed on to the purchaser aka customers. Mexico will be passing on the taxes to us. In other words, we will be paying for the tariffs. Your Trump University econ 101 class was a waste of money sweetie.
Dims want THEIR way; don't care about what the people they're supposedly representing want--don't care if we're safe, have jobs, no criminals or drugs in our neighborhoods--they want to be re-elected and need illegal people to fraudently vote for them
Stand strong President Trump👍👍👍🙏🙏🙏🙏❤❤❤Thank you for everything and now build the wall👍👍👍👍👍
Vivian Parks you're a special kinda stupid.
Stand strong President Trump👍👍👍🙏🙏🙏🙏❤❤❤Thank you for everything and now build the wall👍👍👍👍👍
Vivian Parks you're a special kinda stupid.
Same surveys that said Hillary would win in a landslide I'll warrant.
So if you get that wall is you gon stop playing with our food stamps ? 🤷🏾‍♀️🤷🏾‍♀️🤷🏾‍♀️ that wall not stopping NOBODY but playing with other folks tax returns Wic and foodstamps you gonna need a wall from your OWN people 😂😂😂
Same surveys that said Hillary would win in a landslide I'll warrant.
Apryl L Boyce oh my god😱 snowflake meltdown..awe
Oksana Gereaue intelligence and truth....no meltdown and no snowflakes. Cornflake....maybe you should seek the truth.
James Jerome  Surveys have already been taken, and most Americans DON'T want the wall! I know you categorize that as fake news, but those are the FACTS! Your post also infers massive voter fraud by Democrats! That also has been DEBUNKED! If anything, there has been voter fraud and suppression by the Republicans! As for TRUTH, Trump promised Mexico would pay for the wall! What happened with that?
Me President reina t the HUAC investigate all that speak out against the constitution and the government - Like is the 50s it was very effective !
Oksana Gereaue intelligence and truth....no meltdown and no snowflakes. Cornflake....maybe you should seek the truth.
You spoke from your heart and soul President Trump..I intend to call or visit the facebook page of every Congress member and ask them to put aside their hate and resentment for you because you beat Hillary Clinton and do their  job of securing our border and creating a safe secure  Country for Americans..The Democrats hatred runs so deep they can't fulfill their oath  to serve and protect.the American people..And as always I ask everyone to Pray for our wonderful President Trump ..
Listen to the voice and look at the face.
YOU PROMISED MEXICO WOULD PAY 👺
I will not believe anything Chuck and Nancy state after Pres. Trump address our nation. it is called common sense we are born with.
Morris---A Mexican name? It's our wall. It should say "Welcome To America" Please come in legally.
I will not believe anything Chuck and Nancy state after Pres. Trump address our nation. it is called common sense we are born with.
Morris---A Mexican name? It's our wall. It should say "Welcome To America" Please come in legally.
Tina James Moss Apple & Oranges. Hillary lost. Period.   This Predident in his own words lied about funding this damn wall.   Now, all my TSA friends, traffic cobtrollers won't get paid tomorrow.   So, please don't be so sanctimonious about two different subjects.   I didn't want him as president, but he won and that is the bottomline, now keep his word or suck it up.
Im sorry about that everyone needs to be paid for doing their jobs.  The way I feel about it is we need that wall bad.  I live in a small town in Texas there are so many illegals here.  There are some good people to but alot just don't care.  I have seen them in the stores with ,3 or 4 shopping carts full of food and pay with a food card.  My mom and dad were really in need and only received 16 Dollars of food.  Its really not right for illegals to get food and our own true American citizens can't, when they paid taxes all those years.  We need that wall, fence, or whatever.  Mexico will end up paying for the wall, the trade deal we have with them.  My mom was 75 and my dad 85.
If you give the wall a name so that it won’t be the Trump wall the Democrats will bend they don’t want a monument named after you give it a Mexican name who cares just don’t call it the Trump wall
Im sorry about that everyone needs to be paid for doing their jobs.  The way I feel about it is we need that wall bad.  I live in a small town in Texas there are so many illegals here.  There are some good people to but alot just don't care.  I have seen them in the stores with ,3 or 4 shopping carts full of food and pay with a food card.  My mom and dad were really in need and only received 16 Dollars of food.  Its really not right for illegals to get food and our own true American citizens can't, when they paid taxes all those years.  We need that wall, fence, or whatever.  Mexico will end up paying for the wall, the trade deal we have with them.  My mom was 75 and my dad 85.
Yes we do! And the Dems seem to forget that we are a country of LEGAL IMMIGRANTS NOT ILLEGAL!
Built the wall Trump for 2020
Yes, build the wall!!  It's been promised since 1986!
Barbara Denny FU
Yes, build the wall!!  It's been promised since 1986!
Barbara Denny FU
Karie Kelley-Bowman you've obviously missed your medicine time or don't keep up with current affairs and just talk old bad breath crap.
Ralph Harris uh no!!!  I just know lies when I hear them! Good...how much of a check are you willing to write out toward the wall? I bet not much! Lol
YES SIR!  Protect our borders Mr. President!.  The real Amerians support you!
Ralph Harris uh no!!!  I just know lies when I hear them! Good...how much of a check are you willing to write out toward the wall? I bet not much! Lol
A fence is not going to help border security.  There are boats and planes and ladders and tunnels.
Not sad dipshit, I’m just a fan of justice
A fence is not going to help border security.  There are boats and planes and ladders and tunnels.
No we don’t. Fox is a propaganda channel.
Not sad dipshit, I’m just a fan of justice
Cut pay to Congress now!!! SHUT IT DOWN!!
Cut pay to Congress now!!! SHUT IT DOWN!!
Francine Pytka-Kelcey his own party doesn’t want this bs wall. Grow up.
We want and need that border wall
We want and need that border wall
why no ball?
Congress doesn't care what Americans want they've already been elected
As usual he lied
Shannan Millican Garrison he speaks in rather confusing metaphors; his real plan with Mexico involves increasing trade deficit to a value that covers the $8-10B “wall”...the wall is yet another term for some sort of barrier
Congress doesn't care what Americans want they've already been elected
Shannan Millican Garrison he speaks in rather confusing metaphors; his real plan with Mexico involves increasing trade deficit to a value that covers the $8-10B “wall”...the wall is yet another term for some sort of barrier
Simply shut the Southern border until Congress gives you the funds for a wall.   If international shipping doesn't like it, let them put it on a boat.  Let industry put some pressure on Congress.
I am proud of President Donald Trump he is a great American president, he stand firm on his word, his word is like a great foundation that no Demonrat can lay him down to the ground,...
Simply shut the Southern border until Congress gives you the funds for a wall.   If international shipping doesn't like it, let them put it on a boat.  Let industry put some pressure on Congress.
I am proud of President Donald Trump he is a great American president, he stand firm on his word, his word is like a great foundation that no Demonrat can lay him down to the ground,...
David Lindquist  ..handled just fine?  Yeah right...they're still busing them into Texas under the cover of night and escorted by local cops...because Democrat funded immigration lawyers are defending them and getting them.  Idiot!
Carol Roberts Soutar, you poor ignorant thing...🐑🐑🐑🐑
Border Security comes first, meaning keeping those bad  intruders, bad influence away, this will eliminate illegal people from coming in, this will save the Immigration officer from working extra time,..
Carol Roberts Soutar, you poor ignorant thing...🐑🐑🐑🐑
President Donald Trump will speak to Americans from the Oval Office at 9 p.m. EST Tuesday
"Schmuck" and "Nasty"?  That makes you a Cuntservative.
President Donald Trump will speak to Americans from the Oval Office at 9 p.m. EST Tuesday
This is obstruction of a duly elected leader, build the wall
Please provide all statistics about the crisis at the border and why a wall is necessary for border security. American safety is the government's responsibility...
"Schmuck" and "Nasty"?  That makes you a Cuntservative.
There is no crisis at the Southern border. Trump is spreading this lie because if he loses this battle things don't look too good for him. Yippee!
Right. It’s all about poor poor Donny the fake billionaire. Get over yourself, dude.
Todd Fitzsimmons this is old.   Shut up
Right. It’s all about poor poor Donny the fake billionaire. Get over yourself, dude.
Todd Fitzsimmons Some people have NOT Respect to your thoughts -- IGNORE - MOVE ON - RISE ABOVE THE HATERS - It's the maturity of the MINDS  / not to BASH - when we debate - :-)
Margie Petrone FU
Todd Fitzsimmons Some people have NOT Respect to your thoughts -- IGNORE - MOVE ON - RISE ABOVE THE HATERS - It's the maturity of the MINDS  / not to BASH - when we debate - :-)
Margie Petrone FU
Ammar Alhoushi شو بدك فيو هيدا فشاء حكي
😂 أنا بس عم استفسر الجماعة لمين تابعين
Before finishing the end of the wall,  please put all these liberal arrogant mockers on the other side. Starting with Pelosi.
😂 أنا بس عم استفسر الجماعة لمين تابعين
Eric Fentastico stupidest argument you cult members spew.
Ammar Alhoushi شو بدك فيو هيدا فشاء حكي
But you promised Mexico would pay for the wall !
Kim Miller haha.....great rebuttal.  Please explain how illegal immigration helps Americans?  * crickets, crickets.  😂😂😂
“You don’t build walls because you hate the people on the outside, you build walls because you love the people on the inside.” -President Donald J. Trump
Your the biggest problem America has chetto just do us a favor and have a stroke
Build it out of bone spurs. Those seem impenetrable.
Democrats will do anything to stop President Trump!! They want to destroy our country and Trump!!!
Who will pay for the wall? Mexico will pay for the wall yea
Amanda Parker-Leinart I honestly agree with the shut down people need to wake up and see that America is more important
Jennifer Ogelvie  That's not the way. What if his choice of shut down was where you worked? The politicians just took a holiday vacation with pay.... those 800,000 that are furloughed or working with no pay had no dog in this fight. Most of them live paycheck to paycheck. They didn't deserve this.
Who will pay for the wall? Mexico will pay for the wall yea
Jennifer Ogelvie  That's not the way. What if his choice of shut down was where you worked? The politicians just took a holiday vacation with pay.... those 800,000 that are furloughed or working with no pay had no dog in this fight. Most of them live paycheck to paycheck. They didn't deserve this.
The way you say it is like there's an atomic Tsunami coming fast from Mexico and the wall is gonna stop it 🤣🤣🤣
Us true America lovers want the wall President Trump. We will back you ALL THE WAY!!
Bout time someone stands up for his ppl and not just about other countries
Oh boy, Tax payers don't, so don't push that line.
We don't fund planned Parenthood?
Hyde Amendment.
Bout time someone stands up for his ppl and not just about other countries
Hyde Amendment.
We don't fund planned Parenthood?
Never forget the ppl! Stand our ground and keep fighting!  We the people support you. Proud Deplorable from The Peoples Republic of Illinois.
Dan Grant you mean get ready for your lies to the American people.
We support you, President Trump! We want and need that wall! Don’t let the Demoncrats get to you!
Victoria A. Deobald you’re an idiot
We support you, President Trump! We want and need that wall! Don’t let the Demoncrats get to you!
Victoria A. Deobald you’re an idiot
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
He’s making the Democrats look bad and they can’t stand it. Build the wall!!!
Do what you have to do, as they are never going to help you with anything.
They wanted the border also!!  I think we all know, the wall is needed badly!
The wall*
Do what you have to do, as they are never going to help you with anything.
The wall*
They wanted the border also!!  I think we all know, the wall is needed badly!
Lori Elliott AMEN🙏🇺🇸❤
We don’t want WE NEED border security.
We don’t want WE NEED border security.
What happened to making Mexico pay for the wall, Mr. President?
We Believe in you Mr President 🙂 We Believe in our Country to. Right now it’s time for these people to “Sit down and Be Humble” let someone teach them Something worth learning and improving from..change is hard but as everything else changes I would hope security would too.
Deborah Linskey  Whatever they want to call it...it will slow down and then business as usual. Nothing at the border will stop people running away from violence and poverty and the demand for drugs and the reasons behind it come from within America and no wall will stop the flow. THEY ARE ALL missing the point. Even the press is.
Please, Mr. President. Many of us are afraid right now, with the way these lawmakers are acting, and not considering what regular American's wanted when we elected you. We are 100 per cent behind you!  We are tired of being scared. Do whatever you have to do to keep us safe by building that wall just as soon as possible.  Thank you for all you are doing for us.
Please, Mr. President. Many of us are afraid right now, with the way these lawmakers are acting, and not considering what regular American's wanted when we elected you. We are 100 per cent behind you!  We are tired of being scared. Do whatever you have to do to keep us safe by building that wall just as soon as possible.  Thank you for all you are doing for us.
Border security or ... a wall? What is it Donnie???
Very irresponsible statement from liberal media " only 6 criminals were caught at the border" Only one terrorist can cause massive destruction to americans.
Sharon Howard you tell him friend!!!
Good.  Now go away with the wall. Not everyone wants it go do better dutys. A wall won't make america great again . But fixing our debt from other cuntries will. Besides whatever happened to mexico will pay for it?
Travis Adams  you going back to Facebook jail lol
Renee McNamara Gauthreaux  probably so! Lmao!!! Gonna be put in time out!
Good.  Now go away with the wall. Not everyone wants it go do better dutys. A wall won't make america great again . But fixing our debt from other cuntries will. Besides whatever happened to mexico will pay for it?
Renee McNamara Gauthreaux  probably so! Lmao!!! Gonna be put in time out!
Mr. President, I feel we should stand together to rise, what’s the root of the problems? I don’t believe in walls but I am not a criminal, I feel that the criminals are protected, & the innocent aren’t so the bad outweighs the good. I believe anything can be fixed, call me country if you want lol
You are correct in that! Build the wall plz!!!
Allan Erickson looks like someone throwing the word resist around to try to sound cool.
Buchwald Kevin  News networks should be required to say it at sign off.
You are correct in that! Build the wall plz!!!
Buchwald Kevin  News networks should be required to say it at sign off.
Scott Peabody You wish! 😂🤣
Allan Erickson looks like someone throwing the word resist around to try to sound cool.
Scott Peabody You wish! 😂🤣
Turn your tv off as soon as he's done speaking
Hold your promise in making Mexico pay!!!!
Stand your ground is the Trump. Build That Wall Trump 20/20
Build the wall! Thank you for all you do for America!
Chad Caudill my my, you are a scared little boy, aren't you?
Greg Merz  won't you come find out what I am.
Build the wall! Thank you for all you do for America!
Greg Merz  won't you come find out what I am.
Logan Jeffers What “empty” campaign promise? Trump is trying to fulfill a very important campaign promise, probably THE most important promise of his campaign, but the Dems are trying to thwart his efforts. Why? Not because they don’t believe in it, but because he is Trump. Period!
Mike Hine there was bipartisan support to open the government, and Donald denied it because it wasn't the right number for him. You know my views about Donald more than probably anyone else Mike.
Chad Caudill my my, you are a scared little boy, aren't you?
Mike Hine there was bipartisan support to open the government, and Donald denied it because it wasn't the right number for him. You know my views about Donald more than probably anyone else Mike.
Gerri Modic Candelaria you're going to be paying for the wall with taxes, that doesn't in anyway imply that Mexico is paying for it.
Fred Dickey  And then Ruth Bader Ginsberg.  I can't wait to see Robert's head explode when Pres. Trump puts in a Conservative to replace her.  LOL
Communists
Fred Dickey  And then Ruth Bader Ginsberg.  I can't wait to see Robert's head explode when Pres. Trump puts in a Conservative to replace her.  LOL
Why can’t we use El Chappo’s seized fortune
Communists
How will a wall keep people from applying for asylum? The crisis is the Northern Triangle.
Was very happy with the speech tonight! Border security trumps the shut down!
Build the wall. Make Americans safe.
Rod Novoa are you retarded....why can't you people comprehend how this works....do ya think they were gonna write a big check....no....they will be paying for it....do ya know how business works?
I cant even reply to this without laughing my ass off. You poor thing. Go clean up your guns and make yourself busy. 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Build the wall. Make Americans safe.
I cant even reply to this without laughing my ass off. You poor thing. Go clean up your guns and make yourself busy. 😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
CJ Noiseux that is exactly what he should do because it is a national emergency 💖  #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
Rod Novoa are you retarded....why can't you people comprehend how this works....do ya think they were gonna write a big check....no....they will be paying for it....do ya know how business works?
CJ Noiseux that is exactly what he should do because it is a national emergency 💖  #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
Mr. President remember I will stand.... you're doing a fine job okay much much better than fine job. Hard-working American Patriots are standing with you. We believe in you God bless you for doing exactly what you told us you were going to do don't back down.
How original copying what the circus 🐵 are saying lmao .
Daniel Tittmann But the Iran nuculear deal is ok with you I guess .
Mr. President remember I will stand.... you're doing a fine job okay much much better than fine job. Hard-working American Patriots are standing with you. We believe in you God bless you for doing exactly what you told us you were going to do don't back down.
Daniel Tittmann But the Iran nuculear deal is ok with you I guess .
so much winning. first you should not have promise things that dont rely solely in you.
Sir................please say in your address tonight.....it is NOT about stopping people from coming into this country....it is about getting these people to the right PLACE, port of entry, to LEGALLY come in to our great nation. Now they are going / traveling very dangerous roads with very dangerous people. They only people winning on immigration now is coyotes. We let in over 1M people each year LEGALLY in this country. The wall helps people get to he proper place to enter legally, better for all TRUE seekers!!
Rick Ziglar AND play all the videos where you insisted Mexico is paying. 😂😂😂😂😂
Sir................please say in your address tonight.....it is NOT about stopping people from coming into this country....it is about getting these people to the right PLACE, port of entry, to LEGALLY come in to our great nation. Now they are going / traveling very dangerous roads with very dangerous people. They only people winning on immigration now is coyotes. We let in over 1M people each year LEGALLY in this country. The wall helps people get to he proper place to enter legally, better for all TRUE seekers!!
Make it like the fence in Jurassic Park
Rick Ziglar AND play all the videos where you insisted Mexico is paying. 😂😂😂😂😂
Say the word sir, and millions of us Patriots will go take care of that foreign invasion at our border 🇱🇷🇱🇷🇱🇷
As we know, there are already numerous tunnels under portions of our existing walls.  And there will be more.  Should we build motes around the walls?  I'm all for border patrols, drones, technology as well as sending more personal to the border to expedite the deportation process if the illegals don't qualify for asylum.  A wall would bring a false send of security.
Say the word sir, and millions of us Patriots will go take care of that foreign invasion at our border 🇱🇷🇱🇷🇱🇷
Don't worry about them, build that wall!
Are you gonna build a Canadian border wall also? Or is it only brown people you don't want getting in?
As we know, there are already numerous tunnels under portions of our existing walls.  And there will be more.  Should we build motes around the walls?  I'm all for border patrols, drones, technology as well as sending more personal to the border to expedite the deportation process if the illegals don't qualify for asylum.  A wall would bring a false send of security.
Unfortunately dems don't care what is practical and realistically needed. They just want to throw their tantrums.
All you against the wall, what’s your solution?
Eric A Martelle more high security intelligence drones let's move into the 21st-century
Unfortunately dems don't care what is practical and realistically needed. They just want to throw their tantrums.
This is not about the wall at all. This is about Democrats refusing to give President Trump something he promised his supporters.
You promised Mexico would pay for it.
Eric A Martelle more high security intelligence drones let's move into the 21st-century
****"NATIONAL SECURITY 1ST - THINK And Support - Organize Against country hate killary and team....!!!! :) " ****
All true...it’s the 2020 game to them
****"NATIONAL SECURITY 1ST - THINK And Support - Organize Against country hate killary and team....!!!! :) " ****
Stop human trafficking, stop terrorist and stop the drugs that killed my kid... BUILD THAT FREAKING WALL!
Thank you Mr. President for loving America, our Constitution, values and protecting our culture. A nation without borders is no nation at all. We are a nation of LEGAL immigrants. Build that wall!
GOV  workers  need  to  be  paid!
I hope you're going to stop those 200,000 Muslims from entering our country what about that I could care less about the Mexicans at this point
All true...it’s the 2020 game to them
I hope you're going to stop those 200,000 Muslims from entering our country what about that I could care less about the Mexicans at this point
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
GOV  workers  need  to  be  paid!
I don’t like that federal workers are being penalized but we need a stronger border.
Im very sick of these stupid games, just build the wall, if you have the power just do it and quit letting them dog you on everything, quit being mr nice guy, tear them a new one, they have the IQ of a chicken.
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
We are behind you! We want the wall NOW!!
We are behind you! We want the wall NOW!!
i agree Sherry Fuehrer that commercial does not belong on tv!!!!!
Terry Bolduc Alexander Mennell what vor on your Coffee this Morning?? Primate og a dump Trumpee
i agree Sherry Fuehrer that commercial does not belong on tv!!!!!
Me and my family are behind you and support you 100% Mr. President! Keep doing what we elected you for! #BuildtheWall
I think a wall is the least of our problems
Terry Bolduc Alexander Mennell what vor on your Coffee this Morning?? Primate og a dump Trumpee
Amen!! Close down more of the government until they do the will of the people. They are hired to represent the people— which they rarely do.
John Krysten he  better have a green card and come here legally . He would understand that though . Nice try with a dumb hypothetical lol durp durp durp🐒🐒🐒🐒🍌 for 🐒
Amen!! Close down more of the government until they do the will of the people. They are hired to represent the people— which they rarely do.
John Krysten he  better have a green card and come here legally . He would understand that though . Nice try with a dumb hypothetical lol durp durp durp🐒🐒🐒🐒🍌 for 🐒
Please build the wall President Trump!
stop the house and senates pay checks and you will see results fast
This is nothing more than you pissing all over the democratic majority House. It's clear and easy to see.
Democrats passed legislation the day they took control of the House that offered $1.3 billion for border security, including physical barriers and technology along the U.S. southern border. Dems want effective and sensible border security, not a medieval wall.
Building a wall that Americans directly pay for is not fullfilling your promise.
Call an emergency and get the wall
the demoncrats dont care about America they just want to be rich and have everyone live in hell poverty waste.They dont want America to be United they want anarchy.
Thank you for fighting for the wall!
Africans existed before Israel. Africans are not isralites like whoopie and Oprah are brainwashed to believe. Expose Zionist African exploitation. White corporate men never owned slavery.
Thank you for fighting for the wall!
What the congress forgets it is our money let the people vote for the wall Americans do want the wall.Are they afraid to let the people speak?
Africans existed before Israel. Africans are not isralites like whoopie and Oprah are brainwashed to believe. Expose Zionist African exploitation. White corporate men never owned slavery.
Stop with the wall- many other issues need to be addressed
Stop with the wall- many other issues need to be addressed
Trumpaganda Style and Fox Propaganda. Unreal!!!
A wall is quite possibly the most asinine way of controlling the border, money can be better utilized by providing actual things border patrol needs.  The wall is nothing more that a way of Trump lining his pockets due to the ties he has with the construction companies that will "win" the bids for those fat government contracts.  It's incomprehensible how you and others like you are unable to realize this.  Oh, and don't forget, his promise was that Mexico would pay for it...so why is he now shutting down the government because he wants Americans to pay for it?
Trumpaganda Style and Fox Propaganda. Unreal!!!
Reopen the government already we already got 2 prisons the national guard has had to take over due to no staff. Declare state of emergency and just build it quit using the people that supported you as ponds in this wall game. Quit trying to reason the left dont care.
A wall is quite possibly the most asinine way of controlling the border, money can be better utilized by providing actual things border patrol needs.  The wall is nothing more that a way of Trump lining his pockets due to the ties he has with the construction companies that will "win" the bids for those fat government contracts.  It's incomprehensible how you and others like you are unable to realize this.  Oh, and don't forget, his promise was that Mexico would pay for it...so why is he now shutting down the government because he wants Americans to pay for it?
Reopen the government already we already got 2 prisons the national guard has had to take over due to no staff. Declare state of emergency and just build it quit using the people that supported you as ponds in this wall game. Quit trying to reason the left dont care.
Barbara Gagnon And you my friend are an idiot!!
Linda Dee Montes  Do I not have  a right to my opinion?
Linda, do I not have a right to an opinion? Or is yours the only one that matters?
You don't need approval from the demoncrats, just do it! WE, the majority, want it and we stand behind you.  #MAGA
theres a film on you tube during obama years about needing the wall very informative.
They support border security but not your “dream wall”.
Linda, do I not have a right to an opinion? Or is yours the only one that matters?
Great speech Sir, continue the fight!
but the Dems claim only 6 terrorists come across the southern border, so I would guess only 1.3 would be coming in by air?
Rodney Martin you must be a mathematician or something. Call the president. He needs you.
Rodney Martin Since when are “airports” the same as “southern border?” I bet those 6 terrorists understand English better that you do.
Great speech Sir, continue the fight!
Rodney Martin Since when are “airports” the same as “southern border?” I bet those 6 terrorists understand English better that you do.
Build the wall...love what are doing!
Thank you Mr. President. We are behind you. Build the wall.
Yep build the wall However you need to do it President Trump
Do not give up on us. Hold out for the border security funding.  I stand with you.
Yep build the wall However you need to do it President Trump
Jeff Lisenby You are so right.  Congress is showing their booty💖 #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
Brenda Williams Dennis  they being Congress will sell there soals to the  Devil before helping Americans First .
Thank you Mr. President. We are behind you. Build the wall.
either they fund it. or we the PEOPLE will fund it. they sure do though HATE america though.
Brenda Williams Dennis  they being Congress will sell there soals to the  Devil before helping Americans First .
I don’t care who pays for the wall. Just build it.
I don’t care who pays for the wall. Just build it.
Steve Dixie Smith it is going to be through an updated NAFTA agreement
the morons are the ones that believed mexico was going to pay for it.  We laughed at you then and we're laughing now!
John Scott No one cares what you think! We we are laughing at you for rigging everything for Hillary and she still got crushed. So shut up and get back to your safe space moron. Bite me!
Steve Dixie Smith it is going to be through an updated NAFTA agreement
This is about protecting our people.  Not about the President’s campaign promise.  That should not even be mentioned.  This is about protecting our Country from caravans.  This is about having laws that protect our borders and a wall to help in doing that.
For them?  Stopping you Mr President.  We want the wall!!
John Scott No one cares what you think! We we are laughing at you for rigging everything for Hillary and she still got crushed. So shut up and get back to your safe space moron. Bite me!
I just watched the address to the American people and then the joke responce by the Dems. I say fire them all, democrats do not have America first. Return us to a republic like the constitution says. I'm still with you Trump! Build a taller, concrete wall than what was planned.
yup.
I just watched the address to the American people and then the joke responce by the Dems. I say fire them all, democrats do not have America first. Return us to a republic like the constitution says. I'm still with you Trump! Build a taller, concrete wall than what was planned.
yup.
Kimberly Overen a wall doesn’t fix anything. Chapo used tunnels, most cartels use planes. Immigration is actually going down over the years. We should spend the money on educating our citizens and stopping the rising cost of health care. Maybe with more educated people, an orange faced reality show host conman wouldn’t get elected to the most important position in the world. Fox isn’t news
Then why isn’t it being done?
Kimberly Overen because immigration is going down. Don’t believe the bullshit Fox “news” videos they play on repeat. It’s called propaganda and it’s how a lot of very evil people got to power.
Their grandstanding for 2020...they will NEVER Compromise!
Kimberly Overen because immigration is going down. Don’t believe the bullshit Fox “news” videos they play on repeat. It’s called propaganda and it’s how a lot of very evil people got to power.
Well I think we all know what’s important to democrats. Politics.
And yet schumer is saying the people dont want the wall.
Trump is lying .Democrat's want border Security too ..the Democrat's offered Trump 25 billion .but he declined ...Trump will not sit down and discuss anything .This is all a diversion ...
Build Americas Wall and defend it. Lets have a special election to put it to rest. Chuck and Nancy say they speak for the majority, prove it. Let America Vote and decide. You got the balls Chuck, Nancy? If he loses this vote, the wall, he'll lose 2020. If he does it without you, he'll win.
Build that wall!!! No more foreign aid until our border is secured!
President Trump  Who gets what he wants  (American people Too ) Me Want the wall. Period
Build that wall!!! No more foreign aid until our border is secured!
Bob Frederick we’ve got to stop voting fraud. Democrats will do anything to win power.
You promised Mexico would pay for it!
Bob Frederick we’ve got to stop voting fraud. Democrats will do anything to win power.
Danny I agree with you. Just bullshit. I thinking now that we should just put up what is in place in South Korea, on the DMZ. A big ass nasty Barb wire fence. Your sure not going to climb it
The midterms in the House of Representatives was a big surprise to me and to Trump that is why the Democrats think they have the upper hand
Danny I agree with you. Just bullshit. I thinking now that we should just put up what is in place in South Korea, on the DMZ. A big ass nasty Barb wire fence. Your sure not going to climb it
Yes we do! And so did the Democrats before you took office. They are not placing our national security as a priority and they certainly are not concerned with federal workers or they would stop with the political games and do what is right.
So true!
Yes we do! And so did the Democrats before you took office. They are not placing our national security as a priority and they certainly are not concerned with federal workers or they would stop with the political games and do what is right.
So true!
Deb Pelczar Sciascia I didn't know you were a fucking dumb ass. Now I do. Bye.
Hey bonespurs, your prototype wall can be cut with a hacksaw!!
What do a campaign promise mean to America nothing so democrats hold on to your leverage no wall no no no
Deb Pelczar Sciascia I didn't know you were a fucking dumb ass. Now I do. Bye.
If he wants the wall let him pay for the wall.
If he wants the wall let him pay for the wall.
Wayne Elliott yes because he wasn't living the dream before the Oval Office. I think his own whale was just fine.
It would be awesome if you hadn’t colluded with Russia to win the election, and compromise the United States in the process.
Erin Bond  Ah huh 😁
Do you have the proof to back your statement, actual proof not media proof.
Wayne Elliott yes because he wasn't living the dream before the Oval Office. I think his own whale was just fine.
Love the puppets in Left MSM keep saying a wall is only 33% of the port of entry solution, thus "ineffective!"   No, dimwads It's a 33% improvement in border security!! 🇺🇸
Martial Law!! FEMA camps for registered Democrats!!
Democrats stop playing politics with America’s safety and security! Build the Wall !!!
Underreported...a 'new 15,000 Caravan from Honduras is on its way...as they know ...they're Free to Enter... We had '6 Amnesties' since 1986'...without Border Enforcement...according to (Numbers USA.)...and there was a Report in 2017 that '12% of Central America's Population " ...poorest of the poor...undereducated...can't speak English...living in U.S....as our Border's Facilities & Resources...are overwhelmed...as America's Education...Healthcare and Social Services are IMPLOADING...as America is being INVADED...
Haha, I love how liberal hypocrisy comes back around to bite them in the Ass! 2006 Secure Fence Act, all signed by Odumbo, Godzillary, and Creepy Joe give the President full authority to declare a national emergency and build the wall. They can try and fast track to the Supreme Court, but will take years to litigate. Thanks Morons!!!!😂😂😂😂😂😂
Mr President, build the wall! If necessary use the military, we have plenty of skills and are capable of building it. MAGA
The most important thing to them is resisting!!! We all know that
Do you have the proof to back your statement, actual proof not media proof.
The most important thing to them is resisting!!! We all know that
I believe your promise was to have Mexico pay for it.    More trump lies.  #TrumpLies
parrot much?
Mr President, build the wall! If necessary use the military, we have plenty of skills and are capable of building it. MAGA
parrot much?
Victoria A. Deobald so what?  What is your point? That Prime Minister Trudeau and Arabia are friends?
I believe your promise was to have Mexico pay for it.    More trump lies.  #TrumpLies
HAHA... Fox News... HAHA https://www.newsweek.com/tomi-lahren-american-people-want-wall-poll-finds-should-not-be-priority-1265346
Shut down the whole border. No one crosses in or out.
Didn’t you just say it costs tax payers 275 billion a year? This article says 134 billion.  Which is it?   Plus border security is different than a wall
Stopping you from being even stupider then normal.... you are a joke
Chuck and Nancy are in the fetal position right now. Lol They're going to have to stay that way. They are not running the show. And they have not won the 2020 election like they think they have.
Victoria A. Deobald so what?  What is your point? That Prime Minister Trudeau and Arabia are friends?
All the bad people use tunnels to get here, walls will NOT prevent that
David Meiling The majority of Americans don't want the wall! Stop watching Fox News and you will get the truth.
Then why was Trump elected? Common sense would dictate that a majority of voters do at a minimum.
We DO want the wall
All the bad people use tunnels to get here, walls will NOT prevent that
We DO want the wall
Can't pay for your friend... Sorry.....too busy paying for a family of eight that snuck over the border to take the money I had set aside for your friend. They don't care if your friends live, and I can't afford to pay for both them and you. I reckon someone needs to prioritize who "needs" what...
Then why was Trump elected? Common sense would dictate that a majority of voters do at a minimum.
Build The Wall Mr President!!🇺🇸🇺🇸MAGA🇺🇸🇺🇸
Can't pay for your friend... Sorry.....too busy paying for a family of eight that snuck over the border to take the money I had set aside for your friend. They don't care if your friends live, and I can't afford to pay for both them and you. I reckon someone needs to prioritize who "needs" what...
God bless you, President Trump! Real Americans who love our country are behind you 100%!
God bless you, President Trump! Real Americans who love our country are behind you 100%!
John says: where did I go wrong with you.
David Fernandez please don't post when drunk, comrade.
Greg Merz I don't care what you think pot head
John says: where did I go wrong with you.
Greg Merz I don't care what you think pot head
David Fernandez please don't post when drunk, comrade.
Make Wall your legacy! BUILD Wall Anyway you Can!
Screw them on this, do not believe it will be addressed if dropped now. They are liars and just trying to get past it. This is there Golden child issue
Actually, polls show we do want the wall, AND border security.
Screw them on this, do not believe it will be addressed if dropped now. They are liars and just trying to get past it. This is there Golden child issue
Latin Americans want to enter USA and the numbers showed at border.
Mohamed Hassan Bashle and if they come legally, I'd welcome them with open arms.   Our actual fear is an unsecured border with people named Mohamed and Hassan sneaking in with bad intentions.
Good luck tonight President Trump!
We all know the answer. Trump keep up the hard work and dont back down
Wait Until Ginsberg goes to MEET her Maker and see the LEFT go INSANE AGAIN...I cannot wait .
There main and only goal is to stop you from succeeding in anything!
Stand Firm President Trump! Build The Wall!. Trump-Pence 2020. Keep Moving America Forward!
No deals to start the government back up without funding for OUR wall.
You have more enthusiasm eating cheeseburgers and playing golf you putz!
Build that wall. Remain closed until the DemoRats cave. TRUMP 2020
I never cared who paid for it, I just want it built.
Stephen Caballero Mohamed and Stephen are just only names. Name nothing to do with violence, Mohamed can be more peaceful than Stephen.
Stick to the plan Mr. President! They have clearly shown they are not willing to negotiate. They will never negotiate until they’re hand is forced. Set an unbreakable record shutdown if you have to!
Thank you for respecting our President Trump, We citizens who voted for him think he is amazing for America.  God Bless you for your letting us know how you feel personally!!
Has anyone looked into the real reason why they are so against the Wall. They voted for it before so Trump Hate isn't enough. It's a cover.
Great speech tonight. God bless you, President Trump, for putting the American citizens first.
Border security is not the wall. It is technology, sensors, drones and border agents. Be smart.
Their it is folks most of us do want the wall
I never cared who paid for it, I just want it built.
Because your promise is a downright brainwashed lie
KEEP STRONG PRESIDENT TRUMP AND BUILD THAT WAS--THANK YOU AND MAY GOD BLESS AND BE WITH YOU
They will do everything within their power to obstruct and try to discredit and distroy the best president this country has ever had.
Totally support you from this senior citizen in Michigan.
MEXICO WILL PAY FOR THE WALL!!!!! RIGHT KING DONNIE???
Dont take money from Miitary Funding...then future Presidents will take money for things they want...like Climate Change Hoax....before long the Military Funds will be bankrupt....just like Social Security....Make Congress do their Damn Job !!
Aren't Politics about Promises ?....A Candidate Campaigns about promises if he gets Elected....and the people Vote..If the Candidate wins...they work to fulfill promises...otherwise they are just lying......
Their it is folks most of us do want the wall
Aren't Politics about Promises ?....A Candidate Campaigns about promises if he gets Elected....and the people Vote..If the Candidate wins...they work to fulfill promises...otherwise they are just lying......
I feel so sorry for Dems, cause of insane Pelosi.
Laura Leitzke Eckert she needs 2 go bye bye
Dont take money from Miitary Funding...then future Presidents will take money for things they want...like Climate Change Hoax....before long the Military Funds will be bankrupt....just like Social Security....Make Congress do their Damn Job !!
Stand firm Mr. President, build the wall and use executive orders, powers. God bless you Mr. President and your family.
They think if they stop you on one of your campaign promises they will win in 2020 . News flash it is showing what they are really about Corrupt
That is an easy question.  They do not care about WE, THE PEOPLE, we are the ones who elected you!  They want us all to lose!  And, I firmly believe, if they win, we are doomed as a nation.  Don't give in, PLEASE!!
What is going to be done with the $20 Million wall prototypes?
I’d Tell them, When Pelosi, Schumer, warren and the other liberal nitwits remove their walls/ fences, and door locks  from their homes, we’ll have a meaningful discussion. I’m sure they wouldn’t mind some harmless person they don’t know just coming in.
🇺🇸that is another problem but at least they had a Visa and were checked. We are talking about coming through illegally Kevin
remember the Chinese were smart.................... just sayin
The facts!!!!!!  https://www.facebook.com/5550296508/posts/10159104751221509?sfns=cl
80K to 1K...haters still waaay out numbered...lol
Laura Leitzke Eckert she needs 2 go bye bye
Great speech! Hoping the Demo-rats get their heads out if their asses and do the right thing. If not, declare the emergency and make it happen. I stand with MY PRESIDENT.
They'll destroy their party, just to make President Trump out to be a liar.
You made me proud when you got up from that chair in the Situation Room and walked out on the Commies, because all they wanted to do was obstruct. They had no intentions of negotiating for a WALL and to open the government! Thank you Mr. President for having such strong convictions and for holding true to your oath to protect us!  Now, do what you need to do to get the WALL built. We are behind you 100%.
Lydia, this is NOT true!! Even the democrats wanted the wall at one point.
I have NEVER heard a democrat say they don’t want border security.  Unfortunately, you are able to convince your trumpkins that only 4th century technology will secure our borders.
Lol then why didn't you build it during the 2 years when you had control of congress? Don't blame Democrats, not even the Republicans wanted it.
You aren't fulfilling your promise with a wall if TAXPAYERS pay for it.
The only things DEMs care about, is destroying this country and wanting you to fail. They don’t care about our citizens or our safety, they have no respect for this country or the history of it, they’ll all nuts. Stand firm, build the wall and God bless you
80K to 1K...haters still waaay out numbered...lol
The only things DEMs care about, is destroying this country and wanting you to fail. They don’t care about our citizens or our safety, they have no respect for this country or the history of it, they’ll all nuts. Stand firm, build the wall and God bless you
January 2017 - Trump inaugurated - GOP majorities in both houses of Congress January 2017 Wall not an emergency February 2017 Wall not an emergency March 2017 Wall not an emergency April 2017 Wall not an emergency May 2017 Wall not an emergency June 2017 Wall not an emergency July 2017 Wall not an emergency August 2017 Wall not an emergency September 2017 Wall not an emergency October 2017 Wall not an emergency November 2017 Wall not an emergency December 2017 Wall not an emergency January 2018 Wall not an emergency February 2018 Wall not an emergency March 2018 Wall not an emergency April 2018 Wall not an emergency May 2018 Wall not an emergency June 2018 Wall not an emergency July 2018 Wall not an emergency August 2018 Wall not an emergency September 2018 Wall not an emergency October 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Democratic majority elected in House January 2019  EMERGENCY -Kuby A. Gyasi-
Michael Brian bankruptcy after bankruptcy - if not for the apprentice, Trump would be a nothing burger.
You aren't fulfilling your promise with a wall if TAXPAYERS pay for it.
If MSM wants to edit & delay a Presidential Address they wont recieve my view rating ..go to The White House Youtube from now on ! How DISGISTING their bias hate interfers in their journalism to report All news regardless of personal emotions to the Public ! PULL THEIR FCC LICENCE President Trump ENOUGH BIAS FAKE NEWS its destroying our country !
But they want to pay the people that are getting affected and then continue to negotiate on the wall but trump is the one that is using peoples pay  as pawns
Mr President they don’t want you to succeed in anything. Hold your head up and know “greater is He that is you than he that is in the World!”  We stand with you—But more importantly God goes before you every step and He has your back!! You gave your heart to Him and He loves you.  Ask him to guide your step and give you the words to speak.  Put all your trust and confidence in God!!!
2,000,000 Americans want a paycheck
Thank you for standing up for Americans. Most politicians just pretend to.
We are with you President Trump
They are more frighten that you are right than they are scared of giving you a win!  But it's not your win, it's a win for the American People.
We know what's most important to Dems... stopping you from accomplishing anything!
Michael Brian bankruptcy after bankruptcy - if not for the apprentice, Trump would be a nothing burger.
Loved your message tonight -- and Schumer and Pelosi looked like dum-dums. Thank you, Mr. President! Millions of us are behind you to stay strong.
Man-Baby is in his terrible twos. "He shuts down the government, maybe for “years.” He wants a wall that is “transparent,” then concrete, then slatted, then steel. One moment he’s leaving Syria, the next he isn’t. He’s watching too much TV and yelling at everyone. This is all to be expected. President Trump is entering his terrible twos.  The Trump presidency turns two this month, and though we often hear the mantra “this is not normal,” what the president is doing actually is normal. For a 2-year-old.  According to Dr. Benjamin Spock, "The 2-year-old has a hard time making up his mind, and then he wants to change it,” his “understanding of the world is still so limited,” and “he becomes bolder and more daring in his experiments.”  And when Trump has a tantrum, “it doesn’t help to yell at your child, threaten punishment, plead for calm, or try too hard to ‘make everything better.’ ” This “just tends to make tantrums last longer.” Instead, ignore the outburst, and later, “a quick word of praise along the lines of ‘Nice job pulling yourself together’ can let your child salvage some self-esteem.” – Dana Milbank
Donald Trump isn’t sure The Wall exists. At various times, he has said that much of it has “already been built”—not true. He’s said that Mexico is already paying for it, through a trade deal that has yet to be ratified—also not true, and flat out impossible, at that. - Politico
Having "MEXICO" pay for the wall as promised.
All the want is illegals for the votes so Republicans never win another election. That's what's this is all about. Stand firm stand strong. Do not back down we the people are behind you.
Make it legal for people to sell their US citizenship.. Ill GLADLY sell mine and never set foot in this country again
Just watched Chuck Turd on NBC Nightly News!  Actually questioned the Credibility of Trump????!!!!
OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
The most important thing on their agenda is getting rid of President Trump!!!  doesn't that throw up a red flag,   people !!!!!!!!!
We know what's most important to Dems... stopping you from accomplishing anything!
Make those communist squeal Mr President.  President Trump 2020
Fact free world of childish Trump. He has to go, the most painful way possible would be my first choice. Hopefully, Mueller can seize all of Trump's properties.
This shutdown is on you #Dotard! Remember what you said?  https://youtu.be/ArIxKQgreU0
Oh we know what , they can't stand it that the real Americans just love you. And they are showing their hate. Which BRING more to our side. Everyone can see what DEMOCRATS are, and don't want to be linked with that hate and stupidity.
Resign tRUMP you and your sheep are an embarrassment to our country
Neither....lining their pockets is what they are interested in.
Thank you build that wall prayers for you
Yes keep up the good work..... Build that WALL
The most important thing on their agenda is getting rid of President Trump!!!  doesn't that throw up a red flag,   people !!!!!!!!!
Yes keep up the good work..... Build that WALL
What blithering nonsense. You want this Trump Shutdown to coerce your own way with this idiotic Wall.
Thank you build that wall prayers for you
Adderall snorting Lunatic will declare a state of emergency.  Open the government.  the court will over rule him.  and he can then blame the court. "Mr "Art of the deal" is the worst negotiator Ever.   wait for it
No, they don't  https://www.msn.com/en-us/news/opinion/9-things-you-should-know-before-trump-starts-spewing-lies-in-tuesday-address-to-the-nation/ar-BBRXxUA?ocid=sf
Neither, just your sooner than later exit from the WH one way or another.
Nope and just another POtuS lie.  https://www.facebook.com/61308923432/posts/10156848111748433/
They rather pretend that illegal immigration doesnt exist.
DONE DEALING WITH IDIOTS 🇺🇸 STAND STRONG MY PRESIDENT 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
It wasn't important to the Republicans over the last to year Fuhrer Donnie - stop trying to blame your superiors, Democrats.
Democrats don't want the wall because it's permanent. And they think they'll win elections in 2020. Fix the voting system or all the things you've done for the American people will be lost to socialism.
Unfortunately not very authentic. Address does not extend to an objectivity beyond a subjective problem of the president. Sorry to mention this here.
Jeanne Rogers Really UNINFORMED...
Wait, what’s more important to you?  The wall or helping Americans?
Here's the thing...they're going to try to sell you on more expensive "border control" options that they can repeal later. I think people need to know that permanence is a huge factor...we need this wall because it will stand without as much further funding. I'm all for fitting the wall with high tech security. I think we need electronic monitoring, and I am content with razor wire. Add underground monitoring and I think if it can automatically detect wall attackers and fire tear gas..I think that would be sweet.
BUILD THE WALL !! NOW ...YOU ARE WASTING TIME NOT MONEY !!
Stopping 2020 of course.  You can’t get a big win or they’re toast and they know it.
Great speech Mr President!Democrates should be arrested for open borders!
Stopping is #1 , because  next your promise term limits
all of congress wants border security - just not a wall
The only temper tantrum I see if from them. They can’t handle the truth.
We all know it’s because they want to try to make you fail. They supported everything you want before you wanted it. You won’t fail. I have faith in you!!!
Unfortunately not very authentic. Address does not extend to an objectivity beyond a subjective problem of the president. Sorry to mention this here.
We all know it’s because they want to try to make you fail. They supported everything you want before you wanted it. You won’t fail. I have faith in you!!!
Build the wall. Lol
The only temper tantrum I see if from them. They can’t handle the truth.
Who cares what the Democraps say.  Just continue keeping your promises. That's why we voted for you.
Verizon Trims 10,000 Employees Despite Billions in Tax Cuts and Government Favors  https://motherboard.vice.com/en_us/article/pa5x4z/verizon-trims-10000-employees-despite-billions-in-tax-cuts-and-government-favors
Democrats do nothing but lie and plot and they are the enemies of America.
I believe our president needs to go to plan B...Dems will not support anything he puts forward!
They clearly do not care about the safety of Americans! Ship them out, and build the wall! It's not only Trump wanting it you morans, it's the American people! Take away their fences, walls, and security guards they have protecting their homes, and we'll see how much of a fight they would put up then!
They want to stop you!  Only for their own political careers.
Executive order You are the Leader Protect the children
Fund the border, stay strong, and don't take any crumbs from Fancy Nancy.
You are fake news and enemy of the people.
Build the wall. Lol
Is that a serious question? You don't know what the demonrat agenda is?  Whoo boy
275 billion dollars yearly being put out...5.7 billion is a drop in the bucket.... The wall will bring jobs back to America...
Donald why don't you just pay for it since you're incompetent to close the deal of the rhetoric of "MEXICO'S GOING TO PAY FOR THE WALL" 🤣🤣🤣 Blaming Democrats 🤣🤣🤣 when Republicans wouldn't fund it under President Obama or the last CDC 2 years under you. 🤦‍♀️
Will you live stream your address tonight?  Don't wanna give the fake news the ratings
True democrats don't care about us or there own supporters
Their own growing bank accounts is more important than ANYTHING. They'd sell their own mothers to make a buck. Keep up the fight, Sir. We Patriots are behind you 100%!
Ha Ha you snowflakes arent gettin the wall, Nancy said so!
Best President ever, President Trump.   Build the wall
Best President ever for the working class
As the President stated, we need the Wall/Barrier as it is “common sense” - There is another caravan forming larger than the last two - We are being “invaded” - Pelosi & Schumer won’t even allow “$1 towards the Wall” - these are the leaders of the Dims ! They could end the shutdown in 15 minutes!!!
You are fake news and enemy of the people.
They will never work with you on anything, sorry you have to go threw all of this for trying to protect Americans. God bless you
We Want A Big Beautiful American Made Steel Fence!!!
It's all of us we voted for it they are doing this to all of us.
The American People of today, do not care about this because most of them live in a Fantasy World. Only when a full out war breaks out on our soil will they finally understand.
As you throw your demented little toddler temper tantrum, while holding our nation hostage for your unnecessary and ineffectual "Wall", keep this in mind. Soon and very soon, you will have all the big beautiful, strong, tall, wonderful walls the lying, criminal, traitorous teeny tiny little flap of flesh you call a heart,  can deal with. Bob's coming. He brought down the Gambinos. He is more than capable enough to take care of you and your entire cabal. Sleep well.
SOLAR panels on the steel walls. They can't turn THAT down!!
True that, lets make America great again God bless America and God bless you all
tRump is fricking delusional. I hope he can "adjust" to not getting his money.
Democrats don't care what their constituents want.  They will vote for them anyway.
As the President stated, we need the Wall/Barrier as it is “common sense” - There is another caravan forming larger than the last two - We are being “invaded” - Pelosi & Schumer won’t even allow “$1 towards the Wall” - these are the leaders of the Dims ! They could end the shutdown in 15 minutes!!!
Trump stand tall, stick to your demands, we legals deserve your protection. Democrats will say no to anything Trump wants,
American the mother of the world should be protected by all means before the Arabs and the Islamic,  Soviet associates could wipe out other people in the face of this world.  Donald Trump the great man. My support for Nairobi.
They need to be impeached for refusing to pry America , which they promised when sworn in. Nancy just lured big time when once again accepting that gavel
Giants will fall because Jesus Reigns!!! Democrats are having pride before their destruction
If there wall means nothing then why are they fighting our president so hard. They send more money than he is asking for to help other countries.. I am a registered  dem.  But they are way out of line doing things out of spite. Do what they people want that's why we put you in there
Why are so many against them wall what is it gonna hurt if it makes people feel safer and if you are here legal  then why would you care.  We are all kinds of people from many places I don't think people want that to be different I just think people want others to come here they right way and do their part
Tried to give you a heads up, but I got a flag that I have been blocked from Facebook.
President Trump that’s what it’s all about their corrupt to the core and you have a rattled their bones And they’re scared
If the govt is shut down, then no one in Washington should be getting a pay check either!!  Build the wall!!! I know plenty of national guard folks who are ready to help!!
Democrats don't care what their constituents want.  They will vote for them anyway.
The numbers show Americans want border security, but don’t want to pay for a wall. Trump promised Mexico would pay for it. Don’t forget that.
Buchwald Kevin ACTUAL stats say that a wall will be a giant waste of resources... My source?... Every reliable study except those that come out of that morons mouth....
The numbers show Americans want border security, but don’t want to pay for a wall. Trump promised Mexico would pay for it. Don’t forget that.
They only hate you because you are taking power away from them and letting people see how crooked they are. They need the illegals to vote for them because the Americans are waking up.
Everyone: Call your Congresswo/man and Senators today (WED) 202-224-3121 and Demand $5.6 Billion WALL Funds!
We want to feel safe in our homes. We want our families to bfeel safe. We cannot do that without a wall and added security! Thank you, Mr. President, for standing up for America!
After falling flat on their faces last night, why did they even bother showing up today, just to say no ?
No your Promise was Mexico was paying for the wall .!! Why aren't they ?
NO wall, NO trump Stop the #trumpshutdown
Buchwald Kevin ACTUAL stats say that a wall will be a giant waste of resources... My source?... Every reliable study except those that come out of that morons mouth....
NO wall, NO trump Stop the #trumpshutdown
Michael John Palmieri supermarket saturation of fart paste.
No your Promise was Mexico was paying for the wall .!! Why aren't they ?
Michael John Palmieri supermarket saturation of fart paste.
What is the actual argument against a wall, besides it’s immoral.
Kevin Lee Groves and we are here because we are patriots who live our country, and refuse to see trump continue to destroy it.
Looks like America will be hiring mexican( qualified) workers for air traffic control jobs at half price. This might trouble retired controllers because pensions will be in jeopardy because future employees will not be paying in for retirement. LOL
John Fortney funny. Some of the young Controllers in training or newly certified are worried about missing a pay check. The whole damn thing is a shitshow, but that's nothing new, is it.   If it is truly a Emergency then Trump should declare or be derelict in his duties. Other than that it's a desperate act of a desperate man.
Steve Swisher my point was it could be worse. I understand when people work for or under the government it kidda dictates their thought process. Glad I'm not relying on the government just paying for it. Your welcome.
Kevin Lee Groves and we are here because we are patriots who live our country, and refuse to see trump continue to destroy it.
Steve Swisher my point was it could be worse. I understand when people work for or under the government it kidda dictates their thought process. Glad I'm not relying on the government just paying for it. Your welcome.
Don't you have a stroke or a heart attack you can be having?
Dont you s🐒🐒🐒🐒 f🐒🐒🐒🐒How bout a 🍌 you Damn L🐒🐒🐒🐒
John Fortney funny. Some of the young Controllers in training or newly certified are worried about missing a pay check. The whole damn thing is a shitshow, but that's nothing new, is it.   If it is truly a Emergency then Trump should declare or be derelict in his duties. Other than that it's a desperate act of a desperate man.
Dont you s🐒🐒🐒🐒 f🐒🐒🐒🐒How bout a 🍌 you Damn L🐒🐒🐒🐒
We MUST get to the root cause - our STUPID asylum laws!  You nailed it with that, the Visa Lottery and chain migration  STOP THE MADNESS!  Get to the ROOT CAUSE or we will continue to spin on this hamster wheel!
Karen Waterbury funny how Trump's in-laws got in through chain migration, something which Trump said must be stopped!  Only for certain people I guess!!!!
The law today is still the law TODAY.  I don't care - they are not criminals, terrorists and can SUPPORT THEMSELVES. We need to look at the other side of the coin and realize what is actually coming into this country.  I say NO MORE REFUGEES as well.  Criminalize stepping across this our border if not at a port of entry, and start keeping statistics of those in our prisons that are illegals as well.  Keeping data on just how much these freeloaders are costing us in 'BORROWED' tax funds is essential.  It's our money - we need to see where it goes.
Don't you have a stroke or a heart attack you can be having?
60 thousand of the people  liked this post  - how many of you have donated to the wall fund???? Please donate https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
We want the wall!  We want our border protected by all means necessary.
President Trump, good luck tonight when you talk to America. I say this with love, stay on point and take your time.  Allow for the American people to hear your words and process them.  Thank you for being our President   God Bless America 🇺🇸
Appropriations from the Congressional Pension Fund could pay for it.....like they take from SocialSecurity when money's needed....$3 trillion in 1983 and another grab attempt last July, where they missed by one vote...what's the difference????
The law today is still the law TODAY.  I don't care - they are not criminals, terrorists and can SUPPORT THEMSELVES. We need to look at the other side of the coin and realize what is actually coming into this country.  I say NO MORE REFUGEES as well.  Criminalize stepping across this our border if not at a port of entry, and start keeping statistics of those in our prisons that are illegals as well.  Keeping data on just how much these freeloaders are costing us in 'BORROWED' tax funds is essential.  It's our money - we need to see where it goes.
You dems have the same weak talking points!! Dearing his campaign he said I know Mexico wont cut a check for the wall but we will be reimbursed threw trade!! You bems love telling half truths!!
America wants healthcare and education.  America wants stability and prosperity again.
My HEART is with those Federal workers. I Pray that the Democrats will do their job and reopen the government by giving the American people the money to really secure our borders. President Trump, Please Stand your ground and keep doing what you are doing. You are the 1st President to combat this head on and to keep your promises. TRUMP 2020
No the numbers dont show it
You had two years , sleeping much
Selfish jerks on their own agenda. Nothing more. We won’t get anywhere this way. Sad to say.
I never see any of your post/videos on my page anymore
Turn ALL borders security over to the Pentagon and order them secured. Add Homeland Security, Coast Guard, and NASA to essential personnel. Then end shutdown it is effecting 2020 now.
build that wall and make it strong as our presidents goals....
Picknosie and Schmuck are absolutely useless!
Appropriations from the Congressional Pension Fund could pay for it.....like they take from SocialSecurity when money's needed....$3 trillion in 1983 and another grab attempt last July, where they missed by one vote...what's the difference????
Now we are talking truth Nancy hates Trump so bad she is losing her mind build the wall Nancy hate him later
Mr. President  you are doing a great job for this country.  The true Americans appreciate  it and respect your decisions.
100% obstruction is what they care about. They cannot accept they were wrong.
Democrats know a wall would be effective ! They don’t want us to shut their  future voter base out! They know most of the American people  will not support their epic corruption and lies!🇺🇸
They want to stop anything you do that’s for sure.
Will you PLEASE shut up!!! You are the living embodiment of everything that’s wrong with this country!!!
Your promise was broken when Mexico didn't pay. Bipartisan support gave you the technology and everything else on the list. This is on you!  Also you forgot to mention the two children who died because of your policy. Their blood is on your hand. And meeting with actual victims? Holding hands? Hugging? You don't even hug your wife and kids!
FACT: THERE IS NO CRISIS AT THE BORDER. https://www.npr.org/2017/12/05/568546381/arrests-for-illegal-border-crossings-hit-46-year-low
Praying for you as you speak to the country to ute.  Stay strong!
We are with you 100 percent. Keep fighting for our country. 🇺🇸
Picknosie and Schmuck are absolutely useless!
We are with you 100 percent. Keep fighting for our country. 🇺🇸
Mr President no disrespect sir, but your campaign promise was to build a wall and have Mexico pay for it
Praying for you as you speak to the country to ute.  Stay strong!
Mr President no disrespect sir, but your campaign promise was to build a wall and have Mexico pay for it
They shouldn’t be allowed to have their stupid rebuttal.  This is not a debate. I support the wall. Don’t give in!
Shawn Marie Zavadil FU
FACT: THERE IS NO CRISIS AT THE BORDER. https://www.npr.org/2017/12/05/568546381/arrests-for-illegal-border-crossings-hit-46-year-low
The DEMOCRATS are for the ILLEGALS NOT FOR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE WAKE UP PEOPLE NOW!!!!
🇺🇸🇺🇸 PLEASE STAND STRONG FOR US MR. PRESIDENT! DON'T GIVE IN!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸 #BUILDTHEWALL
Yes we do want border security!! Stay wit it Mr. President---do not give uo the ship
Thoughts and Prayers.  It works for Gun violence...why not border security?
Your “promise “ was Mexico was going to build it now since that’s gone down the crapper I guess it’s democrats who should be responsible huh? Now we don’t want to who is next?  How long are you gonna throw your fit this time?  You know the diapers are piling up and they really do stink..maybe it’s time for a nap
Thank you, Pres. Trump for loving our country more than politics as usual. Build the wall, make our country safer.
Shawn Marie Zavadil FU
Thank you, Pres. Trump for loving our country more than politics as usual. Build the wall, make our country safer.
THEY WILL. THROUGH TRADES AND TARIFFS SON. YOU MISSED ECON 101!
Jill Travassos I don't think you know how tariffs work bud
What happens after the wall is built and illegal immigration is still a thing? Which hole are we gonna piss money into then?
Owen Lamnea clearly, you have no idea what you’re talking about: https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/2019/01/08/president-trumps-desperate-nonsensical-claim-that-mexico-is-paying-wall/
Kim Miller nothing in that article contradicts what I'm saying. Wtf are YOU talking about?
Not to mention he has literally no understanding of what his actual job is, or how the government works. There's checks and fucking balances for a reason, causing a government shutdown over this is nothing short of the most childish thing I've ever seen a grown adult person do
Your “promise “ was Mexico was going to build it now since that’s gone down the crapper I guess it’s democrats who should be responsible huh? Now we don’t want to who is next?  How long are you gonna throw your fit this time?  You know the diapers are piling up and they really do stink..maybe it’s time for a nap
Mr. President PLEASE BUILD THE WALL, we can't wait any longer!!
Unfortunately not all americans mr president  A large number still  hate you so much and believe the fake news media that it is impossible for you to fulfill your promises Without draining the swamp and stopping the fake news America lost
The numbers so not show it. Just saying
Stopping your success is way more important than the security of us pesky Americans.
Trump lies. That shouldn't come as surprising to any discerning person. He's always been a conman.
Yes! We do want border security.Thank you for fighting for America!
Their hypocrisy is breathtaking..... When a political party fights harder for illegals than national security...that’s FUBAR
Not to mention he has literally no understanding of what his actual job is, or how the government works. There's checks and fucking balances for a reason, causing a government shutdown over this is nothing short of the most childish thing I've ever seen a grown adult person do
Their hypocrisy is breathtaking..... When a political party fights harder for illegals than national security...that’s FUBAR
*Fox news polls basically show support from the base but nobody else lmao
Jason Epp and yet every poll said he had no chance of winning and yet he did
Jason Cefai The polls weren't wrong, he lost the popular vote by 2 million.
The ONLY thing important to those radicals is keeping power and making more money from 'serving' themselves.
Sadly dems seem to even want to hurt all Americans to make their political point of hate of the Pres.  It's not just about the wall, it's all his legistlation.  He won and he leads...and also when they win will they also want the Rep to return the same?  This leaves America hurt.  We must keep our country and all our people in mind.  So far, I'd say all of Congress has failed.  They will not negotiate.  They have no solutions and go home when the tough gets going...to vacation.  Leadership like Pelosi in HI is an example....she should have stayed and led the discussions with  Pres. Trump.andt worked until they found a solution....not left the room.  We would expect this from our teenagers...when the tough get going the going GET TOUGH...be thoughtful of fellow Americans and our Country!
Yes, Securtity #1 on Americans List, Build the Wall President Trump ❤️🙏🏻✝🇺🇸
Look at all the fake accounts posting here.   You should be ashamed individual 1.
Why stopping you of course. They were all for it when it was their idea
The Dudek Family stands behind you 100%.  Border security is most important during this time of crisis.  Do not understand why all Americans do not agree with you.  Stand firm, dear Mr. President, the Lord walks beside you, as the Angels overshadow you.  God's blessings of protection and wisdom. <3
Secure our borders. Reform immigration and welfare laws. MAGA 🇺🇸
You Have the Support of Well over Half of this country and millions overseas. Hold Fast, you are stronger then all of them combined
Jason Cefai The polls weren't wrong, he lost the popular vote by 2 million.
22.2k likes and hearts vs 435 laughs. Yep, believe we want this wall.
Get your bets in before his con job 'speech' starts! LOL!  The over/under on number of lies Trump will use in tonight's address is 3.5  Just take that in for a second. Not only are there gamblers betting on how often the leader of our country will outright lie to its citizens, but the expected frequency is once every 2 minutes. https://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html?fbclid=IwAR3ijcgapcC4nJKBEPUmTbHv6xUEGlF1DJjXR1OwLTX776nlThsSCBDdPaoGambling site takes big odds on how many times Trump will lie in his national address - NY Daily Newsnydailynews.com
https://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html?fbclid=IwAR3ijcgapcC4nJKBEPUmTbHv6xUEGlF1DJjXR1OwLTX776nlThsSCBDdPao
LMAO tell me this isn't the most pathetic excuse for a moron sitting in the white house EVER!
22.2k likes and hearts vs 435 laughs. Yep, believe we want this wall.
Border security includes a BARRIER, drones and other small things are bells and whistles. They are Secondary, the wall is Primary, ALWAYS HAS BEEN , ALWAYS WILL BE.
They would bring the whole country down before they would do the right thing like work with President Trump.
WE THE SMART PPL KNOW UR THE BEST THIS COUNTRY HAS HAD AND NEED...FACT
MR.PRESIDENT TRUMP KEEP THE GOVERNMENT CLOSED!!! #CHUCKU AND #NONOPALOSI CAN GO STRAIGHT TO HELL!
Let's end the shut down and then STOP SENATORS CHECKS until they approve no less than the  $5.7 billion for the wall.
democrats want no border wall and they want no voter ID- figured it out yet?
Mr. President Trump, The American People stand with you sir come what may.  #WWG1WGA
Rhetorical question! They want to obstruct because your achievements are their failures.
LMAO tell me this isn't the most pathetic excuse for a moron sitting in the white house EVER!
Yes! We do want border security Mr President!! Stand strong!
MY FRIEND HAS AN IDEA... he shared.. I have an idea to give the democrats a little incentive to fund the wall. Every time an American citizen is maimed or killed by an illegal immigrant, a democrat politician gets executed, chosen by the victims family....that wall would be built in a week...
It is sickening to think that some Americans ignore the American Citizens and their families safety. Build the Wall!
Great speech. We need border security. Stay strong. We are with you. Build the wall
You said that Mexico would pay for the wall .  Keep that promise and I will be impressed.
So increase border security. The wall isn't it fam
A wall and border security are two different things. Illegal crossing has been on the decline for two decades. The bulk of drugs pass through legal points of entry. #Corner store Caroline
The Demonrats, would rather you fail than the country succeed. ♡ U POTUS!
Rhetorical question! They want to obstruct because your achievements are their failures.
Dems want to make Trump look bad.  They don’t have any concern for the safety of American people.
Truth is your company Trump inc. Is owned by the Rothschild Zionist family...
Keep informing people hourly and daily. Expose communism across Mexico and California same banker agenda
Dems want to make Trump look bad.  They don’t have any concern for the safety of American people.
Keep informing people hourly and daily. Expose communism across Mexico and California same banker agenda
EXTRA EXTRA!!! TRUMP SUPPORTER ASPHYXIATES!!! His brother explains:"For the last few years, my brother Jed has been a Trump supporter. We figured he'd be alright when the family left him home alone and went out to dinner during the Trump border speech last night. When we came home, we found that he had his head stuck so far up his ass that he suffocated!!"
Ok lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌
Truth is your company Trump inc. Is owned by the Rothschild Zionist family...
#BuildThatWallNow Don't back down President Trump!  We are standing with you!
Your hatred and fearmongering will not divide us Americans trump.  E pluribus unum
May God bless President Donald Trump and people of US
Yes we do! Close the border till we get it done.
Building a wall or more walls, will protect the people who dare to make that very dangerous trek.  It will force them to find a legal (albeit slower) way to enter this country.  This very wall will protect those women and children who are being harmed!!
Stopping you from full filling your promises. It doesn’t take a genius to figure it out.
Ok lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrpppp!!!! 🐒🐒🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌
Stopping you from full filling your promises. It doesn’t take a genius to figure it out.
Or open the government and freeze the congress salaries will see how long they like that
Building a wall or more walls, will protect the people who dare to make that very dangerous trek.  It will force them to find a legal (albeit slower) way to enter this country.  This very wall will protect those women and children who are being harmed!!
Fear nothing, GOD is with our President and he will succeed <3 I'm now sure of this fact, in Jesus I trust.
Forget the traitor Democrats. Do what you need to do.  We have to have the wall. Thank you so much President Trump. You are awesome.
Nothing is more important to them than increasing their party's political power.  That's pretty obvious.  They don't want to just stop you.  They would be just as happy to make Pence or any other Republican their target.
a few A-10 Warthog passes will solve the problem in a few bursts. forever.
I have a question. Who is the maker of the new fentanyl test kits that are suppose to be handed out free (that’s French for funded by tax payer dollars) can we see if they are campaign contributors to any dems?
I am not an American but I think Donald Trump means well for USA
❤️🇺🇸Exactly President Trump, they wanted a wall until you wanted it❤️🇺🇸
to a democrat hate is the most important thing in the world.
Americans want MEXICO to pay for the wall like you promised. Not making them work for free because you shut the government down over funding you claimed you secured through an “agreement”. Now stop lying to the world. The only crisis at the border are the ICE agents killing and abusing human beings.
Or open the government and freeze the congress salaries will see how long they like that
Americans want MEXICO to pay for the wall like you promised. Not making them work for free because you shut the government down over funding you claimed you secured through an “agreement”. Now stop lying to the world. The only crisis at the border are the ICE agents killing and abusing human beings.
You PROMISED that Mexico would pay for it.
Tim Douglas, like Fox?
to a democrat hate is the most important thing in the world.
Dont listen to the genderless fruitcakes, keep it up Trump!
We can get mexico to pay for it, just use the seized drug money we get on a daily basis to build the wall. The millions of dollars worth of marijuana  that gets found at the border can be sold at our new dispensaries.  Boom, cartels paid for our wall!
You know the answer to that as well as we do.. Just build the damn wall and to hades with that witch..
The only person trying to resolve this is My President!  Socialists, no show!
I support President Trump and his call for border security, including a wall.
Tune in tonight and listen to him lie to the whole world.
Booming economy because of Trump's policies.
Tim Douglas, like Fox?
Demoncrats have never been about working together  Their street riots prove that
BEFORE you - BUILD THE WALL - - - - deport the demonrats to Mexico
Mialei Iske And you have a a good swim across the ocean
Demoncrats have never been about working together  Their street riots prove that
Looks like there needs to be a special election.  NO ID.. NO VOTE, and we the American people vote on the wall!
These people talk about immoral but yet they have a fund set aside to pay people off for the sexual scandals that they get in let’s take that money and start to build the wall
Stand firm, President Trump!  The majority are behind you. I admire you immensely and were counting on you.
🚩Here is a statement from  🇺🇸JASON ROBINSON, a veteran 🇺🇸(not me)... (copied).  "My wife is gonna be pissed that I put my dirty laundry out on FB... And I hope every single person on my feed reads this and many share it. You want to know why I’m pissed about the borders and the “Migrant Caravan”? I’m a 90% disabled combat vet, medically retired, like thousands of others. I’ve been out of work over a year, and with the amount of VA appointments, and the amount of time per appointment, who the hell would hire me? I barely pay my mortgage and bills, I juggle repo on my vehicles and termination on utilities monthly, and we eat, ramen and cereal on a regular basis. We shop at Goodwill and frequent PawnShops not only to shop but to get loans to pay bills or maybe get something we need from time to time. Social Security won’t approve me, and State and Federal assistance programs say I am above their “poverty” levels, so they won’t help me. Yet some of you think it’s ok to allow migrants with nothing to offer our Nation a free pass into this country and you cannot tell me that it won’t cost the tax payer anything. I barely get approved for free lunches for my girls at school and the taxes in Virginia I cant afford to pay, and again, you want to allow these migrants to just walk in...and you want me to offer open arms?  How about you take care of us? All of us? I’m not the only one. There are many way worse than me. There are homeless. There are sick. There are hungry. In this nation. That have paid their dues. Born here. Raised here. Paid taxes here. Worked here, served here. Take care of them.  It’s time to close the revolving door of free and take care of Americans first.  Think about that crap for a second."
BUILD THE WALL!! WE STAND WITH YOU, MR . PRESIDENT!
This is what you get when you don’t elect an ass kisser.   Go Trump!
Stand firm for what's right President Trump.  Don't let them browbeat you down.  We're standing with you.
Mialei Iske And you have a a good swim across the ocean
Why can't we vote on the wall?
That's it exactly if we get the wall they know that they are done in 2020
Because shortly after Trump's inauguration, all immigration detainees holding facilities, and ALL immigration procedures were privatized. All for-profit at the federal level with Sessions aid!
Ty for staying strong! We need to stop all paychecks to the Senate until it gets done
BUILD THE WALL, I support you 100% You are doing what is best for the American people, the ones who wants to come here needs to do it legally! I truly admire you and your family, the USA is blessed to have you as President!! God bless you & family, God bless the USA!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stopping you and preserving their chance at power again. What they are doing might—no, will bite them.
Build the Wall President Trump
I’m not usually a betting woman but if I was I think I’d pick the first answer-lol-no I KNOW I would 🤣just love how you are in this Presidential position!!!♥️🇺🇸♥️
✨❤️🤩THANK YOU Mr. President for allowing us not to think for ourselves anymore!!🌟❤️✨😍💖
Stand firm for what's right President Trump.  Don't let them browbeat you down.  We're standing with you.
✨❤️🤩THANK YOU Mr. President for allowing us not to think for ourselves anymore!!🌟❤️✨😍💖
Americans don't want to pay for a wall you promised Mexico would pay for.  If I have to choose between 5 billion for part of a wall, or 3.5 billion to solve our healthcare problem... I choose healthcare. But apparently, despite the fact it'd save orders of magnitude more lives and improve quality of life for even more, addressing healthcare is "too expensive"... yet still cheaper than your not-quite-wall.  And you said you'd own the shutdown... well, now you own it.
James Flatmo 3.5 billion won't touch healthcare...look how much we spend on healthcare for illegal immigrants...https://www.heritage.org/immigration/report/the-fiscal-cost-unlawful-immigrants-and-amnesty-the-us-taxpayer
I’m not usually a betting woman but if I was I think I’d pick the first answer-lol-no I KNOW I would 🤣just love how you are in this Presidential position!!!♥️🇺🇸♥️
oh please. if mexico or the GoFundMe doesn't pay for it, maybe your buddy Putin will help you.
his promise was mexico would pay for it.
I agree but so does all civilized society , look what is happening all over Europe and covered up by the media and is controlled by the globalists Illuminati.
Democrats want strong borders, too.   We just realize that your stupid wall won’t work.
Use the Army core of engineers to build a barbed wire wall.
Have mexico pay for it
Americans know exactly what the Democrats are playing....and we're tired.....Trump 2020
Do what God tells you to do sir. We are with you.
James Flatmo 3.5 billion won't touch healthcare...look how much we spend on healthcare for illegal immigrants...https://www.heritage.org/immigration/report/the-fiscal-cost-unlawful-immigrants-and-amnesty-the-us-taxpayer
Do what God tells you to do sir. We are with you.
Why must you always start with negativism about Democrats you are the president No one is  stopping you from fulfilling your promise they are trying to tell you you were mistaken with the promise and you need to do other things which are better and explain why
Susan Rainville Fuller that's one of the big problems the Dems don't listen.  They are so upset that he won they won't listen.  It's a shame.  I don't understand how they can give 52 million for aid that includes money for abortions but they refuse to help American citizens.  Wish they would explain that.
Americans know exactly what the Democrats are playing....and we're tired.....Trump 2020
Nancy's number 202-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck's 202-224-7433. Be professional, but demand the wall funds.  Repost numbers. Let's do this. Leave a message, Build the Wall! Everyone call!!
THEY ONLY WANT TO STOP YOU......AMERICA STANDS WITH YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP <3
This is what's most important and you know it and that's why you're doing everything you can to squash this subpoena. https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
Heaven has a wall, a gate and a strict immigration policy. Hell has open borders. Let that sink in.
Please come out with a pro-oxygen campaign so all these snowflakes can resist.
whats more important to Democrats?...simple, YOUR REMOVAL  FROM OFFICE. #IMPEACH45
I'm from the most stupid country in the world.... Nigeria but I love Mr j trump so much...... Pls American's should let him do wat he promised before he was elected as the president.
Susan Rainville Fuller that's one of the big problems the Dems don't listen.  They are so upset that he won they won't listen.  It's a shame.  I don't understand how they can give 52 million for aid that includes money for abortions but they refuse to help American citizens.  Wish they would explain that.
I'm from the most stupid country in the world.... Nigeria but I love Mr j trump so much...... Pls American's should let him do wat he promised before he was elected as the president.
Even a 4 legged animal is smart enough to know when they are boxed in a corner however, instinct tells them to change their path.  Trump is too self serving to realize he has MADE A FOOL OF HIMSELF!!!!
whats more important to Democrats?...simple, YOUR REMOVAL  FROM OFFICE. #IMPEACH45
Marion Sorel Trump is doing what we the American people voted for him to do...Build The Wall!
What’s more important a Wall or People being able to provide for their families!! Time for Congress to change the laws on Shutting down the Government!! The Government should never ever be able to shut down without the votes coming from the house and the senate approval!! This needs to soon be enforced because every-time U cannot have your way this is exactly what U will do!! RESIGN
Amy Perry Jenson yes, exactly what Obama did to get his way. Great teaching by example.
Karen Solis Nimmo Hugh difference a wall and saving people’s lives!! Besides President Obama didn’t Promise that Mexico would pay for our Insurance😳😳
Marion Sorel Trump is doing what we the American people voted for him to do...Build The Wall!
Just 11 days ago the Republicans held the Senate, the house and the WH and still couldn’t pass a bill for the wall!! The Republicans CLEARLY do NOT want a wall!
There agenda is to bring you down, they dont care about the people! TRUMP 20/208
They don't care about the people... only money and power.
One of the rare individuals in politics who cares about the safety of his citizens, unlike Merkel, Trudeau and cie.
Keep the government shut down.  Let them protest.
ROFL, why show Fox News, everyone knows it's fake.
Karen Solis Nimmo Hugh difference a wall and saving people’s lives!! Besides President Obama didn’t Promise that Mexico would pay for our Insurance😳😳
ROFL, why show Fox News, everyone knows it's fake.
CBS stated before the President spoke that their polls show only 59% of the people want the wall.  I CALL BULLSHIT!
Janice Webre  that's over half...lol
I think it's higher.
Suggestion. NEVER mention "campaign promise"!! It sounds self serving. Just zero in on the necessity and urgency of A WALL!! Why! And how!
I think it's higher.
Your are just slobbering at the idea of raping our coffers for more money for your pocket.
YOU STILL MAD BRO?  YOUR TEAM LOST..BIGLY. LOVE YOUR TEARS. KEEP EM COMING.  ENTERTAINMENT IS ALL MINE!  #KAG
Janice Webre  that's over half...lol
Democrats hate Mr Trump and just for that reason they want to say NO  to everything that he propose
https://www.facebook.com/100003832833605/posts/1128381830632901/   I think the left is confused
Democrats have lost their sanity. Ignore them. Build the wall.
Keep it up Mr. President, don't give them an inch!
The answer to that question is painfully obvious Mr. President judging by their petty opposition to something they ALL wanted before it was YOU asking for it.
I think you should stop worrying about this wall and start trying to figure on how you are going to keep Junior from going to prison.
Lmao , we all know the answer to that question Trump.
YOU STILL MAD BRO?  YOUR TEAM LOST..BIGLY. LOVE YOUR TEARS. KEEP EM COMING.  ENTERTAINMENT IS ALL MINE!  #KAG
stopping you......it is their one and only goal.  We are behind you 100% no matter what you decide #BuildTheWallNow
this country is in a state of emergency by all means we must control the border. its now of never. if we dont stop this attack we are done as a nation! potus trump you can call the state of emergency due to the unprecedented deaths of our children due to the opiod crisis. that would be a great startPLEASE DECLARE A STATE OF EMERGENCY! WE WILL ALWAYS HAVE YOUR BACK. AND YOU WILL WIN IN 2020. THANK YOU SIR!
demon rats have no cause other than to promote their idiotic hatred and jealousy
Yes we need the wall and more border patrol  and more judges.
For sure is to stop your promise. Forget about “work together” Their agenda is NWO
We need to protect the American people
But them Demarats say that's not who we are, confusing
Stand atrong build the Wall!
They would rather try and knock you down every chance they get than to make the right decision. Maybe its time to take them all on a field trip to the damn border!
How many ILLEGALS coming here are Human Traffickers ? We must have a WALL to keep them from sneaking through.
Lmao , we all know the answer to that question Trump.
How many ILLEGALS coming here are Human Traffickers ? We must have a WALL to keep them from sneaking through.
They would rather try and knock you down every chance they get than to make the right decision. Maybe its time to take them all on a field trip to the damn border!
Stopping you from fulfilling your promises,  definitely.
And people voted for that promise why these demwits always against everything?
Remember weeks ago the Democrats and media criticized Trump for not listening to the generals?  Today, Democrats aren't listening to the border agents and ICE agents.
So with a shabby wall they confiscated 13000lbs of fentynal.  Thats almost 3 MILLION DEADLY doses.  Especially in this area, with death after death, who says we dont need a wall???!!
Why do we have to beg so hard to spend our own money on our own country?
Bless you POTUS and lets build that wall.
COPY & REPOST  If you support the wall call this number 800-350-6647 then press 1 it tells the government we want the wall. I just did it.  Nancy's number 202-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck's 202-224-7433. Be professional, but demand the wall funds.  Repost numbers. Let's do this. Leave a message, Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!! If mailboxes are full PRESS 3 and leave a message.
If you support the wall call this number 800-350-6647 then press 1 it tells the government we want the wall.
Too bad your kid cannot write proper English. How sad.😞
Kris Knight----They're not funny in the least!
Too bad your kid cannot write proper English. How sad.😞
Your campaign promise is a centuries old solution...
Rose McMullin Brock Uninformed
Liz Hall Believing his lies doesn't make you informed.
If you support the wall call this number 800-350-6647 then press 1 it tells the government we want the wall.
Splain that wall in China...
Really scary that so many thousands of Trump cultists liking and loving more Russian bot comments here.
Um, your promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall, so that ship has already sailed! Want to try again?
Stopping you seems to the Dems and RINOS to be far more important than the health and security of The People. Stay the course, Mr. President! Their treason is not going unnoticed.
God is going to put his hand on this. MAGA 🇺🇸
There is only one thing the Democrats want, to get back in Power even if that means claiming that the earth is flat and the moon a water droplet in the sky... they are of extremely low intelligence and lazy as anyone can be
Americans want Border Security!!! Build the wall!
I wish we can have a President whom love his country passionately with deep heart  In my country just for one week...
Wrong the only reason the Goverment is closed is because Trump is insane.
Liz Hall Believing his lies doesn't make you informed.
They are going to be a has been party. Some of there party are already pulling away from them!!!!
Dear Mr.President, Shut down the gov. Build the wall. Deport the illegals. The citizens of this country stand behind you
Trump Derangement Syndrome on full display - the party of the Ass has stuck their heads fully up their own asses and are too busy hashtag "resisting" to do anything productive.   Hold the line Mr. President - we need the wall.
We’re with you, Mr. President!  Thank you for standing strong!
...so, do live in a country that embraces democracy or a dictatorship
...then don't make promises you know you can't keep.  Administering the Office of Presidency does not include making unrealistic and reasonable promises.
...history where there is absolute rule without democracy
Godspeed Mr. President!!  We love you for standing your ground for America!
You came across weak and untruthful yet again.
Wrong the only reason the Goverment is closed is because Trump is insane.
You came across weak and untruthful yet again.
For the brainless Democrats?.....stopping you from fulfilling another promise is more important Mr. President! They do not care about us or our country's security.
His promise was Mexico was going to pay for it not the tax payers.
Robert Betancourt, so if you were to be up to speed on the facts....Mexico is in fact paying for the border barrier along with substationally much much more through the new trade agreement that replaced the doomed NAFTA.
Godspeed Mr. President!!  We love you for standing your ground for America!
Robert Betancourt, so if you were to be up to speed on the facts....Mexico is in fact paying for the border barrier along with substationally much much more through the new trade agreement that replaced the doomed NAFTA.
Tommy Hooks   wow, what kind of stupid are you
Roger Cary I'm the kind that is not afraid to show my face, comrade !
Roger Cary Go back to you closet, freak !
His promise was Mexico was going to pay for it not the tax payers.
Can you build the wall without congress?
Years of discussions and misunderstandings to come. That will be the cost!
The president threatens California over wildfire funding. Waiting for him to threaten Florida and Texas over hurricanes. Perhaps Michigan and Ohio are next over snowstorms? Step back and think about this....we have a President threatening funding to his own people for disastrous wildfires.
DON'T LISTEN TO THOSE PAFOONS..
KEEP UP THE FIGHT PRESIDENT TRUMP!!!!
Best President in my lifetime and I have lived through 10 others
We need the wall !!! And Trump will be the man to get it done!
Build the wall...what part of illegal is hard to understand!!! UPHOLD OUR LAWS...
Roger Cary Go back to you closet, freak !
We love you, you are good Mister President, G'd bless you, greetings from Tzefat Israel.
Still no negotiations with the newly elected President of Mexico,Manuel Obrador.The .President stated weeks ago that he would take full responsibility for the shutdown but now blames Democrats. who want to open it back up!.
If you support the wall call this number 800-350-6647 then press 1 it tells the government we want the wall. I just did it.
When you consider the trillions spent on national defence every year wall is a pretty small expense.
To keep you from doing any and all of it.
I have set posts from this page to appear at the top, but I'm just now seeing it at the top. 😡
I wish he'd stop trying to take credit for everything.  Makes it more difficult dealing with democrats.
Yes an Pelosi said herself that she would together in a bipartisan way boy she lied. She just wanted to the speaker well she got her way. Her n Schumer need to be tossed out on their ass
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall
Well they seem to be trying to stop you.. stay tough!!  Love president Trump and SECURITY!!
Build the wall...what part of illegal is hard to understand!!! UPHOLD OUR LAWS...
Well they seem to be trying to stop you.. stay tough!!  Love president Trump and SECURITY!!
Quick, make up more fake statistics to scare the stupid and the elderly!!
Bret Van Beek you just another durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrppp!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhh here you go lil 🐒🍌
Micheal Marceaux facts
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall
LOLOLOLOL ANOTHER??? What were the other lies, er, 'promises'???
I know you have to work hard to make it look like you’re actually trying to keep your promise about the wall, but we know it’s just an attempt to distract from breaking your other campaign promises, like your promise to support the 2nd Amendment - instead you’re pushing gun control
It’s time to take a stand We the People!! Share with everyone. Call those numbers. I’ve never seen anything like the duo & don’t want them thinking they know what’s right for us. Let’s not be complacent. It’s not like it used to be & we need to do our part. We can do this!!
President Trump, please use the Nuclear Option and call a State of Emergency.  Forget Congress! The Demos are a waste of time!
Stay strong and build the wall we love you
STAND OUR GROUND KEEP THE GOV SHUT DOWN!#PRESIDENTIALADDRESS
Only problem with your statement is that ALL POLITICIANS from BOTH PARTIES support border security, and provided $2.9billion for that over the last two years, most of which you have not spent. They understand the needs at the border which include many things, but not your wall.
They going to treat u as JESUS
Hang tough, President Trump...we are with you all the way
Micheal Marceaux facts
Hang tough, President Trump...we are with you all the way
democrats know they need the wall they have said it in the past many time about border security BUT they don't want to give into trump. If it saves one life, just 1 life, then it was worth it
Technology would do more, for less, but a scalable, tunnelable wall is the best thing his simple mind could come up with.
They going to treat u as JESUS
Don't let this distract you from the fact that Hector is gonna be running 3 Honda Civic's with spoon engines. On top of that he just came into Harry's and ordered 3 t66 turbo's with NOS's and a Motec System Exhaust.
The promise was you will build a wall and Mexico will pay for it. So.......
62% of the people don’t want to spend that much tax money on a wall .
a secure border does not necessarily mean a wall
his words people.."his" promise,,,,, the fucking dictator does not say one of the republican promises... the dutard
Thank you 👍 wish you the best. Build the wall make it tall round them up get rid of them all. If  people don’t like my remark don’t bother to reply not open for discussion!!!!
I want a wall, a strong military, and to feel safe again.  I want politicians who behave with dignity, not ones who address the congress of the U.S. with street lingo, nor chews their cud when they don't get their way, nor uses millions of $American tax to prove NOTHING!  I voted for Donald Trump and I'm glad I did.  I want America back.
What's more important to Democrat voters? Murder and rape!
Let the people vote on it!
Technology would do more, for less, but a scalable, tunnelable wall is the best thing his simple mind could come up with.
YOUR PROMISE WAS THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT.  NOT US!
Nailed it they are doing it to see you fail.  We are behind you President Trump!!
Time for that wall!  TRUMP 2020!  I've donated to wewillfundthewall.com and I will do it again.  We could just do it wth machine guns and land mines but I would rather have a wall.
54 billion to foreign governments, yet we can't get 5 to protect our own. What a joke!
No America’s hurt during the shut down ban all illegal aide EBT WIC only Americans. And take pensions from the Senate and house till we get our boarders up and not take hard working Americans who have earned their social security! Why should they be paid? What makes the exempted!
Stay strong President Trump..dont cave to the hostage holders of our rights.
They just one to stop you for doing what is right.
Let the people vote on it!
Who cares what the loser left wants...GET IT DONE NOW!!!!
Don’t give in Mr President. We got your back
There coming threw my buddy's back yard that lives in Texas! 20 miles from any road" As he has witnessed with his hunting cam, Why do not people under stand this? We NEED a boarder WALL' only the week go too the gate' The hard core gang member's cross threw the desert HELLO WAKE UP PEOPLE!!!  Please Help us Mr.  President
That fact of the Matter is all the DemonRats wanted the wall.  Now Trump wants it their Hypocrites . BUILD THAT WALL .
We support the wall. Thank you Mr. President.
I support President Trump's tireless efforts to get our wall built. We need the wall to ensure a safe and secure United States of America.
We're want the wall, keep up the fight Mr. President
Then make a deal Mr Art of the Deal!!! U want the wall then negotiate with the other side!! It’s called compromise!! You give them something they want and they will give you your wall!! And reopen the fucking government!!!
Stopping you, you know that tho. Keep up your great work mr trump
They just one to stop you for doing what is right.
Stopping you, you know that tho. Keep up your great work mr trump
Have the democratic puts forward a rational explanation as to why the do not want a secure boarder?. Or for that matter any explanation at all?
Chris Davey  exactly right .
Then make a deal Mr Art of the Deal!!! U want the wall then negotiate with the other side!! It’s called compromise!! You give them something they want and they will give you your wall!! And reopen the fucking government!!!
Get ahead of the lies.  https://apple.news/A1Vc1_OWZQmamrVsxnYBTkg
Not wanting you to fill another promise DEMOCRATS ARE 💩
They don’t give a damn about US citizens
Build it high and electrify jmo
We support and are praying for you Mr. President!
We need security under and over our Border now.
They want to see you fail and they are working so very hard to see you fail.  I am praying very hard for you Mr. President.  I want to see our country SAFE and you can make that happen.
This is for the people give the people a chance to speak up. All this BS from the Democrats.
Promise of healthcare reformation?
Chris Davey  exactly right .
To DEMS - stopping you from fulfilling yet one more promise. Rock on Mr. President.
No backing down! No retreat! Stay strong and force the liberals to fund the wall!!!
THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP XOXO
Yes we the people do Mr President
Don’t sweat it Mr. President, God’s got this... Hola?
BUILD THAT WALL BOO XOXO WE LOVE YOU
you had two years with a congress that would approve the money for your wall a million times over, but you waited until now to ask. #lockhimup #mueller
Don't give in!  Stand strong!  Americans are behind you!  Build that Wall!
Donde esta pesos for the wall?! Where are the pesos!!!!!!!!
You are darned Right we want to secure the Border. The nation is with President Trump and you are so Envious you are writing your own future downfall, Great Presidents are not easy to find but obstacles like Pelosi and Schumer are a dime a dozen.
Promise of healthcare reformation?
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=2294109654197776&id=1778442735764473 What really goes on in south Texas
Mr. President whatever you have to do you have to secure the borders end of story secure the borders
Its a power play sire!  My andvice is to not sink to the same level as your Enemy. Place the Good of the Republic first. If needs be find a way to pay our goverment employee's
I truly believe if they're not on the side of the Muslims they are on the side of socialism why would anybody not want secure borders even for the emigrants
Wish he would had mentioned the triple amputee and the many Americans that donated to Go Fund Me. to assist in the wall being built!!!! We the people want the wall!!! If not why would so much money be collected so quickly???
Tell the demonrats you want the wall to keep out trump supporters
Those are their voters. Introduce a bill that you have to pay tax in order to vote and have a say on how government spends tax dollars. Double down.
Make sure who you vote for in the next election, 2020 comes fast.
Crisis !  Your the crisis !  More like the anti Christ !
You are darned Right we want to secure the Border. The nation is with President Trump and you are so Envious you are writing your own future downfall, Great Presidents are not easy to find but obstacles like Pelosi and Schumer are a dime a dozen.
Crisis !  Your the crisis !  More like the anti Christ !
Make sure who you vote for in the next election, 2020 comes fast.
A wall doesn’t mean “keep out” it means “please use the the door (legally)” 🇺🇸 Supporting our president 100%
Thank You Mr. President, stand tall, strong & build that wall, stay safe.
Mr. President what is important to Liberal Democrats is hating you at the cost of our safety . #BUILDTHEWALL
No one should live in fear! No one should be homeless no one should be hungry...God gave us free food, water and light...all this technology and still can't do the right thing smh...Live.Learn.Love #WorldPeace
Another? Racking my brains here for a first promise kept...mmm....no nothing!
Stay the course Mr. President. We've got your six! KAG2020!
They just want the votes,not what the American dream is made of.
Keep strong President Trump..we are here.
U.S. NEWS New Study Shows Illegal Immigrants to Outnumber Americans 2 to 1 by 2025 NOVEMBER 4, 2016 by R. HOBBUS J.D. CAMBRIDGE, Ma. – A groundbreaking study conducted by researchers at MIT suggests Americans living in the United States could find themselves outnumbered by illegal immigrants by a staggering ratio of at least two to one within the next ten years unless significant changes are made to U.S. immigration policy
Keep strong President Trump..we are here.
YOU DO NOT HAVE THE FIGURES.MORE LIES!!
They just want the votes,not what the American dream is made of.
Harriet Jones another demorat... Crawl back under your bridge, you troll
You promised Mexico was gonna pay for the wall? So what promise is it you are speaking about that you are fulfilling?
Shawn Peterson do you understand that they will be paying for it? Business is done many different ways
Tina Magaro Foust then why don’t you show us the proof that are clever president has got them paying for it....
Harriet Jones another demorat... Crawl back under your bridge, you troll
GREAT SPEECH......BUIL THE WALL....PRAYING FOR YOU ALWAYS
It would be a greater step toward US security if we build an impenetrable wall around Mar a Lago ( whenTrump is home)
Obstruction is their only goal.
What's more important ???   FACTS ... no lies, exaggerations, immigration reform that does not cost $5.6 billion (and counting per Pence's recent TV interview).    I hope the FACT checkers are working overtime tonight ....
When will Deceptive Hodor Donnie stop lying to his supporters?
The most important thing for the entire world is to get you out of the Oval Office ASAP.
Let's charge a $10.00 border crossing fee or tole per person. And use that money to build the wall and strenthin our border.
Tina Magaro Foust then why don’t you show us the proof that are clever president has got them paying for it....
Please declare a national emergency because there is a national emergency.  If you declare a national emergency and build the wall and institute e-verify, and do other things to secure our sovereignty, you WILL BE RE-ELECTED!
Love you and build the wall !!!
Please Mr. President, BUILD THE WALL. We live in Dallas County Texas (a sanctuary county) and we are overrun with illegal aliens - so many that our public school signage is in Spanish!
We'll get the wall up one way, or another!
We want a 'Great Wall' just like the one China has, protecting their/our border.  I can see it now!  Thank you President, Donald J. Trump.  Stand your ground....make this your utmost priority!  If it takes two more years...we'll elect you another 4 after that.  Let's BUILD THE WALL!!!🇺🇸
He said  Mexico is paying for it! So why shut down the government????
Uh not according to like.... everyone. The wall is not what America wants. The majority of America infact opposes this concept, now please try to come up with real ideas that don't tear our country further into a divide. Please find something that doesn't make us look like our grandfather's enemies. Comprehensive border security is possible and bipartisan consensus can be reached if epic demands are met with constructive bipartisanship. If you want to be the greatest President you have to remember that our America isn't your Trumpica, we have people of all political inclinations and you are supposed to represent us all. Not just pander to the base...
I think that the Congress and senators should not get paid during the shut down either. They have a year to make sure that our government has a spending account put together before the beginning of the next year. Because they did not do so that is why they are having  the shutdown. So that shows  American people that government are not doing their job for the American people.
It's all about removing or stoping Trump, not about the agenda, or the health of the country, it's personal, and viscous
Where does Pelosi get her information on the American Citizens do not want the wall. She must be asking her grand kids. or her Nephew Pretty Boy Gooseman AKA Newsom.
Let's charge a $10.00 border crossing fee or tole per person. And use that money to build the wall and strenthin our border.
Where does Pelosi get her information on the American Citizens do not want the wall. She must be asking her grand kids. or her Nephew Pretty Boy Gooseman AKA Newsom.
This is not about border security for tRump.  This is about his insatiable ego.  Nothing more.
Cathy Robinson like yours
Liz Hall Ahhhhhh, you’re a tRumpy!!!!! 😂
It's all about removing or stoping Trump, not about the agenda, or the health of the country, it's personal, and viscous
Liz Hall Ahhhhhh, you’re a tRumpy!!!!! 😂
Americans says no more lies, you said Mexico will pay for, so!!!
Cathy Robinson like yours
Dictators deal in absolution. RESIGN
Faith and our perseverance awaken optimism, which leads to final victory.
Damn Kitty there so many stupid people it's unreal or maybe not stupid uneducated. Or both
Nancy, in her own words of what they do!https://www.facebook.com/randy.weber.1675/videos/10161440828065089/UzpfSTc0Nzk3MjgwNzoxMDE1Njg2OTk5MzE4MjgwOA/
Ever notice the fences an walls around the White House.. they keep most people out.
Proud of the President and his stand!
Your promise was a wall that not the us paid for but Mexico if you are worried about promises!!!
Adam Ben Mexico will pay, think about it. ..its gonna cost them when that wall goes up....
We met a man visiting from Nigeria. He said we have President Trump to stand firm for us. We also met an American citizen who came here from Russia at 18 who had nothing but praise for President Trump and took time from her job to discuss socialism. She is against it!
Trump said Mexico was paying for the wall !
No we don't want border security we love vacationing in Mexico
The Dems are instigators and will stop at nothing to protest that President Trump is OUR President! They would rather the country fail, than support him! Their ultimate agenda is to bring this country to Socialism!
They will always fail in all their evil vices as we are confident in victory of good over evil
Thank you for accepting the weight and burden of your commitment not only to We The People, but to the citizens of the world, POTUS Trump. You and your family are role models and heroic to all of us. Some people and generations won't understand in this lifetime. But the hands of time will tell of your sacrifice. Thank you.
Any country but America... build the wall..
If only you would quit making the statement that the wall is effective border security.  Democrats are smart enough not to want a useless wall.  They want modern and cost effective security measures. The fact that the wall would eventually cost an estimated 70 billion is lost on trumpsters.  There is also the problem that some of the proposed border land is owned by private citizens and would have to be acquired by eminent domain.  Another issue is that much of the land is mountains or water and would be hard to construct on.  Finally ... Mexico was supposed to pay for it!  Border security yes.  Wall, NO!
Your promise that Mexico will fund the wall. Not us. Gtfo
Your promise was a wall that not the us paid for but Mexico if you are worried about promises!!!
I have a question for all my friends. I don’t care whether your Republicans or Democrats. Why do we send our American soldiers that spill their blood to protect the borders of other countries but we can’t spend the money for a wall to protect our Great Nation.Is blood not more precious than money?
I've seen so many Democrats say they don't want the wall, but they do want border security.  Or Democrats that proudly support Obama and Hillary, without realising both Obama and Hillary voted and set aside billions to have a wall built too.  It's mind boggling...
I say just do what you have to do President Trump to get the wall built. We support you but please freeze the salaries of those in Congress who are the decission makers.
They don’t want to stop their illegal immigrants voting for The Dums or Dems
Yes we do. Our homes, our country!
And I'm one of the number yes and I'm one of the numbers
Stopping you is more important for Democrats. Remember, the status quo benefits them.
Keep up the great work your doing President DONALD J TRUMP AMERICA is behind you and let build the damn wall and stop this invasion with any means necessary for the people of the USA. TRUMP 2020
Your promise that Mexico will fund the wall. Not us. Gtfo
From what I'm gathering from posts, is that Americans want protection, but not a wall. Is there another solution?
Walls work... See “San Diego’s wall” before and after... Nitwits🙄
Secure our borders no matter what
It’s your memorial not border security, if you’re so worried about illegals getting benefits not given to homeless take the 5 billion you want to waste on a wall & help the homeless
With all due respect, Mr. President, why do you have to furlough workers who are doing the jobs they are expected to do, not pay them and put them in dire straits with their mortgages and taking care of their families until this gets straightened out.   If you need this wall and it's the only solution you see, I hope and pray you and the Democrats can sit down and resolve this, but please restore the pay to those depending on it that are caught in the crosshairs of this crisis.  They have not done anything to deserve this and are scared/stressed and worried sick.  Thank you for your consideration.
57% are against building on the southern border.
Promise that Mexico is paying? Hilary in prison?
Build it! Hell the past 4 only talked about it!
When and which time did you think President trump is not the greatest President?
What ever happened to DACA? Too much empathy for you? Why must you make people suffer needlessly?
Keep up the great work your doing President DONALD J TRUMP AMERICA is behind you and let build the damn wall and stop this invasion with any means necessary for the people of the USA. TRUMP 2020
What ever happened to DACA? Too much empathy for you? Why must you make people suffer needlessly?
How do you compromise with someone that is taking shots at you?
Return fire.
When and which time did you think President trump is not the greatest President?
You just can’t reason with the Democrats when before you say a word they have stated they will not listen and they will block you
Went through the list almost every single person who express how hilarious America protecting its borders is using the 😂 by reaction is..... a... you guessed it foreigner to the US
Just saying ...  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=322843754997484&id=143574282924433
Democrats don't believe in filling campaign promises.
President Trump, the Democrats say, let's fund the government now and then we will work on national security. Well, that is the same thing they said to President Ragen. He caved. They lied. Don't fall for their tricks.
Campaign promises got u elected.  We expect u to keep them.  Obviously those promises r just rhetoric to Dems.  Just like all of Obama’s empty promises.
TRUMP 2020.  Re elect that mother f@cker again!
Return fire.
Don’t Cave !!! We got your back. Thank you Mr President
What if individual STATES on the border begin to bypass the Feds and construct extensive RAZOR WIRE barriers? Then, the President could have troops and border control officials take it from there? BYPASS CONGRESS!
so when is Mexico paying for it..part of your promise
Stay strong, hold steady!!!  We want that wall.
Yes, most Americans want border security. However, most Americans don’t want a physical wall. Get out of your own way and stop manufacturing crises.
I will build a great wall — and nobody builds walls better than me, believe me — and I’ll build them very inexpensively. I will build a great, great wall on our southern border, and I will make Mexico pay for that wall. Mark my words.”
Also the go fund me donations show it
Stop depending on the democrats they do not give 2 shits about the Americans or you do what we the people want build that wall declare 🚨 emergency
True America s want borders and protection!!!
Build  that  Wall and  veto,veto,veto play  the  same  game  they  do.
Building walls has never solved any problems.
Keep working hard for We The People Donald J. Trump!!! We Appreciate everything you do for our beautiful country!
If the government shutdown were affecting the Senate and the House bottom line, you can bet something would be done. NOW!!!!! Because tomorrow, while others are NOT getting paid, they WILL BE PAID! ( they're the people don't need to be paid).   I'm glad Mr. PRESIDENT; that you're NOT KICKING THE CAN DOWN THE ROAD! !!!!!!
KEEP US AND OUR CHILDREN SAFE.
We know the answer to that and its not to support the country.
I think they want to impeach “the mother f&cker”.....seems pretty important to them and the rest of us too.
If Trump was for giving Democrats pay raises , they would oppose it.
Democrats started lead the HOUSE with obstructive intent against you, Mr President, and against the policy US government.  Their unfair destructive stance failed...and failed again. Bible said, in Proverbs 22:8,  "--Those who plant injustice will harvest disaster, and their reign of terror will come to an end---".
Listen to Trump....Im UK but please listen. He means well.
THANK GOD FOR TRUMP! FINALLY A PATRIOT IN OUR WH AGAIN! #KAG
America wants secure borders but not a wall that will cost billions but will not succeed in keeping people or drugs out? There are better and cheaper ways to secure the border. You promised a 2000 mile concrete wall paid by Mexico. Now you want steel fencing 234 miles paid by US. That isn’t even close to what you promised
Didn’t you have 2 years to do this when republicans held all levels of government ?
Chris Hanson he didn't use the nuclear option.  (To prevent democrats from using it as well.)  60%.  Never had it.  Nice play on words, though.  Perhaps you should read up on how things actually work.
He could have had his budget approved under the republicans.  This is just a tactic by him to entice fear into people
America wants secure borders but not a wall that will cost billions but will not succeed in keeping people or drugs out? There are better and cheaper ways to secure the border. You promised a 2000 mile concrete wall paid by Mexico. Now you want steel fencing 234 miles paid by US. That isn’t even close to what you promised
He could have had his budget approved under the republicans.  This is just a tactic by him to entice fear into people
Liar, liar, pants on fire. There is more crime committed by US citizens than by immigrants, in every city in the US.
Joy Sudler Really ? They are citizens? We will always have crime, but why import it?
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
You won't read it. But I'm obligated to try to educate the uninformed and gullible.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/undocumented-aliens-violent-crime-murder-statistics-data-2018-8google.com
Chris Hanson he didn't use the nuclear option.  (To prevent democrats from using it as well.)  60%.  Never had it.  Nice play on words, though.  Perhaps you should read up on how things actually work.
You won't read it. But I'm obligated to try to educate the uninformed and gullible.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/undocumented-aliens-violent-crime-murder-statistics-data-2018-8google.com
More terrorists cross the northern border than the southern. Why no border wall in the north? https://globalnews.ca/news/4824976/us-mexico-border-terrorists-canada/Reality check: More terror suspects have entered the U.S. from Canada than from Mexicoglobalnews.ca
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
Yes they want it.  Just not your kind of border security.  Hey can somebody talk some sense into this guy or find a better guy?  Try something human.
You know Democrats don’t care about Americans and they do not want to work for the good of the country.
Its about time we have a President that's not a politician but an advocate for the American people!
Too bad you didn't tackle this issue in January 2017. Instead you went along with that dolt Ryan  and tax cuts. Why not simply invoke Article 4 Section 4 of the Constitution?
The sad part they are trying to hurt you, terrible!!!
Your not worth the breath Kenneth McIntyre
I think we all know the answer to that one
More terrorists cross the northern border than the southern. Why no border wall in the north? https://globalnews.ca/news/4824976/us-mexico-border-terrorists-canada/Reality check: More terror suspects have entered the U.S. from Canada than from Mexicoglobalnews.ca
I think we all know the answer to that one
No 75% of the population wants nothing to do with you and anything you try to BS your supporters with!!.
Craig Johnson calm down snowflake
If the country goes down the drain what you are saying means Absolutely nothing!!. As for being a snowflake I would rather be one instead of a mindless follower of a big orange con man!!.
PS, I don't think Reggie deals in facts not unlike his orange master!!.
Craig, what else has your TV told you to be mad at today? Very hypocritical to call supporters mindless followers, we get it - Orange Man Bad.
Reggie James Your facts are swayed when it comes to the orange monster!!.
Your not worth the breath Kenneth McIntyre
I am So Happy with President Trump.  He is Amazing and is working, tirelessly, for the American People.
Repeat a lie often enough and it becomes the truth”, is a law of propaganda often attributed to the Nazi Joseph Goebbels. Among psychologists something like this known as the "illusion of truth" effect. But part of guarding against the illusion is the obligation it puts on us to stop repeating falsehoods. We live in a world where the facts matter, and should matter. If you repeat things without bothering to check if they are true, you are helping to make a world where lies and truth are easier to confuse. So, please, think before you repeat.http://www.bbc.com/future/story/20161026-how-liars-create-the-illusion-of-truth
I support President Trump !!! Build the wall !!!
Donald J. Trump... I don’t understand the mentality in Washington ....the people of Capital Hill often choose party over people... they obstruct good things for America simply because the other party has their candidate in the White House or a majority in Congress... it all about power to them... drain the swamp Mr President... we want successors in Washington more concerned about the good of America over their political beliefs... often times when we replace someone in Washington... that person is also well indoctrinated in his or her view of legalism whether it be to the right or left...
Get the federal employees back to work and paid .... we will get the barrier for sure along with DACA plan and all other immigration
You are not working together with anyone on anything.
BUILD THAT WALL Mr. President, who cares what the DemonCratz think or want. You have kept all your other Campaign Promises thus far and We the People deserve Protection for our Country. Sir Thank You for Leading this Country. No telling what HildaBeast would have done to America Only GOD knows and He gave America Trump!
No they don’t you do !! All we want to impeach you
All Americans want border security. Stop lying !!  A wall stops animals not people.   Open the government and start compromising.
Reggie James Your facts are swayed when it comes to the orange monster!!.
That much money can go on more important things.
America's Southern Defense Barrier!!! Build it!!!!
I'm a South African and I fully support President Donald J Trump he is the best President America has ever had in my opinion all he wants is for American to be safe and secure why is that so hard to comprehend MAGA VIVA PRESIDENT TRUMP don't settle get the money for the wall and build it majority Americans r 100%  with u
Stand Strong Mr President! America is behind you!
Democrats are ready to give away $25+ Billion in foreign aid but don't want to authorize $5 billion for America's border security. Tell Chuck and Nancy to end the #DemocratShutdown now!
President motherfucka individual 1 this is just another one of your distractions by the way Robert Mueller says hi #TrumpResign #ImpeachThatMotherfucka
You have my respect, Mr. President, working hard for America, it's great again. I love this country. 🇧🇷❤🇺🇸
I don't know if you remember or not,  but you did a big tax cut and no way to pay for a wall.  You probably should have built it first.  Then the tax cut
Joel 2:20 But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things.
All Americans want border security. Stop lying !!  A wall stops animals not people.   Open the government and start compromising.
Joel 2:20 But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea, and his stink shall come up, and his ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great things.
Stand firm President Trump, most Americans are behind you!❤️🇺🇲️
Lynette Kilgore Strohbehn hello dear h r u 😍
I don't know if you remember or not,  but you did a big tax cut and no way to pay for a wall.  You probably should have built it first.  Then the tax cut
Unfortunately the answer is obvious.
You in acting a state of emergency and telling dems to pound sand
Time is now ! Stop , people coming into America , illegal ! Growing up in California , all people were equal , always ! Now illegal , have different laws , hiding in sanctuary city’s ! So so disappointed , disgraceful ! A group of people , together in political group , Democratic  group ! Americans say no more , entry to America without legal , no over stay visa ,  Thankful everyday , President Trump is strong leader to stand firm against , this group of democratic people 🙏❤️🇺🇸💫
Secure the border mr president where with ya
How about working together?  As soon as that check from Mexico clears.
Didn't you promise that mexico was going to pay for it? Is that what you mean?
There is no national emergency along the southern border. Both DHS and US State Department disputes your facts. Delusional.
Lynette Kilgore Strohbehn hello dear h r u 😍
There is no national emergency along the southern border. Both DHS and US State Department disputes your facts. Delusional.
Stopping you, being offensive to half their fellow Americans,  spouting hateful foul comments, demeaning our government, and that is exactly it
Cathy Lovelace Really, This wall will save people, sadly in life maybe even you😄
Didn't you promise that mexico was going to pay for it? Is that what you mean?
Cathy Lovelace Really, This wall will save people, sadly in life maybe even you😄
How can these libtards go on national tv..and lie..they offer no facts..no numbers..none!! Then they call our president a liar.. he is inducing panic and manufacturing   fear...??? How are they allowed to just flat out lie like that to the people!!!??
Joe, can you please do something about the people you know who voted for Clinton / Obama? (Such as friends, family members, coworkers, neighbors, etc) Please make sure they do not screw up again and support another communist Democrat again.
Edward Dennis Toppe . Everyone that I know has voted for trump
Only reason Obama won..was because he ran against two morons. And their true colors have  been seen
Do more please....the friendly waitress at your local restaurant for example...make sure she does not vote Democrat....what about your neighbors, the mailman who comes to your home every day, etc.
Stopping you, being offensive to half their fellow Americans,  spouting hateful foul comments, demeaning our government, and that is exactly it
From Egypt I say..build the wall mr president Trump...wish we in Egypt had enough money to build a similar wall in the Sinai border to keep the terrorist Hamas moslem brotherhood out of our country.
Stop dividing the country. Start being a leader. Start working on real policies that fix the real issues. Please. Democrats aren’t the problem. This derisiveness, us versus them, pitting each other against each other is the problem. You were elected to serve ALL of the people of this nation. Not just the ones who yell the loudest.
What is wrong with them?  They dont care about us, that's for sure!  Thank you President Trump for caring!!!
CBS Nightly News sucks cheesy balls.
Your a doer DJT Washington isn't used to that ! Good job Mr President ! G-d bless you and your's! 👆🇺🇸🇮🇱☝
Agreed don’t fold mr trump we need the wall
This is about 1 thing and 1 thing only...stopping Trump from getting another win and securing his base for 2020.  They are playing football with the security of our nation!  Despicable
Do more please....the friendly waitress at your local restaurant for example...make sure she does not vote Democrat....what about your neighbors, the mailman who comes to your home every day, etc.
GOD  ALMIGHTY  is  with  HIS  anointing  President  Trump  bur  satan / lucifer  is  with  his  favors  the  demoncrats.
Americans overwhelmingly know you’re a fake
Diane Dodge honey I will and YOU are in a minority.  Check the polls
GOD  ALMIGHTY  is  with  HIS  anointing  President  Trump  bur  satan / lucifer  is  with  his  favors  the  demoncrats.
Amen....we want that border.  Democrat's are misleading you to believe that we don't want a wall.  WE WANT THAT WALL, NOW!!
Build the Wall.......to hell with Polosi and Shumer........
#buildthewall I support you Mr President
What's more important,  your lite tantrum or opening the government
Build the wall Mr president! We still got your back out here! 🇺🇸
we all know the answer to this 1 its a no brainer really they want to stop you :/ they would <3 open borders not border security
To the Federal Employees that are furloughed — Welcome to the real world!  Been working in industry as a mechanical engineer since 1979. Myself and damn few of my peers have a pension or are even eligible for one.  The smart ones have IRA’s, 401K’s and personal investments we have sacrificed to make.   We have been furloughed, laid off and terminated due to poor business decisions, smart business decisions, Federal Reserve policies, Federal and State rules, regulations or legislation.  We’ve been done in by simple economic downturn cycles.  Most of the people I know my age of 55+ or older are working simply for health insurance until Medicare Kicks in.  Most of us have reached the point where we would really rather be doing something else to make ends meet but we need health insurance.  I’ll be working for health insurance until I’m 67 to keep my wife covered until Medicare.  Oh you think universal health care is the solution? Pass it and see how fast my taxable income heads down.   Those of us that have chosen the management or self employment route have worked long unpaid hours, days, weeks, months.  So stop whining, we’ve been there multiple times before, we’ve started over multiple times.  Life happens and there are no guarantees in life, even though the Federal employees I currently work with seem to think there are, there really aren’t.  Thing is I have yet to miss a government minion.  So keep her shutdown and kick some ass tonight President Trump.
Diane Dodge honey I will and YOU are in a minority.  Check the polls
Apowerfulmen,change the world forever
Declaring a state of emergency at our borders will free up the money to build the wall. LET'S GO!
The only thing important to DemTerrorists, is the destruction of our way of life, Christianity, and our constitution.
What promises have you filled what have you done for us nothing !!!! But devide us hold our people hostage
I back trump. But not happy with asking us to pay for the wall when his whole platform was that Mexico was paying.
What if I tell you, you can have border security without a wall???? Mind blown!!!!
We will back your play Mr. President!
After 9/11, we all said we would Never Forget!  Well, I think too many have forgotten.
hi Mr. President, ask Nancy and Chuckie to join you at the border Thrusday when you go. When was the last time they went there to see for themselves first hand.  Stay strong,sir. God Bless. fr. sue
Would be great if could be on a voting ballot in each state, just like an election.
To the Federal Employees that are furloughed — Welcome to the real world!  Been working in industry as a mechanical engineer since 1979. Myself and damn few of my peers have a pension or are even eligible for one.  The smart ones have IRA’s, 401K’s and personal investments we have sacrificed to make.   We have been furloughed, laid off and terminated due to poor business decisions, smart business decisions, Federal Reserve policies, Federal and State rules, regulations or legislation.  We’ve been done in by simple economic downturn cycles.  Most of the people I know my age of 55+ or older are working simply for health insurance until Medicare Kicks in.  Most of us have reached the point where we would really rather be doing something else to make ends meet but we need health insurance.  I’ll be working for health insurance until I’m 67 to keep my wife covered until Medicare.  Oh you think universal health care is the solution? Pass it and see how fast my taxable income heads down.   Those of us that have chosen the management or self employment route have worked long unpaid hours, days, weeks, months.  So stop whining, we’ve been there multiple times before, we’ve started over multiple times.  Life happens and there are no guarantees in life, even though the Federal employees I currently work with seem to think there are, there really aren’t.  Thing is I have yet to miss a government minion.  So keep her shutdown and kick some ass tonight President Trump.
Great Job tonight Mr President! Stay Strong on Securing our borders
Build the wall!  Stand firm Mr President!  MAGA
Build it of American steel then solar/electrify it
Don’t the Democrats have any agendas that they can be working on?  What about the roads in Cleveland and Political Finacial waste on every level?
Stay strong, never give up! Build those walls!
Secure our borders but also get people back to work
Stopping you from fulfilling the promises.
we want you to be fiscally responsible act presidential and stop demonizing those who are not your base.... stop selling our lands, stop screwing up our environment, create green jobs, and stop lying
Well of course, if Fox News said it, I'm in. Psych.
Please fulfill your promise. MAKE MEXICO PAY FOR THE WALL !
Would be great if could be on a voting ballot in each state, just like an election.
It’s crazy that an entire political party is arguing AGAINST safety for the American People! 🤨 Unreal.
I fully support Border Security BUT we US CITIZENS would also like to be able to get back to work and get PAID! Penalizing Government workers shouldn’t go hand in hand with getting border security. Also let me say while yes we typically get backpay once we are allowed to go back to work it’s not 100% guaranteed so this is not a “paid vacation” nor do our creditors care that we are furloughed and may quite possibly fall behind on our payments. Savings for some but not all may carry us over but unfortunately not everyone has that ability financially.
They want to stop you at all costs. Damn the consequences. Build that wall sir!
Stay strong President Trump! #MAGA Secure our borders...build the wall!
Need the wall to facilitate SAFTY for our citizens
So obvious, Schumer and Pelosi, have their own agendas.  They are vindictive, and will go against anything President Trump wants to accomplish.  Build the wall!
So no wall I guess they can't stop when he ups the security.
What do conservatives say about the wall? https://medium.com/@vickyalvearshecter/what-happened-when-a-trump-supporter-challenged-me-about-the-wall-e54e86a5edd1
You promised the Mexicans were going to pay!
Please fulfill your promise. MAKE MEXICO PAY FOR THE WALL !
$5,700,000,000 for the wall ÷ 327,160,000 Adults in the U.S.A  = $17.42 per adult.  Democrats are seriously upset over this?
Well, tRump is right about running the country like his businesses: it's failing, shut down and none of his employees are being paid.
Thank you mr. President for caring about Americans first.
They don’t give a crap about Americans if they cared they give their paychecks to veterans like you GIve your paycheck to the veterans and other groups in the countries that need it!
PLEASE MR PRESIDENT...,,FIND A WAY TO SAVE US FTOM THOSE 2 INSUFFERABLE TOOLS!
Stand strong Mr President, and secure our boarder.
Your promise was Mexico (not America) pays for wall.
Go President Trump, GO.  We love you.  You are strong, you love WE THE PEOPLE, you love and protect us and our soldiers, etc. etc.  We stand behind you and you will be in office for another term.  God Bless You.
You promised the Mexicans were going to pay!
" I will own this shut down" "Mexico will pay for the wall" "I'm bringing our troops home" " our troops will get a 10% pay raise"When will the lies end?
President Trump, we are proud of what you are doing.  Don't quit!  The media will never tell the truth but you do!  Thank you!
Listen to flip flop Chuck  https://www.facebook.com/PatriotRichardGarcia/videos/288855465313119/
The Dems..  1. Wish to abolish ICE; 2. Rejected Kate's law; 3. Run 'Sanctuary' cities; 4. Rejected Criminal Gang Removal Act; 5. Reject a Border Wall....  Yet, most Dems live in walled properties which ordinary Americans do not.
Allowing the killing of unborn babies and impeaching the President are the two top chores on their list.  Working FOR Americans is not even in the top 20..😡
It's not about you fulfilling any promise, they want their voter base flooding the country.
Omfg wall is not gonna solve anything. Here tackle two birds with one stone.  Hire more foot patrol and use modern technology like drones and pilots to man them omfg.....job creation and border security all in one........
Declare national security and build the wall before government restart.
Keep up the hard fight President Trump ... best President ever 🇺🇸
Build the wall President Trump!!  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Keep up the hard fight President Trump ... best President ever 🇺🇸
American's want Hillary in prison and the US to stop playing sugar-daddy to every shyster country on the planet. But none of that seems to be happening.  PS: they also want the goddamn swamp drained, not re-arranged.
Declare national security and build the wall before government restart.
American's want Hillary in prison and the US to stop playing sugar-daddy to every shyster country on the planet. But none of that seems to be happening.  PS: they also want the goddamn swamp drained, not re-arranged.
What are you all so scared of ? Waist of money, waist of time. Irrational fear!
Stephanie Collarile what a brain-dead moron what are we so afraid of if you weren't an uninformed liberal idiot you would know the answer to that
90% of the deadly fentanyl laced heroin comes over the southern border you dumped with how about that for starters
David Criola but it's proven that it comes through ports of entry .. not people walking across the boarder illegally . Irrational fear, backed by far from the truth statement .
Nancy Pelosis number 202-225-4965 Chuck Schumer’s number 202-224-7433 Be polite but EVERYONE call and get your family and friends to call and demand funding for the wall! Crash the phone lines until they understand what the American People Want!!!
Do what is needed.  I also keep seeing posts about you planning on,getting rid of the Wildlife , Do you even know how important Wolves ARE to our Eco Systems❓ Have you even done a study of wildlife in Yellowstone before the Wolves were removed & what happened after they were put back into our wildlife ❓❓ Please do some research , some homework before any unnecessary plans are made to remove what belongs!! Please LOOK UP ~ CENTER FOR  BIOLOGICAL DIVERSITY. Make the right decisions on an Education about Wolves first _ their role in Nature. Thank you from Oklahoma Be Educated on,any decisions
Ha Ha ha ha... Trump would be funny if he weren't so pathetic
Build a bunch of Army forts along the border and let the military do the surveillance
I want immigration reform more than a wall.  I support President Trump but think if the immigration process was run more efficiently, less people would come in illegally.  I know someone personally who is married to a man from Mexico.  She has been for 5 years.  They cannot live together because after over $20,000 and stacks of paperwork, he is still in Mexico due to a filing error that was not their fault.  She has her PhD and still cannot seem to get through all of the red tape.  He is trying to do the right thing but red tape is making it extremely difficult.  Fix the problems with the process first, please.  Families are suffering.
Facts that scare trolls... https://www.whitehouse.gov/trump-administration-accomplishments/
"Build the wall", "God bless trump", "praise trump" ha ha, geez, all Russian bots, fake accounts, ha ha
How much does it cost not to have a wall? There is one!
David Criola but it's proven that it comes through ports of entry .. not people walking across the boarder illegally . Irrational fear, backed by far from the truth statement .
Please Mr President, show Mrs May how to honour and love her country 🇬🇧 as much as you honour and love yours 🇺🇸. I love my country 🇬🇧 yet she is about to let the ‘EU wolves’ continue to control and dominate it.
I heard antifa has been in Mexico coaching those people what to say and they have been bulling the natives. Oh and there are antifa lawyers to
The American citizens have to be the number one priority. Build the wall!!!!
Lower the food stamp amount given to all southern border illegal and Medicaid
I think we all know the answer.
Most communities in the southern states are gated communities at least for upper middle class. So what is the big deal with it at the southern border
President Mr. Donald Trump is not saying that you don't come to USA.He is saying that come legally with documents.His point is an extremely correct that human trafficking, child abuse and drug dealings are happening through open border.people should go to LA and should visit million homeless people there.I request to Mr. Trump that he must revoke country quota based green card and give green card to people who are talented, educated, can take care themselves and are in Q for employment based green card for long time.Poor should also allow to come through green card.
Trump 2020. Declare National Emergency. Build the wall.
How much does it cost not to have a wall? There is one!
Great speech!  I would have been happier with you announcing that you were going to reopen the government and declaring an emergency and take the money to build the wall!  Don't give in.
Stopping You which makes them an Enemy to us Americans! Dems are getting scarier by the day!
Donald, I am a normal every day American, trian me to help protect our border until our wall is built. I will stand there proudly protecting my children's future.
Then go above them..build that wall..they went above the people and hid it
No wall. Border security, yes.Get it through your head.
More material for SNL.  Normally, that would be a good thing.
fox news is the biggest inaccurate news............
Father God, have Your way.  You bless those who bless Israel.  Stand in the path and stop this attack on the sovereignty of the USA and ISRAEL!  TY, LORD GOD ALMIGHTY, MAKER OF HEAVEN AND EARTH.
Trump 2020. Declare National Emergency. Build the wall.
Father God, have Your way.  You bless those who bless Israel.  Stand in the path and stop this attack on the sovereignty of the USA and ISRAEL!  TY, LORD GOD ALMIGHTY, MAKER OF HEAVEN AND EARTH.
Your promise was that mexico was gonna pay for it
https://youtu.be/FmF6iPbRvvE  3 times 1 rally
fox news is the biggest inaccurate news............
No one is responsible for this shut down by President Trump he is on tape saying that he would take the responsibility what else do you need as proof that this man is a jack ass
We want border security, but that doesn't mean we want a "wall". We are not East Berlin.
Who's going to pay for the wall ? Everybody repeat it again ,How did it go ? ...ya
if it’s fox news it’s a lie even true things once reported by fox news become lies
Even the ultra conservative Cato Institute thinks the wall is a taxpayer scam.  The wall will not stop drugs per their study.   https://www.cato.org/publications/commentary/why-wall-wont-work
Dont care about the haters they are very critical to alot of things. You are and will be the most dedicated person to do good for your country and that's the bottom line. 🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂🙂
I love and support my President ! Trump2020
https://youtu.be/FmF6iPbRvvE  3 times 1 rally
Stand strong President Trump! Build the wall! We stand with you!!!! Don’t back down!!! It will protect people on both sides! We thank you for all your doing for our country! ❤️ MAGA 🇺🇸
54% of americans are telling you no to the wall
Mr. President, what’s important for Democrats is to take revenge for crooked Hillary’s loss in the election.
You are exactly right!  Why would they not want a wall built???  Theres no other reason!!  You are right!! That is the only reason they refuse to pass the Wall. They wanted it before when a democratic president was in office. But now that a Republican is in they won’t agree! Thank you for standing FIRM!  So Thankful for you and what you are doing for our country! Keep up the good work and don’t back down to them !
I am so tired of people talking bad about you. What gives Bernie Sanders the right to call u a liar. I love having u as our President and will be glad when everyone starts showing u respect.
Dont give in to the devil. Stand your ground please
Yes it’s one of the reasons there isn’t a Democrat President
Yes Americans want a Border Wall,   but the unAmericas so called DEMOCRATS  don't.   So PLEASE Build the Wall Mr. PRESIDENT TRUMP for us Americas that Respect YOU !!
Yes sir, "we the people" WANT THE WALL!! Stand firm, you are the President of the people! Send all of the Natinal guard down there and get it done!💪😎
I love and support my President ! Trump2020
You have many supporters here that are on your side. Build the wall President Trump. Don't give up on your promises.
Wonder why the Networks are so keen not to televise your wall speech? To much truth in one spot?
https://www.naturalnews.com/2019-01-08-it-begins-president-trump-likely-to-declare-national-emergency-at-9pm-today.html  Go President Trump!
Seems to be their focus as opposed to doing the job they were hired to do.
Your promise was to have Mexico pay for this damn wall. You yourself are failing on your promise. Your pride is failing the people who work for you.
Build the wall .. this is probably the least amount of money we have ever fought over for that dose good
Americans like my wife (a federal employee for over 20 years) want to go back to work! But your childish behavior and continued shutdown of the government is preventing her from doing that.  Reopen the government and fight for your damn wall on your own dime.  #trumpshutdown
Mr. Trump don’t give in to the democrats,built that wall. You gave a great speech today. You presented plenty of examples as to why we need the wall.  Just the fact that Americans are dying in the hands of illegals which it shouldn’t happen, is good enough for me. build that wall.
Drones will just fly over wall with you know what!
Maybe you can stop their pay and pay everyone else so we don’t lose everything we have worked so hard for!! I bet they would change their mind real quick like!!! I voted for you and support you 100%!! Please take their paycheck and not ours!!! Go Trump!!!
Yes sir, "we the people" WANT THE WALL!! Stand firm, you are the President of the people! Send all of the Natinal guard down there and get it done!💪😎
Sadly it's to see you fail Mr President..
Just out of curiosity, will the wall cover both the southern and the northern borders or is Canada fine with no wall?
More important to Dems that you don’t succeed than our national security.
100% support our president on the wall and he has my support in 2020 keep America Great
Cut  the  cost,,  have  inmates  do  some  of  the  work,,
Border security is of the utmost importance.
Stopping you from succeeding at anything is their priority. They are not effective, they can't get anything worth while accomplished and they are angry and jealous. They do not want you to be the one that goes down in history for making this happen.
President Trump don't give in to them the Democrats have gone to far we need the wall. Most of my friends and others agree it is time to stand up to these Democrats.
Grandma Nancy is worth $200 million you think she will care if you stop her pay check.  It won’t hurt her or a lot of the upper Senate people Chucky May mind as he is only worth $900,000 but still can pay his bills
America please wake up don't build a wall... Build two of the fuckers and protect what's yours much love from the UK
Maybe you can stop their pay and pay everyone else so we don’t lose everything we have worked so hard for!! I bet they would change their mind real quick like!!! I voted for you and support you 100%!! Please take their paycheck and not ours!!! Go Trump!!!
What’s more important to Trump? Building a wall or securing the border and running a country?
Build it now and start deportations in mass by bus, train, plane, boat, by mule or what ever way they can be carried back.
Stopping you POTUS is their ONLY agenda. Tell the world ALL of their dirty little secrets!
We’ve got your back, Mr. President!
That's a given...take him out-no matter the cost.
Build the wall.  Crisis over. Easy. Nancy you get it?  Chunky ???
Every thing needs an upgrade even Nancy's  plastic surgeon knows that
I don't care if they never restart the government...bunch of democratic communist.....get out... Trump build that wall  Build that WALL TRUMP BUILD THAT DAMN WALL
I know, right?  Democrats need to show up and grow up. Keep the pressure on. Its a deep wound for them.
America please wake up don't build a wall... Build two of the fuckers and protect what's yours much love from the UK
I know, right?  Democrats need to show up and grow up. Keep the pressure on. Its a deep wound for them.
Let's have an official special issue vote for the border wall at local election sites.  Only those who can prove they were born in the U.S., or are legal citizens may vote.  No fake polls or rigged election.  No mail in ballots, or dead people voting.  Let's find out how many Americans support our President and really want this southern border barrier built.  If the public says to fund it, then the Congress MUST fund it.  My guess is that at least 3/4 of the whole population want the wall built.  Democrats are afraid of the truth!
James Jerome   Apparently, you're getting your numbers from the same place Trump is, OUT YOUR ASS!
James Jerome the only ones that got caught rigging elections were rep in the carolina election
Tom Caskey Awww - did I trigger a liberal who slaps back with a huge informal fallacy.  I didn't provide any "numbers" as facts.  I said, "my guess" which is clearly an opinion.  I proposed a vote be taken to find out how many people really support the wall.  You must be one of those Democrats who are afraid of the truth.  You talk loudest, and think that means you are in the majority.  😆😅😂🤣
Larry Favre - I didn't mention rigged elections to point fingers, or go off on a red herring tangent.  There has been plenty of evidence of elections being "rigged" across the country, and likely even more that has gone undetected.  That was not the point of my proposal.  ASK THE AMERICAN PUBLIC directly, and stop relying on whether the President, or Congress thinks it is a good idea.  After all, they ALL work for us - - so IF the majority actually want the wall, then the debate would be over, and they should fund it.  IF the majority does not want the wall, then those who do can find ways to fund it without Congress.  Either way, crossing the border must be done legally, so who is in favor of enforcing our laws on entering the United States?  Let's not be afraid of the truth!
I don't care if they never restart the government...bunch of democratic communist.....get out... Trump build that wall  Build that WALL TRUMP BUILD THAT DAMN WALL
Larry Favre - I didn't mention rigged elections to point fingers, or go off on a red herring tangent.  There has been plenty of evidence of elections being "rigged" across the country, and likely even more that has gone undetected.  That was not the point of my proposal.  ASK THE AMERICAN PUBLIC directly, and stop relying on whether the President, or Congress thinks it is a good idea.  After all, they ALL work for us - - so IF the majority actually want the wall, then the debate would be over, and they should fund it.  IF the majority does not want the wall, then those who do can find ways to fund it without Congress.  Either way, crossing the border must be done legally, so who is in favor of enforcing our laws on entering the United States?  Let's not be afraid of the truth!
Divisive rhetoric!  Trump!  Get the money by ending the TSA.  Although I do love the fact the the Fed and IRS are closed right now so they can’t keep raping Americans!
Audit the feds now
Tom Caskey Awww - did I trigger a liberal who slaps back with a huge informal fallacy.  I didn't provide any "numbers" as facts.  I said, "my guess" which is clearly an opinion.  I proposed a vote be taken to find out how many people really support the wall.  You must be one of those Democrats who are afraid of the truth.  You talk loudest, and think that means you are in the majority.  😆😅😂🤣
Just bypass these crooks. Violating oaths of office. Build the wall.
1) Filling there bank accounts  2) Stopping Trump 3) Ruin America
Well wasn't part of the promise Mexico would pay?
What's that baaa noise I hear? All the  brainless Trump supporters following him like sheep 😂😂🐑🐑
D.C. (both parties) want to shut down any and everything an 'outsider' does so noone with the money to run for pres ever tries again.  Not part of the club .  Trump was a Democrat before he ran for pres...remember that.
Don't waste anymore time with these obstructionists. They only want power & airtime oh wait, that's all politicians. Somebody just do something. This is getting very old.
Audit the feds now
Stand your Ground ! Keep America safe Mr. President 🇺🇸
Stopping you! With hopes you won’t run in 2020.
Hold the line Mr. President!  The American people have faith in you!
Why can't 45 compromise and get the government employees back to work and get a portion of the 5.7 billion....break it down into getting part of the wall started  and more boots on the ground. Use more technology for surveillance etc. The Mexican government need to crack down on the people who are growing crops and making heroin. The Mexican govt. did virtually nothing to stop the caravan. As a matter of fact, they assisted them.
I know I want border security   Stay strong Mr President
Stopping you from fulfilling a promise
They could care less about our country,  if  you told them you were against the wall they would of wanted a golden wall.  Build that wall President Trump,  the AMERICANS will appreciate it.
Democrats care about illegals more then citizens. Truth.
Hold your ground Mr. President, let the shutdown in place until you get every last cent of the proposed 5.7 billion you requested.  The democratic learches have sucked enough blood out of the American taxpayer for nothing projects during the Obama administration, and its time for us to do the right thing.  BUILD THE BARRIER.
WE THE PEOPLE WANT THE WALL....we stand behide you ALL the way!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  We are all with you Mr. President 100%
Don't waste anymore time with these obstructionists. They only want power & airtime oh wait, that's all politicians. Somebody just do something. This is getting very old.
The amazing thing is that they will try to stop you until 2025 just so they can be the ones to build the wall.  Their foolishness is illuminated for all to see.
Per an IG audit,  Accenture Federal Services was paid by CBP $13.6 million of a $297 million contract to recruit and hire 7500 applicants.  They hired 2.  Not to mention, the parent company is Accenture incorporated in Dublin Ireland.  So taxpayer money is going to a contractor who did not live up to the terms of the contract and is not even owned by an American company.  How is this an America first policy?
I'm fairly certain he keeps talking about this wall because it's one of the only words he and his FOLLOWERS know how to spell without any help.....
Still waiting for that "better insurance coverage for less money" the "great negotiator" PROMISED during the campaign..... I guess Mexico is paying for that too
Why without illegal votes how would the Democrats ever win elections!????? There are only so many deceased votes one can win without raising eyebrows!! Build the damn wall please
please keep meetings with Nancy & Chuck on camera so they show there true evil colors
I would share my plan with you to fix the government, but you don't pay me enough.
Just A few weeks ago democrats and the liberal news were quoted saying there was a crisis at the border when the young girl died... today they say it's a made up crisis... hmmm...I guess they forgot who made it up.... maybe they should go on air and tell everyone they lied instead of saying Trump is lying about it... he's just agreeing with them and trying to solve the problem. Funny how short their memories are when they want to lie about things.
The time is now. Do not fumble the ball. It is on 10 yard line and ready to be thrown into the end zone. Loyalty.
WE THE PEOPLE WANT THE WALL....we stand behide you ALL the way!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  We are all with you Mr. President 100%
The time is now. Do not fumble the ball. It is on 10 yard line and ready to be thrown into the end zone. Loyalty.
Are you that friggin scared?  You really believe this crap he babbles on about. Did you graduate?  Can you read?  He can barely read his lines  talks likes a 5 yr old.
Carol Osborn Can you spell/grammar? Did you graduate?
Carol Osborn Nope, just responding to idiots.
Just A few weeks ago democrats and the liberal news were quoted saying there was a crisis at the border when the young girl died... today they say it's a made up crisis... hmmm...I guess they forgot who made it up.... maybe they should go on air and tell everyone they lied instead of saying Trump is lying about it... he's just agreeing with them and trying to solve the problem. Funny how short their memories are when they want to lie about things.
Do what ever it takes, but please get it done.
huge difference between boarder security and a wall...
Yes we do!!!! Thank you for protecting us!!!! Praying for you Mr. President, always.
The border wall is a good start let alone 11 million illegal immigrants using falsified Social Security numbers which is a felon to u.s. citizens
Give it to God. If it’s Gods will for the wall to be built it will. God is more powerful than anyone or anything.  Matthew 19:26 But Jesus beheld them, and said unto them, With men this is impossible; but with God all things are possible. Amen
Congress wants to spend $55 billion on foreign aid but refuses to spend $5.4 billion on border security. Let that sink in real good.
I saw a Meme that said Build the WALL on the Mexico side and call it Foreign Aid ..Good Idea <3
Build the wall, make sure it's got electricity, make a moat filled with crocodiles... lol they all seem to forget Obama shut down the government to push his bs Obamacare..
Carol Osborn Nope, just responding to idiots.
Build the wall, make sure it's got electricity, make a moat filled with crocodiles... lol they all seem to forget Obama shut down the government to push his bs Obamacare..
The promise was , Mexico is gonna pay for it
Bullshit
Wish it had been longer and that some of the border security people had talked about the dangers they face every day and what t's like at the border.  Trump did a good job tho.  That wall must be built.
Congress works for their district. Not all districts want the wall. They are doing their jobs. You just dont agree with their sides. But the president is not doing his job by putting a federal freeze.
You promised to make Mexico pay, not us...
No, we don't. We want you out of office!
We are with you President Trump.
They are just afraid their future voters won't be able to sneak into the US..
Your kind calling them democrats, Mr. President I call them DEMOBRATS.
Your promise wasn't we'd pay for it.
I’m in for the original plan, Mexico writes the check, then we build.
Trump could build cities on the moon and the Democrats would still only be there to  say no
Bullshit
Trump could build cities on the moon and the Democrats would still only be there to  say no
I'm truly sick of hearing about it. Live up to your word...😎
Give him a chance there friend!
Andrew Whitaker he's fighting the Dems man.
I’m in for the original plan, Mexico writes the check, then we build.
Secure the border please, sir 🚂🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
They hate Trump so much that they oppose anything he tries to do even when they know it's a good thing to do. If Obama or Hilary wanted a wall, they and all the Americans on the same bandwagon would agree.
You said Mexico would pay, not us! Plus you’re making the very people that voted for you, believed and supported you, pay for the wall! Not to mention the people that believed in and voted for you are going to lose their homes, the lives they built, and their families just so you can get your way over empty promises!
What about the promise that Mexico was paying? Isn't that part of the promise you made? Lol
call Pelosi @ 202-225-4965 & Schumer @ 202-224-7433. blow up their answering service demanding the wall.
Your promise was Mexico was paying for the wall....ah hem.
Stay strong! We support making America safe!
I wander the same thing but also would like to know okay say you get your wall then then are not re-elected and the next president says "No Wall' then what?
I'm pretty sure a highly raised go fund me reflects that...
Chuck Ellis. We're all fighting the Dems
Past presidents and the border wall   http://www.msnbc.com/rachel-maddow-show/latest-trump-lie-discredited-several-former-us-presidents
BOTH. Stopping you from fulfilling your promise AND providing funding for BETTER methods to secure the border.
I wish there was a “pants on fire” emoji.
Stopping you is all they seem to care about. Let the facts put the American people at ease. The dumb media, which I now call, Paid Actors Of TV seem to leave out pertinent information when reporting what’s going on in the world. Someone needs to step in and fine then for everything they say that is inaccurate. When they advertise that people won’t get their income taxes and food stamps, they need to share ALL of the information. Is it possible? Sure, but not likely.
Yeah.. we want border security. Not a wall.
Unfortunately, the Pelosi/Schumer "Illegals First" campaign cares less about United States citizens!!  BUILD THAT WALL Mr. President!!
You don't want security at the border, you want a monument with your name on it. That's all you've ever wanted, and when you asked for Rushmore the country told you to go sh*t in your hat. Well, you can go get ready for round 2.
Americans ? Who cares about Americans ? 😭😭😭
I'm pretty sure a highly raised go fund me reflects that...
the don proving he does;t care about the security of the u.s , do you really think your fooling us lmao
Democrats Need The Votes !!!! BUILD THE WALL !!!!!!
Or are you keeping all of the money?
KARMA in time will get them. Mr. President you are still a winner. They are the losers. Big time.
So sad! I am embarrassed for living in the State of California. We elect the worst politicians. Please forgive Pelosi Mr. President Donald J. Trump-as Jesus said on the cross, "Father, forgive them for they no not what they do." Hang Strong President Donald J. Trump!!
I'm not sure a wall is the answer. Stop all the free stuff and that would stop a lot. Americans are struggling. We can't keep supporting people coming in
Secure our borders!!!! Keep America safe.
The Democrats want open borders so they can get all the illegals’ votes so they can stay in power forever!!!!
Reopen the government and fund Fema you ass
Americans ? Who cares about Americans ? 😭😭😭
Reopen the government and fund Fema you ass
Cruz and Norris "El Chapo Act" sounds like a good place for the money, Mr. President..✌️🇺🇸️
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
The Democrats want open borders so they can get all the illegals’ votes so they can stay in power forever!!!!
So is the Canadian border next?  Walls don’t stop anything.
sorry, i meant to say, WALL, please.
Meanwhile, the rest of the World watches the collapse of a once admired country...It will take a long time to recover.
people want rule of law, not dimplomatic immunity for whoever wanders in...
Let the people vote, we want the wall!!
legalize cannabis it will build whatever you want from the profits!!  lol
Yes We DO want Border security!!
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
Yes We DO want Border security!!
come on Democrat impeach that son-of-a-b****
legalize cannabis it will build whatever you want from the profits!!  lol
Love our president! Trump I know you will stand your ground! After all you are a business man not a politician ! Thank god your not. Build the wall
Senators shouldn't get payed until this problem is solved period
You just want another structure to put your name on..
Build the WALL  forget schumer and Pelosi, they're not true Americans
Your promise was Mexico would fund a border wall. Asking American tax payers to fund it is NOT fulfilling your promise.
Please don’t hold your breath for the wall you will suffocate nana Pelosi will not allow it to be built
That is what it is all about what you want your ego cannot stand to be told no
how about a Land Mine Field then people will think twice before crossing illegaly either way over the border
Payo Trevino are you really from america??you sound like an Arab
how about a Land Mine Field then people will think twice before crossing illegaly either way over the border
That is what it is all about what you want your ego cannot stand to be told no
Sadly they care more about trying to take you down
Keep it shutdown, until they pull their heads out!
Please ask Congress to waive their monthly salaries for those that depend on their federal paycheck and support!!!
They just want to stay in power
There is probably 2 guns in every house in America and you are telling me American. Are still frightened of the boogeyman
Matthew 25 31“When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his glorious throne. 32.All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33.He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34.“Then the King will say to those on his right, ‘Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35.For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36.I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.’ 37.“Then the righteous will answer him, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38.When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39.When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?’ 40.“The King will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers and sisters of mine, you did for me.’ 41.“Then he will say to those on his left, ‘Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42.For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43.I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.’ 44.“They also will answer, ‘Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?’ 45.“He will reply, ‘Truly I tell you, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.’ 46.“Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life.”
Duh, obviously stopping you even if it destroys the country.
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
Duh, obviously stopping you even if it destroys the country.
Patricia Luippold what the F are you talking yes a Trump Supporters who believe all the Trump's lies news flash what the Hell about the Canadian border
Arnold Bowie Jr. You watching too much CNN you're another one that has a half a brain so left side
You can see where their importance lies and I support building the wall!
Arnold Bowie Jr. You watching too much CNN you're another one that has a half a brain so left side
Hey, Mr. President.  You said Mexico was going to pay for this wall.  Could you explain please?
Shannon Laird they could easily use the 14 billion they confiscated from El Chapo but the corrupt Democrats want to keep that to maybe give it to Saudi Arabia
Robert Day good answer. I can live with that. Totally forgot about the Ted Cruz ace in the hole. Thank you.
Patricia Luippold what the F are you talking yes a Trump Supporters who believe all the Trump's lies news flash what the Hell about the Canadian border
Robert Day good answer. I can live with that. Totally forgot about the Ted Cruz ace in the hole. Thank you.
Sonny Kohlmetz "thank you for not being a liar" 😆, 😆, 😆,  Are you FREAKING SERIOUS???? this statement is ABSOLUTELY LAUGHABLE,,,, YOUR FUROR, IS THE GREATEST, BIGGEST, MOST PATHOLOGICAL, MOST DIABOLICAL LIAR THAT HAS EVER WALKED ON THE FACE OF THIS PLANET, THAT CONMAN CRIMINAL HAS TOLD OVER EIGHT THOUSAND EASILY PROVABLE LIES IN THE TWO YEARS THAT HES BEEN IN OFFICE,,, LOOK AT, AND RESEARCH THE FACTS, NOT FICTION,,HAVE YOU JUST CRAWLED OUT FROM UNDER A ROCK??? TO THANK THE BIGGEST LIAR ON THIS PLANET FOR NOT LYING, IS ABSOLUTELY PATHETIC AND HILARIOUS IF IT WASNT SOOOO SAD AND TRAGIC!!!
Shannon Laird they could easily use the 14 billion they confiscated from El Chapo but the corrupt Democrats want to keep that to maybe give it to Saudi Arabia
Call Schumer 202-224-6542 and Pelosi 202-225-4965 tomorrow and ask them to "FUND THE WALL" (Be POLITE)
God bless you, Mr. President! Thank you for stating the facts. Facts that Dumbocrats continue to ignore due to their lack of maturity and temper tantrums.
ridiculous....how can dems think the wall is a bad idea when they see what's on the other side?? Stand your ground, and as far as the shutdown goes...we have too many people working in government and cutting some will help with everyone's taxes....let it ride
The Democrats are Desperate to save their socialist communist agenda to take over the USA , and they know they must have open borders with all the world flooding in here to be their supporters and  to get enough votes to win an stay in Power which is all they care about an I REPEAT , WHICH IS ALL THEY CARE ABOUT.
Sure tells us just the kind of people they are !
We should probably try to strengthen America, before building the wall, people with money are so ass backwards.
Build the wall President Trump it will stop the drugs and protect Americans From illegals😍
Sonny Kohlmetz "thank you for not being a liar" 😆, 😆, 😆,  Are you FREAKING SERIOUS???? this statement is ABSOLUTELY LAUGHABLE,,,, YOUR FUROR, IS THE GREATEST, BIGGEST, MOST PATHOLOGICAL, MOST DIABOLICAL LIAR THAT HAS EVER WALKED ON THE FACE OF THIS PLANET, THAT CONMAN CRIMINAL HAS TOLD OVER EIGHT THOUSAND EASILY PROVABLE LIES IN THE TWO YEARS THAT HES BEEN IN OFFICE,,, LOOK AT, AND RESEARCH THE FACTS, NOT FICTION,,HAVE YOU JUST CRAWLED OUT FROM UNDER A ROCK??? TO THANK THE BIGGEST LIAR ON THIS PLANET FOR NOT LYING, IS ABSOLUTELY PATHETIC AND HILARIOUS IF IT WASNT SOOOO SAD AND TRAGIC!!!
The problem at the border has been in existence for decades they continue to kick the can down the road because it's a way to get the votes.  Thanks for taking on the problem, it's the politicians more than the border since everyone's in agreement that we need to have a barrier anyway.  The American people are with you!
Right it's totally the Democrats fault you're failing to fulfill your promise of making Mexico pay for the wall.
It was not even a month ago you said “I am proud to shut down the government for border security, Chuck. … I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I’m not going to blame you for it.”  Your promise was that we would not pay a dime for the wall.  Now you shut down the government, and are costing us more money every minute, to take our tax money for the wall we aren't supposed to have to pay for!
Agreed!!!!  Do What the people WANT!!!!!!
Build the wall!  Thank you President Trump for caring about us enough to protect us.  We Love you and your family. May the God of Israel always guide and protect you in Jesus Name.
Clean house it's about time don't people realize that this is what he has to do to get people to pay attention United we stand he is doing what's right they are not
Trump keeping our borders safe? Except maybe air traffice below. SAD
They want you to fail.  Stand Strong 💪 we in believe you.
There are many treasonist that need to be arrested I sure would like to see them gone
Build the wall President Trump it will stop the drugs and protect Americans From illegals😍
There are many treasonist that need to be arrested I sure would like to see them gone
Ron Michie why you lil durp durp durp dur dur duuuuurrrrrrrppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo ooooo aaaah aaaah here you go 🍌
They want you to fail.  Stand Strong 💪 we in believe you.
You see everything as a polarized problem, where there is one "right" and one "wrong".    That's so far from the truth on this issue
BUILD THE WALL !!!!  We have been donating to the Veteran's Fund The Wall- Go Fund Me..every little bit helps!!
They are digging their own grave and don't know it
Stay strong, President Trump!
Keep fighting the loonies Mr. Trump
That I recall, just before you shut down part of the government there was a bipartisan immigration bill presented to you that covers border security. This mess would have been resolved weeks ago with your signature. So tell me again how that is the Democrats' fault.
I do think if you aren’t paying the non essential workers congress the house the president none of you should be getting paid either
Yes if you are trying to full fill said promise on lies. Try integrity it does a body good.
See you just said it... Democrats have no issue with funding for border security but they aren't going to fund your wall. So you just agreed to the funds for border security.
Ron Michie why you lil durp durp durp dur dur duuuuurrrrrrrppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒ooooo ooooo aaaah aaaah here you go 🍌
See you just said it... Democrats have no issue with funding for border security but they aren't going to fund your wall. So you just agreed to the funds for border security.
Yes if you are trying to full fill said promise on lies. Try integrity it does a body good.
When Nancy made that comment about it’s a campaign promise as if campaign promises are just words that aren’t meant to be followed up on and not wanting to speak on camera,   well that to me said a lot about career politicians.
Build the Wall. How about having everyone donate and get a brick with their name on it. I would donate if I knew it was going for the wall.
You had a bipartisan bill that you were going to sign until you listened to Ann Coulter and russ l, the people in office were voted in by the people, those people who you are supposed top listen to not Ann Coulter who the hell is she anyway I didn't see her on any ballot
wish we had a decent one who helped the people , more and more stabbing shootings liquidations more and more stealing and our prime minister just say come on in open borders here!
The democratic leaders/ socialists do not care about the American people. I have seen it after watching Schumer and pelosi speak. It’s sad that people who have no interest in preserving our values and constitution have been elected to represent the us.
You should make it a law that no media/news outlet can share false news. It does nothing but cause anger and hatred in our country. I have had enough with all these news outlets just lying nonstop.
You are so obsessed with this wall, you are forgetting about US! You are neglecting the people that have NO JOB right now because of YOUR pettiness! What ABOUT US? The American People!? You are putting WORKING Americans at risk with your foolish games right now!
I love you President Donald Trump!
Build that wall!   President Trump I stand strong with you all the way you are doing what I voted you in to do Thank you  President Trump
Brent Congdon Probably any USA airport! Good luck!
Build that wall!   President Trump I stand strong with you all the way you are doing what I voted you in to do Thank you  President Trump
"I promise,  MEXICO is paying for the wall..."
How do you figure?
I love you President Donald Trump!
Yes and the “promise” was to make Mexico pay not the American taxpayers. Liar, traitor, President Pinocchio 🤥
Albert kojo kyekye We all agree with you here in Long Island,New York
Healthcare? If you want to call a national emergency on something or anything, why not start with healthcare?
Don't forget the MSM working for them!
So what's that wall gonna be good for again?
Yes we do want Border Security.  You have my vote 2020 President Trump
A link to a Fox News article? I'm not sure what's the biggest joke here
Stay the course, Mr President!  We love you and support your position.  Please stay safe on your trip to the southern border.  Praying for you.
Exactly!!! It’s absolutely unbelievable and disgraceful!!!
How do you figure?
Build that wall! Shut the government down! Don’t give them any more chances to make a decision they are just gonna fight you no matter what.
Everyone not thinking a wall will work unlock your doors. These imagrents need a place to stay. And thanks for volunteering.
Its become more obvious everyday the democrats do not care for the American people, they are nothing but arrogant pathetic individuals. They have no message nor do they provide solutions. They can’t debate so they resort to hate.
You are right Mr. President ,,build the wall.
Build the wall! Supporting  you all the way. Praying
We need laws to fully end the bastardization of the Civil War amendments, ending birthright citizenship, ending chain migration, mandate e-Verify prosecuting non-compliant companies, demanding proof of citizenship for any federal benefits, and strong voter ID. Fast track deportation. We need the Wall but that will not be enough.
🤣🤣🤣A former Border Patrol chief in the Obama administration who was removed by President Donald Trump joined the experts supporting a border wall.  Mark Morgan, a former FBI agent, served as Obama’s Border Patrol chief for most of 2016 and was asked to leave the position by the Trump administration in 2017.  Speaking on Jan. 7 during an appearance on Fox News’ “Tucker Carlson Tonight,” Morgan said that border walls “absolutely work.”  “If you look in the past, you don’t have to go too far back in history, that bipartisan legislation that was passed, the Secure Fence Act in 2006 and 2012, bipartisan legislation passed where they built the wall or fence or physical barrier, whatever you want to call it, it’s a wall. It works,” Morgan said.  Current Democratic leaders, including House Speaker Nancy Pelosi (D-Calif.) and Senate Minority Leader Chuck Schumer (D-N.Y.) were among those voting for the pieces of legislation Morgan mentioned.  Carlson noted that Morgan had been fired by Trump, which Morgan acknowledged before saying Trump was right about the wall.  “The president is right, the president of [National] Border Control Council is right. The other day when they had the national press conference and they got up and they said, ‘The wall works,’ they’re right, and it’s not based on a personal, political ideology. That’s based on historical data and facts that can be proven,” Morgan said.  “I cannot think of a legitimate argument why anyone would not support the wall as part of a multi-layered border security issue,” he added. “Why aren’t we listening to the experts and the people who do it every day? I don’t understand that.”  Trump’s opponents have taken to calling the wall “immoral” and “ineffective” but have put forth few counter-measures nor cited data supporting their arguments.  Trump border security President Donald Trump listens to Brandon Judd, president of the National Border Patrol Council, speak about border security in the briefing room at the White House in Washington, on Jan. 3, 2019. (Nicholas Kamm/AFP/Getty Images) Trump invited experts to talk to the media about why a wall works and is necessary on Jan. 3. As Morgan noted, National Border Patrol Council members were among those speaking.  “Anywhere that you look where we have built walls, they have worked,” Brandon Judd, a border agent for 21 years and president of the council, told reporters. “They have been an absolute necessity for Border Patrol agents in securing the border.”  Morgan’s comments came as President Trump was scheduled to give his first prime-time address to the nation on Tuesday night to address the crisis at the border.
🇺🇸 Thank You Mr. President 🇺🇸 You are ❤️ loved and appreciated!!!!!!
None of this is about a wall, immigration or whatever.  It's about making Trump look bad so they can win the white house in 2020.
I think we ALL know the answer to THAT question!
Exactly!!! It’s absolutely unbelievable and disgraceful!!!
The people are behind you.....drain the swamp.....build the wall.
Stopping you from another win. Thank you President Trump.
BUILD THAT WALL!  KEEP US SAFE! Who goes to bed in this day and time with their doors unlocked and open? BUILD THAT WALL! !!
Build the wall!! Nancy & Chuck have no intentions of building a wall!!
Wall won’t do it unless you mine the border as well.
Please come over Mr President and sort Brexit out for us. We have a bunch of self-serving idiots in government who are not up for the job.
Let’s hear more about that “mantle” that you will hold lol 👍🏼
One says make America great again, the other says resist. Hmmmmm. Build the wall!!!!
Hey check out China’s Great Wall, fantastic tourist attraction nowadays.
I think we ALL know the answer to THAT question!
Hey check out China’s Great Wall, fantastic tourist attraction nowadays.
I call  bullshit It a political stunt to distract from all coming out your campaign and collusion Why would you then campaign manager give a Russian operative internal polling info
Michael Brian  At least it is Relevant Unlike  trumps broken record of Hilary Obama and the Dems
One says make America great again, the other says resist. Hmmmmm. Build the wall!!!!
Agree Mt President We have your back!!!!
Stand firm!! WE ARE WITH YOU MR PRESIDENT!!!
Except the... It's my way or I shut down the government... is the Worst form of negotiating...
Getting you outta office its time for impeachment
Dems won't vote for wall funding, but fund illegal aliens health care, 56 Billion in foreignaid last year.....So next time you pay your copay remember people here illegally get a free ride.
No, Americans want Impeachment!!
It is true that most Americans want border security. However most Americans are smart enough to realize that a wall is not going to secure the border.
Yes! We have got to have border security.
Michael Brian  At least it is Relevant Unlike  trumps broken record of Hilary Obama and the Dems
Yes! We have got to have border security.
What time is the speech tonight??
So if you like polls, then do a test to see how many people like or love a post regarding building a wall for border security and how many people hate it. Just about as accurate as anything the news networks state as a statistic/percentage. Just hover over the "like" and "love" icons in this post and see what real Americans on FB are are approving of and who are actually hating it. Done this test on hundreds of posts from either side of the aisle and I'm of the opinion the media is in fact lying and fake for their own agenda and reasons, as are most politicians.
9pm Eastern
Please, Americans give us Trump to develop our country Nigeria.
For real , I will let you have him for some time .
9pm Eastern
Common sense has been lost in Congress and they are Blind and Cannot See
Mr President you need to cover your back. The Demos are up to no good and their going to pull the rug from under your feet. Nothing but defiance.
The democrats are out of control- mean, angry, and NOT thinking about this country or the American people!! They are self serving and only have one thing in mind.... how to get more votes-
They've shown their true colors. If you want it, they don't. Full on obstruction.
Need the wall! The entire world can't l8ve 8n the US & Canada we're full
Please secure the México border with a Wall Mr President 👍
Durbin your wasting your time..TRUMP IS BUILDING THE WALL...It seems you are not getting it..just be patient.will take you on a field trip once ended..prepare a snack
Hold out Mr President!!! We need that Wall!
For real , I will let you have him for some time .
Their answer should be, how high? Been going on since the 80's with these clowns. Build the wall. Stand firm.
Just like Syria...” Lies made lies kept” no wall OR pie for you Danald.
Demos are worried on the govertment shut down instead border security..the same illegal rethoric on emigration the trend of the moment shutdown opportunity excuse to get around
Take a look at the numbers... at this point, 22,422 "Like" this, 2,509 "Love" this. and a pathetic 451 think its "funny"  The American People have spoken!  #BuildtheWall!
Take a vote and see if you are right.
We stand with our President Trump and Vice-President Pence! God bless and lead them both!!
Looks like he's going to get another Russia fairytale put on him again. ....all they're doing is trying to cover themselves. I hope Giuliani can pull him out of this one quickly this is getting ridiculous
I live and work in the south.  WE NEED THE WALL
This wall thing isn’t about securing the border, it’s just a way to shoring up your fragile ego and incompetence. Donald, there’s not enough concrete in the world for that.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2019/01/08/politics/trump-border-wall-walk-up/index.html
Personal vendettas hurts Americans. McCain proved that. Build the wall. 5.6billlion is cheap.
Hold out Mr President!!! We need that Wall!
Personal vendettas hurts Americans. McCain proved that. Build the wall. 5.6billlion is cheap.
I am all for the Wall...but, we also need to keep our ocean fronts protected after it’s built. 😢
All they have to do is get a boat and go around it into California and Gulf!
This wall thing isn’t about securing the border, it’s just a way to shoring up your fragile ego and incompetence. Donald, there’s not enough concrete in the world for that.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2019/01/08/politics/trump-border-wall-walk-up/index.html
Amen Glory to God keep up the fight for us Mr.President :)
God will contintue to lead  you
don't be silly !! stopping you of course😠
Trumps actual  interview stating Mexico will pay for the wall!   Your welcome!!   Check out @RealDark_Kent’s Tweet: https://twitter.com/RealDark_Kent/status/1082872969368547328?s=09
Trump 2020...till we get border security.
I stand with my President! Fund the wall or no Government pay at all.
Yes! We want border security! Build the WALL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
How about electrical fences like in Jurassic Park.
Vendetta isn’t pretty https://www.americanprogress.org/issues/security/news/2017/06/14/433945/trumps-conflicts-interest-mexico/
All they have to do is get a boat and go around it into California and Gulf!
The American people stand with you Mr. President regardless of what the dishonest media tells us!
Keep up the good work, President Trump! You are MY President!! ❤
That was #1 onhis list everyone knows that .he became the president because of that reason voted for it .AMEN!
No Wall. I'm not afraid. Mexico has always been there. So NO.
This is not crisis stop using the American people in ostage this is not Russia Trump
Yes, we the people want border security and yes the Democrats are only against anything President Trump promised to do for we the people!
I want it today, secure our borders 🇺🇸
thank youALBERT KOJO KYEKYE FOR YOUR KIND WORDS FOR OUR PRESIDRNT
Your daughter is a smart cookie 👍
Can anyone actually reference where there are facts to support a wall being effective at curbing illegal immigration?  I have looked at various sources and don't see agreement that it will be the solution he keeps saying it will be.
Vendetta isn’t pretty https://www.americanprogress.org/issues/security/news/2017/06/14/433945/trumps-conflicts-interest-mexico/
Use ElChapos seized money. or basically any drug seized cash.
...Early on 16 October, Marie Antoinette was declared guilty of the three main charges against her: depletion of the national treasury, conspiracy against the internal and external security of the State, and high treason because of her intelligence activities in the interest of the enemy; the latter charge alone was enough to condemn her to death.   https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marie_Antoinette
For them stopping you, stay on task.
Stopping you is their priority. Doesn’t matter what it is. They must work to stop you.
When you see the Mexican President the number you need him to agree to is 108,400,000,000 pesos  Have Baron write it down for you and put it in your pocket.
So first year we save 270 billion Next yr we save 275 billion Wow that's simple math for democrats to understand Looks to me like wall pays for itself and is a money maker
Stopping you and destroying us. Investigate the Democrats as thoroughly as they’ve investigated you Mr. President!
Every president has the right to take steps for safety and better future of the nation who selected him. I must say Donald Trump has always been loyal to America . He is doing right and the best for americans
Can anyone actually reference where there are facts to support a wall being effective at curbing illegal immigration?  I have looked at various sources and don't see agreement that it will be the solution he keeps saying it will be.
Better study up on drones dear they won't get very far
You do what ever it takes to build that Wall mr. PRESIDENT
President Trump stand strong, we the people love you. You love our country and we will stand behind you. Build the wall.
Just look at how much money Americans have raised in contributions for The Wall.  President Trump, do not back down.  We have your back.
Declare an emergency start the wall then open the government
Democrat politicians don’t want a secure border or a prosperous America. Both are a threat to their power.
Please do not give in!!! The elected Democrat's are pathetic. They care nothing for the safety of the people or this nation.  Stand ground for something you believe in and a big majority of us believe in also.
Promise???? You said Mexico was paying for this wall. Another of your lies....
Change the stance and work to stop border funding all together and the democrats will have the wall built in 72 hours.
Every president has the right to take steps for safety and better future of the nation who selected him. I must say Donald Trump has always been loyal to America . He is doing right and the best for americans
Change the stance and work to stop border funding all together and the democrats will have the wall built in 72 hours.
Promise???? You said Mexico was paying for this wall. Another of your lies....
They want security but they also want you!! That is the truth, and you must keep on keeping on, With God, ALL things are possible🙏🏼👋🇬🇧
Mr. President, my cousin is an honorably discharged marine with a very sick wife at home, today he figured out how you could get free labor to build the wall so all you would have to but is the building materials.  His name is James (Jim) Blackburn, he lives close to St. Louis, MO    this is his post                                                                                                                                                                                     Jim Blackburn 15 hrs ·  I would gladly take 2 days out of my life and without pay go to the border and help build the wall. Its my duty to still help protect the country.
Why hasn't anyone asked Pelosi why she had a wall built around her home and why she has locks on her doors
Protect our borders and "Build the Wall" you  are supported more than you know..
Yes we do and isn’t it amazing under every other president they’ve wanted barriers or walls too. Just not under Trump hmmmmmm two faced idiots I think
Stand strong.  Don't give in to the Democrats and keep the govt shut down.  We want the wall.
Definitely not border security or America first.
I hope beyond anyone’s hatred or disagreements for our president ... we all listen to hear clear concise points without prejudice why this is so important.
Lawrence Plaisance yep that's what I meant in Lawrence
This is what we call a president ,fighting for the safety and well been of his people. Mr president keep up with that same spirit 2020+
You promised Mexico would pay, yet you shut our government down.   Stop the silliness.  Free Leonard Peltier
Hahahahaha Russia Russia Russia! Where is the proof?  Still waiting!
Seems like England has more dignity and better government then we do
Kellyanne Conway said Sarah Sanders made a mistake when she cited 4,000 terrorists come through the southern border. No Kellyanne, it is NOT a mistake, it is a LIE. If a reporter can get the correct data from Trump administration, so can Sarah Sanders. #Liar
Don’t forget to take Ann Coulter and Rush Limbaugh to the meeting with Chuck and Nancy tomorrow. #Donthecon
Looking forward to voting for you again in 2020! You’re doing a great job!
Ben Ali, TUNISIA is the argument of American crime towards Tunisia and the people of the whole world Mr Trump, The American dignity arises on the repair of the situation in Tunisia and the destruction of the terrorist device ENNAHDHA which was implanted by Hillary Clinton
I hope beyond anyone’s hatred or disagreements for our president ... we all listen to hear clear concise points without prejudice why this is so important.
How is walking away from the table working together? Very childish.
Why didn’t you do it when you had the majority?? You’re just looking for someone to blame cuz your plan isn’t going to fly
Awesome!  You did Great tonight in the address!!  Clear and concise ...Well done!  We stand behind you!
Isn't an illegal alien against the law?
Please stop all the killing of our animals and wild life. The seals to the whales to the wild horses and buffalo. I am all for the wall, and all that but leave the animals alone. Please stop the trophy hunting. There is no need for such a horrific thing. Thank you Mr. President.
Pay our USCG NOW...They can't make ajustments that a joke. They our protecti g our borders and they have to worry about they family's at home to make adjustments that the dumbest thing you could say..😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😠
Construction to start immediately , we are behind you Mr. President
The answer to that question is very clear! It’s NOT securing the border.
Individual 1 wishes he has an absolute power like Putin, Kim Jong Un, Xi Jin Ping and Erdogan have.
Ben Ali, TUNISIA is the argument of American crime towards Tunisia and the people of the whole world Mr Trump, The American dignity arises on the repair of the situation in Tunisia and the destruction of the terrorist device ENNAHDHA which was implanted by Hillary Clinton
Kool-aid will be served for refreshments this evening!
Mike Pence was asked about individual 1’s claim that some of former presidents confided to him they wanted to build the wall themselves. However, all living presidents denied ever told individual 1 about it. Mike Pence’s response American people are not concerned about the political aspect of it. How about the truth Mike. You are a religious person, how about the truth.
What americans want is for someone to take you out...
Dems don't support a wall, but they sure are standing around like one...
You promised (stupidly) that Mexico would pay for the wall. How is Americans footing the bill making good on that promise? Insanity.
We already have a wall, President Trump just want to finish it. The Democrats want a wall and they built part of it. What good is a part of the wall . Need to finish the wall
Says corporate media is "fake". Follows Fox News religiously. 🙈
I mostly agree with the wall but! The bad will still find a way in.. Just like the "gun" laws.
it was all fluff and bollocks then and still is
Individual 1 wishes he has an absolute power like Putin, Kim Jong Un, Xi Jin Ping and Erdogan have.
it was all fluff and bollocks then and still is
Would you like some warm milk and cookies as well? Maybe a pacifier? Diaper change?
Chloe Weaver GO DO SOME COKE & STFU ❄❄
I mostly agree with the wall but! The bad will still find a way in.. Just like the "gun" laws.
It is obvious that they will fight you on anything and everything. This is their agenda and they could care less what the majority of US citizens want!
I don't see this as half true.
I want my paycheck. Where is my pay? Oh yeah...working for free....thanks allot POTUS.   #LOSTMYVOTE
You want your way and it ain't the right way
The dums dont want to work with you, Mr. President. They want our nation to cease as a republic and transform it into a socialist nation. Stay the course, sir!! Praying for you!!
We need this wall! Do your job and protect our borders and people! Listen to our President and build it!
keep pounding on the table. lol build the wall!
Securing the border without building a wall. Can you do it?
No daca no amnesty build the wall
Chloe Weaver GO DO SOME COKE & STFU ❄❄
No daca no amnesty build the wall
ElCoyote EJ Sanchez do you have children and grandchildren?
Securing the border without building a wall. Can you do it?
BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT!  Don't back down...
No we Americans dont . Its rediculous.
Mr. President (My Prez) Thank you for all you do! God put you in the White House. You have millions of supporters that have your back! Fight the good fight, you will win in the end. Thank you sir. I love my Prez and First Lady, and all of your family!
Democrats are trouble makers are  not there for American success.
Isn't a wall just the equivalent of the walls of your house?  Imagine a house with no walls, would you like that???  Makes sense now doesn't it!!!
Democrats should just change the name of their party to Obstructionists.....
How is it that an American citizen can work 40 years and pay into SSI ,retire and be told  they can't collect from SSI because the make too much from their retirement??? Where did their EARNED money go???...I've lost all faith in this government they take everything give nothing and say they're doing it FOR us...no ladies and gentlemen...your doing it TO us.... thanks
ElCoyote EJ Sanchez do you have children and grandchildren?
Stand up we love you President Trump for what you are doing GOD BLESS AMERICA
TRUMP u said during election Mexico was going to fund it. Y the change? The ones saying build the wall would u go to work without pay? Having rent to pay
Every time it's, we will do security After!  After what you ask, well it depends on the time.  This time it's after potus gives in.  Stand fast!
Con artist deception and deflection propaganda.
Border security and “a wall” are two different things.  They gave you plenty of money for border security, you just couldn’t have your penis-compensating giant monstrosity of a “wall.”  Grow tf up and stop throwing a temper tantrum because you didn’t get exactly what you wanted!
Stoping you!  You got to keep in mind they are insane
The Schumer/Pelosi shutdown needs to end.  Build the wall now.
My President Donald J. Trump. Please stop. You have the majority of Americans nationwide that support a wall to end or deter Illegal immigration. It is a National emergency most people with half a brain can understand the jist of it. So call it one and let's move on.
Make better promises & everyone will back you.
How is it that an American citizen can work 40 years and pay into SSI ,retire and be told  they can't collect from SSI because the make too much from their retirement??? Where did their EARNED money go???...I've lost all faith in this government they take everything give nothing and say they're doing it FOR us...no ladies and gentlemen...your doing it TO us.... thanks
It's not about stopping you. It's about you not giving up. Remember, you promised Mexico would pay for the wall
Yep! Security is your key word! Not wall!!
If you built golf courses at the border, no one would want to go anywhere near the border, and no one could afford to play golf there either.
Thank You President Trump for all you do for the American People.
Yes, we want border security.
I'm from El Paso , Texas I live in a border city. That wall will work against criminal activity for sure and I'm around those type of people that the government calls criminals. I'm with you Trump build the wall. realDonaldTrump
BUILD THE WALL!  STICK TO THE PLAN THAT GOT YOU ELECTED!
Declaring a national emergency will. Cause him more problems ,he can have money for extra security more staff and the needed equipment but not a stupid wall that will fail ,it’s not a national  emergency ,and most are against it ,his facts are wrong all wrong ,he’s special
Border security does not necessitate a wall. Wall will never be funded. Get over it. trump lied to you & you believed him. Contact him for details.
Make better promises & everyone will back you.
Border security does not necessitate a wall. Wall will never be funded. Get over it. trump lied to you & you believed him. Contact him for details.
What’s more important to you, border security or fulfilling one your campaign promises? HYPOCRITE!!
Stefan Edlund AMERICA is important to our President. This isn’t about campaign promises. This is about national security.
No dear. Trust me. Our president don’t give a damn about America or its security. He ONLY cares about himself and his businesses.
Declaring a national emergency will. Cause him more problems ,he can have money for extra security more staff and the needed equipment but not a stupid wall that will fail ,it’s not a national  emergency ,and most are against it ,his facts are wrong all wrong ,he’s special
No dear. Trust me. Our president don’t give a damn about America or its security. He ONLY cares about himself and his businesses.
Your promise was Mexico was paying for the wall but taxpayers.
He forgot to address the tunnels.
Stefan Edlund AMERICA is important to our President. This isn’t about campaign promises. This is about national security.
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
I agree with border security so that services for American citizens continue to be available. However the govt needs to be reopened. Veterans and disabled and seniors depend on our incomes food stamps and insurances to survive and now we r being told that the shutdown is going to affect all these things. What are we to do?
66 BILLION earmarked for foreign aid now is it? And Americans who lock their front doors at night are asking to approve 5.6 Billion to help with national security and curtail people entering ILLEGALLY? What exactly is the problem here?
I totally support you Trump.....is your obligation as a president to do what s necessary.......Am an African I believe we should travel at the right channel.....The love is deep....love you Trump...love America..
Lol. I screenshot bbc news article that says americans are largely uninterested in trumps border wall....
Stopping you, of course. Build the wall!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Your promise was build the wall but we would not have to pay for it. You have gone back on that promise.
Build the wall mr trump we all the 65 million supporting. You 🇺🇸👍🏼
He forgot to address the tunnels.
Keep it up President Trump. Build the Wall. No compromise. It's been tried more than once already. Democrats lie and have no honor.
I stand with my President. BUILD THE WALL!!!
Yes we do!! BUILD OUR WALL!! STOP ALL FUNDING TO STATES THAT HAVE SANCTUARY CITIES!!
Take 5.6 billion from from foriegn aid. Enough fucking around build the wall and let me fight Schumer.
Build the wall President Donald J. Trump, stay strong sir and keep The United States of America safe. Thankyou. God bless you with His wisdom, guidance, love, peace, and prosperity.
Best I have heard so far  “If they only loved our country as much as they hate our president!”
Making better decisions that are logical that supports a plan to reduce and or eliminate illegal migration. Maybe meet at the table with sound and clear ask. You should know how to do that since you have built many structures.
Build the wall Mr. President Trump i dont care i can wait on my taxes i waited this long for tax time i can wait longer to recieve it.
Build the wall mr trump we all the 65 million supporting. You 🇺🇸👍🏼
The same question over and over I keep asking, the ones that are against the wall. Do you have children and grandchildren?
Thank you Mr President! You're doing what TRUE Americans desire. Stand strong I pray for you daily.
Give him the money for the wall and make him the general contractor under 2 conditions he must stay out of the White House and he cannot charge a toll
U know I think each and every place should tear down they walls this is everyone's land
The libetals will fight him no matter what. If he says no wall tomorrow, the libetals will go crazy against him
Pelosi and Shumer are only putting up a fight because it's Trump.  They Wanted this before. Stand ground and build the wall apparently they don't think we can read the comments about the need for more border security they made in the past.
Americans want border security but you’re screwing the wrong people with this shutdown!  Hard working Americans are suffering by not getting paid! Namely the Coast Guard who put their lives on the line everyday to save others lives!!! Your statement ‘the people not getting a paycheck will find a way to live’ is ignorant and ludicrous!  Stop this ridiculousness now!!!
American Wall not just Trumps Wall
They hate you and don’t care about Americans. What they care about is themselves, money and power.
Bring back the comanche helicopter and the a10 warthog
Check out the polls on Americans wanting this 100 miles of useless wall addition and repair. Not looking good, DFT.
Build the wall Mr President!! We know your trying hard. You are so right all of Congress live behind walls why???? Why should we protect them if they can't protect us. Take their security away!!
You're the biggest crybaby to every hold this once respected office. You're like the rich kid that doesn't get his way and cries to his rich parents until you get what you want. Wait you're not like they.... You are that. Disgrace.
Their job apparently is to disagree with everything you want to do. It’s more about that!
Do away with the Federal Reserve, restore gun rights permenantly.
I think the opposition needs a drug test and a psych eval. They are 🦇🦇🦇🦇🤡
Close the southern border Now Sir
What are the real number. Lay it all out for real Americans. Will taxes go up or will we reduce other spending?
I’m from Australia. We like Trump. He loves his country. Be grateful, and careful what you wish for.
The money seized from drugs coming from Mexico since 1946 could build that wall IN GOLD
Bring back the comanche helicopter and the a10 warthog
The money seized from drugs coming from Mexico since 1946 could build that wall IN GOLD
You just call about money, why cant you just pay for the wall your damn self your a fucking millionaire
Oops my bad billionaire
Paige Elizabeth call about money.   How many other presidents do you know that is taking $0 to run this country.   Oh that's right no other president besides Trump has done that.  He has gotten paid $0. And has put up with a bunch of crap from liberals who are blinded and don't want to see the truth
I’m from Australia. We like Trump. He loves his country. Be grateful, and careful what you wish for.
God bless America!
Was the promise Americans would not pay for the wall !!!
What happened to you saying in the televised meeting with democratic leadership that you would take ownership of the shutdown.....must have been crossing your fingers...
What's more important to the Democrats is to be humanitarian to criminals. How many children suffer when parents are sentenced for crimes. Do we let our humanitarian approach to life remove the penalty for crime.  President Trump desparate times call for desparate measures. Stop the shutdown and play your aces.
Trump I applaud you you are doing a great job  !!!! Pelusi scheummer puppets lol
Stay strong and cut their pay off! 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
I really dont care America was fine before your ass showed up
"Build that wall" Nancy 202-225-4965 Chuck 202-224-6542
We the true American people want a wall built. We want our children safe.
Paige Elizabeth call about money.   How many other presidents do you know that is taking $0 to run this country.   Oh that's right no other president besides Trump has done that.  He has gotten paid $0. And has put up with a bunch of crap from liberals who are blinded and don't want to see the truth
Thank you President Trump!
I dont care what the Democrazies want I want a talllllll Concrete Wall and a secure border..  Hang in there President Trump.
The only thing the Democrats want his control and power, they don’t care about the people or the country and their number one goal is to hurt our great and wonderful president
Im not against building the wall but this shutdown has to stop
How can a few people. Doesn't matter who they are stip the president of the United States  from diverting money from one place to spend it on building a wall to help his country? He is the PRESIDENT.  Just do it Donald and let the snowflakes scream as long as they like.
SHUT DOWN THE WHOLE GOVT. THEY MIGHT THINK TWICE THEN.
Is anyone from Texas, AZ, or NM? I would like to hear your opinion on the matter.
Americans first always  we tax payers want our wall  Thank You Mr President!!
I'm stand with my President Trump
We the true American people want a wall built. We want our children safe.
Democraps want to stop the President. And they don't care how many legal citizens lives are lost in the process. To the left, that's acceptable as long as they get their way. Sort of sounds like a spoiled brat....no?
They do not care what the people want, Mr. President!
Why not a giant billboard that says "whites only!"? It is just as effective and saves a ton of money.
Do not bend anymore...Build The Wall ..My President..Go Boss Go
Stand firm sir, I'll get by no SS check this month
Border security is more important!
We need the wall and Trump will get it done.
We Stand Beside You mr. President build the wall is everybody's been saying Heaven has walls and Angels guard them and that's what we must have here on Earth Allah for the borders so we can stay safe and secure and if they don't like it too bad God is on our side God bless you mr. President
The truth is DEMS DO NOT CARE about anyone or anything else other than themselves !
I'm stand with my President Trump
The truth is DEMS DO NOT CARE about anyone or anything else other than themselves !
If we're using voters, more voters voted for Clinton than for trump. So your argument about who wants the wall, more don't want it than those who do want it. Bullshit!
Werner Evans got news for you. It doesn't matter who won the popular vote. That is not how we vote on presidents. Trump is your president.
Eric S Siegel i don't dispute he is the president russian meddling notwithstanding.I dispute arguments using incorrect facts. When he gets impeached, i'll consider him my ex-president.
We Stand Beside You mr. President build the wall is everybody's been saying Heaven has walls and Angels guard them and that's what we must have here on Earth Allah for the borders so we can stay safe and secure and if they don't like it too bad God is on our side God bless you mr. President
A wall would cut into their money from drug running to human trafficking to gun running. They are trying their best to make this country a third world country where we are all their subjects. You better like Trump cause he’s the only one to save us from these beasts. That’s the truth. This is no game!!!
It’s our security .., FUND THE WALL
The wall pelosi the wall the rest will fall in line
What's more important is keeping your word to the American people when you said the Mexican President would pay for your wall.
What’s more important to the Democrats is trying to look as crazy as they are ridiculous God bless you President Trump
YES!!! What is wrong with the damn democrats?
Some depts are open unemployment a friend doesn't get help works for the city t Toni harp is his boss
SINCE YOU WERE ELECTED, WHAT HAS OUR DEMOCRATS DONE TO HELP YOU MAKE AMERICA ANY BETTER I'LL WAIT
Eric S Siegel i don't dispute he is the president russian meddling notwithstanding.I dispute arguments using incorrect facts. When he gets impeached, i'll consider him my ex-president.
Exactly!!! Stopping his main campaign promise is their top priority! Borders, Language and Culture be damned...
Secure the border!! Why do Dems need a rebuttal to Tonight’s speech from the Oval Office? Wouldn’t it be nice if they went back to congress to do their jobs?
All I heard were lies from them
If they do not work with you to get a wall....they will not be re-elected but you will!
Don't give in, we are behind you 100%. Build the wall.
Mr President I truly appreciate all you are doing for our country.  We were in desperate need of a leader who is not controlled by the political pigs that have made a career out of the position.  Keep doing what you are doing, you have more support than you know.  Praying that our country can be turned around and that we eventually can all just come together to get things done.
Thank you Mr. President for loving this country. I’m praying for you. Stay strong.
I Stand by you Mr. President Trump. Don't give up!! Keep Government Shut Down till We Get OUR WALL!! I have love and respect for you and will vote again for you #Trump2020 💙❤
The safety of inhumanity challenged !! Lol .
SINCE YOU WERE ELECTED, WHAT HAS OUR DEMOCRATS DONE TO HELP YOU MAKE AMERICA ANY BETTER I'LL WAIT
Yes thank you for standing strong for the American people! We need the wall!
Hang in there President Trump!  Don’t back down!  Keep government closed for border wall money...we’re all behind you 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Just start using reverse  psychology and then you will get what the true Patriots want for our  country!!  God bless You Mr. President!!!!!
You made a vague attempt but didnt go deep enough with the evidence to prove the need. I did some research and found much more than you shared.  Who is staying with evidence gathering? You should have reached out to me?
All you people out there who don’t support securing our borders. I want you all to take your locks off your front door. Because you don’t need them.  Apparently you can live with your countries front doors unlocked. And next time you go to the market don’t lock your car in the parking lot.
So completely full of BS! Are you unable to understand poll results on this subject? It certainly seems to be the case.
How about paychecks? Pretty sure that want those also.
You also need to stop congress pays why should they get there checks while the goverment is shut down..stand strong mr president the American people are counting on you
You promised to build a wall an have Mexico pay for it. Anything other than that is not fulfillment of your promise. #ChangeMyMind
You’re the only one not willing to work as a team. You are a national bully.
The safety of inhumanity challenged !! Lol .
It's Crystal clear....all they care about is stopping him.
They will just dig a cave like  El Chapo .....all those millions wasted...eh amigo
Vice President Pence said in an interview today that most Americans are not interested in the truth.  I for one am not one of them!
Like Obama would have done, just sign an executive order and build the wall. Stop playing with these hypocrites who flip flop and build the wall.
Pelosi and Shumer are trying their best to stop president trump from getting reelect in 2020. They don't care about the American taxpaying citizens!
you promised mexico would pay for it what happened to that
Read this article on shutdowns from history.   https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/wonk/wp/2013/09/25/here-is-every-previous-government-shutdown-why-they-happened-and-how-they-ended/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.e2e98acf5210
You’re the only one not willing to work as a team. You are a national bully.
Read this article on shutdowns from history.   https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/wonk/wp/2013/09/25/here-is-every-previous-government-shutdown-why-they-happened-and-how-they-ended/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.e2e98acf5210
Please help and go to this site to sign the petition to build the border wall.  IT IS IMPORTANT!  www.WeFundTheWall.comWE THE PEOPLE WILL FUND THE WALL!americanjoe.clickfunnels.com
Sylvia Giron-Black according to MSNBC, THE ONLY REASON THE PRESIDENT ADDRESSED THE NATION TODAY WAS TO PUSH THIS GOFUNDTHEWALL PAGE THAT HE PROBABLY WILL USE FOR HIS 2020 CAMPAIGN.  WHAT A LYING BUNCH OF DIRT PEDDLING CRITERIONS. I DESPISE THOSE HATE MONGERS.  GO PRESIDENT TRUMP AND BUILD BUILD BUILD.🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
you promised mexico would pay for it what happened to that
What's the over/under for number of lies you put forward tonight?
Good.  Keep using opinion pieces to explain your idiocy.
Lets be clear, we could care less what its made of, we want it strong and effective!
Shutting down CBP, FBI, Coast Guard, DOJ in order to 'get your way' on a policy, is assinine, is a threat to national security, and is not about your promises. It is, a convenient smokescreen so you arent impeached and imprisoned sooner, though...
Could we pay for the shut down out of congress' salary.
I'll be honest, with the way that these four years have been going and especially the last year-and-a-half I don't think I'll be voting for him again next election.  I'll have to see what he does and I might change my mind, we'll see.
Clearly Dems only care about stopping trump at ALL costs no matter how good for our country.   Build the wall!!!!  T R U M P ! !
Of course it's to stop you from doing anything good.
Secure our Borders!  Build the wall!!
Sylvia Giron-Black according to MSNBC, THE ONLY REASON THE PRESIDENT ADDRESSED THE NATION TODAY WAS TO PUSH THIS GOFUNDTHEWALL PAGE THAT HE PROBABLY WILL USE FOR HIS 2020 CAMPAIGN.  WHAT A LYING BUNCH OF DIRT PEDDLING CRITERIONS. I DESPISE THOSE HATE MONGERS.  GO PRESIDENT TRUMP AND BUILD BUILD BUILD.🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
We don't seem to have boarder security in UK it's a free for all
Seems as if democrats have a vendetta. Most all voted for border security before but now with Trump in off it is immoral. Their speeches were played back so it is sickening.
Sir your promise was to have Mexico pay for it!
Stay strong Mr. President, your doing exactly what we elected you to do!
They care nothing about this country when it comes to making sure you don't keep your promise.
Politicians work for the American people, if Dems want to keep showing their asses please do an executive order to limit their terms which end this year with new line ups to get voted in, time the POS leave their spots anyways
The normal-minded agree but the leftist socialists won't agree with anything that makes sense!
Do t give in we stand behind you Mr. President. We want a wall...
Build the wall!! Any improvement in  border security is a good thing. What's so hard for the Democrats to understand that?
Secure our Borders!  Build the wall!!
Build the wall!! Any improvement in  border security is a good thing. What's so hard for the Democrats to understand that?
Americans want to work.  Stop holding their jobs hostage!!!
Mary Stone not such a good negotiator!
Do t give in we stand behind you Mr. President. We want a wall...
Couldn't agree w u more lydia. It was so obviously personal last night
Fund the wall Congress! We the people will build it!
Secure our border. Build the wall and give border security the full power to defend our border.
PLEASE President Donald J. Trump...NEVER EVER have a meeting with Chuck and Nancy that is not on camera. They cannot behave themselves.
Democrats are sentimental men, they want to do charity. What a lofty idea!
We the people go fund. Talk about the 19 million raised.
Make sure you remind the American people what pelosi and Schumer have said about border security in the past. Show the videos!!  Those don’t lie!
Please Build The Wall. I want to feel safe agin. I stand with President Trump. Don't Back Down.
Mary Stone not such a good negotiator!
Build the wall, close the border.  We support you, Mr. President.
So legally coming into this country is ok.. but the soft pussies want to let the whole world in...not fair to my grandparents
Israel and Saudi Arabia send illegals
Build the wall, close the border.  We support you, Mr. President.
I’m pretty sure the promise was that Mexico would be paying for the wall... 🤷🏼‍♀️
You were doing so well, then you had to attack the 2nd Amendment, lost many of your 2020 voters. You manipulated ATF and you re wrote ATF's currant laws... bad move! No one person should ever have that kind of power!
I have a crazy question & do not mean any ill will at all!  I was just curious!  Who actually sells & profits from the MAG AGAIN items in the Trump Shop that is always at top of President Trump’s FB posts?  Thank you in advance!
Mr President. I support You. Thank You for trying to do what is right for American Citizens. You got my 2020 Vote. 🇱🇷
They do want border security but a wall is asinine
Stand tough!  Don’t give in until you have the wall funded!  Fund the wall before you end the shutdown!
Thank you President Trump!
straight talk and jobs done.. that's Donny the PRESIDENT
It also help people that all facilities will be upgraded so people will not die after they cross from dehydration or hunger after 1000 mile journey .. we will have better life wading equipment .. better medical.. better family holding areas .. did anybody think about that .. it’s not just a wall !!!
Israel and Saudi Arabia send illegals
As usual, you have no factual proof or real numbers to back your claim. Lies lies lies...that's all you know.
Fools. The only reason Trump wants this wall is so he stands a chance come election time. Don the Con has half of America drooling over his drivel 😂
Dear Mr. President, please don’t ask us to put up a wall. Don’t you realize we the Democrats would get less new customers? We can’t abandon a major element of our strategic growth plan.   - Chuck and Nancy
Tell them to stop making it personal, and let's all get this shutdown shut down!
All they have to do is look at the go fund me account to build the wall.  The American people have given over 16 million
On another topic, didn't Donny promise the coal miners he would put them back to work? Appears he's not keeping his word on that little promise. https://www.nbc4i.com/news/u-s-world/coal-mines-closing-at-a-faster-rate-under-pres-trump-than-obama/1690261093
Good point. They just care about not letting you win!!
It is quite clear that the democrats to do not have the best interest of the people they serve. They give new meaning to "power hungry."
The nay Sayers and to think what t heyy
It also help people that all facilities will be upgraded so people will not die after they cross from dehydration or hunger after 1000 mile journey .. we will have better life wading equipment .. better medical.. better family holding areas .. did anybody think about that .. it’s not just a wall !!!
Build the wall and  stand up for the second amendment!
Or the fact President Trump cant be bought because he is already rich.
He spoke valid reasons in fairness....has heroin takin more lives than the Vietnam war?
When Mexico pays for it!
Again, the “Me” word. Signs of a pathological narcissist. The presidency is above and beyond “you”. It’s about “us”. Where did you learn these self centered tendencies? How long is it going to take America to repair the damage done?
“Provide for the common defense, ensure domestic tranquility!” #Buidthewall !
You go Linda Dean, old Matt Bachugan has never seen a lady with balls, might get his ass handed back to him  lol
Yes we do! Stand strong and firm Mr. President!
We do need border protection, thank you for making a stand!
I see Executive Order in our future... Obummer did it every day!
They know ,if you get the wall you win in 2020
Build the wall, but stop keeping my paycheck hostage!
tell the truth when you address the American people tonight...
Please build the wall POTUS! You are the Man!
You plan on pulling troops out of Syria and Afghanistan! Take the 5 billion off the table implement border security with the money that would’ve been used in the Middle East!  Best of both worlds, you keep your promise on border security and you force Democrats into defending their neocon foreign-policy position!  But I don’t think you have the Balls to #StopTheCrusade
I'm behind President Trump 100% President Trump 20/20
By now it should be obvious Trump is not cut from the same cloth as a. Traditional politician  2020 you got my vote
They hate our President more than they love our country.
Stand strong, the silent majority supports you!!!!
We do need border protection, thank you for making a stand!
I think every person who voted for you wants the wall. So.. how many of us? 😍 We voted for president, not Pelosi/Chuck, we dont need them to make any decision.
Need a Great Wall of America!👍💪🤝
Pelosi and Schumer KNOW that if Trump delivers on the wall...  he is confirmed for re-election!!  Trump knows if he DON’T deliver on the wall.....  it’s his “Read my lips - - - No new taxes” moment!!  Build That Wall.....
At this point getting people back to work and accepting some money for the border would be a good compromise. Otherwise our economy is going to implode and I and others may lose our house!  A new section of wall would good  progress and make it easier for border guards to cover the area with the same manpower.
I see the support that americans have given for the building of a wall. I am just hoping i can reach a few of you to help me.I am a current active duty veteran on leave here in altoona,pa and my wife’s little brother passed away this past Saturday. We buried her mother last year so we already know we can not afford the expenses that come with this more recent death. If there is anything that you guys can do to help my family and i, even if it is just sharing this i would be forever grateful of every last one of you for supporting us. This is my link i started for the family. Hey, I'm supporting this fundraiser, please have a look - 'Family of Tyler Gehret' https://dm2.gofund.me/family-of-tyler-gehret, we have been successful so far and i want to restore faith in humanity by helping this family enter the new year with some type of hope, please even if you just share it will mean the world to this family
We can build the Southern USA Canal, better than we built Panama Canal, wider & deeper, and if it needs a fence, build it.
Why don't you build a dome? It would be much safer. Ilegals and criminals can climb a wall or dig tunnels but they can do nothing against a dome. Protect America please! You're are the unique capable of doing so. Stay strong!
BUILD THAT WALL. We need a red cap that says. “ BUILD THAT WALL”
You failed miserably! Have Mexico pay for the wall. We’ll pay for the roof.
Democrats have become a disgrace. Build the wall
Stand strong, the silent majority supports you!!!!
If we need to vote for wall, let us do the vote. It will prevail, as votes for you prevailed.
Your promise had MEXICO paying for it . Remember???
U need a happy meal from mcdonalds!
After he builds the wall, he needs to investigate why So many Muslim can come here and own top notch businesses, when Americans can not afford to.  Most little store, I hops, waffle houses, hotels I can go on and on!
Stopping you at any cost. They don’t care about the taxpayers, all they want are the votes from the Hispanics that cross the border illegally.
BUILD THE WALL!! Thank you Mr.President for everything you have done to get this country back on track! GOD BLESS YOU AND GOD BLESS AMERICA 🇺🇸
I fully support you Mr. President, but please try to work this out. The shut own isn't affecting me, personally, but it will soon hurt millions of Americans. I want you to win another term as our President, and I'm afraid if this lingers on too long, it will affect the voters in the next election. I'm all for a wall, but the policies we have in effect now need to be enforced much HARDER than they are now. Hell, they'll figure out a way to climb over the wall sooner or later anyway, we need stronger punishments for the ones that get here first.
Your a #thunderman Sir #spotify #urbancowboyband #tribute #Making 🇺🇸 Great Again  https://open.spotify.com/track/10Y8NaFT2OgthZilnm2mEu?si=K2Us84I8RMGi2DzVbq_Nuw
I think he meant feed his pride...
Democrats have become a disgrace. Build the wall
Yes! We want border security. No more delays!!!!!!!
Trump said Mexico were going to build the wall they say not now he blame the democrat why didn’t he get the wall he had the power because the republican were in power for two years they didn’t want it and now they blames the  the democrat . They are republican leaders is jumping the fence why because they don’t want the wall yes we need some type of security but don’t take these peoples paycheck to get your way Trump need to remember he not promise tomorrow and he got a lot of hate on him and they won’t be know hate in Heaven.
They are afraid of you winning again in 2020.
Stop the shutdown. Re-open the government.
Stand strong! Don’t bend even a little!
Democratic Obstructionists from Day1.
I thought you said you was going to put the war with your own money you try to take from the poor
important to democrats ???  PICK ME PICK ME
Help me feed my family college degree and u take so much taxes out my checks i can barley pay my bills and feed my baby
President Trump.  5 billion dollars for a wall.  What is it going to cost me to help fund this?  I have had way toomay people I know die from drugs.  I want to stop it.  I live pay check to pay check... but want this nonsense of killing American's to end.  what is this costing me?
I think he meant feed his pride...
President Trump.  5 billion dollars for a wall.  What is it going to cost me to help fund this?  I have had way toomay people I know die from drugs.  I want to stop it.  I live pay check to pay check... but want this nonsense of killing American's to end.  what is this costing me?
Majority of people think immigration is a big issue, that does not mean they support the wall. Majority of Americans DO NOT SUPPORT THE WALL. https://www-m.cnn.com/2019/01/08/politics/polls-trump-shutdown-wall/index.html?r=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.google.com%2F&rm=1The majority of Americans are against Trump on the wall and the shutdowncnn.com
https://www.cbsnews.com/news/cbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall/
https://www.bustle.com/p/most-americans-oppose-trumps-border-wall-blame-him-for-the-shutdown-polls-show-15722768
https://www.kmov.com/news/most-americans-don-t-support-building-the-wall/article_3abcedd2-0526-11e9-9145-df9678debc22.html
https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/trump-americans-support-border-wall_us_5c2e9aaae4b05c88b70798d1
https://thehill.com/homenews/administration/423099-poll-majorities-oppose-trumps-wall-funding-demand-call-for-compromise
https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2019/01/08/facts-donald-trumps-border-wall-address-nation-immigration-shutdown-column/2503981002/
https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/03/subset-subset-americans-whom-trumps-wall-stubbornness-is-catering/
Just because Trump calls all the media outlets fake news doesn't make what he says true.   "The party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command." - Orwell, 1984  And yet so many run like lambs to slaughter behind this President. Open your eyes, open your hearts. The enemy is not outside our borders, it's sitting in the White House.
Help me feed my family college degree and u take so much taxes out my checks i can barley pay my bills and feed my baby
But..But..But you said They would pay for it not us..
If you have to declare marshal law
Build the wall, President Trump!
Build that wall keep us safe.
More about the wall they need those votes
your promise was Mexico would pay for the wall
Just because Trump calls all the media outlets fake news doesn't make what he says true.   "The party told you to reject the evidence of your eyes and ears. It was their final, most essential command." - Orwell, 1984  And yet so many run like lambs to slaughter behind this President. Open your eyes, open your hearts. The enemy is not outside our borders, it's sitting in the White House.
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Public Safety Announcement & LIE - Do NOT take a shot of alcohol every time Trump lies during Speech. Oh my goodnesses, that’s dangerous...Anyway, here’s a chart proving that there is no emergency along Southern Border.   https://www.rawstory.com/2019/01/trumps-called-border-crisis-can-disproven-one-chart/
Yes president Trump build that big beautiful border wall!!!!
Never has a low brow been elected to such an esteemed position.
.... Democratic leaders respond to Trump's address  https://www.cnn.com/videos/politics/2019/01/09/schumer-pelosi-response-president-trump-address-border-security-sot-cpt-vpx.cnn
Republicans had both houses for last two years. Why didn’t you build the wall then?
Looking forward to your speech tonight. All In.
Demoncrates. Are for the money and not the people
Keep going Donald....you are doing great. God put you there, and us with you. You got this.
You already voted that Mexico will pay for the wall!
We understand what is going on.  Stand strong against them.  Their leader is Satin.
your promise was Mexico would pay for the wall
We understand what is going on.  Stand strong against them.  Their leader is Satin.
If Mexico is "paying for the wall through the USMCA", then why the hell did you shut the government down, Comrade DRUMPF?
Impossible Trumps entire family are Jewishh
You already voted that Mexico will pay for the wall!
Impossible Trumps entire family are Jewishh
Bob Hawley Mexico don’t had money🤦🏼‍♀️
Edward Odine well we’ll
Neither do we. Have you seen how many trillions of dollars of debt these drunken sailors have run up?
Elizabeth Navarrete Ponte then you and the 22,7% of the voters that's left of the people who still want the wall can start emptying your piggy banks and pay for it yourselves So that means from the 135.7M voters just 30.8M people still want the wall... if you all collect 185 each then you can start building the wall... for now, but in the coming years you must pay that again because the wall is going to cost more than 50B + maintainance
If Mexico is "paying for the wall through the USMCA", then why the hell did you shut the government down, Comrade DRUMPF?
In the name of Jesus build the Wall.
Yes thank you Mr President for making us safe
we "the people" voted for him because he will build that wall!!
They want to stop him from building the wall at all costs. Itd guarantee his win in 2020
Steady the course Mr. President the horizon is close.
When the US military rapes the borders of other countries. Waiting for border security in America is ridiculous.
Sure our President Trump's will do with out his pay. Start at top and next.....Congress.
Elizabeth Navarrete Ponte then you and the 22,7% of the voters that's left of the people who still want the wall can start emptying your piggy banks and pay for it yourselves So that means from the 135.7M voters just 30.8M people still want the wall... if you all collect 185 each then you can start building the wall... for now, but in the coming years you must pay that again because the wall is going to cost more than 50B + maintainance
I’m with you President Trump please don’t cave on this issue
It’s obviously just a power-play. Don’t give in!
STOP YHE PAYCHECKS OF ALL IN OFFICE.
Keep up the good work Mr. President Sir...
Build the wall Mr President.  Don't back down
Build the wall!  Stand strong Mr. President, your base supports you!  #MAGA
Human trafficking of any kind should propel everyone to support all border security measures!
They only want to stop it to make trumps base mad at him
Those democrats are jeopardizing our future by their selfish and self center behaviors. Those democrats are protecting their own egos and do not care about the American citizens. Everyone in this country is going to suffer because a few people at top refuse to admit they are wrong.
Stand strong we must fire all the Democrats in white house
Sure our President Trump's will do with out his pay. Start at top and next.....Congress.
Stand strong we must fire all the Democrats in white house
Please stop the goverment shutdown i need things from the irs to start school i have to start feb 25th if they dont open by then i wont be able to start school.
Donald J. Trump
Those democrats are jeopardizing our future by their selfish and self center behaviors. Those democrats are protecting their own egos and do not care about the American citizens. Everyone in this country is going to suffer because a few people at top refuse to admit they are wrong.
I know that you hate being laughed at.....so lol!!!!!! 🤬🤣😂🤥🤮
What is more important to the president ...saving America? Or saving his pride?
Congress has "debated" long enough. It's time for results! Keep the government closed until they resolve this crisis. My family and I will sacrifice while I wait for my paycheck.
What is important to Democrats is to do nothing for the American people. They love power and money.
Great job last night mr President, unfortunately the media will distort the facts and the truth 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
love trump and how he loves his country be strong. what happened to the me too movement not going after gangs coming into country defending women
I am concerned about the future of America...say 20 years from now. I know you won't be there but the seeds you have sown will surely hurt your base more severely
votes, dems want votes, to the detriment of U.S. border security.
Learn from Europeans mistake...secure the border!
Donald J. Trump
Just. Build. It. Get money from elsewhere and do it!!!!
I dont know anyone who wants a wall just saying
Build the wall and stop paying and giving benefits to these politicians who are not doing their jobs.
BUILD OUR WALL. GOD ONLY KNOWS WE NEED IT. 💘AMEN!!!!
If you worked with the Democrats and opened your mind, you would see that wall is useless and a waste of money.  You would also see that a wall on the border would cost way more than 5 or 7 billion....
Anything you want or propose, they will try and stop.  As Mr. Graham said,  they still can't get over that YOU won
I WISH HE COULD FIRE! ALL OF THESE OVER PAID AND UNDER. PERFORMING FOOLS!
The Democrats don’t care what the issue is, they just want to make you look bad.  I support your agenda, but please stop the tweets.  They are mean spirited and divisive.  Your policies are refreshing and I love being able to hear from you directly on your Facebook page.  But your tweets are not good for anyone.
Keep on don’t give in to those losers that are driven by hate and if they weren’t in the government they wouldn’t no what to do . Lol you stick to it me. President you got this and god has you!
He’s the bankrupt proven liar but we’re the ones with the fake information? 45 was right about one thing, he could shoot someone on fifth avenue and they wouldn’t care. He’s got them in the bag! Glad I’m not one of his cult members!!
Learn from Europeans mistake...secure the border!
Take Pelosi down there and drop her off on the Mexico side to walk to town there. I guarantee she will we welcomed with open arms for one reason only and then they will kill her. Why do we have to open Our arms to everyone.
Let's do it steel wall transparency is great too 😎😅
You campaigned on the promise Mexico would pay for it.Make your word right for the first time in your life
Yes we want the wall. Take the Democrats walls and fences down.
Legalizing medical marijuana on a federal level
Nope not at all!!! To that hate wall!!!Not this American Donnie!!! Anybody else???
We want the wall or steel fence or what ever will keep out intruders.
Fulfilling your promise that Mexico will pay for it?
This is what needs to be done:  https://www.whitehouse.gov/briefings-statements/white-house-framework-immigration-reform-border-security/
No you promised Mexico would pay for it so it’s not the Dems fault you lie
He’s the bankrupt proven liar but we’re the ones with the fake information? 45 was right about one thing, he could shoot someone on fifth avenue and they wouldn’t care. He’s got them in the bag! Glad I’m not one of his cult members!!
Build the wall! Protect our citizens and God bless you Mr. President!!
Lead by exuctive order.  Ram it down their throats
We stand with you Trump! Don't give up,  don't give in. Leave the government shut down til we get the wall!!!
Yes we do we Americans want the border secure your right Mr President. I am so glad I voted for you.
Start paying our men you sent to stop the caravan that never showed up and let the ones re up that want to your not helping are military your your cutting are throut just like Johnson did.
Declare national emergency and build the wall. Then, open the government. If you open the government before the wall is funded and construction started, you’ll never get it done.
Secure the border! They're against you regardless of what you do!!!
I do not support the president in building a wall. It is our corporations that is attracting the illegals. But most of all I am not raciest and believe in a free America not walls to protect me but my belief in jesus teaching. Jesus would never build a wall around the this country even tho we are becoming less free day by day...
Just called my senator Johnny Isaakson  Left message to support our border wall.
trump had a deal twice and he backed out.  A long court battle will ensue if he tries to do it all by himself with his pen.  Threats and lies aren't working
No you promised Mexico would pay for it so it’s not the Dems fault you lie
trump had a deal twice and he backed out.  A long court battle will ensue if he tries to do it all by himself with his pen.  Threats and lies aren't working
Make the wall out of see through bulletproof type glass with auto steel shutter panels that can be closed if needed for additional strength..  The border patrol is safe and can see whats happening on other side too.
Ginger LaConte agree
Maria Peterson Before I forget, I will be at my oncology appt this Friday is you need facebook.com/lacontefarms honey!
Maria Peterson Oh ok, hope everything is ok, I won't be back until Feb appt prob around same time.
Ginger LaConte ok thank you. I’ll sure will need some then!!!!
Just called my senator Johnny Isaakson  Left message to support our border wall.
Ginger LaConte ok thank you. I’ll sure will need some then!!!!
The wall works in Israel, I'm with you Mr. President!👍
Maria Peterson Oh ok, hope everything is ok, I won't be back until Feb appt prob around same time.
😂😂😂😂 it doesn’t matter what you do we will be the mayoralty in a couple of years lol 😂 have fun learning Spanish ❤️😛
Stopping you fulfilling any promises.  #FundTheWall
Democrats only want to go against our president they can't stand the fact that a business man can run the country better than a politician  he's been right all along  thank you Mr President
The employee's  can draw unemployment  and food stamps.  And they will get back pay later!
"Mexico will pay for the wall!" Democrats are not stopping this from happening!
Makes me so angry because all they want to do is see you fail. You've already proven yourself. Job well done. Thank you President Trump🇺🇸
Love you Donald.  Keep up the good job
We love Israel
President Trump put the  debate with Congress on TV so the American  people can see the discussion in Congress!!!
We need the wall. They say you're inciting fear,  the fear is they know the wall has to be built.  Fearful of losing noncitizen votes. Keep inciting fear.
Pretty much arguing with a wall at this point. Let em argue with the border wall!!!
The wall is going to be a money pit and end up being an abandoned waste of money. Everyone keeps neglecting the cost of up keep for that thing on top of all the lawsuits for commandeered land and encroaching on endangered species lamd
Their object is to stop YOU at all costs, and at every turn.  They want border security, but not from YOU.  They want a wall, but not from YOU.  They want safe streets, but not from YOU.  They want a better economy, but not from YOU.  They want everything YOU have given them, but will never acknowledge it because, it came from YOU.  They hate YOU so much, it will be their downfall.    Mr. Trump - stick to your guns.  NO compromise.   BUILD YOUR WALL.
It should be a proper wall, the same as Great Wall of China, with viewing platforms, tourism attractions around it, visible from the Moon.. One day people will want to visit it..
Keep it shut until you build that wall we are with you till the end
A wall might not solve it why not have guards in towers or somthing that doesnt cost as much but gets ths point across.
Put an electric fence at the top of the wall and be done with it
Declare a state of emergency and get the wall built! Fake news isn't interested in all the insane things going on at our border.
Gotta love people living up north, talking about the southern border. Makes sense.
Ramen noodles for everyone!!!!
I want boarder security and the elected officials to work together for the good of this country.   It’s not about their own political agenda or political views.   Stop fight with each other and get to work.  The people have spoken, build the wall, stop illegals from coming in.
Demi are showing how hateful they are.  Such great Christians.
I hope someone is airing the speech live tonight on FB. My ATT Uverse went out during the Alabama game last night and won’t be restored until tomorrow!
I noticed you stopped referring to it as The Wall. Is that because Democrats have consistently advocated for other forms of security?  Because anyone with any sense knows A Wall is a colossal waste of money?
How exactly are the Democrats stopping your promise that Mexico would pay for a wall?
All they want is to stop the Pres. From doing anything  !!!
Put an electric fence at the top of the wall and be done with it
Democrats make me sick with their ignorance. I cannot grasp their way of thinking. Gain some knowledge about what's coming into the U.S. through illegal immigration. #BuildtheWall 🇺🇸
I think the majority of them do want a wall.   The squeaky wheel don't want it but they never poll a sufficient number of average Americans to know what they want.   Regardless, thankfully we are not governed by polls and popularity.
Stand firm sir..get that wall built..keep government shut down going until they adhere to border security!
They only care about not letting you win!
Stopping you from succeeding in anything you do...they just want the power back so they can continue to screw the American people and line their  pockets.   100% behind you....BUILD THE WALL
People need to stand up to the government. Stop letting the government decide how much money they can take from us.
Don't let the media or Dearest mama Nancy ever make you believe we are not with you Preaisent Trump We are with you all the way
We the People will build the wall in spite of all the goodies We will not back down ever
All they want is to stop the Pres. From doing anything  !!!
Dont give up until the wall is built!!!!
Sorry but worry about paying our people who have recieved no checks. Worry about the millions who depend on food stamps and are not receiving them first. To add value to this nation you need to impact the most lives and give back. Right now this wall is distracting you from carring for our own people in the short term why are we starving folks over this? This isnt a political statement anymore the American people are actually suffering.
Whats wrong with you if he shuts up where woukd u be?he doesn't need money he is fightin for us..and you like it or not
God bless and protect you president trump.AMEN!
A balanced budget. Isn't that another of your broken promises?
I have a solution for the border wall issue. While I'd love a wall, and I think it would be effective, I have an idea since it appears no one can budge.  Part 1. Shut the border Part 2. Request 160K acres from Mexico to borrow for a temporary period of the next 6 years. Part 3. Work with Mexican authorities to build holding facilities(cages with barbed wire) in that 160K acres. Part 4. Work with Mexican authorities to fund and staff a holding facility for the people trying to get in. Part 5. Then, put a suggestion box in the registration building for people to turn in their applications for either asylum or citizenship. Part 6. Ask said people to please be patient while we process your paperwork.
One problem, it's one border and it's land based; there are also a lot of things get through the I-5 corridor which already has things in place to stop them. . .😂🤣😂🤣
So do Democrats you lying ‘tool.’
Beyond every point now..my President can't back down or he'll lose face..I think everybody understands that stance.,..MAGA
We the People will build the wall in spite of all the goodies We will not back down ever
Beyond every point now..my President can't back down or he'll lose face..I think everybody understands that stance.,..MAGA
Can you please just open the government again? Lol
So do Democrats you lying ‘tool.’
U said Mexico would pay for it!!!!!
We are with you President Trump
America first should be the theme to bring everyone together
Yes we want the border. You have many behind you.
Yes we do and we support u for standing for the good of Americans
I want the border wall. Having said that you said Mexico would pay. Now we have to do so which I have no problem with except that Senate and Congress, let's just say Capital Hill should be shut down NOT the American workers! They make a lot of money with no regard to us and they still take home a paycheck!!
We're so disgusted with the democrats in Washington.  Shumer and Pelosi are crazy and they're making decisions!!! Aren't there any good democrats out there who will stop being led by these two crazies?
Alot of americans have your back! Maybe we can get companies to donate the materials you need for the wall and have volunteers to help build it.  Im sure you know alot of people Mr.  President that may help.  Im sure americans will be happy to volunteer to build it
Stay the Course Mr President..
Derrick Dupuy Please tell Nancy and Chuck...
Americans want border security. We are with you President Trump.
Joshua 1: 9 Reina-Valera 1960 (RVR1960)  9 See that I command you to be strong and courageous; Do not fear or be dismayed, for Jehovah your God will be with you wherever you go.
Build it...tired of excuses not to build, tired of the lawlessness of those that take advantage of a wall not being there !
Executive order term limits for all politicians!
We should work it out with mexico &  move wall to their southern border.
Your doing a great job Mr President. Stand strong and keep making America great again
Once Again! My support from Panamá. The good people in the U.S. are more than those awful democRATS. MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!
Americans want border security! Keep doing what your doing! Build the wall #Trump2020
Build the wall and make cannabis legal again!2020!
Stay the Course Mr President..
Build the wall! However, if those who oppose it want to be fair and do what the people really want put it to a vote by the American people. Make every legal vote count. Give a deadline and make states hold a special vote. Or make it where all legal registered voters vote online using their voter registration i.d. link it to vital statistics so that the dead and illegal aren't voting and so that no one can vote more than once.
Your promise was Mexico would pay.
Do whatever you need to do. Don't give the damn Democrats anything .
JUST DO IT MR. PRESIDENT...THE POWER OF THE PEN WORKS...
Mr. President can you also make sure Polosi and shummer are on the other side of that beautiful wall! They're not Americans!!!
Maybe , do the unexpected...you give something to the Pelosi gang extend your good intentions first? Then emplore the people?
Secure our borders! Stand strong; be wise. Surround yourself with people you can trust; people that have a good moral compass. God bless you and strengthen you and guide you.
Build the Wall! Praying for you and our great country!
Mr President.  I think you should ask Chuck and Nancy what they would do if a illegal killed one of their loved ones
You Rock President Trump!! We need all them Democrats outta there!! Life would be so Much easier if they were!! God Bless You Mr. Trump!!
Build the wall and make cannabis legal again!2020!
Thank you President Trump!
We love u Trump.  Please make America great again
Grocery stores had a run on Fabreze today.
Just because they won't give you your way means their motive is anti Donald, get over yourself
Wall necessary for safety. DJT is right.
KEEP GOING MR. PRESIDENT!!! We need you and we need the wall!!!!!!
Ever y home in Mexico has a wall around it. Look on my page i post the photos.
President Trump call for a special vote and let the people speak!! We can not support the world and we shouldn't have to! BUILD THAT DAM WALL!
Thank you President Trump for standing strong for the border security.
You Rock President Trump!! We need all them Democrats outta there!! Life would be so Much easier if they were!! God Bless You Mr. Trump!!
Thank you President Trump for standing strong for the border security.
Retiring border chief slams Trump's campaign promise to build a wall claiming it's a waste of time and taxpayer money   https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trumps-border-wall-waste-time-money-retiring-border/story?id=44978156Retiring Border Chief Calls Trump's Wall a Waste of Time, Moneyabcnews.go.com
Jerod Lazan https://www.waynedupree.com/former-border-chief-defends-trump/?utm_source=facebook&utm_medium=social&utm_campaign=tpi
Lisa Bond https://m.dailykos.com/stories/2017/2/25/1636987/-Texas-Republicans-do-not-want-Trump-s-stupid-border-wall-because-it-is-stupid
President Trump call for a special vote and let the people speak!! We can not support the world and we shouldn't have to! BUILD THAT DAM WALL!
There is enough protection at the wall now. Democrats want to open the government so 800.000 can get paid specially the ones whom work at the border it would backfire if they abandon their jobs and let border open !!
Dear Mr. President,  You’ve my full support. However, you failed in tonight’s address, it’s illegal vs legal immigration! Invaders enjoying freedoms that our elders are NOT experiencing. It’s about the approximate $5,000 per month, illegals receive over our elderly and citizens! It’s a dollar for dollar. Do it LEGALLY!!!!
Nancy's number (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck's (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020
You have our prayers President Trump!
Use your own money to fulfill your promise if you want it so badly. Since you can relate to how you left Gov employees unpaid. You should have no problem losing some of your own money. What you dont like ramen noodles. I'm sure you will get by
Don't back down Mr. President. Build the wall. Thank you for your service and protection.... God bless you
Show me the numbers! Everything I have seen or heard says that the MAJORITY of Americans do NOT want this proposed monstrosity, while they DO want border security. If all you believe is the Trump supporters, of course they wan the wall. It’s what (their) god has commanded.
A barrier stops the streaming in their tracks. Without a barrier how do you stop people? Can't shoot.
Lisa Bond https://m.dailykos.com/stories/2017/2/25/1636987/-Texas-Republicans-do-not-want-Trump-s-stupid-border-wall-because-it-is-stupid
A barrier stops the streaming in their tracks. Without a barrier how do you stop people? Can't shoot.
Mexico you said is going to pay for it!
Craig why don't you just sit back and enjoy the ride!
Show me the numbers! Everything I have seen or heard says that the MAJORITY of Americans do NOT want this proposed monstrosity, while they DO want border security. If all you believe is the Trump supporters, of course they wan the wall. It’s what (their) god has commanded.
The problem is not the people coming in illegally, but the people who are already there.
I  want  border  security!  Its obvious  they  just  want  to  fight  you  on  everything,  they  been  doiing this  from  the  very  beginning. They  are  making  it  easy  for  me  on  the  next  election.
Mr. Trump will get Kate's wall built and will solidify his legacy and live the rest of his life with peace and happiness
Build the wall, Mr President.
I want the wall contrary to what the democrats say.
Build the wall! That was chanted by hosts of your supporters during your campaign! We really want this! The other chant was "Lock her up!" We'd really like to see that one, too!
Haha no, they want help you stop lies
Oh that's an easy question . STOPPING  YOU.
Craig why don't you just sit back and enjoy the ride!
Oh that's an easy question . STOPPING  YOU.
Be nice if you’d open government offices back up so I could buy my house
Jill Travassos huh
Haha no, they want help you stop lies
People living  on east coast   do not no  what life is like there build the wall  remember to put Christmas LIGHTS on it
I think that one's obvious to Stevie Wonder!
GREAT speech Mr. President!!!  Stay STRONG.  Keep the Shutdown going!  WE are with you!!  BUILD THE WALL!
Shut down the Border  Do Not waiver
Time to wake up!!!!  https://youtu.be/bQoPOY0t8Hw
I'm jelous you have MR TRUMP, we have Trudeau dancing sock boy. Boohoo.
Stopping you from doing anything, like a bunch of little kids, remember those days when you were a 5,6 year old and that was your mentality-then a lot of us grew up and some didnt
Hey President; it's not "you", it's "us."  You are our AGENT.  When they come against you, they come against the whole TRUMP TRAIN.  I've read the Bible: we WILL NOT be defeated.  The crash and burn of Pelosi and crew will be dramatic and sudden, just like Korah.
I'm so proud to call you my President!! I think congress is wrong!! We need the wall and more importanly we need you President Trump. Your the best president since as far back as I can remember. Keep us the great work and dont get discouraged. God bless you!!
Jill Travassos huh
East Tennessee here build that wall 👍
I'm with wall if I'm not paying. You suck
How about having all the other 99% of the government working?
American people want security for all other international borders particularly planes coming from South East Asian countries, not just from Mexico.
Promise.  I thought the promise was Mexico paying for a wall
Republicans need to stand tough TOGETHER be REPUBLICANS for the people
Dont give in Mr. President! You are courageous! You're doing the right thing for our country!
You mean you can’t fulfill your promise and want Americans to pay for your empty promises why aren’t u making the Mexican pay like u said
I'm so proud to call you my President!! I think congress is wrong!! We need the wall and more importanly we need you President Trump. Your the best president since as far back as I can remember. Keep us the great work and dont get discouraged. God bless you!!
You mean you can’t fulfill your promise and want Americans to pay for your empty promises why aren’t u making the Mexican pay like u said
But the promise was that Mexico would pay? 🤷🏼‍♀️
Amanda Smith ummm oh well🤷‍♂️
Matt Smith  but I’m confused. He said Democrats are stoping him from fulfilling his promise? But his promise was that Mexico was going to build the wall?!
Stay Strong!! Everyone already knows their agenda.
Wall. We want illegals stopped. Too much of our money to support them. And foreign aid is outrageous too
Senator Ted Cruz has introduced a bill to have El chapo pay for the wall with drug money. Why this hasn't been done yet?
Build the wall don't stop until they give u the wall
Sir may you live to fulfil your promise to the people of America . You have benn a good president and I pray for more wisdom , and grace of God upon you in Jesus name
The ONLY thing they care about it defeating you, Trump.
Build the wall!  Libs will fight everything Trump wants.
I'd say put some budget in there for motion cameras.
I am under the president is trying to enforce laws congress has already put into law in 2006
Take a look at "World Navigation 3D Maps : Route Traffic" https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.gps456.tracker17.navigator3
Matt Smith  but I’m confused. He said Democrats are stoping him from fulfilling his promise? But his promise was that Mexico was going to build the wall?!
Take a look at "World Navigation 3D Maps : Route Traffic" https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.gps456.tracker17.navigator3
Donald J. Trump does congress still get paid during a shut down? You are so right in saying most of them have fences or protection around their mansions so what is the difference? Also they brought up spending on equipment adding man power who do they think will pay for this? It’s not about a wall for them it’s about getting their way!
Jan McClendon Carter u got that right. They continue to get their pay & it’s not right.  Others are having to do without. We the people are the ones that put them in office & we just have to sit aside & let those scum bags do what they want, but something is going to have to give & some things need to be changed in Congress.
I am under the president is trying to enforce laws congress has already put into law in 2006
Stand firmly behind President Trump. The only president that is actually doing what he campaigned on. Whatever he hasn't done is due to obstruction from democraps and looney liberals.
the most anoying thing is having to reason and fight fools
You wouldn’t live in a house with no doors #Buildthewall
President Trump  them Democrats want the wall too , there just more worried about making you look bad and it’s a crying dam shame
Exactly right President Trump. It's called Trump derangement syndrome.
Very true....Some hate Trump more than caring about our country!
Apparently stopping you using any means necessary. We know the truth.
Jan McClendon Carter u got that right. They continue to get their pay & it’s not right.  Others are having to do without. We the people are the ones that put them in office & we just have to sit aside & let those scum bags do what they want, but something is going to have to give & some things need to be changed in Congress.
Apparently stopping you using any means necessary. We know the truth.
I hate labels but if we have to have them then I guess I’m a democrat. So let me tell you my answer to your question Mr Trump. You asked, so try listening. I would love for you to fulfill your promises!!! I keep trying to see good in what you’re doing. I want to be a fan of yours! But you never promised that we would pay for this wall. I don’t like the idea to begin with for a million reasons but I certainly don’t see our country funding it! We didn’t sign up for that. Your promise was that you’d build a wall and Mexico would pay for it. So do that. What’s more important to me? Working together to find a more reasonable solution which I’m sure is somewhere in the middle. Let’s take that money and apply it to actual crises. Border control let’s be honest is not a crisis.
Carolyn Davis  you need to check your facts. Drug trafficking is a national crisis. Human trafficking. Is real. The illegals entering our country are costing us billions of dollars annually. 1.2 billion alone just to house the illegals currently in our PENAL system. This is not including the impact to healthcare and the cost to feed and house them in our population.
Very true....Some hate Trump more than caring about our country!
“What’s more important to the Democrats? Stopping me from fulfilling another one of my promises or murder?”
God Bless you President Trump.
President Trump BUILD THE WALL !
Just build it, those two will never agree to anything the President  wants.
If they don’t want a wall tell them to let all all them people go live in their home
Looking  forward  to  your  address to  the  Nation  in  about  25 minutes.  I know  you'll have  a  lot  to  say.
Security without the wall perhaps.
I swear, I cannot believe the stupidity of this country...
Carolyn Davis  you need to check your facts. Drug trafficking is a national crisis. Human trafficking. Is real. The illegals entering our country are costing us billions of dollars annually. 1.2 billion alone just to house the illegals currently in our PENAL system. This is not including the impact to healthcare and the cost to feed and house them in our population.
Yes we do want border security and go to those who voted for you and we will donate money for your border security and then tell Congress to stop acting like a child worse than a child they child has more common sense than those than those than are in there now!!!!!
$46 Billion was already giving to the Democrat for the border where is it the $$$?? Trump is only asking 5 Billion  And the democrat is giving him a problem.  https://www.westernjournal.com/ct/2006-dem-senators-voted-50-billion-border-fence-2013-bigger/?utm_source=facebook&utm_medium=thenewvoice&utm_campaign=can&utm_content=2019-01-08
May God grant strength, wisdom and protection to our Pres. T.  It has been too many years since America has a leader like our Pres.  who has worked selflessly to repair the damage done by last admin.People had forgotten what an authentic President was like and therefore rinos refuse to appreciate what we have.  Those who love what America was built on...honoring God and Country...are grateful for our Pres. T.
Mr President stop everybody's pay until the Democrats come to their senses n that includes them. This has gone to far the Democrats are getting more people upset w our President so they get more votes next election He needs to go over their heads n put a stop to this nonsense.  Build the wall!
We need to help our own American citizens first and protect them. Securing our borders when I wall is the first line of the defense. Own citizens are facing epidemics across the country with losing their jobs and becoming homeless. We need to help our citizens first and not the legals tried to come in.
They are a total embarrassment to we the people our nation and the world!
i believe in what donald trump has done and what he is doing keep fighting for the american people and and why not make congress pay for the wall with there wages they sure make enough money they can afford it since they dont want to sign a bill for it
Just take the money and make it disappear so we can have our wall.  Obama was good at making money vanish.
Does the question even need to be asked about what the Democrats want?
Build That Wall President Trump 💖
Does the question even need to be asked about what the Democrats want?
I think you are looking for legacy. Do what pleases you so long as it doesn't infringe on others.
That was Obama the muslim terrorists lover you thinking of . He left a legacy alright lol .
Just take the money and make it disappear so we can have our wall.  Obama was good at making money vanish.
That was Obama the muslim terrorists lover you thinking of . He left a legacy alright lol .
You need to get off your high horse and open up the gov't..stop holding us  USA citizens hostage by denying our paychecks and tax returns and our food supplements to fund a wall we dont need!!! Your delusional you lie about the numbers and fabricate falseness If you must have it so damn bad..pay for it out of your pocket not mine!!!
It not trump that wants the wall its america.... The government can stay shut down.... federal employees knew this could happen when they signed the employment papers....  Most of us dont get tax returns....  did you know #jayinslee blew 50 billion this year already..... with nothing to show for it.... https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1852251838156838&id=100001161185330  Also another large part of the problem is government dependancy... instead of people needing support how about you work on the cost of things and question why its so high...
Well then be my guest and pay for it out of your pocket not mine because I dont think a wall or barrier is the answer especially when there are tunnels and other ways that they will come in..if they are truly desperate enough to come in illegally... nothing will stop them..
I think you are looking for legacy. Do what pleases you so long as it doesn't infringe on others.
My FAMILY will back you STICK TO YOUR GUNS Mr PRESIDENT you your family and your Cabinet are in our Prayers
The Americans also need to be paid. I am all for the wall but not at the expense of Americans suffering
So let's take all the money confiscated in drug crime and apply it to the wall. Send all drug fellons to the other side of the wall and save the money it takes to care for them in prison to patrol the boards. Build the wall
Build the wall.   We stand with you President Trump
Please do it we need it for the safety of America!!!!
What's the need of a President if all I have to do is take him to court  and win
Americans want to be paid.
Well then be my guest and pay for it out of your pocket not mine because I dont think a wall or barrier is the answer especially when there are tunnels and other ways that they will come in..if they are truly desperate enough to come in illegally... nothing will stop them..
We are so Proud if you President Trump !
Build the Wall!!! Thank you Mr. President🙌 This family stands with you❤️🇺🇸
Dont give in a promise to us the people of America.
Tis truly amazing how little many Americans actually know about the deals and other decisions Rumps has made and actual results. And remember he lost the popular vote by almost three million votes, a record for a President.
Easy. Stopping u. Clear to me and the rest of the world.
Stop buying 600.00 hammers US Gov and spend the money on a wall!!
Keep it shut Mr Trump. You can’t trust Pelosi and Schumer.
Still with you Mr President!  I don't care what the libs say or do I will stand strong with my President!
I got a great idea. For all who are against the wall let’s create a separate tax pool for them and they can pay for all the bullshit it cost the rest of us and they can open their homes to them as well. Or build the wall. Anyone wanna take a guess which one they will pick?
This wall so needs to be built.  Not just any wall, one that will do what it is intended to do.  I realize there are many immigrants that want to come to this country, but it seems that most of them end up on Welfare and receive benefits.  If they want to come, do it legally!  Build the WALL now.
shmeer and pelosiesssss are so wrong ...
Don't cave Pres. They don't care about our country. Just staying in power is what they crave! Term limits!!!
The FEMA camps conspiracy theory holds that the U.S. Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) is planning to imprison US citizens in concentration camps.[1][2][3] This is typically described as following the imposition of martial law in the United States after a major disaster or crisis. In some versions of the theory, only suspected dissidents will be imprisoned. In more extreme versions, large numbers of US citizens will be imprisoned for the purposes of extermination as a New World Order is established.  The conspiracy theory has existed since the late 1970s but it has picked up greatly in popularity with the advent of the internet and social media platforms.[1]  About FEMA	Edit  Main article: Federal Emergency Management Agency FEMA is a United States government agency tasked with the effective management of major emergencies within the country, including ensuring the continuity of government during a large-scale disaster such as a nuclear war. It provides federal relief to areas afflicted by natural disasters.[4]  The precursor agency to FEMA was the Federal Civil Defense Administration established by President Harry S. Truman in 1950 pursuant to executive order #10186.[5]  FEMA was established in 1979 under executive order by President Jimmy Carter. It was established to coordinate the response to a major disaster that has occurred in the United States and that overwhelms local and state authorities.[6]  In 2002 it was finally codified into law and made a component of the Department of Homeland Security. As well as providing large-scale emergency-management, FEMA is also the largest flood-insurer in the United States, mainly because most private insurance companies don't offer flood-insurance.[7]  Proponents of the conspiracy theory argue FEMA's mission is a cover up for real purpose — to assume control of the United States following a major disaster or threat — and that the organization is 'the executive arm of the coming police state'
Stopping you, they look like 3rd graders at this point it’s hilarious. “Que liberal tears now”
How about the health care you said we have the day you took office. Better and cheaper Donny that's what you said, still waiting.
Take the House of Representatives pay away instead of a Government shut down. They are over paid and don't let them collect Social Security or any other benefits.
Feeling so secure MR.PRESIDENT  YOU  OUT SMART THEM EVERY-TIME .
also due what ted cruz wanted to due take the seiuzed drug money from mexico and pay for the wall there should be enough money from that and that means mexico would be paying for it
I got a great idea. For all who are against the wall let’s create a separate tax pool for them and they can pay for all the bullshit it cost the rest of us and they can open their homes to them as well. Or build the wall. Anyone wanna take a guess which one they will pick?
Mr. President, please stand your ground on securing our boarders. We are with you!!!
Can you be our Prime Minister Mr. President?
Mr. President, please stand your ground on securing our boarders. We are with you!!!
Marcus Bryant wtf are you on drugs
Larry Boydston well, god loves sinners so Trump must be loved
Marcus Bryant wtf are you on drugs
Yes we . Keep up the great work Mr. President. We have your back
Declare a national emergency and BUILD THE WALL. I'm for term limits to. Get them out.
Now lets focus on the goverment shut down
How about a wall of humans that get paid and  are more effective at stopping illegals from entering. 5 Billion would create a lot of jobs.
Americans don’t want the wall and you refuse to negotiate in good faith. So who’s the real one responsible for the government shutdown? You.
May i borrow money. I may not get paid this Friday due to the shut down but I’m still going to work each day.  I will need gas to continue to work with no pay and lunch and dinner is a nice extra.  I can move most of the items due this pay to then end of the month in hopes we get paid then but there are late fees for this humm, govt shut down.  Is there another idea?
What is more important to them is there new world order and death to America ... call on us to end them!
Larry Boydston well, god loves sinners so Trump must be loved
Sir please l beg u Mr president, for the sake of God. I love your administration in Usa. Mr president sir, l wish to be a citizen in American.
Build the wall. God bless you president trump. Make America great again. 👍
Just pay border patrol executive order that would make sense
Am in love with the administration of Mr president, Donald trump. Go ahead God is with you and ur family.
I mean it’s obvious that anything Trump tries to do, Libtards immediately resist.
It's personal Mr Trump it's only because it's you. Take away their checks until they agree to what the people want ,the wall.
I don’t even have to guess the answer to that question; it is obvious.
You are right Mr. President.. Thank you to keep up fighting for USA..
Is that the same fox news that caught you lying about statistics?
Pls Mr president, u can do all things through Christ that strengthens you. God is with you sir, l want visa to be in usa l am from Nigeria. This is my number, 07030426201.
What is more important to them is there new world order and death to America ... call on us to end them!
Pls Mr president, u can do all things through Christ that strengthens you. God is with you sir, l want visa to be in usa l am from Nigeria. This is my number, 07030426201.
Obama used executive orders on everything why can't trump?
Jaye Jay Trump signed more executive orders in his first year than Obama did in 8!  Check your facts
Is that the same fox news that caught you lying about statistics?
Thank You Mr President! Build The Wall !!
BUILD THE WALL!!! LET'S GIT'R DONE SON!!!!
We want the wall! Dems are crazy. They dont even make any sense at all.
Do what you need to do Mr Trump! Were with you!
I'm thrilled we have a President with an actual brain that works. So very thankful!
Keep sharing!!  https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Time to come together. Ditch politics. They smell! Time to take America back!
They just want to stop what your doing mr president.   That is all they care about
Jaye Jay Trump signed more executive orders in his first year than Obama did in 8!  Check your facts
I want border security and immigration reform. The same as every one of these Democrats did until they decided to take a more dictatorial route by looking to import a new party base and seeking to stuff future ballot boxes with illegal votes. You folks are everything you claim your political counterparts to be. Only worse.
The Democrats hate Trump more than they love America. ...so sad....
YES! But not a wall. The drugs are on the trucks.
56 percent of Americans do not want a wall, according to Fox News
fake news fake numbers no correct information was used during fox news
Stand your ground! That’s why we voted you in. We are behind you!
Actually, the numbers don't show it: The survey found that 56 percent of respondents do not support the president’s proposal to construct a wall along the southern border, compared to 44 percent who do.  Erecting a broad security barrier along the border is only slightly more popular, according to the poll. Only 46 percent of respondents support that proposal, while 54 percent oppose it.  A majority of U.S. voters surveyed, 58 percent, said Trump should withdraw his demand for the border funding, while 42 percent said the president “should not give in."
Lol. The left is in a frenzy now! # triggered. President Trump called the hypocrisy out and i loved it.   Note to Democrats, the country has spoken. BUILD THE WALL.
It’s more important for them to stop Trump from fulfilling his promise. If he wanted to plant a damn tree, they would find a reason to object to it and twist it into an attack against him.
We don’t want your wall, hurting so many people, and no longer to be our president because you are cruel, and all over a wall when other better suggestions have been made. You’re childish, a bully, and don’t listen like a spoiled child. Be helpful! Listen and learn. Stop hurting, destroying and hating people and lying.
They just want to stop what your doing mr president.   That is all they care about
Americans want their jobs back.
Stand firm!! Build the wall and keep us safe!! 2020 is in the bag!
Border security is imparrtive to keep All Americans SAFE.
Customer Appreciation Giveaway 🚨 26x14 Fuel Sledge Wheels 🚨 Starting today Wed Jan 2nd, 2019 ALL customers will receive one raffle ticket for every $250 spent with XTP. A winner will be drawn at the Dayton Offroad Expo on Sunday Feb 24th 2019. #giveaway #freewheels #appreciation #xtp  Visit Facebook.com/XTPdiesel
Here’s an idea no wall but if we catch them on our land shoot to kill every time no questions.
May God bless and protect you as you work to protect this nation!!!!!
Quit arguing and build the dam wall..We the Americans demand it or get your butt kicked out next term...We have had enough..
I want a border fence/wall built on the southern border. Don't listen to Chucky and Nancy. America first!
Democrats have given us 30 years of lip service on immigration  it's time for action no more discussions.
We don’t want your wall, hurting so many people, and no longer to be our president because you are cruel, and all over a wall when other better suggestions have been made. You’re childish, a bully, and don’t listen like a spoiled child. Be helpful! Listen and learn. Stop hurting, destroying and hating people and lying.
Stopping you at any cost. If you win they lose again.
Instead of a wall, how about a electrified fence...
If we don't build it "They Will Come"
Perhaps there are a few thousand Handy Manny’s waiting for asylum that can help build the wall?
The FCC has laws against using TV to purposely mislead the viewing public. I'll be calling them tomorrow after all of your lies are spoken tonight.
Your campaign promise was that Mexico was paying for the wall.  So why do you want billions from our govt  to lay for it
I thought Mexico paying for it was your promise? 💁🏼‍♂️
Border security > supporting illegal immigrants
Its not about political advantage.  Logically, building the wall is the wrong thing to do.  In this matter, breaking your promise is making the US tax payer pay for the wall.
What’s important is re-opening the government, not building an unnecessary wall.
Democrats have given us 30 years of lip service on immigration  it's time for action no more discussions.
We just want the government up and running. Do the right thing.
Get Mexico to pay for it like you promised.
Keep up the great work you are doing n we the people are standing with you. Build the wall. Prayers are with you. 😊🙏🏻
Protect Americans by giving the back their jobs back! You started it!
I don't like people not getting paid or on furlough but you have to stand your ground on this or the democrats will block you for the next few years. Stay the course, we are with you.
This is why he will be our president next term 2  Build the wall
Your promise was “Mexico will pay for the wall”
U just are trying to protect  your image..con man
President Trump. You are right. Americans want the wall. Nancy and Chuck are hypocrites. Please dont settle. Stand your ground. That is after all why we chose you. To fight back against the deep state and corruption in Washington.
You promised Mexico will pay for it! #veteran
What’s important is re-opening the government, not building an unnecessary wall.
You promised Mexico will pay for it! #veteran
Build the WALL!!!!  Please stay STRONG!!!
President Trump. You are right. Americans want the wall. Nancy and Chuck are hypocrites. Please dont settle. Stand your ground. That is after all why we chose you. To fight back against the deep state and corruption in Washington.
I'm a American and Trump has my vote to build the WALL and make the family's of the American people safe from the illegal immigration. The Democrats are refusing Define border security that is a fact and they have no remorse or sympathy for the victims that have been affected illegal immigration. The presidential debate that just went live to the whole nation just showed us that our government it's not for the American people and for themselves I'm with Trump 100% because he is not one of those lying cheating politicians that only care for themselves and how big their wallet gets.
Build the wall never forget the American people are with you
Yes, all of us we need SECURITY.  God bless you PRESIDENT  DONALD TRUMP.
I say mr president stand your ground build that wall
Hilary was right. Judging by these comments anf views... you are the deplorables
Just play some of Chuck's immigration speeches on prime time. You know the ones where he agrees with POTUS
Americans want border security
Build the WALL!!!!  Please stay STRONG!!!
Americans want border security
Ryan Allberry why don't we build the wall and and save 147.8 billion a year and house our vets and help the American citizens? Hmmm spend 5 billion to save 147.8 billion. Doesn't take a genius to figure that out.
It will cost around 70 billion, where are the actually statistics to prove that number and helping out vets has been a consistent problem for decades
Just play some of Chuck's immigration speeches on prime time. You know the ones where he agrees with POTUS
Keep fighting for our safety. This has gone to a ridiculous level and parties need to stop fighting you as OUR elected president and work to make our country safe and pay OUR employees. Thank you for what you do and for sacrificing your peace and for taking the hit for our country. We needed someone who isn’t a politician running our country and you have done this.  You have never pretended to be anyone different than who you are and as an American citizen that voted for you, I appreciate this character trait. Please stand strong and fight the good fight. Clearly Americans have spoken by raising the money we have. Thank you Mr. President and God bless you!
Yes we do sir! Build the wall and protect us!
Stand proud and with the people Mr President.
I hope it is worth it. Husband is out of work only working 3 of the 4 days. He works at the Truman Library. Maybe you could give us a loan. We support you and believe that we need a wall. Thanks for thinking of us and protecting us with this wall. They need to hurry up though we still have bills. (mortgage, utiltites etc).
Good luck tonight, Mr. President!! Me and my entire family are rooting for you and standing with you on the wall and the rest of your agenda. We are praying very hard for you every day. Give ‘em Hell, Sir!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
No one polled me and want the Southern border wall. Don’t believe 59% of All Americans don’t. I’m glad to hear the speech tonight. Dems are spewing hate language in their speech!
President Trump it's almost income tax time why don't you ask for donations when people file for their income tax. because I know a lot of people will be willing to do it and you can get the money for the wall that way. And the heck with the Democrat politicians
Mexico 're ready to pay for it!
It will cost around 70 billion, where are the actually statistics to prove that number and helping out vets has been a consistent problem for decades
Trump On Baby!!! BUILD THAT WALL, DO NOT CAVE!!!
I support you Mr. President through and through!!! Stick to your guns!!!
We know the answer to that question.
Arrest and try representatives that do not representatives the American people.
Show me where it allows for that in the Constitution.  Without it being Constitutionally binding, it would be a waste of time and money. Remember, Democrats have been promising  African Americans better schools, less crime, and more jobs to bring them out of poverty since the 1960s.
Build that wall. Stipulations: All US citizen workers and all materials Made in the USA!
Keep your promise President Trump
Stand strong President Trump, I am with you 100%!  Build the wall, we need it badly!
You haven't fulfilled 1...Make Mexico pay for your wall like you infactily  said & promised...was that a lie?
Take our country back President Trump!  We are behind you 100 percent!
Stopping you from keeping the promise you made. They are still upset about loosing and if you keep your promise it makes their politicians look bad.
Amen, go for the wall.   San Diego California supports you sir.
More important to them is stopping you.  Definitely do not care about American citizens.  And WHY should them be given air time?  They do not run this country  - are people afraid to tell them NO?
They only have one objective and its to be against the President in any way possible. They arent there for the people they represent. Its all about protecting the corruption they have had secreted from the people of our country. And it has gone beyond mere politics, but into a huge drive of hate pitting people against people, against law enforcement, against races, even the history of this country and more. I have respect for country and our President. He is there in office because people still believe in our country and someone like Mr.Trump that wants to make things better. He got there on his own, without any help, beyond the peoples' vote. Think how much could actually be accomplished for everyones betterment if they worked with him and give him the opportunity to work with them. It could become the greatest time in history for our country.
Build the wall President Trump!
Uhhhhh you said Mexico will be paying for it !!  #Dementia
We need this wall! Dems let the president have the funds he needs!
Thank you for standing up for Americans, Mr President! Build that wall!
You haven't fulfilled 1...Make Mexico pay for your wall like you infactily  said & promised...was that a lie?
Thank you for standing up for Americans, Mr President! Build that wall!
Good distraction from the real news. No collusion? 🤣  https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/justice-department/manafort-says-he-didn-t-lie-federal-investigators-n956276?cid=sm_npd_nn_fb_maManafort lied about sharing presidential polling data with Russiannbcnews.com
Brian, PROOF??
Thomas Sargent yes
We need this wall! Dems let the president have the funds he needs!
As soon as Mexico ponies up the $😀
I'm just here so I won't get fined....
The Democrat Party has not offered any other ideas or plans to solve the problem. They obviously are afraid that Trump will win again in 2020 that's why they wanna make it a Read My Lips promise broken.
This is the answer ! https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Army_Corps_of_Engineers
are they crazy americans need guns to protect ourselves from terroists this is crazy
Dont back down ever.... We The People want that wall
I have not seen either on the white house fb page or your personal pages the announcement about being on tv tonight to discuss state of the union national security/immigration issues.
Congress work for the people we sat bypass them open the polls and let the people vote on wall funding and any other funds they want to deem out in aide
Thomas Sargent yes
Congress work for the people we sat bypass them open the polls and let the people vote on wall funding and any other funds they want to deem out in aide
Americans want a president. Go home.
Nic, He is home for the next six years. Ha Ha
Thomas, I sincerely doubt he’ll last his full first term. By his own hand. Ha. Friggin. Ha.
I have not seen either on the white house fb page or your personal pages the announcement about being on tv tonight to discuss state of the union national security/immigration issues.
Thomas, I sincerely doubt he’ll last his full first term. By his own hand. Ha. Friggin. Ha.
No wall!! No shutdown!! USA needs a president!!
Nic, He is home for the next six years. Ha Ha
No wall!! No shutdown!! USA needs a president!!
Still waiting to see an impact on my taxes and you to "fix" health care, but you do what you do best and blame someone else for no progress.
You mean like how the reds worked so well with obama?
Dallas Smith Hey nephew sorry to bust your bubble but the blue is way way worse to our President  then we the reds were to Obama.
Americans want a president. Go home.
How about the wall around Ms Pilosis house
Take the aid 300M stopped from Pakistan and put Towards Wall !
Our priority is not WASTING 5billion on your vanity project that will do absolutely NOTHING to secure our border! You know what will? Paying our Border patrol, instead of making them work for zero pay
I believe you but what I can't believe is how many people are jumping ship because their behinds are too impatient to wait.Rome wasn't built in a day and this wall won't be either
The only thing the Democrats want to do is block President Trump's EVERY attempt to fulfill the very promises which got him elected to begin with.  They should be ashamed of themselves. The shutdown is on them.
Stop their pay and retirement benefits!
Well that’s a silly question!
Dallas Smith Hey nephew sorry to bust your bubble but the blue is way way worse to our President  then we the reds were to Obama.
Well that’s a silly question!
Americans want border security; they don't want some damn wall!  Democrats had funding for border security in every version of a bill they have tried to pass.  You, Mr. Trump, are the one who is keeping the government shut down, not the Democrats.  You said you would sign the bill that was presented, the bill that would have kept the government open.  Who is not fulfilling their promises??  YOU!!  And because you can't keep your word, 800,000 citizens are not getting paid, have to worry how they will feed their families and pay their bills, and some are being forced to work without pay.  We want border security, not some ugly wall that will keep us in like the Soviets did to their citizens.  Open the government!!
Diane Merlock-Felts Look we have to be documented why not them. We have they have birth certificates social security cards and other mean of ID.
Stop their pay and retirement benefits!
The commies want a sommunist state, illegal immigration is a means to an end.
Trouble is Congress has to vote for it. Fox watching the henhouse.
I'm confused as to why people think the wall is a bad idea? Anyone care to enlighten me on there opinion
WRONG... Americans want affordable healthcare, infrastructure improvements, and good-paying jobs.... JUST LIKE YOU PROMISED! You can take your wall and shove it!
I don’t know about this. We could improve the Rio Grande. We could make it similar to the Panama Canal. Continue the Rio Grande all the way to the Pacific. We could use it for water treatment and barges could ship goods
A Crisis or Problem.   The degree to the response would be much different in how you respond.  Example, If I showed up at the ER in a Crisis, I would expect to be seen immediately or with some degree of urgency.  But If I showed up at the ER with a problem they would advise me to make an appointment to see my local physician in a week or so.  So do we have a border problem?  Or do we have a border Crisis?  If it is a Problem, end the Gov’t shut down and take the time to develop a comprehensive plan to address border immigration at every border entrance.  If we have a Crisis, then open the Gov’t because a border wall will take years to build and will not address a Crisis which requires immediate attention.
everytime you solve problems,the middle class suffers...think carefully before taking action please...End Shutdown
Diane Merlock-Felts Look we have to be documented why not them. We have they have birth certificates social security cards and other mean of ID.
You can fulfill your promises with the government open. You not paying the ones that voted for you will cause them to vote differently in 2020.
build the wall, maintain border security, get rid of Nancy and Chuck
No wall for you! #FakePresident #LockTrumpUp
LET THE PEOPLE VOTE ON IT ; IT'S THE DEMOCRATIC WAY !
I'm ready to help. I have strength and lots of brains.
We need the wall. Our future will be bankrupt  if e don't stop letting them in
Mr. President is the report true that there is 14 billion seized from drug cartel Joaquin “El’Chapo” Guzman that could be used to fund the wall?   If so can we use it for your original plan for a concrete wall? Or is this fake news?
everytime you solve problems,the middle class suffers...think carefully before taking action please...End Shutdown
Mr. President is the report true that there is 14 billion seized from drug cartel Joaquin “El’Chapo” Guzman that could be used to fund the wall?   If so can we use it for your original plan for a concrete wall? Or is this fake news?
Why isnt mexico paying for the wall. Thats what mr trump promised?
John Fairbrother omg pay attention....they will be paying for the wall....they aren't gonna write a check for it in crayon like you people want....jesus do you know business at all
Tina Magaro Foust, I like John have not ‘kept up’, although I don’t think a cheque written crayon was ever going to feature. So how exactly are they going to pay for the wall??
We need the wall. Our future will be bankrupt  if e don't stop letting them in
Yes, build the wall, protect our borders!!!!!
Very simple logic,     The biggest reason why the libtards are against the wall is,     They think that if they succeed in stopping the wall, that all of Trumps base will leave him,      SURPRISE LIBS EVEN IF HE DIDN'T GET THE WALL BUILT HIS BASE WOULD NOT CHANGE ONE BIT,
Most Americans would be happy if you would just shut the hell up.
What do the Democrats want? Sanity in government would be a good start.
Stopping Trump is more important to Chuck and Nancy than doing the job they were elected to do.
Thank you President Trump.
Secure the Border i totally agree with you and the safety for the people and our children!
Hold the line Sir!  We have your 6!!!
Your darn right Donald. We do want a wall and hope you can knock some sense into those knuckleheads so they will give you the funding.
Tina Magaro Foust, I like John have not ‘kept up’, although I don’t think a cheque written crayon was ever going to feature. So how exactly are they going to pay for the wall??
Iam from canada and i want to see the wall .... stand strong and tall
Trump’s $5 billion is a laughable drop in the bucket for what would ACTUALLY be needed. For example, according to the Cato Institute: An estimate for a border wall area that only covered 700 miles was originally 1.2 billion. How much did it REALLY cost? SEVEN BILLION. And that’s only for 700 miles. Whatever we think it’s going to cost, experience shows us we have to multiply it by more than 500%
Why can't democrats be fired for grand standing ?when they vote no to the peoples security,they took a oath and sweated to God on the bible. Doesn't that have any meaning at all. Wait until they come up to your neighborhood !
It’s about stopping you so I would open the government and secure border without them they are going to try and stop you no matter the issue your President they’re not that’s what o would say
God put you there to stand firm for the good of the people of America. God bless President D. Trump.
You are my President. Thank You for your efforts President Trump!
The just want the space arou d them "dems" secure dont care about the pesents
Mr. President, do not back down! I support you.
They are all about stopping you Mr. PRESIDENT...we know it..we love you💕
Praying for God to give you the strength and wisdom to protect America. Thank you President Trump.
Your darn right Donald. We do want a wall and hope you can knock some sense into those knuckleheads so they will give you the funding.
Trying to take minds from the real issues has stopped working.  Your days are numbered child in chief.
Weird only pro trump comments with lots of likes at the top of the comments 🤔
How about 45 does good on his, "Mexico is going to pay for it" or even better, 45 can pay for it himself and anyone else who donated to GoFundMe. Idiots.
Your promise was Mexico will built the wall
Your not going to stop them with technology. Ask Israel.
They will always choose what is worse for America
I’m all for the border but how many congressmen are going with  out there pay like the hardworking citizens . Seriously.
We need door to protect all house so like wise we need wall to protect our nation or we Democrat should tear out their homes door so they will kno how they feel!
Remind the folks that God is on record for making asylum seeking refugee slaves from Egypt wait 40 years to enter the promised land.
Praying for God to give you the strength and wisdom to protect America. Thank you President Trump.
Remind the folks that God is on record for making asylum seeking refugee slaves from Egypt wait 40 years to enter the promised land.
Americans want their jobs back!! Open the government you fool
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
Trump wants a dictatorship
We need door to protect all house so like wise we need wall to protect our nation or we Democrat should tear out their homes door so they will kno how they feel!
All forms of entry, not just Mexico border.
Dems have painted themselves into a corner.  They cannot save face unless they make sure no wall gets built.  Even if it means the government stays in a partial shutdown for years.  Though he'd declare an emergency, a court would immediately rule he can't, and it would go to the supreme court which would say he can, and he'd built the wall with the military before "years" happens.  And we'd have a wall AND a partially-shut-down government!  Unless Schumer/Pelosi agree to lose face for the good of the country (and you know where freezes over while we're at it).
Build the wall. To much diversity in this country . it's called United states of America let's be united
Guess we just better build that wall !!!!
President Trump is a man of his word and democrats can't take that from him
I believe most of this democrat blocking the wall funding has fences on their homes, has locks on their door's, why blocking border wall for internal security
Yes it will. Kathy hope your not a dem. The president has done more than any other pres. He's keeping his promises. All the others talk bull.
Trump wants a dictatorship
Yes it will. Kathy hope your not a dem. The president has done more than any other pres. He's keeping his promises. All the others talk bull.
We do want a wall!!! Mr Presiden we stand with you! Stand firm until we get funding!
I believe most of this democrat blocking the wall funding has fences on their homes, has locks on their door's, why blocking border wall for internal security
I sand with you on Securing the Border Mr. President. What they did was inexcusable.
It’s like watching Shrek the movie in the scene where Fiona says “ohhh à talking donkey and Shrek responds ya it’s trying to make him shut up the key” DT you need a Golden Shower from the top of any wall
I can tell you why the Democrats wont deal with trump they are afraid if they do trump will brag that he won and make them feel like losers they care more about them selves and way they would look then they do about the American people to which that's why they where voted in to help Americans not them shelves . give trump the money quit playing these damn games with American lives .........
Border security is critical for a nations sovereignty. Period. Get it done ✅  #protectsouthernborder
Stop their paychecks. Stop their insurance stop their body gaurds. Stop everything until they agree
He is not the best president can't you guys see what's going on what he's doing to this country he lies about everything
+1 for Trump. The left has done what? At least he is keeping his promise trying to protect America. Enough is Enough. All the left does is talk, never follows through. $50B to other countries....????
Your promise was for Mexico to pay for the wall.
Ginger Snow yes we do.
Your promise was for Mexico to pay for the wall.
Wait until we have our government car the car that's generic that parts are interchangeable and easily upgraded yes upgrading two different style bodies years exedra
Just think of the money that could be made on upgrades you could give away a strip down model and get your money back on upgrades
Just think Obama gave away phones how about you make people earn cars a safe secure reliability with your name on it the Trump mobile
4k strip down 13 Inc tires  old jeep block you can salvage the blocks from junk yards
You can put the car on the Social Security account we all know we can get access to that account
More of a point system calculate the Good Deeds throughout the day
EMP resistant cars
You know as well as I know you don't want a bunch of stranded people
so it's either you fix the Auto industry are you just take it over
Whatever money we paid out that's that's payment for takeover taxpayers paid it give it give it back to us
+1 for Trump. The left has done what? At least he is keeping his promise trying to protect America. Enough is Enough. All the left does is talk, never follows through. $50B to other countries....????
A car that's interchangeable with engines and drive shafts electric gas diesel stick shift
The ultimate and economics affordability and accessibility four-wheel drive 6 wheel drive yes extendable drive shaft trailer rear ends
The car has to be set on a platform like Qanon Mopar  can run program
I'm not asking for a handout I'm asking for an easy way out something something simple and not complexed
The car has to be set on a platform like Qanon Mopar  can run program
Notice how Schumer looks us in the eyes, but did not look the president in the eyes in the meeting a few weeks ago! And Shcumer lies, so does Pelosi! Happy that you mentioned that many congressional and Hollywood types have walls around their homes Keep the shut down, build the wall!
The ultimate and economics affordability and accessibility four-wheel drive 6 wheel drive yes extendable drive shaft trailer rear ends
Keep doing the right thing for America and all of us who know and believe you are doing the right thing. Amen
Call and tell Nancy to pound sand.. Build the dam wall.
Literal shut down cause our government is too busy playing “who’s got a bigger dick” in the White House.
Please, secure that border!  May our living God be with you!
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for it.
How many times have the FBI or CIA advised a wall on the southern border?
Sign a Executive Order why we are shutdown you don't get paid.Put that in there plpe and smoke it !!!
Come live here and you’ll see that’s a fiction
they both looked like something from a horror movie with their creepy eyes!
Go nuclear on them....declare an emergency by executive order!
History is history real is facts he can protects all the people hes not Jesus or God trump no gimme shyt
I also just want to go back to work it's is not doing good for my house payment car payment and much more food ex
It isn’t about you Mr.President look at the drug money and who stands to loose the most. Sanctuary cities will go Bankrupt when you stop the flow of drugs and money..I love you
But democrats are saying to the public that you are lying!
I think we know the answer to that question..   stand tough President Trump !!  We are worth it !
Build the WALL the true Americans are with you President Trump, protect us and God will continue  to Bless you.
If they are right and we don't need a wall, then why do we need the TSA?
Love the job you are doing! Build the damn wall!
Come live here and you’ll see that’s a fiction
Love the job you are doing! Build the damn wall!
I want a secure nation. Every country had the right to protect itself. If you don't believe that why do people lock their doors? I remember a time we didn't until nighttime. If you don't believe in a border keep your doors to you home open 24/7!
If they are right and we don't need a wall, then why do we need the TSA?
Please secure the Border Mr. President!
Take a walk through the desert 🌵 please!
Israel's wall is considered to be a security barrier against terrorism, stopping waves of violence, and protecting it's citizens. Don't we as American citizens deserve to be protected also.
The only thing missing from this whole debate about the wall... Is not having Michael Moore chime in.
Doesn't matter what he would say,  want,  or propose.  Because it's him,  they'll fight it.  Anything he does they'll fight.  Sickening.  Keep it shut down.  Build it.
Praise God for a President who has the intestinal fortitude to protect us!!! This problem should not be a political issue to Politicians on both parties as they have made it for “ their  own Gain”! I am a supporter of immigration but people must do it the legal way!!! Built the wall President as we have too many problems created by open borders.
I don’t see any saying build a wall around Canada. It’s all BS.
The wall is the dumbest idea ever. They can still go over or under. A wall that cost 25.6 billion dollars make no sense. But what happen to Mexico paying.
I want a secure nation. Every country had the right to protect itself. If you don't believe that why do people lock their doors? I remember a time we didn't until nighttime. If you don't believe in a border keep your doors to you home open 24/7!
Stay strong Mr. PRESIDENT and dont gove in...build the wall
Do it like how it is at Area 51... with the buried sensors and lots of armed camodudes... effective and cost efficient.
They keep saying you arent doing what a normal President does, that's right that's why we are in the mess we are in, and they want more of the same? Really, you are here doing what you said so you keep on doing what got you elected and not what all the haters want. You will win, don't give in and I am still loving that Kelly Ann  called Jim  a smart ass today lol
I am for Trump, but wasn't his promise Mexico would pay for the Wall ?
STAND TALL MR PRESIDENT!! BUILD THE WALL!!!
If you lock them up they will learn quick, that prison wall work every time!
Why doesnt trump stop allowing the govt to send 5 billion a week to Afghanistan the govt your so gung ho for is the same one funding every war and allowing our service men and women to die everyday. Get real people.
Making sure ends meet and the domestic budget doesn't peak before the head of state hemorages more billions on overseas loans. He might want to consider offsetting the national debt with a threat to build a wall around Wall Street before they wreak more havoc on an overstretched economy thats rapidly running out of money.
Stand strong President Trump we are behind you all the way.
They complain the country is devided......they complain everything trump is doing is political. ......question when waa the last time a president addressed the nation and the other party immediately ask for tv time to rebut everything our president said. Have some respect mr schumer in mrs pelosi or atleast a little class. Political yes u made it political otherwise u wouldn't have jumped on tv right away
The wall is the dumbest idea ever. They can still go over or under. A wall that cost 25.6 billion dollars make no sense. But what happen to Mexico paying.
They just wanna go opposite what ever Republicans wants. Even knowing that will hurt American citizens, I am so confused. Why they have to do this ?
Stand firm sir, we must have the Wall.
I think you should finish your promise to drain the swamp first. Drain the swamp in all states. Then you won’t have any resistance.
all this garb with the democrats has given me an extreme insight. (((((((((GO PRESIDENT TRUMP)))))))))))))))
Keep up the great work President Trump!!!  We voted for this wall and you!!!
Build the wall Mr President! We stand with you !
Listen to Barack Obama speach and proposal of 2014 that was not supported, it is awesome.
We r behind u 100:/ luv u praying always! Build that wall....
For goodness sake build the dang wall. DEMS STOP EVADING THE POINT JUST TO SAVE FACE.
Americans want you out of the Oval Office and in prison.
They complain the country is devided......they complain everything trump is doing is political. ......question when waa the last time a president addressed the nation and the other party immediately ask for tv time to rebut everything our president said. Have some respect mr schumer in mrs pelosi or atleast a little class. Political yes u made it political otherwise u wouldn't have jumped on tv right away
Americans want you out of the Oval Office and in prison.
President Trump ! Take charge ! You know what we all want, so please do this ! Thank you, I respect you so much ! Thank you !
Nancy Rasner Duggan God long Red month than this Felon is History
WHAT ???
English please
Are you calling my President a felon ???
For goodness sake build the dang wall. DEMS STOP EVADING THE POINT JUST TO SAVE FACE.
American’s want Border Security and a Wall and obstructionist Democrats and Socialists want Open Borders. Dems don’t want Border security.
Trump we love you! And we are cheering u on! They are all just pissed cuz you will make things the right way in America and jealous because they couldn’t do what u do!!!!!
No we dont, we want the Gov open and working. I could care less about people coming here, I say welcome all.
Supporting President Trump all the way.....Mr President build that wall!!!!
Build the wall and drain the swamp !!
Declare Marshal Law! They can’t stop you!
Sir if that wall isn't built. Myself as well as many many others like me will become that wall
Mr President please don’t give up build our wall
Are you calling my President a felon ???
When will the democrats start working for the american people who put them in office? All they think about is there pay check. Wake up and start working with our pŕesident and for the american people!!
Obviously stopping President trump.  Their hate is palpable.
BUILD THAT WALL...Mr President.
WE ALL NEED TO CALL OUR CONGRESSMAN!!!! They work for us remember? Tell them to BUILD THE WALL!!!
It doesnt matter if your wall is of iron or concret, while you continue supporting coruption governments in some countries of C. A. Especially Honduras the people will continue leaving their countries. All the walls have been fallen.
That’s means some of thous lazy fat people before will start working in strawberry fields ,good job Don  I like that !
Please Build the WALL TALL and LONG Mr. President. Thank You!
I prefer God’s promises be kept! I don’t care at all about President Trump’s promise being kept. He’s just a man! God alone is wise!
Exactly. We must secure the Southern Border now more than ever. Times are more dangerous and drugs poor in daily.
Mr President please don’t give up build our wall
Exactly. We must secure the Southern Border now more than ever. Times are more dangerous and drugs poor in daily.
You are holding 800,000 American citizens hostage.  Return American government employees to work!!!!
I prefer God’s promises be kept! I don’t care at all about President Trump’s promise being kept. He’s just a man! God alone is wise!
You are holding 800,000 American citizens hostage.  Return American government employees to work!!!!
Border security? Ok. tRump wall?  No way!  Waste of money.
Dur durrrrrrp dur durp durp ok 🐒here have 🍌
Please Build the WALL TALL and LONG Mr. President. Thank You!
Build the wall  GOD BLESS AMERICA  BLESS YOU Mr President
Yes! Americans wants borders security and flushing down the swamp in D.C., make it happen Mr.President.
President Trump after building the wall  that I know you will, please send the Democrats to the eye center we can pay for that too.
Build the wall!! Stay strong Mr. President Trump!!!! Thank u for standing up for us Americans!!! The Democrats are terrorists!! They dont care about Americans at all!
Do not waste the money on the wall. It will not stop anything. Money needs to be used for the needs of Vets. Health Care, Michigan etc.
Dur durrrrrrp dur durp durp ok 🐒here have 🍌
Just like drill baby drill impacted oil prices, build baby build.
Here's a thought. Imagine you live in a new place. Imagine how beautiful your life is you have wonderful neighbors. The birds are chirping the sun is shinning. You go into your house and you find out on the news there has been a catastrophe. Now remember you live inside the wall. The president comes on and says he will implement Marshall law. Now depending on what the situation you may be required to stay in your home. If you try to go out lethal forced my be used. Now you have rights but at this time you are under marshal law. You have no food and your water has stopped. You can't go out to find out what is wrong or ask for help. 911 is off and the president is only telling you what you want to hear about the situation. Your children need food water and medical and you are confined to your home. Oh and for fun we will take away the right to bare arms also. You go out to get help because you have no other choice, you need help for you and your loved ones, you are killed or better yet taken into custody. Or you want to leave the U.S. because everyone is sick or you don't even know what is going on. Now after that thought I have to ask myself which side of the wall do I want to be on? I know its frustrating wanting to keep people out but I don't see people wondering about the possibility of having to stay inside the wall. Look up the definition of a reservation check your history fact before you decide if you want to live on a reservation too.
President Trump we need border security, thank you for sticking to your promises.
Stay strong Mr. President! You have my support!
If Democrats would work with President Trump, they would gain a lot of respect.....
Stand your ground. We need border security
We support you Mr. President. Declare the state of emergency and let's get the wall done.
Build that wall! Behind you in Indiana 100 percent!!!!
I don’t want the wall, I have family in Mexico
Do not waste the money on the wall. It will not stop anything. Money needs to be used for the needs of Vets. Health Care, Michigan etc.
We really need to build the wall in the border.
Proverbs 16:6 King James Version (KJV)  6 By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the Lord men depart from evil.
Go ahead, Mr. President, and build the wall...We're behind you 100% AND WILL STAY BEHIND YOU, no matter what the Dems do!!!
As long as Mr. Trump works in prayer, I am sure that if it's in God's line and God had planned that it would be, surely,the wall will be built. May God's will be done.  I am praying for him(President.)  May God bless the USA🇺🇸
If you need an experienced Project Mananger reach out
Do not cave---I called all of our congressmen today. Did You??? please call your's and let them know to stand with the President
democrat's vote for wall when they knew it wouldn't be built. But they know Trump will build it and that's the facts.
If amricans need wall but human need humanity don't be ra***
El chapo. Use his 14 billion to fund the wall.
I don’t want the wall, I have family in Mexico
behind  you president Trump stand strong praying for you
It's all about prevent Trump from succeeding. They refuse to even negotiate or offer alternate ideas for border security. But Trump is acting like a child and solely to blame for the shutdown... Dumbocrats!
seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
Yes Mr. President  We want the wall
If they ain't funding it, the public will...
Why did Democrats get time after your speech? So wrong. Schumer has been in office since ‘81 and Pelosi since ‘87. All they do is get rich. They self serve rather than sacrificially serve. They were undeserving of equal time. They’ve had nothing but time!
We Want Border Security!!!! Every Nation should have borders!!!  We stand with you Mr. President!!! El Chap was arrested, use the money he had and all drug money caught coming across the border!  That way Mexico does pay for the wall! Or Tax all remittance leaving the country! We want the wall!!
Ur doing a good job mr trump keep up the work
Most of us know the answer is; both. #ILOVEMYPRESIDENT
El chapo. Use his 14 billion to fund the wall.
The internet polls I've seen reflect support for the wall by over 80 %.
Take away the democrats security guards, and see how they feel. BUILD THE WALL SECURE OUR BORDERS
Protect the border build that wall protect America it's the only way to stop the illegals from getting in.
Build a wall on your northern border.
Since we are giving Mexico Federal Aid money, can we ask them to build a wall on their side of the border with the money we give them? It would also create jobs there...
Congress should give up their visiting protocols, security cameras, guards and chauffeurs and then say a word about the WALL...War Against Lies and Liens
Proposal of Nation wide fence ban at next meeting! Start with government buildings and elected officials homes🐂💩
Build the wall with cartel money. Use all the drug money coming over the boarder. El Chap had money. Use it to build the wall!!!
We want the wall President Trump! Thank you  🙂
Most of us know the answer is; both. #ILOVEMYPRESIDENT
Stand firm, Mr. President! We are behind you!
What’s more important to you—fulfilling a very bad promise, very weak solution, or doing the right thing for America?
Wait a minute what about all the known ISIS terrorist camps that are in the United States across our country. Confirmed by the FBI. Mr. President Donald Trump when you gonna do something about that and all the jihadist terrorist in our country
Thank you Mr President.  Build the wall!
Build the wall - the sooner the better!!
Dems are never going to become moral, responsible, ethical adults.
Their power security is more important than our border security  to them.
We have to be with our president who want the best for us and our country do not get paid the congress no checks until they approve what you need for our protection .do what you have to do   you are the president of this country Donald Trump
Tell Congress to go home, because they have done nothing since they started except obstruct.  So why are we paying them?
We want the wall President Trump! Thank you  🙂
Secure our borders. Quite spending money helping foreign countries use the money for our security
Mr. President, We the People need you to declare war on the democrats and immigration. This way they those idiots that oppose you can then be charged with treason given their actions; Whoever, owing allegiance to the United States, levies war against them or adheres to their enemies, giving them aid and comfort within the United States or elsewhere, is guilty of treason and shall suffer death, or shall be imprisoned not less than five years and fined under this title but not less than $10,000; and ...
God bless USA with abundant blessing
YOU ARE RIGHTMR. PRESIDENT  WE WANT THE WALL. WE BACK YOU 100%
Can't wait to see what *cough* totally not fake news you're going to tell us.
Over power and over rule you don't need them it is a national emergency that's been going on for to long. I'm tired of giving these aliens our jobs and freebies. Go get um #Trump 2020
Why is “Getting rid of Trump” not one of the choices?  That’s what America wants.
The only problem I see with the wall is making the American people pay for it why not just raise taxes on Mexican Imports since every car in America comes from there anyway maybe use that money to pay for the wall and you should paint the Mexican side camouflage so they can't see it to climb over
I want the border secured. This is stupid. Legislators need to get off their lazy entitled butts and do the job they were elected to do.
Tell Congress to go home, because they have done nothing since they started except obstruct.  So why are we paying them?
I think its time America started making pennies out of steel again ;)
I lost relative's already. Build the dam wall before I come down there and make the brick for you all.
Sir Who doesn't want border security, The budget and personnel are in place and under your command.
I am a Settler, Not a Refugee? Not an immigrant. irony Hello Aboriginal Red Indians.
With family and close friends in law enforcement, whom I care about,  the question is why are we putting up with dying out here for sanctuary laws?  What are we really arguing about here?
Just get Gov employees back to work, please. I support wall but not at Gov employees price
we need the wall i just dont see why we are so divided as a country
There not promises there pipe dreams
Americans also don’t want to be laughed at anymore because they have an orange bafoon running the country!
I want the border secured. This is stupid. Legislators need to get off their lazy entitled butts and do the job they were elected to do.
Clearly stopping President Trump based on tonight’s broadcast!  Build the fence, protect America!  The Experts want it, listen to them. 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 USA
We should also build a wall between Mexico and south America since the use Mexico as away into the us I bet half the people or majority the border patrol catches are from South America.
It's Patriotism vs. Globalism and THE WALL...will all but end Globalism and it's open borders...too!
Loved your speech tonight!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Linda in San Diego
Build the wall mr president..we are behind you..it is now or never...we will help you..just tell us what you need...praying for you every day.
venezuela needs help I ask on behalf of all Venezuelans who act to help children and Venezuelans with this economic crisis we do not want to mature in this country I really ask from my heart to help us
Your doing a awesome job mr president!! You stand for what America stands for! Keep standing strong and they will fold in time
Noone knows they have the armor of God on them.  Ramona Jeannine
Stand up to them Mr. President, your people are behind you. I'm very proud to call you my President!
Americans also don’t want to be laughed at anymore because they have an orange bafoon running the country!
God bless you in all your doing for us, God's will be done, stay strong  in the Lord President Trump's, May God continue to protect you and all your family 🙏
That is exactly why you won the election by far
Build the wall President Trump....America needs this!!! Our dear friend was hit and killed by a drunk, illegal immigrant!!!!
Stand strong for us! Build the wall!
So.tell them to build the wall with their own hands
Canadian's want the wall at the border too!
Let the fun begin!!!! - Just a starter kit.... (*Show & Tell*), https://www.imdb.com/name/nm1136942/
We all need border security but for the wall,I wanna reminded you MEXICO 🇲🇽 WILL PAY IT‼️
Keep our citizens safe.  Build the Wall!
Stand up to them Mr. President, your people are behind you. I'm very proud to call you my President!
We want real border security not a wall! Security that includes fully staffing and PAYING our border security officers and TSA officers!!
Your doing a great job mr president  You can't tie your shoes if your hands are tied behind your back.
Sen Graham one of the few sane in that  congress!  Where are the  “Old West” guys  when we need them?
Kamala Harris calls the wall "a vanity project." For one to want national security at the border is now vanity in a country according to her. Americans just want immigrants to be like them, legal.
I guess democrats are not American.
Take Congress pay checks away they are paid to much and get benefits that our veterans need and deserve
My family is praying for you and your family, Mr. President.  Thank you for fighting for America and her citizens.  You will get 4 votes from my family in 2020.
Speak the truth for once in your life and perhaps people will be willing to work with you.
True Story !!!  The democrats are more interested in destroying you, than in what's in the best interests of our country !!!  I've never seen anything like it !!!  The democrats need to have their HEADS EXAMINED !!!
Keep our citizens safe.  Build the Wall!
Build the Fricken Wall. Tall and Deep !!  Just do it
Pay no attention to the negative comments from the false Americans they are democrats or foreigners who went back on their alegence to America
James Macleod you have the right to disagree and speak your but not to go against our laws and constitution so stick it
Build the Fricken Wall. Tall and Deep !!  Just do it
Your promise was that the American people will not pay for yet I've been or of work for 3 weeks because of your huge ego and tiny prick.
Obviously the former - since day one — EGO!!!!
Your promise was Mexico was going to pay for it
That's it, they will block everything you try. O didn't do a single thing that was good for the country, instead he ramrodded hurtful legislation, hurting our democracy too. Thanks for not being a baby like him.
Fund it with El Chapo funds? Is that feasible?
Do you even need to ask? Lock them up for Sedition and get on with business. Simple.
The promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it. Why should our taxes pay for it now? As much as I would like to see you impeached, I would much rather see you indicted after your term in office.
Mr President, you can use my tax dollars for the wall 💯
James Macleod you have the right to disagree and speak your but not to go against our laws and constitution so stick it
Can Mexico pay 50% of the total cost? Can Mexico support the funding to help their people in the US. Can their Embassy pay for all the cost to help their people?
President Trump...it's all about throwing a fit so you can't help out America. So very shameful.  Keep up the great job!
I believe your "promise" was mexico will pay for your monument to yourself. #SAD
Thank you for your hard work in office.  We are proud of you.  You build, we'll pray.
Most of America sees the idiocy represented by the democrats. They are signing their on demise as a party in Congress
Israel has walls and Heaven has walls and gates too
Did you forget the Mexico is paying for it ???!!!
Stand strong Mr. President. We are with you 100 percent.
Nobody has ever argued against border security!! The “wall”’ extending from coast to coast that you wanted Mexico to pay for is the problem!!
Thank you mr president  You doing EXACTLY what needs to be done for this country  I'll be there in 2020
Mr President, you can use my tax dollars for the wall 💯
Build the wall thank you Mr president.
Dems would still oppose Trump no matter what, blind hate is such a useless thing.
Mr president I want a let’s make America great again hats
How about starting with a partial bill that just covers essential workers pay.  Do not want to take out a loan to pay bills.
Why not show what’s happening at the border now live. Show people that are clueless how bad it is.  I’m all for the wall. We need more security as a country.
Take the money from Foreign Aid! We spent $50B+ last year. Just cut that aid.
Canadian here... You have one hell of a great PRESIDENT!!!
Don"t back down Mr.Trump! BUILD THE WALL!!! to keep our country safe!!
Thank you mr president  You doing EXACTLY what needs to be done for this country  I'll be there in 2020
What's that phrase? Oh, yeah...stop digging. 😉 https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-shutdown-poll-idUSKCN1P223U
Don’t flinch to their political game! Don’t flinch Mr President we are proud of you!
What's that phrase? Oh, yeah...stop digging. 😉 https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-shutdown-poll-idUSKCN1P223U
The wall is to keep you in !
Top you Mr. President fulfilling another promises
American want security, it's right but is not the Wall the correct way. I'm Sorry President.
Do not give in, build the wall, we stand with you.
I vote to build the wall!   Not only for security but also the endless benefits we pay with our tax dollars to support the ILLEGALS for years and years.  We need to make laws to fight the Boarder crisis and make our Boarder laws effective, fix DACA, and to have laws made to secure Boarder that make sense. It’s  only common sense to fix the Southern Border. It’s time to do what is right for our American citizens!
Or how about getting new Democrat votes?  Illegals tend to vote that way.
Legalize cannabis and build a big wall with that revenue mr. President.
Build a base, use service folks who can not find employment when discharged, drones, that gives employment and  guards the boarder. Just saying
Americans like me want to start getting paid again .... how about this!
Don’t flinch to their political game! Don’t flinch Mr President we are proud of you!
Let the people vote on it!!
When will you ppl wake up?! These elite bastards have less in common with you than the people you're trying to block off with the wall...
Yea STUPIT Dems👿They don't care about us😤
This kind of stuff leads to revolution asked the French.
President Trump you are doing a great job,if the democrats would stop acting like kids I believe this could be a great country again
Out of all the president's in my lifetime I would love to shake Trump's hand.
You should be ashamed of yourself. I have no idea how you sleep at night. Pathetic to use fear to control. Shame.
I want the government to quite thinking about power and money and there own pockets and do whats best for the people and work together to get this figured out. This is becoming rediculouse how democrats cant just come to a compromise.
God bless our best president.you worked so harder.we are proud of you.
Americans like me want to start getting paid again .... how about this!
They stopped with Fake News, now they are telling the truth, already dictated in campaigns, it is now until 2020.
Stop building all these walls that they can climb over.
Supplement the victims of the furlough
Offer the Democrats a 3 year deal on the wall- if there is no noticeable positive changes, we’ll take it down.
Yes Mr President, please stand strong and build the wall. I want my children and my grandchildren to be safe from these terrorists. Also I'm praying for you and your family! God bless you.
They care more about stopping you. They’ve been trying to impeach you from the start.
Stand strong Mr President the American people are behind you. Thank God we finally have a President that will stand up for the American people! God bless you and your family!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 #MAGA # proudtobeamerican
God bless our best president.you worked so harder.we are proud of you.
Stand strong Mr President the American people are behind you. Thank God we finally have a President that will stand up for the American people! God bless you and your family!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 #MAGA # proudtobeamerican
Neither A or B. How about impeachment?
Pablo Morales Wake up, Read,Be informed, don't keep living under a tree.
But I like trees 😞
No, we want medicare for all, good public schools, an affordable higher education and clean water. But thanks for checking.
If you don’t want border security your house and property should always be open and available to all strangers, at your own personal cost.
Just do what you promised the good people of America.
If the elephant and the donkey are fighting only the people of America suffer I thought it was America first and not the wall first
We need a wall. You know it and so do many others. Just the typical democrat crip crap. And tell kellyanne Conway nice job yesterday. We may be related but I doubt it.
If they don't want a wall what would they like.
Lining their pockets with the $54 billion that they “ want for foreign aide”. Riiggghhhhtttt. Can you SPECIAL INTEREST?!
Take away their pay and see what happens
the promise was mexico would pay for the wall. not us
Build the wall and protect americans, stay strong President Trump.....
But I like trees 😞
I agree with hold congress pay checks and work to secure our borders. I don't  believe Trump is holding government workers hostage, it's congress.
Protect our United States of America!
Fantastic Oval Office Address!!! Behind You, my President, 100% !!!! Thank you, again.🇺🇸
Great address dont give in keep firm
Go for roll! We got your back! LOVE YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP!
Why doesn't the same problem exist at the northern border of America?🤦‍♀️. And I  am so grateful and proud o four president.
The Democrats are obstructionists!
Build the wall and protect americans, stay strong President Trump.....
The Democrats are obstructionists!
What’s so bad about a wall? I am really trying to see this from both sides, but I honestly cannot grasp opposing. Whatever the facts it won’t hurt? Spiteful anyone? 🥃
Jay Benk  👍🏻
Veronica Kirk-Lanigan exactly.
Hey Donald it's time to impeach your ass!
Veronica Kirk-Lanigan exactly.
Helga Destefano Let them live there!!
Jay Benk  👍🏻
Maybe we should all stop going to work and spending money untill they decide to vote yes for the wall haha
Yes Americans want the wall and we love our President
We are turning against g each other because of our differing views about this wall....face it, this is gonna get worse. Already, the food stamp program will be short next month that and they have no funding for March. The Government t workers most likely are having to rely on family to help make their car and house payments. I don't know what the solution is, but we need to help our fellow Americans. The economy is gonna begin to slow. People other than Government  workers are gonna be without work due to this. People won't afford their wonderful government insurance premiums and won't be able to afford healthcare. I'm not saying the Wall is foolish. I support the Wall. But it's about to get rough America. For all of us.
Thank you Mr. President for all you are doing to help protect us.
Absolute joke of a president...
We the people voted for this president and won! Build the wall
Funny watching Pelosi and Schumer up there jumping up and down like crybabies
Helga Destefano Let them live there!!
Here is what I would like to see: every federal employee whose pay you’re holding hostage to go on strike or walk out on their jobs.
Why is it always fox news?   If the majority of Americans want something,  more sources would say it
We always with you....give a head mr president..godbless
I understand Mr. President stated he expected Mexico to help pay for the wall and now there are those who say he flopped on a promise.  I wish those people would consider that Mexico is dealing with the caravan at this point.  This was an unforseen expense.  The wall will pay for itself.
Keep it shut make them not take a paycheck
I agree build the wall it will help it will slow down illegal immigration and any immigrant that wants to take the proper action of obtaining there citizenship that's fine come on but build the wall
We know it’s to fight you know matter what. They don’t care about Americans.
We don't need to another 9/11! It's scary to think so many Americans have forgotten why we need protection!
'Stopping me from fulfilling another of my promises'  😐 😕 😏 😬 😃 😄 😂 😂
Your bs promise of Mexico paying for the wall is the biggest lie ever....
Funny watching Pelosi and Schumer up there jumping up and down like crybabies
Your bs promise of Mexico paying for the wall is the biggest lie ever....
Even having the money that has been confiscated doesn't automatically allocate it to that particular budget funding. It must still be approved by congress no matter where the money comes from. Doesn't haven't to be the specific taxpayer money, how much did Obama send Iran again? Oh yeah, it was billions as well of our taxpayer money. As a government employee household of 35 years I can assure you first hand the government wastes far more than that just in idle hand-wrenching and not making a decision? Why didn't they fix this crap when they had control for so many years exactly? Do you know? They don't want to for their own agenda's and now more than ever simply because of stupid blind hate of Trump for no real actual reason any worse than anything any other president has ever done in their lifetime. Kennedy was a womanizer if that's your beef and everyone knew it, but overlooked it. Character issues, let's don't trot out all of Bill's as we just don't have that much time left in this world now do we. Please, get an actual real reason to not want better border security, a better economy for all, left and right sides, beside the lame and whimpy "I just can't stand Trump" and would rather see our country go down in flames than agree with him. How very childish.
Yay, finally an intelligent American !!!  My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Saige Turner You don't have a clue do you.  Those coming across the border and working are being paid in cash which they send home to their familys.  I've seen it happen many times.  They pay NO social security.  They don't even have legal Social Security cards.  Idiot!!!
Arev Neerg your so wrong .you need to grow up. we need the wall. you don,t know whats going on in this country. .
Susan Eidoen the ones that the groups are sending in are giving fake ss numbers, id,s and are able to vote as long as they vote dem giving a certain number to use so when they work they can file taxes. true facts. another group is coming in and told what to say. bless this country..
Karen Henderson Typical liberal worries about a misspelling and turns to nastiness, because you cannot prove your point. Have a great day.
Karen Henderson Mexica Is Not Handing Them A CHECK. In The end They Will Pay.Learn To Understand Whats said Build The wall
'Stopping me from fulfilling another of my promises'  😐 😕 😏 😬 😃 😄 😂 😂
President Hoax is a NATURAL BORN PATHOLOGICAL LIAR and the Biggest Fattest Hoax ever perpetuated on the American People!!!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin You keep saying the same stupid crap. You keep calling Trump a liar.... Should we go back to all the lies Obummer fed us??? "If you like your plac you can keep it".... Funny how your party was all for a wall before........... You all just hate not being in power and getting to shove your ideology down our throats.
William Bieke some people are complete idiots and you can't argue with stupid
William Bieke everything you just said was wrong....learn about how that works before you listen to that idiot...go back to your coloring book
Joseph Siegel funny how no one mention this until he said it...but its not true...its not just free money....learn how this works before you run stupid crap from dumb ass trump
Karen Henderson Mexica Is Not Handing Them A CHECK. In The end They Will Pay.Learn To Understand Whats said Build The wall
You haven’t been paying attention have you?
Dan, It's B.O.R.D.E.R   Trump ball licker Crack me up.
I say wait for the checks to come in from Mexico.🤔
he said mexico AND canada are already paying for it through the new deal...it's on his very own twitter page...so why is he holding the government hostage?  oh right, because he's a coward and doesn't know how to negotiate.  he's afraid to let the bill pass onto the senates (which is republican controlled) and have them vote on it  because he's afraid to have a veto under his belt... BTW...Dan....the ones who cross the border to work....they are taxed social security....a tax they can never see as non-citizens....being that we do not have enough social security, they're contribution is helping to keep us afloat on this....use your brain and do some real research like an actual government site....or even a library
Saige Turner yeh...research the Dems bill that funds other countries. At least keep our money here!
Chuck Schumer Barack Obama Hillary Clinton Joe Biden Dianne Feinstein ALL voted to spend billions on a “Secure Fence” in 2006  Why are they opposed to one now!!!  🤔
President Trump the American people are with you. Democrats are a little slow.
Americans want safety and security! Yes!! We also want to live and thrive!!!! Survival and poverty are unfortunately the results of a corrupt system. Change that and your name will live on forever. Make America great!
Wasnt mexico paying for the wall? That was the promise.
Do they really? How about an honest president?
Fox News (I use the term loosly) is full of bull, all surveys/polls I have seen the majority think the wall is not needed. The majority DO want border security, there are a number of options. Don't mix the two.
Mr. President, isn't there money confiscated from the drug kingpins, like El Chapo, that could be used for the construction of the wall we need so much.
he said mexico AND canada are already paying for it through the new deal...it's on his very own twitter page...so why is he holding the government hostage?  oh right, because he's a coward and doesn't know how to negotiate.  he's afraid to let the bill pass onto the senates (which is republican controlled) and have them vote on it  because he's afraid to have a veto under his belt... BTW...Dan....the ones who cross the border to work....they are taxed social security....a tax they can never see as non-citizens....being that we do not have enough social security, they're contribution is helping to keep us afloat on this....use your brain and do some real research like an actual government site....or even a library
Declare a national crisis please protect the citizens of this country.  We know that they, Pelosi and Schumer, do not care about us.
I am for a beaded curtain will solve all the issues and can be fashionable at the same time
Thank you President Trump for protecting America
You are Always in my prayers  Mr. President.
Why don't you tell Pelosi and Schumer to kiss your a double s?
#BUILDTHATWALL ... AMERICANS SUPPORT YOU.
Build the wall even if it  takes AMERICANS rushing the border with concrete blocks.....
Thank you President Trump.  God  Bless you.
Well Calvin Wright, I'm 75 years old and in 2 days I could figure out how to get over, under or through ANY FUCKING WALL the orange pig can build. And so could any half conscious human being.
How I wish Trump could come and safe South Africa
Mr. President, isn't there money confiscated from the drug kingpins, like El Chapo, that could be used for the construction of the wall we need so much.
please president trump please build the wall!  you are using common sense!
I agree with the wall but not the government shutdown will have a crisis here if it's not opened back up....
The democrats aka Pelosi, Schuman most likely don’t want the Wall built, to keep the Drug Cartel and them wealthy. Remember in 2009, democrats under Obama, overturned the 1988 Ban on use of federal funds for needle-exchange program. Why do democrats want to encourage drug users to continue the deadly habits?
Secure the border, end illegal immigration once and for all.
I want border security not just a wall across our entire border. Address the real issues with the system and Congress will work with you  It is time to compromise!
the thing I want to know is why is it that the news said that more Citizens do not want the wall but I was not asked and none of my family was asked. I want the wall for the security of my family and friends. the border patrol can not stop everyone or everything from entering the us. the Democrats needs to stop being bull headed and compromise. I watched as they blamed Donald J. Trump. Stop blaming him for everything that goes wrong.
The Democrats  get on my last NERVES take it out of the pay they are not earning
The white house has a fence but not the border
I'm proud of my president don't give in build the wall !!!!!!!!
History shows we Need the wall and currently, we NEED the wall, so much that is NOT spoken about going on down here in south Texas!!! It’s scary!!!
How I wish Trump could come and safe South Africa
History shows we Need the wall and currently, we NEED the wall, so much that is NOT spoken about going on down here in south Texas!!! It’s scary!!!
HOW ABOUT HE OPEN UP A GO FUND ME FOR THE WALL!!!!
I'm proud of my president don't give in build the wall !!!!!!!!
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Have trump supporters pay for it if they want it so badly
We got the money but law says government cannot money or tips
O wow
I'm talking about the wall?
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
I'm talking about the wall?
I'm a furloughed employee. I say build the wall. I agree with you President Trump and will vote for u again. Your doing a great job for our country. God bless you and your family.
That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid in reality WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds if you get bound up and need to get money, also you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats say it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders which is against our own countries laws to support. For one. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money we earn for OUR Family taken from us to care for them. The more that come the more it coat and Democrats more, Open Borders. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more evry day and Democrats say send them on our American Citizens will pay for more and Thank US with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
O wow
The only job Democrat’s want to do right now is obstruct your administration, they don’t know or care what it is they’re obstructing
It appears that the democrats are serving their own agendas and have forgotten their responsibilities as elected persons.
President Trump! Please go on hunger strike until the wall gets built, no matter how long it takes,  #TrumpHungerStrikeNow
A wall will not stop people from crossing our border. It may add a slight hindrance but that’s about it.
Who’s going to pay for the wall?
Thank you Mr.President! DO NOT Give into the greedy ass Democrats.
That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid in reality WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds if you get bound up and need to get money, also you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats say it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders which is against our own countries laws to support. For one. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money we earn for OUR Family taken from us to care for them. The more that come the more it coat and Democrats more, Open Borders. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more evry day and Democrats say send them on our American Citizens will pay for more and Thank US with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
I am from Canada , you should see the FOOL we have for a PM if we had Trump Canada would be great again
YOU ARE NOT GETTING A FUCKING WALL. PERIOD.
Build that wall and make it tall then DEPORT THEM ALL !!!!!!
Don't be  a fool  walls only creates  enemies  be smart and don't talk So much garbage  were tired  of hearing you  trying to brainwash  our people  Americans wake up  before is too late
We haven't had a wall for over 200 years, during which time we've won two world wars, a cold war, and took over the entire planet. Why do we need a wall now?
Build the wall president  Trump
Well done speech just now  Mr.president Donald Trump 👍👍👍👏👏👏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 God bless you🙏🙏🙏Me and my Family agree with you 100℅ on  that wall  and everything else you do .We are Proud of you
Yes we do wants border security!!!
One place nobody wants to go, war zone with buried explosive/ mines and automatic laser. I don't think anyone wants to cross illegally after the first explosion
Thank you Mr.President! DO NOT Give into the greedy ass Democrats.
Need to cut the Pay for Congressmen, Governors Everyone in Government until they Actually DO Their JOBS.  Use their pay to Build "The Wall".
Take the money from all the wasteful govt programs to pay for the wall. The illegals are flooding into Arizona where I live. Plus some how they're getting medical benefits when they shouldn't.
Pinocchio continues with the hate mongering and hate.
Please post your security plan so Americans can read it. Then we can decided if we call our elected representative s
If this is such a crisis, why didn't you and the Republican controlled Congress fund it last year?
The promise was Mexico was going to pay for it not us. I'm all for it, but your not fulfilling the promise.
Show clip when they voted for the border should be secured!
One place nobody wants to go, war zone with buried explosive/ mines and automatic laser. I don't think anyone wants to cross illegally after the first explosion
Do whatever it takes to get the wall built.
Brent Congdon again I'm not against the wall, just think there are numberous other ways to pay for it. Instead of being a"whiner" all the time.
Do whatever it takes to get the wall built.
Greg Kemp how is it affecting the poor?
Brent Congdon again I'm not against the wall, just think there are numberous other ways to pay for it. Instead of being a"whiner" all the time.
Great job Mr. President.  The Schumer and Pelosi response makes clear they do not care about our security only obstruction. Stand your ground! # MAGA #MY PRESIDENT!
It is no longer a wall, he wants a picket fence made of steel.
Build the Wall Mr.President you have my support!🇺🇸
Just tell the Dims that you are building a northern border wall for Mexico.
I am 100 percent behind you President Trump!!
Mr. Trump, Please ask the Democrats if they even care about their kids, grandkids or great grandkids. Because America is going to be a terrible place for them to grow up in. I am scared for my kids.
And we’ve paid for it 10 ways from Sunday multiple times over!  It will be good to finally have the darn thing done!
Greg Kemp how is it affecting the poor?
The democrats need to work with Trump make America great
I dont see why not put guard towers every so far from each other along the boarder staff up to. 25+ .  per tower
I can see that.  And then give the guards orders to shoot to kill.
Thomas Sargent  Only shoot to kill if violence erupts , detain and run back grounds on them ones with violent record , stick in   Guantanamo Bay pending trial by a military court instead of a liberal/democrat circus court.   On November 13, 2001, President George W. Bush issued a new military order in the war against terrorism. The order called for the secretary of defense to detain non-citizens accused of international terrorism. The order specifically applies to members of the terrorist organization Al Qaeda. But it also includes all those who have engaged in, aided, or conspired to commit international terrorist acts against the United States or its citizens.Those who knowingly harbor such individuals are also subject to the order. Under the order, the secretary is charged with establishing military tribunals (also called military commissions) to conduct trials of non-citizens accused of terrorism either in the United States or in other parts of the world.
The democrats need to work with Trump make America great
Thomas Sargent  Only shoot to kill if violence erupts , detain and run back grounds on them ones with violent record , stick in   Guantanamo Bay pending trial by a military court instead of a liberal/democrat circus court.   On November 13, 2001, President George W. Bush issued a new military order in the war against terrorism. The order called for the secretary of defense to detain non-citizens accused of international terrorism. The order specifically applies to members of the terrorist organization Al Qaeda. But it also includes all those who have engaged in, aided, or conspired to commit international terrorist acts against the United States or its citizens.Those who knowingly harbor such individuals are also subject to the order. Under the order, the secretary is charged with establishing military tribunals (also called military commissions) to conduct trials of non-citizens accused of terrorism either in the United States or in other parts of the world.
I can see that.  And then give the guards orders to shoot to kill.
let him build it we can always knock it down later. much later.
Put our military all around the 50 states and no one comes in and if you leave do not try to return.
They want the baby cut in half.
we need to call Pelosi (202)225-4965 and Chuck (202)224-6542 and leave a message "Build The Wall". We work hard for our money,first they didn't vote to give us the tax reduction and, the money they have of ours, they are wanting to help other countries with...we don't work so they can use our money to work against America!
They won’t to stop you all political
Greg Merz Why don't you F*ck off asshole.
They won’t to stop you all political
Put it to a physical vote I'm erican and don't want the wall. People should have the right to vote
Linda Acree I doubt that but that is the American way
BuzzMarge Rabatin 😄
Like you worked with them for the last two years? Calling them obstructionists and evil!???  Don’t expect too much from us now that you need us.
BuzzMarge Rabatin 😄
Go fund me page to build the wall 330,000 people have donated 19,000,000 dollars in 23 days
They  cant can’t legally build  it  that  way.
Ruth, you are 100% correct! AND the people DID vote.... for Trump!
I support you do the job we elected you to do dont allow them to bully you or try to tear you down, continue to stand your ground America supports you!!@
Unfortunately stopping you from for filling your promises is  more important to them then national security..go president trump 2020
Mr president  I am 72 years old and in my  opinion you are the best president in my life time  and I have your  back build the wall
your promise was build the wall mr gorbachev and have mexico foot the tab, the way I heard it, just sayin.
YES! Stay the course Mr. President! We are behind you!
It’s important for the Democrats to 🛑 you Mr. President from fulfilling your promises so that when it’s time for re-election, Democrats can through it in your face and the rest of the USA 🇺🇸! Democrats will say, “He didn’t keep his promises!” Those that elected you know the TRUTH and will continue to support you President Donald J. Trump!
Silent majority of U.S. citizens is for ensuring the nation’s security and security of their families. “No if’s or but’s about the Wall.”They’ll be around in 2020 to deliver the greatest political smackdown in history!
they only worry for their selves we to under educated to poor and deplorable for our safety or think for ourselves they want total control over us
They  cant can’t legally build  it  that  way.
they only worry for their selves we to under educated to poor and deplorable for our safety or think for ourselves they want total control over us
I stand with you, Mr. President. Thank you for trying to take care of US.
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
You need help.
Silent majority of U.S. citizens is for ensuring the nation’s security and security of their families. “No if’s or but’s about the Wall.”They’ll be around in 2020 to deliver the greatest political smackdown in history!
You need help.
Janet Williams that's what I said too and the senate. There the ones stopping this, it's not the rest of us. Get the prisoners to help build the wall, like the frigid people
Suppose to be drug people
Sorry about that?
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
Build the wall! We are behind you President Trump! #buildthewall
Haven't you already had 2 years to build this wall?
Thank you Mr. President for all you do for our country . Build the wall !
NO I do not want it, it is immoral and you would do better to revise the current immigration system, which by the way has allowed terrorist to fester in this country legally.
President Trump if you feel the need to declare a state of emergency to get your money to provide security for this country because the Democrats just don't like you do what you have to do.
Thank you for standing firm on this important issue.
Protect our borders build the wall Mr President!!!
Sorry about that?
Protect our borders build the wall Mr President!!!
For Trump to fulfill his campaign promise, Mexico has to pay for the wall! Trump guaranteed "MEXICO" will pay for the wall!!! He should run for President in 2020 and tell his short-sighted base that they will be paying for the wall. The Trumpster Wall is a diversion to keep Mueller's investigation off Fox News.
Bill Champion ...not nice to call his base crazed...there are many people who feel the Dems are crazed...but we are all entitled to an opinion. Anyway, don’t underestimate or be short-sighted - Mexico could pay in time due to changes.  It looks like the Dems will continue to obstruct.  Amazing that the President has managed to improve the economy.  Many are thankful for the change from Obama’s NWO direction and the fact that Hillary is not POTUS.
Vickie Jarrett Cartledge I changed my sentence above from "crazed base" to "short-sighted" base. I was addressing his crazed base, the ones that "ignore" the fact Trump said multiple times that Mexico "will pay" for the border wall. He ran for President on that platform. I will wait for the President of Mexico to say they will pay for the wall. Now, as for as not nice to mention Trumps "crazed base", its interesting his base is OK with his life-long disgusting or "unflattering" comments and actions, many of those targeting women. We deserve better.
Bill Champion -respectfully, note that you chose the word I used- “short-sighted”...and that is def not true of those who support our President (which was the point I was making when I used the word first).  People were hugely concerned with the direction that Obama was taking our country and certain that it would get much worse with Hillary. Mexico will pay for the wall with change to the burden we see from that country if Dems will stop obstructing progress.  I don’t recall anyone saying we would negotiate with their President for a fund. I cannot fathom how people are so naive, blind, or brainwashed to not see the changes we need for U.S. security and welfare.  We must enforce law and    do what we can to keep our border from being breached.  Do we help others?  Sure...what is the best solution?  All people of the world matter...not just those who try to enter illegally.  Countries need to work to improve their standard of living..the U.S. cannot house the world.  Additionally, we have the right to guard against harm. I am amused at Trump’s character attack.  Surely, you know that the “trained politicians” who have served are no better.  Trump was in the entertainment industry before politics...so far there is no evidence of the disgusting behavior known by Clinton, JFK, etc. while serving as POTUS. Trump is not a trained, polished politician.   Many appreciate that he is not just that smooth talking image used by a political machine.  Many appreciate the fact that he has actual knowledge, skill, and success needed to bring good change...not just a do nothing career politician.  Is he perfect..no, but he was the best choice at the time.  He has proven to be capable of leading toward good change -especially if Dems would support this country and stop obstructing progress. Those who support the Dems socialist, NWO agenda are the short-sighted and misguided base.
Vickie Jarrett Cartledge I repeated  your word “short-sighted” to only make you happy. No other reason….I also used “unflattering”, thinking that would be nice too. OK, so much for that. What Bill Clinton did while President has no reflection or parallel with the distress Trump has brought to our country as President of the US and “leader of the free world“.  (Btw, I never voted for Bill Clinton and I’m still a registered Republican, which means nothing.) I vote and support who I think would make the best leader for our country.  Vickie, our allies don’t trust us anymore, that’s not leadership. Trump has eroded years of world goodwill and respect. Trump can’t manage his own administration. Four military Generals have left either by disgrace or opposition to Trumps erratic behavior and seat of the pants decisions. He flames the fire of division across our nation and the free world. He manages like a failed casino mobster. He’s a billionaire that’s filed bankruptcy 4 times, treats women and speaks of them and his sexual conquest like an immature 18 year old. Some of this and more “before” anyone had the opportunity to vote for him.  Demos want border control that represent the values that most of us know and respect. Values that made our county the most admired in the world. Not a wall (I can add some adjectives but I‘ll be nice).  Yes, I agree that Trump never said he would negotiate with Mexico to build the wall. Trump said repeatedly that Mexico “will” pay for the wall. The guarantee that millions bought into and voted for him. Of course, three million more voters “did not” buy into his ridiculous promise.  On Feb. 16, 2016 then Mexican president Vicente Fox, flatly stated that Mexico will not pay for Trumps wall. I believed the former Mexican leader and still do.  The manufactured wall issue, which Trump “waited” to rally his base, is nothing more but another diversion from the Mueller investigation, which so far has placed a wall around some pretty bad hombres. And Flint still doesn’t have clean water.
Well Bill ..it appears the discourse is going nowhere.   I don’t think anyone expected for Fox to SAY that he will pay for the border wall...seems you do not get that change in interaction with the country will save the U.S. more than the price of a wall. The lifelong unflattering and or disgusting comment/behavior regarding Trump is a joke.  Do you really believe that someone with Bill Clinton’s sexual predator track record has not exhibited unflattering and disgusting comments and behavior??...and to be so disgusting WHILE SERVING as leader of our country!  The groomed politicians are somewhat smooth ...but nasty, and imo- Clinton is far worse...as other politicians are deceptive. Of course we vote and support who we feel would make the best leader (duh).. To excuse Bill Clinton’s behavior and say that it has no parallel to distress is such a blind comment of denial...along with thinking that Dems want border control that represent known and respected values is just being out of touch with the truth. Apparently you drink the koolaide...I don’t. If you cannot recognize the hypocrisy, lies, and socialist, NWO direction of the Dems...unfortunate. I think we can look at economic systems in countries and see that capitalism is far better than socialism. The Dems are not about the welfare of this country...they are about so much more..they are about their own welfare while serving the welfare and agenda of the machine behind them. Trump has faced bankruptcy..not uncommon for people who engage, don’t give up, and are successful.  The man gives his salary to charity, and I don’t want to hear garbage of how much he gives in respect to what he has.  Notably-Trump is not getting rich from politics as the career politicians are.  We need term limits so that those with political office just might possibly work for the welfare of the citizens and NOT toward a career focused on the welfare of themselves and their puppet masters.   The issues in Trump’s admin are fueled by the obstruction of said career politicians. The world issue is complex...too much to discuss. I applaud policy change with allies, and world policy in general.  A border wall with Mexico is just a small needed measure. (As far as the wall is concerned..it is needed for many good reasons, and far less money than the problem costs of our border being breached.  It will not solve the problem, but it only takes common sense to know that it will help.) Trump is shaking things up in a needed direction. The corruption is so huge and obstructionist are involved in that. Trump is not a perfect example of all that should be, but at least he has thrown a cog in the wheel of the socialist, NWO machine that the Dems deceptively serve.  Sadly, many are not aware of this threat that will ultimately result in change not good for people (to put it simply)...sadly, short-sighted and shallow thinkers. This is all I have to say...we see things differently.
Thank you for standing firm on this important issue.
Well Bill ..it appears the discourse is going nowhere.   I don’t think anyone expected for Fox to SAY that he will pay for the border wall...seems you do not get that change in interaction with the country will save the U.S. more than the price of a wall. The lifelong unflattering and or disgusting comment/behavior regarding Trump is a joke.  Do you really believe that someone with Bill Clinton’s sexual predator track record has not exhibited unflattering and disgusting comments and behavior??...and to be so disgusting WHILE SERVING as leader of our country!  The groomed politicians are somewhat smooth ...but nasty, and imo- Clinton is far worse...as other politicians are deceptive. Of course we vote and support who we feel would make the best leader (duh).. To excuse Bill Clinton’s behavior and say that it has no parallel to distress is such a blind comment of denial...along with thinking that Dems want border control that represent known and respected values is just being out of touch with the truth. Apparently you drink the koolaide...I don’t. If you cannot recognize the hypocrisy, lies, and socialist, NWO direction of the Dems...unfortunate. I think we can look at economic systems in countries and see that capitalism is far better than socialism. The Dems are not about the welfare of this country...they are about so much more..they are about their own welfare while serving the welfare and agenda of the machine behind them. Trump has faced bankruptcy..not uncommon for people who engage, don’t give up, and are successful.  The man gives his salary to charity, and I don’t want to hear garbage of how much he gives in respect to what he has.  Notably-Trump is not getting rich from politics as the career politicians are.  We need term limits so that those with political office just might possibly work for the welfare of the citizens and NOT toward a career focused on the welfare of themselves and their puppet masters.   The issues in Trump’s admin are fueled by the obstruction of said career politicians. The world issue is complex...too much to discuss. I applaud policy change with allies, and world policy in general.  A border wall with Mexico is just a small needed measure. (As far as the wall is concerned..it is needed for many good reasons, and far less money than the problem costs of our border being breached.  It will not solve the problem, but it only takes common sense to know that it will help.) Trump is shaking things up in a needed direction. The corruption is so huge and obstructionist are involved in that. Trump is not a perfect example of all that should be, but at least he has thrown a cog in the wheel of the socialist, NWO machine that the Dems deceptively serve.  Sadly, many are not aware of this threat that will ultimately result in change not good for people (to put it simply)...sadly, short-sighted and shallow thinkers. This is all I have to say...we see things differently.
For the ones who's argument is trump said Mexico will pay for the wall don't forget you can keep your doctor you can keep your coverage
Steve Demarb OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
Alison Edwards Lorentz sounds good to me
Vickie Jarrett Cartledge I repeated  your word “short-sighted” to only make you happy. No other reason….I also used “unflattering”, thinking that would be nice too. OK, so much for that. What Bill Clinton did while President has no reflection or parallel with the distress Trump has brought to our country as President of the US and “leader of the free world“.  (Btw, I never voted for Bill Clinton and I’m still a registered Republican, which means nothing.) I vote and support who I think would make the best leader for our country.  Vickie, our allies don’t trust us anymore, that’s not leadership. Trump has eroded years of world goodwill and respect. Trump can’t manage his own administration. Four military Generals have left either by disgrace or opposition to Trumps erratic behavior and seat of the pants decisions. He flames the fire of division across our nation and the free world. He manages like a failed casino mobster. He’s a billionaire that’s filed bankruptcy 4 times, treats women and speaks of them and his sexual conquest like an immature 18 year old. Some of this and more “before” anyone had the opportunity to vote for him.  Demos want border control that represent the values that most of us know and respect. Values that made our county the most admired in the world. Not a wall (I can add some adjectives but I‘ll be nice).  Yes, I agree that Trump never said he would negotiate with Mexico to build the wall. Trump said repeatedly that Mexico “will” pay for the wall. The guarantee that millions bought into and voted for him. Of course, three million more voters “did not” buy into his ridiculous promise.  On Feb. 16, 2016 then Mexican president Vicente Fox, flatly stated that Mexico will not pay for Trumps wall. I believed the former Mexican leader and still do.  The manufactured wall issue, which Trump “waited” to rally his base, is nothing more but another diversion from the Mueller investigation, which so far has placed a wall around some pretty bad hombres. And Flint still doesn’t have clean water.
I'll bet every Democrat has a fence around their homes, such hypocrits.
Hold your ground until it is done!
Yes, build the wall! We need it!! MAGA!!! Thank you President Trump 2020!!!!
It’s a cost vs benefit issue. Wall will be a wasteful boondoggle.
Mister president please build your wall
Shud have ashamed to promote cowardly criminal Tricky Trump
yes we want the steel wall. Do it. Do it right.
Alison Edwards Lorentz sounds good to me
Peter says the president and the other two members of Congress shall be put into a room and no one comes out until an agreement is made
So secure the border, but a wall ain't it. Stop holding America hostage for your wall, and open the govt.
Amazing how some people have decided the greatest threat to our sovereignty and safety are hungry, dehydrated, exhausted families with nothing but the clothes they are wearing. But mass shootings, domestic terrorism and Russian election interference are totally fine...
We want border security. Term limits for Congress and Senate!!!!!!! Lets go....
Everyone is for border security Crazy Donnie.   How is money to  be spent. No blank check.
I voted for you because you said you were going to take care of business.  TAKE CARE OF BUSINESS.
Easy one! They are against you even if it hurts us. They only care about how things impact them politically. They couldn’t care less about Americans.
We all know the answer to this.
Yes build the Wall build the Wall the America people are with you
No pay for Congress and continue it for the workers.
yes we want the steel wall. Do it. Do it right.
it must be nice to work for the gov , having a nice vacation.
Democrats wanted it until Trump took office.
what is sad, our government stops the wall, wanting to spend the money on donations to other countries. the money comes from the taxes. take care of us first.
Don’t give in.  Keep it closed.  Build the barrier
I would like the wall to be done . Please stop the lying and get your facts right, I am starting to think otherwise on a candidate for 2020
That right ! Stop giving are jobs to them . We would have more jobs to the people over in America that need job's . American are struggling enough . With out them coming over here and take the jobs that we need . They shot us if we came in there country !
Everyone wants border security. What they don’t want is an ineffective expensive wall just to boast your ego and one that you convinced your “sheep”, Mexico would pay for.
Anyone remember the “Secure Fences Act?”  What has changed, hmmm.
Democrats are blind! Any real American cares about the security of our Country!
Just a thought! Wish he had proposed that legislature in Washington go without pay til this is decided and  return the ordinary government workers their pay. It’s them that aren’t doing their job! Bet when they lost their pay check it would be a whole different story.
No pay for Congress and continue it for the workers.
Just a thought! Wish he had proposed that legislature in Washington go without pay til this is decided and  return the ordinary government workers their pay. It’s them that aren’t doing their job! Bet when they lost their pay check it would be a whole different story.
During your campaign you said you were a negotiator and would work with both parties. In case you are unaware, negotiating is all about give and take. However, it is becoming clear that you are not able to work well with others and are nothing more than another politician dividing the country by political affiliation. Enough is enough with this government shut down! You are acting like a two year old who didn’t get his way. Meanwhile, there are American families who are wondering how they going to pay their bills and feed their children. Unfortunatlely, not all of us a rich like you Mr. Trump!
Amber Maki did you complain when Obama shut the government down? The president has been trying to work with the democrats and has been met with opposition from day 1. It takes two sides to work together. What you’re really saying is bend over. Their priority is only to obstruct anything and everything the president proposes. Their goal is solely his failure and to hell with America. They’ve been crying impeachment for two years since Hillary lost. You’ve got Congress “women” blabbering about going to Washington to fight Trump and impeaching the MF. REALLY? Their “job” is to represent the people and they are using it instead to fulfill their own personal twisted agenda. Now you tell me how that is WORKING TOGETHER!!!!
Democrats are blind! Any real American cares about the security of our Country!
Stand strong.  We support you Mr. President.
SECURITY YES WALL NO ..........AND YOUR PROMISE WAS THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY
Thank you Mr. president for bring up, Marilyn Pharis in the central coast Santa Maria, Ca.  Marilyn Pharis death was so terrible, ruthless and painful for her not the people who did this, they get 2 trials with interpreters and 25 years for taking a beautiful life from us.
Great job, Mr. President! We love and support you because you love and support all Americans. Stay strong. You are in office by the grace of God.
Stay strong President Trump!  We want border security!
You did the right thing President Trump. You had to do a state of the Union because you are in this IMMIGRATION battle alone outside of all support base that's in every state in the USA.  I'm sick of the democrats, unelected big money donors, and the media dementing & rottening minds AND destroying the fabric of this country.
Mr President: how do we the American People vote to have the Voted Officials Congressman and congresswomen receive the same Medical Benefits, OBAMA Care, for their health insurance.  They deserve to have all the benefits they voted for the rest of America.  We would not want them to miss out on the experience and the cost increases they have in storage for everyone else!
We are giving one more penny to another country till our government takes care of ours! Pelosi Schumer your time is up!
What is this BS about not pulling troops from Syria. Please dont listen to criminal war-monger John Bolton. He is a war criminal.
Amber Maki did you complain when Obama shut the government down? The president has been trying to work with the democrats and has been met with opposition from day 1. It takes two sides to work together. What you’re really saying is bend over. Their priority is only to obstruct anything and everything the president proposes. Their goal is solely his failure and to hell with America. They’ve been crying impeachment for two years since Hillary lost. You’ve got Congress “women” blabbering about going to Washington to fight Trump and impeaching the MF. REALLY? Their “job” is to represent the people and they are using it instead to fulfill their own personal twisted agenda. Now you tell me how that is WORKING TOGETHER!!!!
Perhaps the answer is to stop funding these countries and buy them so we can really improve their conditions.
Go for it president trump we’re behind you.
Don't play the blame card,Stop it.      I'm not employed,thank you.     Accept a phase in up to that amount,you expect to be re-elected right?    No concern for the bugget,nor the payments to our troops .      Demanding will not work well for you in the long run,if you want to be re-elected to see it come about.
We support you right here in Northeast Texas Mr President! God Bless!
Build four walls.  Small ones.  One on each side of you and I'll pay for it myself.
I'm watching you tonight, Mr President!
Keep working for the true Americans! Thank you Mr. President Trump
Build that damn wall, long and tall !!!
Mr. President, please show the videos of Democrats saying that a wall is needed and will work (according to Chucky) right before your speech tonight.
Time to call for national emergency!!!
What is this BS about not pulling troops from Syria. Please dont listen to criminal war-monger John Bolton. He is a war criminal.
Time to call for national emergency!!!
FAKE PRES LEFT TWO YEARS AGO SON ... BLESS YOUR HEART. YOU REALLY NEED TO GET OUT MORE. ;)
Hi, Dan! https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=1967719046596858&set=a.106243116077803&type=3&theater
Mr. President, please show the videos of Democrats saying that a wall is needed and will work (according to Chucky) right before your speech tonight.
Hi, Eric!
Decker---That's total BS!
Karen Harvey No Karen it is fact. You know just not liking facts does not change them or make them disappear, unless of course you are a trumpie.
Hi, Eric!
Declassify everything on the Democrooks it’s time to hang them high!
Stand strong Mr. President, we are behind you and the other snowflakes just want more votes.  Has anyone checked into Calif's laws for collecting votes yet?
Be good president. .mercy. .the money not the important thing in life
The majority do not want a wall border security yes.  You are suppose to be governing for the majority
Karen Harvey No Karen it is fact. You know just not liking facts does not change them or make them disappear, unless of course you are a trumpie.
They don't fulfill campaign promises Mr president...they don't want you fulfilling campaign promises......
1. Walls don’t work. Illegal immigrants have tunneled underneath and/or erected ramps up and down walls to simply drive over them. People find a way. When East Germany erected its wall, it created a military zone, staffed by booted, machine-gun carrying guards ready to shoot to kill. Yet thousands managed to make it to West Germany anyway. More to the point, do we really want to model ourselves after communist East Germany?  2. Most illegal immigrants are “overstayers.” They come to the US legally — for vacations, business, to study, etc. — and then STAY past their visas. By 2012, overstayers accounted for 58% (THE MAJORITY!) of all unauthorized immigrants. A wall is meaningless here!  3. Walls have little impact on drugs being brought in to the US. According to the DEA, almost all drugs come in through legal points of entry, hidden in secret containers and/or among legit goods in tractor-trailers. A wall will have little to no impact on the influx of drugs into our country.  4. It’s environmentally impractical. Walls have a hard time making it through extreme weather. For example, in 2011, a flood in Arizona washed away 40 feet of STEEL fencing. Torrential rains and raging waters do serious damage. Also, conservative sources generally do not address the environmental harm that walls create, but there is plenty of documentation available that show its potential for irreparable damage to both plant and animal life.  5. A wall would forces the U.S. government to take land from private citizens in eminent domain battles. Private citizens own much of the land slated for the wall. The costs of the government snatching private land — and the legal battles that would ensue — are incalculable.  6. Border patrol agents don’t like concrete or steel walls because they block surveillance capabilities. In other words, they can’t mobilize correctly to meet challenges. So in many ways, a wall makes their job more difficult.  7. Border patrol agents say, “Walls are meaningless without agents and technology to back them up.” Are we prepared to pour countless billions annually — after the wall is built — to create a nearly 2,000 mile, militarized 24-hour surveillance border operation? Because according to patrol agents, that’s the only way a wall would work. Again, are we really, going to use East Germany, a brutal communist state, as our model here?  Are we seriously going to model ourselves on East Germany and their wall? A 1979 celebration in E. Berlin. 8. Where walls have been built, there was “no discernable impact on the influx of unauthorized aliens.” In other words, they came in elsewhere, primarily where natural barriers such as water or mountainous regions precluded a wall.  9. An unintended consequence is that a wall blocks farmworkers from EXITING when their invaluable seasonal work is done. Farmers are against the wall because it makes getting cheap seasonal labor almost impossible as few American citizens want or can even do those jobs. And if seasonal worker do get in, a wall makes it harder for them to leave! A wall traps migrant farm laborers in our country.  10. Trump’s $5 billion is a laughable drop in the bucket for what would ACTUALLY be needed. For example, according to the Cato Institute: An estimate for a border wall area that only covered 700 miles was originally 1.2 billion. How much did it REALLY cost? SEVEN BILLION. And that’s only for 700 miles. Whatever we think it’s going to cost, experience shows us we have to multiply it by more than 500%.  11. According to MIT engineers, the wall would cost $31.2 billion. Homeland Security estimates it at $22 billion. Given the pattern of spending mentioned in number 10 (plus Murphy’s Law), that means we’re really talking about pouring endless billions into something that doesn’t even work. And, of course, we taxpayers will be footing the bill, not Mexico. Given all the drawbacks, is that REALLY the best use of our taxes?  As the conservatives of the Cato Institute put it, “President Trump’s wall would be a mammoth expenditure that would have little impact on illegal immigration.” (Emphasis mine) Also it would create many “direct harms:” “the spending, the taxes, the eminent domain abuse, and the decrease in immigrant’s freedoms of movement.”
Just assuming, most of these comments aren’t coming from those on furlough or those working and not getting paid. Please go to your bosses and tell them you won’t accept a paycheck until the shutdown has ended. Let me see how many of the base reacts after you can’t pay your bills because he can’t have a wall. Kind of like if you don’t play the football game the way I want I’ll take my ball and go home. Kidsey stuff.
Why do the Congress and Senate still get paid with the govt shutdown?  Take away their pay just like everyone else and see how fast things get done.
Please president Trump help us I hope you get the money you ask for from Congress for the wall and end this government shutdowns
Thank you Mr President.  Stand your ground and please keep fighting for us.  #Trump2020
Americans want their tax refund check.... 😝
He does nothing that does not benefit him and his family
No they don’t! Only your supporters do!
He does nothing that does not benefit him and his family
Build the wall... !!!!!!!!!!! I love my country n my president!!! Go Trump!!!!!!!
After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL. fools
Thanks Mr president build the wall!!!!!
After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL. fools
"That is power, the mob is Rome. And while Commodus controls them he controls everything."
Rome comes not from who controls the Senate, but who controls the mob -- the mob is the people, the unruly masses of ordinary citizens.
Build the wall... !!!!!!!!!!! I love my country n my president!!! Go Trump!!!!!!!
E-Verify. Stop hiring illigals. Fine businesses who hire them. Put Americans first. Stop the feebees. And yes, how about a double wall with a solid dirt road between them so border control can do their job.
If you do not have money, use the Mexicans to build the wall. You could pay them with a green card...
Funny how the media quickly side with Democrats 100% need the wall. These families women and children can easily come over legally and get visa and go through process like all the legal immigrants from Mexico.
Border security is very important.  However, the method proposed should be questioned. One cannot successfully resolve a 21st century problem with 5th century technology(wall). One only needs to look back in history....The Maginot Wall....built by the French in the 1930s  to prevent German invasion.  We all know how that went.
Mr President, I do agree we need to secure our borders, but we need to build a smart wall not a wall like China built 2000 years ago and it was useless. Sensors, heat cameras, drones, AI, etc - not bricks... c’mon!
Your promises? Stopping you? Working together? Are you fucking kidding me? It’s not about you. It’s not about your promises. It’s about common sense man. Stop this craziness.
Rome comes not from who controls the Senate, but who controls the mob -- the mob is the people, the unruly masses of ordinary citizens.
But please help me with money buddy I've been on your side the whole time
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall.
Build that wall Mr. President, thank you!
Build the wall don't give in the 25% thats shut down we haven't even missed.
This has to be one of Manford’s Russian Facebook tied Facebook pages
We need to build one like the Germans did.
We can/could have better border security.  We do not require a wall of concrete or steel.  Double ICE's budget, hire more BPA, crack down hard on illegal employment of aliens, add lawyers to challenge sanctuary cities...  My God, I could put $5b to much better use!!!
Everything must have a reason! Support our president ! Make American great again
Your promises? Stopping you? Working together? Are you fucking kidding me? It’s not about you. It’s not about your promises. It’s about common sense man. Stop this craziness.
Stay Strong!! I am an former Air Force wife and live in Texas. I want the wall. If the Dem want to drag this out, so be it. Sad, but not surprised.
Seems people do not understand the objective. The objective is to STOP people from crossing the border illegally. The objective is not catch and release like we do in sport fishing. The only electronic method that would stop illegal crossing would be drones programmed to shoot and kill. Building a wall is far more humane.
Very proud of you Mr. President stay strong
Mr, President, Why do you not cut the pay of all of Cogress and take away all the perks they receive as a member of Congress, then perhaps they will see the light !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Our family is with you Mr. Trump stand firm and keep standing up for our country we are proud to have you as our President.
Why is the wall so important? Criminals will find away to get in like dig a tunnel. Oh wait they already do that.
So now you're not taking responsibility for shutting down the government. Predictable.
Hello my baby ...I'd like to know if you will be sugar baby....for a start I promise I will pay you 500$ twice a week for weekly allowances if that going to be enough for you   Please text me on hangout @deangeorgecain1@gmail.com                 Or  Kik me @ deangeorgecain1          Or text me        2027534298
Everything must have a reason! Support our president ! Make American great again
Hello my baby ...I'd like to know if you will be sugar baby....for a start I promise I will pay you 500$ twice a week for weekly allowances if that going to be enough for you   Please text me on hangout @deangeorgecain1@gmail.com                 Or  Kik me @ deangeorgecain1          Or text me        2027534298
Marie Smith this is the most sincere democrat post I have read. Thank you.
So now you're not taking responsibility for shutting down the government. Predictable.
I just called 800.350.6647 to support President Trump on the wall
The only true way forward is together. A strong future is built on the backs of many and no part in it is any less important than the other. We will get there together Mr. President!
Have you heard of things called tunnels Donald? Or, how about ladders?
Proud of the resolve of this President
GOD GOT HIS HAND ON YOUR HEART, BUILD THE WALL, PROTECT AMERICA!!🙏🙏
Posen revirushaliy   parzont  of pasheir  Kel  the people  ..stap secis fayer
Sorry it's stopping you...they don't give a s..t about our country.
Marie Smith this is the most sincere democrat post I have read. Thank you.
Sorry it's stopping you...they don't give a s..t about our country.
I even saw a Mexican as young as 19 crying because she couldnt get home. God owns the world, not you Mr Trump. I'm not a drug addict, I just wanted to see Disneyland for goodness sakes
Janice Leigh Schroder God Does not condone murder by aliens that are hateful illrgals
Liz Hall what has that got to do with me!
How can you judge her based on an illegal alien. Msybe she had no choice to fly that way
Posen revirushaliy   parzont  of pasheir  Kel  the people  ..stap secis fayer
How can you judge her based on an illegal alien. Msybe she had no choice to fly that way
I was so disappointed, rejected at the SA embassy yesterday.  I wanted to visit Disneyland!! How bad is that your staff rejected me???? You humiliated me, I lost all respect for USA now  so disappointed. Lady judged me in a 10 second interview. Australia beats your country.  Cant believe it
Go back then easy solution
Patrick Odell back where
Guys leave me alone I wont entertain your stupid talk
Liz Hall what has that got to do with me!
And as soon as you finish your State address they couldn't wait to talk so bad about you it's sad it's truly truly sad they would rather be more happier seeing you and she'll and Miss Miller case if I was you I'll keep the government shut the hell down and I can throw away the key to the courts
I cant believe how delusional Pelosi and Schumer are, Mr President shut down the boarder completely now.
Now I still feel messed up a little bit because me and my accident lawyer he got his third he gave me a thousand and hold back nine thousand he said well when we get the lien they don't see how much I can give you a lot of that well tomorrow yeah I'm going to have a naturally address for him too because he's going to have to cut a check he's going to give Medicaid that lean is going to be 500 he's giving me the rest of my money I
They were born on the wrong side of the wall , that doesn't make them monsters. #John_Snow
we need the border wall! don't give in
They will leave no stone unturned to eliminate you! Therefore I address to your common sense - act before they do. They do it already - we just don't see it yet, because they always act underground. We only see the dead - but we have to talk about the living. Yes, yes, all right, I understood and I know a few human lives don't matter compared to the planet. But excuse my way of thinking - for me every single creature - no matter if worm or human - is my planet and my (our) way of life! This should also be your view of our planet. Thank you. Do it!!! #wwg1wga
Guys leave me alone I wont entertain your stupid talk
They will leave no stone unturned to eliminate you! Therefore I address to your common sense - act before they do. They do it already - we just don't see it yet, because they always act underground. We only see the dead - but we have to talk about the living. Yes, yes, all right, I understood and I know a few human lives don't matter compared to the planet. But excuse my way of thinking - for me every single creature - no matter if worm or human - is my planet and my (our) way of life! This should also be your view of our planet. Thank you. Do it!!! #wwg1wga
we need the border wall! don't give in
Brad Thompson Upchuck him in Mexico for a few days..
I am not in favor of constructing a border wall, but you aren't interested in my opinion or representing me as an American. You only seem interested in representing your "base." Weren't you elected to represent ALL the people?
Charissa Rausch I wish you could experience what we deal with in border states and perhaps understand. Additional fencing along with increased personnel and technology is needed to slow the tide. Three of my family members have personally suffered from the doings of illegals committing criminal acts. Our school is bilingual and challenged by the transient attendance. Our neighborhoods have transmitted to third world country appearance and operation. Without a slowdown, there is no way for absorption and assimilation to work. You may not feel it yet in Idaho, but it won't take long at this pace.
Brad Thompson Upchuck him in Mexico for a few days..
Tell them to give their paychecks to those that are not getting paid!
Help  people  Sudan  don't  the ferydam
Mr. President, you said that Mexico would have to pay for the wall. How about we take foreign aid money from Mexico, Honduras, Nicaragua, El Salvador, etc. and fund that wall. Why do we continue to provide aid to countries who won't take care of their own people.
We need to build border wall for Americans security
Stand strong Mr President build the wall
Gonna have a lot of pissed off Americans if you keep up with shutdown, can't take foodstamps away from those who are in need of it. A lot of the American people who are on food assistance for their kids and WIC are going to be against you! This is uncalled for. And you can't expect people to work for free! #justsaying
I've toured the border with CBP agents, and you know what they first showed me? THE TUNNELS. But no, let's throw money away on a useless deterrent to non-violent people....
Charissa Rausch I wish you could experience what we deal with in border states and perhaps understand. Additional fencing along with increased personnel and technology is needed to slow the tide. Three of my family members have personally suffered from the doings of illegals committing criminal acts. Our school is bilingual and challenged by the transient attendance. Our neighborhoods have transmitted to third world country appearance and operation. Without a slowdown, there is no way for absorption and assimilation to work. You may not feel it yet in Idaho, but it won't take long at this pace.
How about not growing the budget deficit by another 300 billion?
Please share and get it out their
How about not growing the budget deficit by another 300 billion?
Your shutting off their stream of voters
Maybe Democrats like drug dealers &  criminal than others,
God bless you #POTUS. Stay strong and keep Americ safe. The 🙏🙏🙏
How about telling the dems ur releasing the names of all the people in congress who paid hush money for their affairs
Do you need dinero for the wall ? I will give you some .
So can't government workers get unemployment payments? No one is addressing this
Americans want sensible border security. Americans don't want to waste money on solutions that won't work.
Please share and get it out their
Americans want sensible border security. Americans don't want to waste money on solutions that won't work.
I’ll tell you what’s more important to me. And why I voted for you. Healthcare.
It’s all about the wall. That’s it. Just the wall. That’s all you speak of anymore. Why aren’t you fighting to fix the healthcare system?
So can't government workers get unemployment payments? No one is addressing this
Secure the Border ..look at Europe!!
WE want the wall the Dem are in office to vote for what's best for Americans not act like kids pulling a fit because  they want everything there  way
Build the wall ,God bless America.
A wall is not the answer. Did you forget about all the tunnels?
True Democrat idiocy.  Cussing always works. Lol
WE all want border security but it has been found that cyber and other forms of security are more effective.  Please allow the immigrants who need our protection in.  We have get boarder security agents.  Get more of them.  Thanks and Blessings,
So easy , thousands of vehicles go across the border every day. Put a $5 or $10 charge on each time any cross the border and it will help pay for the wall.
Built the WALL. Stand strong Mr. President
It’s all about the wall. That’s it. Just the wall. That’s all you speak of anymore. Why aren’t you fighting to fix the healthcare system?
Built the WALL. Stand strong Mr. President
God bless you Mr President!!! Build the wall!!!
Wayne Denny nope
So easy , thousands of vehicles go across the border every day. Put a $5 or $10 charge on each time any cross the border and it will help pay for the wall.
Wayne Denny nope
Brandon Burgoss you’re kidding right?
God bless you Mr President!!! Build the wall!!!
Brandon Burgoss you’re kidding right?
I don’t  understand why people and the Democratics are so against our President, it about time democrats wake and smell the coffee. Which I think they don’t.  This is a personal issue in which they are not strong enough to fight it in a clean way. Everybody voted for the damm bother. Whey is the problem now.? Is it because is Mr. Trump, or what.  Pososi and Schumer are such hiprocrits that they don’t believe their own s......t.
Blanca Ortiz because he is a thieving incompetent piece of garbage, that's why. Also, please work on your spelling, comrade.
President Trump they are breaking the law not protecting our country like they said they would when they took the oath
President trump your the man build the wall and make sure your name is on it
Border security is needed, they are only stopping because its President Trump . All of those who voted for the Democratic’s I hope , you can sleep at night knowing what’s going on at our southern border.
Let the people vote!! As it should be!!
Democrats want you to fail above everything else. Build the wall
That's what we hired you for, protecting the sovereignty of American Citizens and our laws. You're doing fine Mr. President Donald J. Trump
Blanca Ortiz because he is a thieving incompetent piece of garbage, that's why. Also, please work on your spelling, comrade.
That's what we hired you for, protecting the sovereignty of American Citizens and our laws. You're doing fine Mr. President Donald J. Trump
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!! WE'RE WITH YOU MR. PRESIDENT.
Steven Anargyros "we?"....um NO. YOU are with him and yelling about it
Barbara Warrell Jones yep. Kind of excited that we finally have someone in Washington that will do things for the Country.
Democrats want you to fail above everything else. Build the wall
Barbara Warrell Jones yep. Kind of excited that we finally have someone in Washington that will do things for the Country.
I just dont understand whats why so much resistance. Wasnt this Obamas canidate promise?
Steven Anargyros "we?"....um NO. YOU are with him and yelling about it
Definitely  build the wall.This is something that should have been done years ago.With you 100% President  Trump
Better look at real polls not those fake news polls.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/thehill.com/homenews/administration/423099-poll-majorities-oppose-trumps-wall-funding-demand-call-for-compromise%3famp
More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
Prior to Christmas until now, only whining rhetoric from Pelosi, Schumer and gang.  You’re always steps ahead of these political thugs.  Do what must be done for effective Border and National Security🇺🇸
R Doug Harner that’s different.   They just like to  cry and moan about anything and everything.   They are total morons.
Prior to Christmas until now, only whining rhetoric from Pelosi, Schumer and gang.  You’re always steps ahead of these political thugs.  Do what must be done for effective Border and National Security🇺🇸

Sure. Thanks for asking.
How embarrassing and humiliating it must be to be a Democrat.
Bullshit people are not getting paid !! That's  ur priority!!
What's more important to this president? Fulfilling an idiotic promise or doing what's best for America? If you watched him this evening, it's crystal clear. It's not about America. It's all about Donald's ego. :'(  Even the OAN commentators were choking on his lies.
Sure. Thanks for asking.
What's more important to this president? Fulfilling an idiotic promise or doing what's best for America? If you watched him this evening, it's crystal clear. It's not about America. It's all about Donald's ego. :'(  Even the OAN commentators were choking on his lies.
Clint Waite Where'd you get that statistic?  You might want to go back to school.
Clint Waite what a fucking idiot hahahhaha
He said it right there at the top: fulfilling a campaign promise which is nothing more than red meat to his base. His address tonight will be nothing more than untruths and misinformation. A manufactured crisis because right wing pundits called him out. Nothing more.
STAND WITH US AND HAVE THOSE REPUBLICANS DO THE THE SAME. Don't let the Democrats make them a deal for them. You make the deal.
Border security can be achieved without a wall.  #dotard
“AUTHORITIES ALONG U.S., MEXICO BORDER FIND TUNNEL WITH RAIL SYSTEM, SOLAR-POWERED LIGHTING UNDER CALIFORNIA”  https://www.newsweek.com/mexico-us-border-drug-tunnel-jacumba-underground-wall-trump-solar-power-train-1162022?fbclid=IwAR33ulk8eamsMY_misR1iaMnZrE2zB5R5jD4lAFyRRWwhnLdC_CH8rgBvaU
Stopping you. That is all they care about
We were with you in spirit, and we know you are doing your best to save this country.  Thank you, President Donald J. Trump!
Clint Waite what a fucking idiot hahahhaha
We were with you in spirit, and we know you are doing your best to save this country.  Thank you, President Donald J. Trump!
They want open borders and high taxes.
Stopping you. That is all they care about
Communist agenda via Zionist billionaire bankers. France protesting this agenda
Americans want you out of office.... then truly America will be great again
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California. Catholic Hispanics got divided against the protestants via communism. White corporate men never owned slavery nor put Mexico into poverty. Most Christians were catholic before
Communist agenda via Zionist billionaire bankers. France protesting this agenda
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall so I suggest you ask them. Democrats aren't stopping you from getting you tiny Dick monument, they just aren't going to allow the Murikan taxpayer to cover the cost
You're the man Mr . President..stay the course..we want the wall..keep the government shut down until we get the wall..the Democrats only care about their own agenda..not the American people's safety and welfare..Thank you for all the great work you are doing for our beloved Nation..MAGA
What's more important to you Donald J. Trump? Serving the country or lining your pockets? And your supporters? A healthy nation based on the concept of human rights, or propping up this failed businessman's latest scam?
More people voted against him. Gerrymandering should be a crime.
Stick to your guns. Your a great president
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California. Catholic Hispanics got divided against the protestants via communism. White corporate men never owned slavery nor put Mexico into poverty. Most Christians were catholic before
ask me why people #walkaway would be glad to have a conversation.
Mr. President...furlough the DEMOCRATS AND REPUBLICANS PAY CHECK AND THEN YOU WILL HAVE THE $5 BILLION FOR BODER PATROL IN 45 MINUTES...as an essential government Employee I need my pay check...thank you and you right our border needs to be SECURED 😡😡😡
I think deplorable fits. I mean, what better adjective is there for people who support a man who ran a sham charity?
Stick to your guns. Your a great president
They are wanting to stop the shut down, and negotiate later. Don't trust the party of evil. They will NEVER do anything to let you fulfill your promises, no matter how it affects the people being hurt by this. Keep the faith, and build the wall.
End the drug war in the cartels will  have little incentive to come here to America
They are wanting to stop the shut down, and negotiate later. Don't trust the party of evil. They will NEVER do anything to let you fulfill your promises, no matter how it affects the people being hurt by this. Keep the faith, and build the wall.
End the drug war in the cartels will  have little incentive to come here to America
The most important thing for Demonscrats is 2020 US Elections because there have no candidat so far and they need collectivly a lot attention to beat the actual president.
Yes we do President Trump We Want the Wall And We Want People To come Into Our Country The Right Way.. Thank you for Your Firm Position On The Wall.. Americans Are With You , We Stand With you And We Will Be Voting For You Again In 2020 Because YOU ARE THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER..!!!! #MAGA
That's RIGHT! Keep that border CLOSED until the DemonRATS give in! That's OUR money they have HOSTAGE!!!
What's more important to YOU...Getting your way and screw all the little people or letting people work rather than throwing a tantrum
Buld the wall sorman and his orcs are coming the battle of middle earth begans 🌎😂😂
AMEN.  The voters want border protection against the Mexican invaders that is taking over our country. Thank You President Trump for all that you are doing 💖
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
We stand with President Trump! Build the wall!!
"How I heard it:  Trump: "Let's spend a couple of bucks and fix the brakes on this car."  Schumer: "Brakes are ineffective at stopping cars!"  Pelosi: "We have more than enough money in the budget for body work after a crash! Besides, who cares about the people we might run over?"
Border security yes.  Border wall no.  There is money in the House appropriation bill for border security including fencing.
Incompetent 45 doesnt care that our national security is in big jeopardy today. The TSA agent arent getting paid and are calling out sick. Our airports where most of the terrorists and drugs come through are NOT secure due to CORRUPT 45s SHUTDOWN!  Adulterous 45 is a disgrace!
More LIES from adulterous, hateful, lying, inept, dense and very CORRUPT 45. OLD 45 promised that Mexico would pay for the  WALL. Polls show Americans want border security not ridiculous WALLS.
I don't care who pays for the wall, we need it,
A wall is not a COMPLETE immigration policy  which is what we need
The republicans didnt support the dems vote on the wall, so it works both ways. And that was your promise, not theirs. If people truly supported it, the dems wouldnt have the house
Tell the truth, you blurted something out during your campaign that was unrealistic and ineffective
AMEN.  The voters want border protection against the Mexican invaders that is taking over our country. Thank You President Trump for all that you are doing 💖
Tell the truth, you blurted something out during your campaign that was unrealistic and ineffective
Yes, Potus, Americans, all Americans want border security, just not an ineffective wall.  Your campaign promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall, which they aren't, so promise broken.  Now drop the wall and negotiate increased cbp personnel, technological defenses and other effective defenses.
Cathy Bellin Drop Nancy and Crooked Chuck I'm Mexico, I bet they would negotiate like they wanted to under Pres. Obama and Pres. Clinton wanted it...
Liz Hall time to stop playing politics and work together for the good of our country.  The other side did it doesn't solve anything.
The republicans didnt support the dems vote on the wall, so it works both ways. And that was your promise, not theirs. If people truly supported it, the dems wouldnt have the house
Liz Hall time to stop playing politics and work together for the good of our country.  The other side did it doesn't solve anything.
Duh! We all want border security but a dumb wall is not the answer .
Chrisopher Hernandez,  What is the answer?
Judy Conrad  the cartels are a multi billion dollars even trillion dollar industry ... why because Americans feed off their drugs ..... it’s a drug epidemic here. If we ask for drugs they will supply. Going beyond that they have submarine, airplanes , hundreds of tunnels already in place, boats, drones, catapults... you think a wall is going to stop them from making trillions of dollars. Ha!
Cathy Bellin Drop Nancy and Crooked Chuck I'm Mexico, I bet they would negotiate like they wanted to under Pres. Obama and Pres. Clinton wanted it...
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
The wall should come as soon as Mexico pays for it...that was his campaign promise!
Etta Ejg Moss double check that...wrong
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
Wait, for a grand total of 1 promise kept? When does that check come in from mexico btw?
You have not kept your promise! You have not and collected the money from Mexico. The fact is, you and you alone are responsible for not finishing that wall. You had both houses and two years time mr. trump. The question is what stopped YOU, mr. trump, building the wall?
Democrats want to turn all of the common citizens of the world into slaves for the ruling global elite.
Faux News!  Haha haha!  Also known as the Trump propaganda channel.
Loretta this will be the first week with no check. Unless Keith is stealing your pension what's going on
Hey dems you feel so bad for federal workers then get your butt to the table and help open the government again...!!!
Etta Ejg Moss double check that...wrong
Hey dems you feel so bad for federal workers then get your butt to the table and help open the government again...!!!
Don't give them a damn dime for foreign aid unless we get our wall.
Scott Czeiszperger how about no foreign aid at all, we have enough people that need help in the us.
Loretta this will be the first week with no check. Unless Keith is stealing your pension what's going on
Mexico isn't gonna pay for his vanity project, it never was going to pay for it. Trump told a lie. Now Trump wants the US taxpayer to pay for his vanity project, and his supporters are so brain dead they aren't saying to Trump "You said on several occasions that Mexico would pay for the wall, not us!"
Good old Fox - straight from Trump's playbook....fabricated numbers, lies, twisted logic & putting false words in peoples' mouths....I expect Trump to spew Fox's rhetoric in this lie-filled article almost word for word (except pausing mid-sentence to repeat the bigger words & sniff)...what a maroon...
The odds makers are taking bets on how many times Trump will lie tonight. http://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html
If Trump thinks Mexico will pay, tell him to keep up all the records of the so-called money we are getting from Mexico and when it gets to $5.8 billion, he can show Congress and get the wall built.
You tell them Trump! God bless the 45th. Our children and grandchildren will thank you. Make it big make it beautiful. #Trump2020  #BUILDTHEWALL
Hell has made reservations for all the evil, whoever they may be. The ink well of blood, I dip my quil. Enjoy the read, nightmares to come. https://www.amazon.com/dp/179331862X/ref=cm_sw_r_fa_awdo_t1_3H7mCb8PN73WA
"Nearly every time he puts thumb to keypad, he exposes that he has never progressed beyond the mentality of the precollegiate, trash-talking teen. They suggest not just inadequate manners or polish, but inadequate thought," argues John McWhorter in The Atlantic. #MoronPresident
Scott Czeiszperger how about the wall or no paychecks for the demo rats 🐀
"Nearly every time he puts thumb to keypad, he exposes that he has never progressed beyond the mentality of the precollegiate, trash-talking teen. They suggest not just inadequate manners or polish, but inadequate thought," argues John McWhorter in The Atlantic. #MoronPresident
I personally think you should let Democrats have this one, you’ll still get your wall built just you should surprise everyone & show the Democrats that you can bend but you won’t break
It’s so you can win2020..
Hell has made reservations for all the evil, whoever they may be. The ink well of blood, I dip my quil. Enjoy the read, nightmares to come. https://www.amazon.com/dp/179331862X/ref=cm_sw_r_fa_awdo_t1_3H7mCb8PN73WA
Just say the word  Mr.President and we'll come down there and build it our Damn selves
Well that's a no brainier . Anything to stop Trump
AMERICANS WANT TRUMP IN PRISON FOR TREASON
Missed your speech, Donnie.  I was watching your girlfriend fold her clothes on Instagram.
open the government then talk immigration. Just because Trump promised a big beautiful wall doesn't mean he gets what he wants. He constantly lies about everything
Hold The Line Pres Trump !!!!! Do not back off !!!!!
I have friends and family in prison. If walls didn't work, they'd be out causing mischief.
Ask Nancy and Chuck, why do they have walls around their homes ? If they think walls don't work then tear theirs down !
Their survival depends on trying to stop you at everything  .Keep going , we need them to become extinct !
It’s so you can win2020..
Their survival depends on trying to stop you at everything  .Keep going , we need them to become extinct !
The Democrats are opposing the President ONLY BECAUSE they are just about obstruction!!!  THEY KNOW the Border needs a wall and security...see below:  https://www.facebook.com/redpillusa/videos/223178005279698/The Caucasian ManDemocrats: “Shiiiiiiiiieeeet”Play Video
They don't care about our security, all they care about is obstruction...and that obstruction isn't just against Trump...it's against ALL OF US who voted for him!  They are NOT representing the people!  They are doing their OWN WILL, against the American people, who put Trump in office by an overwhelming majority!  The ILLEGITIMATE HOUSE we have now, by voter corruption and FRAUD will feel our wrath in 2020.
Ask Nancy and Chuck, why do they have walls around their homes ? If they think walls don't work then tear theirs down !
Yes we want the Wall built!!! Keep our country safe.
Why won't yall pay for the wall since you want the wall ? Its real simple
They gave you funding for border security, just not a wall.
Your own propaganda machine!  Fox News. Also, wanting border security is not synonymous with a wall. Ff
Wow the liberal comment never seen to amaze me🤦‍♀️ why are they so stupid and brainwashed? Like honestly!!
Praying for you!  Praying for America!
Stay strong President Trump. We the people are behind you!!  Build the Wall!!  Go gettem Trumpster!!
They said they risk their life to come to the greatest country in the world. They do not want to see this country turn into what they left. They say Trump loves all people not just the rich. They say Trump good for the country. Hillary not. They say build the wall. https://www.facebook.com/NewsweekEspanol/videos/1324031397629822/UzpfSTE0MDE2OTA3ODk4ODA1MjE6MjA1MjUxNjk4MTQ2NDU2Mg/?__tn__=kC-R&eid=ARDKL3BVHgUopEMTXuammEaPQ-4g1loZCjR6Q9yqeZAULHUznSzc-Mj6C6m9nZLAdlXdCcTxWNsDNU0M&hc_ref=ARRUCLKbbrSPzBl7GZqBS7MMmP5gyHR7Y1MvUBWPsJ8P7grtY087r_Tkwefb-Emx0oY&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARD13hkxsMlqXnC0E1lELOFxrFQoKIHOmaIxD-B1_FNa6L_Il7YAjO-Qfsyl4wsFoz3gW7Tl6Xz628CxJTFHNsD8M4poGnwz1TIyz1VBRWXAtsib5uaGViIIJzb6bOkECcmY3Dn7X7RvabLnHWb0dvJBkDSLZYkp1KmUwKOKy9-iqNjRAMBzaD7P38e0tgaAdwEdX0hl0SO14LeuJ6_ERTzoIxIwPtguhk4Zn8SGzoUZ-4aGVn5AlDWXMbslF21AgsBoJmBptkq7G7u4QhmnnTBj0aw6bSp5pip6f1wQALFcdUkWi3IOawNm0lbqhSQLloO3x5d18zuMuVeQ3ZVx13kcXkpgPCyS9gpxso4sSzvUYOtIK6SK4isognofqeRzL6w
Working together?  Do you work together?  Right.  Why then should they work with you?  And why not just listen to the experts on how to deal with this problem rather then fixate on a political wall?  Because it's really not about the wall.  Its about the fight for the wall.  It's about politics.    Lol.
They don't care about our security, all they care about is obstruction...and that obstruction isn't just against Trump...it's against ALL OF US who voted for him!  They are NOT representing the people!  They are doing their OWN WILL, against the American people, who put Trump in office by an overwhelming majority!  The ILLEGITIMATE HOUSE we have now, by voter corruption and FRAUD will feel our wrath in 2020.
Working together?  Do you work together?  Right.  Why then should they work with you?  And why not just listen to the experts on how to deal with this problem rather then fixate on a political wall?  Because it's really not about the wall.  Its about the fight for the wall.  It's about politics.    Lol.
The eu is ok funding a border wall for Turkey the left aren't moaning about that
There is a war going on there
They said they risk their life to come to the greatest country in the world. They do not want to see this country turn into what they left. They say Trump loves all people not just the rich. They say Trump good for the country. Hillary not. They say build the wall. https://www.facebook.com/NewsweekEspanol/videos/1324031397629822/UzpfSTE0MDE2OTA3ODk4ODA1MjE6MjA1MjUxNjk4MTQ2NDU2Mg/?__tn__=kC-R&eid=ARDKL3BVHgUopEMTXuammEaPQ-4g1loZCjR6Q9yqeZAULHUznSzc-Mj6C6m9nZLAdlXdCcTxWNsDNU0M&hc_ref=ARRUCLKbbrSPzBl7GZqBS7MMmP5gyHR7Y1MvUBWPsJ8P7grtY087r_Tkwefb-Emx0oY&__xts__%5B0%5D=68.ARD13hkxsMlqXnC0E1lELOFxrFQoKIHOmaIxD-B1_FNa6L_Il7YAjO-Qfsyl4wsFoz3gW7Tl6Xz628CxJTFHNsD8M4poGnwz1TIyz1VBRWXAtsib5uaGViIIJzb6bOkECcmY3Dn7X7RvabLnHWb0dvJBkDSLZYkp1KmUwKOKy9-iqNjRAMBzaD7P38e0tgaAdwEdX0hl0SO14LeuJ6_ERTzoIxIwPtguhk4Zn8SGzoUZ-4aGVn5AlDWXMbslF21AgsBoJmBptkq7G7u4QhmnnTBj0aw6bSp5pip6f1wQALFcdUkWi3IOawNm0lbqhSQLloO3x5d18zuMuVeQ3ZVx13kcXkpgPCyS9gpxso4sSzvUYOtIK6SK4isognofqeRzL6w
There is a war going on there
I want border security just not a worthless pointless wall. A 10 mile moat would work better anyway
Flood the tunnels too... Then work on airport security and other means of entry.  And do not forget those who have overstayed their visa.
Lori Elliott you have NO idea what you are talking about so let the adults talk run along and play
The eu is ok funding a border wall for Turkey the left aren't moaning about that
Did he just say, Democrats aren’t Americans??
No! Americans want you to get hit by a truck!
We all want border security. But only 30% want a wall. Funny thing...30%..is also the amount of Americans diagnosed with delusions.
,I'm announcing my candidacy for President in 2020 Looking for a VP She has to be hot.. Mckinnon/ ??? 2020 #MASA Maake America Sexy Again.
Dems are babies!!  The politicians and the voters. They cry and whine when they don’t get their way. We raised 20million!  That means we want the wall. We want immigrants, just not illegal ones!!
If you found a cure for cancer they would oppose it.
Then tell Mitch to introduce the bill and when you get it ... sign it.  Stop being a POS con man
Lori Elliott you have NO idea what you are talking about so let the adults talk run along and play
They rather have Americans suffer  and not appear weak to stop the president from looking good to voters
The government shutdown is your fault Trump, you said you would own it. So own it! You can't pass the buck on this one!
Hey #Shit4Brains we have border security, we haven’t been invaded in almost 100 years
Dems want trump out. Can’t stand the truth. They lost
Make a poll!! Post the link on twitter and have a honest to god poll right here on fb!!  👍 👍
Donny is getting really desperate. This isn't even an actual poll. It is guest opinion article. No research done, no poll taken, just simply the thoughts of one man. But you know Donny any BS to make him look good.
Term limits a must... and build the wall.... https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Then tell Mitch to introduce the bill and when you get it ... sign it.  Stop being a POS con man
Term limits a must... and build the wall.... https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Polls say building that wall is not that important to Americas
CNN fake news polls lol
Larry Boydston who is talking about CNN? These are polls by Quinnipiac and Harvard CAPS
Donny is getting really desperate. This isn't even an actual poll. It is guest opinion article. No research done, no poll taken, just simply the thoughts of one man. But you know Donny any BS to make him look good.
Larry Boydston who is talking about CNN? These are polls by Quinnipiac and Harvard CAPS
Build a wall on only one border. Looks to me like you don’t like the people on the other side, or why wouldn’t you build it on the Canada side too? You and your followers are motivated by the color of those on the other side of the wall you wish to build.
Kevin Carlson  Perhaps it us their neediness & connection to drug & human trafficking.
Patricia Murphy-Dailey looks to me like you want to discriminate.🤷🏼‍♂️
Patricia Murphy-Dailey so it’s NOT about protecting us from terrorists?
Kevin Carlson is that you Obama
Larry Boydston a wall won’t stop the drugs.🤦🏼‍♂️
Larry Boydston Obama wouldn’t waist his breath on you.
CNN fake news polls lol
Since when was the border ever insecure...stop making a problem that doesnt exist just to make a buck for yourself
God Bless our President Donald J. Trump..God Bless our Border Walls..Goe Bless all who stand and protect our United States Constitution and its Citizens!
Well you also promised better heath care. You also promised Mexico would pay For the wall.
With that atrocious grammar yes, i'd say she watches judge Jeanie because judge Jeanie talks like a crazy Puerto Rican woman from the Bronx. I don't believe she ever graduated law school, she can't even conjugate a sentence.
After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
And by the way, GOOD JOB 👍👍👍 Leader McCarthy on your presser outside the White House after the "waste of time" meeting!!!
Dems are slaves to their Reptilian masters . bunch of damn 🐍. Your days are numbered . Armageddon is near ha ha ha haaaa.
Larry Boydston Obama wouldn’t waist his breath on you.
Dems are slaves to their Reptilian masters . bunch of damn 🐍. Your days are numbered . Armageddon is near ha ha ha haaaa.
You promised Mexico was going to pay for the wall......
Maury Masalin we are going to let you pay for it😜
Ruth Gum ...shut TFU....and go get your gums checked, because your teeth are ok.
And by the way, GOOD JOB 👍👍👍 Leader McCarthy on your presser outside the White House after the "waste of time" meeting!!!
I'm ready to hunt down these Shapeshifting Reptilians kill em all!!!!
I recently asked my Mexican friend how his relatives back home felt about a wall being built. He said they will get over it.
Go get em tiger... We expect NO LESS. If they don't play nice, do what you gotta do within your powers. Just letting you know, on a personal level...  This LEGAL CUBAN IMMIGRANT REFUGEE is proud of you and proud of MY RED, WHITE AND BLUE.   God bless the troops, God bless you and yours and may God FOREVER bless the USA...  Home of the free, BECAUSE of the BRAVE!  Donald J. Trump
No they don't.  Only your cultist do and they are  un-Merican
I stand by you president Trump 100%.
"...another one of my promises...?"  What happened "Promises made, Promises Kept?"  Which is it Mr. President?
DO WHAT YOU HAVE TO DO MR. PRESIDENT!!!  National Emergency Option!!!
Efficient security , not a monument of your ego.
Ruth Gum ...shut TFU....and go get your gums checked, because your teeth are ok.
We voted for them for one reason and one reason ONLY!!! TO STOP TRUMP!
https://www.governorpalin.org/2019/01/07/gop-democrats-passed-full-funding-border-wall-jordan/?fbclid=IwAR1iRAR7L-3C4-Pghp3ds4fLvIoAO9U_l6WTSJqe4W3CXrVz5KqqPT51yRE.     Why are we funding walls in other countries, but GOP and Democrats refuse to fund one on our border ?
Please build the wall! The steal wall will require much more costly maintenance in the future and will be easier to penetrate v’s concrete.
Providence Rhode Island is a war zone!
How about putting people back to work
It’s all about stopping trump at all cost
Pay for it yourself you love to brag how rich you are and your trumpanzes will build it. Problem solved. Move on
Sir, stand your ground for us!! Thank you for all your hard work!! We the people see and appreciate it!! Lots of love and respect!! God bless you, Sir!! ❤️ You are the best President in the modern world history!! We LOVE you!!!! 😍
Border Counties are the safe'est in the Country, Check it out
Shut it down until we get the wall
Border Counties are the safe'est in the Country, Check it out
Peter Proscia wow, you are so brainwashed.  The Democrats  do give a crap about you or any of us Americans.
Sir, stand your ground for us!! Thank you for all your hard work!! We the people see and appreciate it!! Lots of love and respect!! God bless you, Sir!! ❤️ You are the best President in the modern world history!! We LOVE you!!!! 😍
Peter Proscia wow, you are so brainwashed.  The Democrats  do give a crap about you or any of us Americans.
Democrats want border security!
Just not a stupid wall!
Your not worth the time to even waste your one big lie after other soon you will be gone just out collusion has been found you are a trader and you know what the penalty is for traders
Can't you write an executive order and make it concrete we don't want a fence!
Pelosi: Approves over 30 billion in foreign aid. No outrage. Pelosi and Chucky: Displays her ignorance and snubs protecting her constituents. Liberals blame Trump. Sounds legit.
Trumptards are so gullable. They'll believe any bullshit Donathon tells them.
It is just not about Trump..it is against the electors of Trump they are after. The left is of one mind..Trump or someone like him is to never be elected again
President looked weak last night. When you are coming from a strong position you don’t have to justify yourself. He convinced me last night the wall is MORE worthless and pointless than it was on Monday.
Democrats are unable to think straight , because they are off the latch, since we elected President Trump. Sick of the lot of them.  But........I just love PRESIDENT TRUMP!! Keep up the Great WORK S I R!!!!!
Want to get refreshed on Trump’s lies before the address tonight? Here’s a good piece from USA Today. https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2019/01/08/facts-donald-trumps-border-wall-address-nation-immigration-shutdown-column/2503981002/
Security is not the same thing as a wall.
Just not a stupid wall!
Security is not the same thing as a wall.
Oh, NOW we understand why you had this bogus distraction "address" tonight.  Better get a real lawyer this time, Dippy Donnie!!  https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2019-01-08/manafort-denies-intentionally-lying-to-mueller-investigatorsMueller Suspects Manafort Gave 2016 Polling Data to Russianbloomberg.com
your a true idiot
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid in reality WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds if you get bound up and need to get money, also you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats say it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders which is against our own countries laws to support. For one. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money we earn for OUR Family taken from us to care for them. The more that come the more it coat and Democrats more, Open Borders. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more evry day and Democrats say send them on our American Citizens will pay for more and Thank US with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
Want to get refreshed on Trump’s lies before the address tonight? Here’s a good piece from USA Today. https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/2019/01/08/facts-donald-trumps-border-wall-address-nation-immigration-shutdown-column/2503981002/
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid in reality WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds if you get bound up and need to get money, also you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats say it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders which is against our own countries laws to support. For one. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money we earn for OUR Family taken from us to care for them. The more that come the more it coat and Democrats more, Open Borders. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more evry day and Democrats say send them on our American Citizens will pay for more and Thank US with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
Bringing Back MANUFACTURING!  ( as in, crisis on our borders)
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Ftruthout.org%2Farticles%2Fmayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless%2F%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2ZlZqLXNLQbpZQuAN6kaBM68Zz9UvyF8X2wUxbze9DrLNBWLscDKe2-cc&h=AT3DCTVxZY_wu0CW6_rNa7S6S5cJJxb8UPbxVIZmU3Jj_YaAAucc2bQrqwsYna7c5cFpkgnqIBON1jYuQUQtVY_FfZeIfXRDtsAU7Yja0NFaCJnXnFTnhFg9jZXYV0RMY3ZRepK__noyL4V_2ojdXXO2q93Dzooe7YMrXfhZpd1Wy7S6Dzx-UQxTHeouUGn2m6Pp3ievwBCQLC6J2PbNRdw_6tyWm-Ppkpr3ssc9-hQ0kekjFgRpZKl3LsldspzbwQcggI4G_eEVzdiVE4r-1fhbKtdqXfI-FEniuGw2f7uiIjQZ7XEkEhL4MDvmwkyVgJee5k5kWVj3gsFdXWu9-Iny5mik0qtn1qE6C68QCGMjrfQ_A5kqwNgfWQ2Csh6wtf5LUGqs8BzkTokMp8bMeNzi6-jyNjqNW0JIX33yi2k_dVwiAtKDZCdr95atzQ18V2Gl1xgh9r11GLUuR64MvD6R-ZQX8r_s9nsy-IJtwElfDCV4ilIizOQsbAhYRYTiw78EF6IE2RQRPAClWzppf8YLrKnsjAtPEV959sFf5ZZHOyCIWdWkzWMSdS4glP1HfrFxuoMkOOynmRtbfpoMzN1TykNqXgKOTXQ49ax51ayuxcgIMGl3o4FPEA9JHW5riceJc2rGjKiQH2e6t_DynicPl0KlA3IJV2jYOMjd
your a true idiot
I think you should take a cue from Syria Mr President
Americans want their money.
Hold the line, Mr. President! Thank you!
May they choose wisely. #BuildTheWall
Not true. https://www.cbsnews.com/news/views-on-southern-border-wall-have-been-consistent-since-trump-became-president/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62105165
Democrats will appose the wall like they opposed the Kavanaugh appointment.
My GOD!!!  ...just listen to this whiny little baby!!! Would you like a plate of cheesy poofs to go along with your daily whine, little Donnie?  Ridiculousness. https://aol.it/2LWHeqQ
https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Ftruthout.org%2Farticles%2Fmayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless%2F%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2ZlZqLXNLQbpZQuAN6kaBM68Zz9UvyF8X2wUxbze9DrLNBWLscDKe2-cc&h=AT3DCTVxZY_wu0CW6_rNa7S6S5cJJxb8UPbxVIZmU3Jj_YaAAucc2bQrqwsYna7c5cFpkgnqIBON1jYuQUQtVY_FfZeIfXRDtsAU7Yja0NFaCJnXnFTnhFg9jZXYV0RMY3ZRepK__noyL4V_2ojdXXO2q93Dzooe7YMrXfhZpd1Wy7S6Dzx-UQxTHeouUGn2m6Pp3ievwBCQLC6J2PbNRdw_6tyWm-Ppkpr3ssc9-hQ0kekjFgRpZKl3LsldspzbwQcggI4G_eEVzdiVE4r-1fhbKtdqXfI-FEniuGw2f7uiIjQZ7XEkEhL4MDvmwkyVgJee5k5kWVj3gsFdXWu9-Iny5mik0qtn1qE6C68QCGMjrfQ_A5kqwNgfWQ2Csh6wtf5LUGqs8BzkTokMp8bMeNzi6-jyNjqNW0JIX33yi2k_dVwiAtKDZCdr95atzQ18V2Gl1xgh9r11GLUuR64MvD6R-ZQX8r_s9nsy-IJtwElfDCV4ilIizOQsbAhYRYTiw78EF6IE2RQRPAClWzppf8YLrKnsjAtPEV959sFf5ZZHOyCIWdWkzWMSdS4glP1HfrFxuoMkOOynmRtbfpoMzN1TykNqXgKOTXQ49ax51ayuxcgIMGl3o4FPEA9JHW5riceJc2rGjKiQH2e6t_DynicPl0KlA3IJV2jYOMjd
My GOD!!!  ...just listen to this whiny little baby!!! Would you like a plate of cheesy poofs to go along with your daily whine, little Donnie?  Ridiculousness. https://aol.it/2LWHeqQ
Trump will have to confront one of the biggest challenges in building support for his wall: The people who live on the border say there is no national emergency and they don’t want a wall.  https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/Mayor of Texas Border Town: There is No Crisis Here, Trump's Wall is Pointlesstruthout.org
Baron Von Brztekkenburg depends on who you asked!  Border patrol agents say YES to WALL
Well this article asked actual people who live on the border, deal with this made up crisis and they say No. I'll take their word over the word of someone making a living off of border security. Pretty sure the people getting paid have an alternative motive to their opinions.
Democrats will appose the wall like they opposed the Kavanaugh appointment.
The promise was that “Mexico will pay for the wall”.
Liberals are willing to exchange American blood for Latino votes.  Simple as that.
Wish America could vote on it. But use electoral votes so all the illegals that vote for Democrats wont have as much pull.
We The People = Must take action For illegal immigration has been occurring for decades  - FINALLY  ONCE in our life time Have a President Who is  FOR We The People
Neither, getting their hands on taxpayer money is their only goal
Why doesn't a billionaire step up to the plate and build the wall for the United States and have it named after him!!!!
Well this article asked actual people who live on the border, deal with this made up crisis and they say No. I'll take their word over the word of someone making a living off of border security. Pretty sure the people getting paid have an alternative motive to their opinions.
We need a wall/ barrier or whatever they want to call it.  Come here legally....and I don’t care who pays for it.  Think of Americans first this time
But Mexico was going to pay for it.
I think there is no point of the wall because face it we already know how to fly airplanes and dig tunnels and still have other ways yo get in the country no matter what you do
we are behind you Mr President!!!
THEY HATE YOU MORE THAN THEY LOVE OUR COUNTRY
All of this is the Democrats' fault. I really wish they cared enough about the U.S. citizens to help pay for the wall that is supposed to protect us. I guess they don't care about our safety.
Your posts haven't been showing up in my feed for some time now. The Facebook censorship continues. Something really needs to be done about this.
One day the US will Collapse just like all other empires throughout history.
Why doesn't a billionaire step up to the plate and build the wall for the United States and have it named after him!!!!
One day the US will Collapse just like all other empires throughout history.
But your cool with the president lying non stop?
Charles Johnson Jr it’s all lies! Stop watching the news!
Your posts haven't been showing up in my feed for some time now. The Facebook censorship continues. Something really needs to be done about this.
You know to get past all the zoning restrictions your going to have to use Adobe right
Call a special election put it to the people and you will see how many of us what the Wall!
The removal of (D-MN), IIhan Abdullahi Omar from the 5th Congressional District in her participation in marriage fraud.  Created by C.M. on January 05, 2019  We have 30 days that get 100,000 signatures. Please Patriots sign , I did. https://petitions.whitehouse.gov/petition/removal-d-mn-iihan-abdullahi-omar-5th-congressional-district-her-participation-marriage-fraud
I am from West Africa {Nigeria} but I support you Donald J Trump. Protect your country. Build the wall.
Stand strong Pres. Trump and don’t give in to any amnesty deal.  Reagan gave amnesty in return for a securing our border.   They got their amnesty and our borders are still wide open.  One American life lost because of an illegal, is one to many.
Mexico should pay for it! Go get the money!!!
I'm all for boarder patrol and a wall but how much of this money is coming from trumps pocket or out of the pockets of are high up political figures. I know money is being pulled out of my mother's pocket who has worked for this government for over 25 years and if she can't make her house payment that will leave her homeless how many of a government officials are looking at loosing there homes if this shutdown continues.....
Stick to your guns - BUILD THAT STEEL WALL!!!
Charles Johnson Jr it’s all lies! Stop watching the news!
We need the wall 60 years ago.
It’s obvious that it’s all about the wall...I support it, but don’t support all of us Americans you are hurting,including myself
I think the market cares more about a trade deal with China than a government shutdown.However, if the shutdown continues Trump may lose consumer and business confidence.
Thank you President Trump, Do Not give up to those trolls,  Be strong,the people with you
Dem's just want to win. They hate the President and will do anything to make him loose. They care nothing about the American people. We voted Trump in because he will fight against the establishment.
Life need to be secured first before think about something else!
I called Congress for you brother..from kalifornia..
I am not against stopping the inflow. My concern is your background as a builder and a stubborn temperament. Are their tech alternatives, sensors and drones - for that price get Musk to pop a bird up there.
I think Mr. President that once this wall goes up you should find all the homeless vets, and give them housing and a pay check and have them patrol the wall. It will bring down the rates of homeless people in America, and it will help the vets giving them a purpose.
I don't care about the wall. But if you're going to not pay someone it should be the people that are fighting, not the innocent people who have no influence on what is going on. Hold the pay on the Congress and Senate and the President until they can get along and make a compromise.!!
Stick to your guns - BUILD THAT STEEL WALL!!!
Americans want border security!
Trump you need to see this. you can fund the wall this is how. https://www.teaparty.org/chuck-norris-comes-brilliant-solution-fund-wall-youve-got-hear-340586/
oh stfu Chancy (thats Chuck and Nancy) just build the fkn wall and STFU!
It won’t matter.  Rage politics is only answer dems have.
Wouldn't it be cheaper to electrify the wall that we already have? Plus these drug dealers use boats in the Gulf & Pacific coast, as well as small planes. Plus, people that use illegal drugs will (sadly enough) just make their own.
What’s most important is for you to keep your word and get the money from Mexico like you said. You didn’t mislead your voters did you. That’s there sticking point. Don’t build a wall build a shipping canal that’ll create jobs on both sides and they won’t want to come. Then build a Super-max Wall if you want. This way both country’s pay for the canal share in the overall upkeep and profits it’s a business deal a win win deal and your the master of the business world. Thanks best wishes.
I have the wall courtesy of the democrats and hilary clintons.
They will never agree ... it doesn't fit their plan. So just declare an emergency and build it. The Country will thank you when this nightmare is over.
Finally a president that is not all talk no action.
I don't care about the wall. But if you're going to not pay someone it should be the people that are fighting, not the innocent people who have no influence on what is going on. Hold the pay on the Congress and Senate and the President until they can get along and make a compromise.!!
Finally a president that is not all talk no action.
President Trump: Please end the government shutdown.  I'm for better border security but does it have to be a Wall?
You can call it whatever you want. We need  border security.  The left does not care about it citizens they only want power. They can give money toward this as they waste billions on other things that is good for them
They will never agree ... it doesn't fit their plan. So just declare an emergency and build it. The Country will thank you when this nightmare is over.
Mr Trumpski, the truth is the most important thing - truth and clarity. We are talking about a man without a plan, only interested in money at any cost. A wall will not keep Americas enemies out for they sit in the Whitehouse.  Manaforte taking money from Russia, guilty of tax fraud, providing inside polling info to Russian spy, secret deals with Russian spy in Madrid on Americas stance on Russian sanctions eye- the truth is out there
KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! It hasn't affected my life one bit.
They don't want you to win! They will never give it to you and that is the only reason. They pretend the voters didn't want this. Someone send them the chants from all your rallies "Build the Wall"
UP THE RESISTANCE  STOP TRUMP AT ALL COSTS F.... the American M... F...ers
We want border security and a wall as high as you can build it. The American people own this country not Congress!
anyway is 911 war or wto war nobody want to die
This is one reason why Americans vote for you!  Build the wall.  Don’t cave to the bullies!
Withhold pay from Congress and the Senate. They are withholding pay from their constituents because they refuse to negotiate. It's time their pockets are empty. If they were under pay for performance they would wouldn't get a check. Better yet if you cant hold their pay then encourage them to donate their pay to those who are hard working individuals, doing the jobs most of them never would and now they are doing it without pay
Jeanine Pirro is the perfect Atty General
You can call it whatever you want. We need  border security.  The left does not care about it citizens they only want power. They can give money toward this as they waste billions on other things that is good for them
Your doing a “Great Again” job pres. keep up the good work!
Just seen Dem response to address. Do I think Dems see security one way and Republicans see it another....yes. Do I think only unity can end the shutdown....yes. So, let's approve both methods....simple!
Great speech, Mr. President. You call Dems who they truly are.
Consider Compromise  yes to security
Because you Mr President said that Mexico would pay not the American tax payers  that's why.
I wounder how many people who are against the wall donate to these other countries! This should show all americans how much the Democratic elites care about them when they have walls themself. Democrats just want votes and are willing to put you at risk to get them! Wake up! Build the wall!
The question is why don't democrats want border security???? It baffles me. I know it's for the votes, but they are really willing to trade their own security for votes? Why??????
Interesting listen...  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=2468045599876608&id=1102865066394675
Declared a National Emergency and build the wall to secure our boarders Mr. President.
Jeanine Pirro is the perfect Atty General
Look out,,its the nancy and chuck show, they really are out of touch,and im not even an american..
Democrats are all in on following the Luciferian agenda.
Shut down the border show Mexico we mean business
Mr. President - As a Navy veteran I know that you did not swear to protect the country when you were sworn in to office. You swore to protect & defend the Constitution of the United States just as I did when I was sworn in to the Navy. The last two years of my enlistment I was stationed at the Fleet Area Control & Surveillance Facility In Jacksonville, Florida. While there our air traffic controllers would detect planes and ships trying to evade detection, which would turn out to be bringing drugs into the country. The point being our border with Mexico is not the only way drugs and people are coming into the county illegally. what do suggest; a dome like in the Simpson Movie.
#Declassify FISA and stop the nonsense.
But you promised México would pay, and instead you’re trying to pass the cost off to taxpayers... some of whom, you’ve stopped from getting paychecks at all. And the majority of us who are already struggling even with our paychecks.
Stand your ground on this it’s been needed for years!!!!!
200 year ago those socialists TRAITORS would have been hung for treason!! Let's bring that policy back 🇺🇸
Stop giving foreign aid to our future enemies! We are in debt!
I have friends that lived near the border that must hide belongings as things were stolen from their yards.
Stop giving foreign aid to our future enemies! We are in debt!
Keep the government shut down until we fix the southern border
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
200 year ago those socialists TRAITORS would have been hung for treason!! Let's bring that policy back 🇺🇸
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
President Trump you are the best president I have ever seen , I am a hard worker  and have lost my insurance after I wAs told I was grandfathered in i am so tired of people who want something for nothing  theirs lot's of people who want me to start a militias to stop this night   MAre
You are working to hard for the American people but we love you keep up the good work
Keep the government shut down until we fix the southern border
Your promise was ....MEXICO will pay for the wall.  Not...the AMERICAN tax payers will pay for the wall.   Please be honest in your statements.   Please remember why you voted for Trump!
no matter the outcome we are on your side sir
EXCELLENT, EXCELLENT,EXCELLENT SPEECH, MR PRESIDENT!
"BUILD THE WALL"!!!!!!!  It's about time we have a president that really cares about our country and for the people. It has been a long time coming. Toooooo long! Go Mr President!!!!! Very proud to have him!!!!
When nancy said you lied just now...I turned it off.   If I happen to listen to the news I will hear her and Chuck for the next week with the same crap that I just blocked out of my life for the evening. These people are nuts and I wish they would go away.
The majority of Americans do not want a wall.  Stop with your Fear Mongering LIES
Schumer and Pelosi looked very ashamed from the meeting . Going in a meeting in a civilised world with that type of heart deserves a lot to think of. United States of America is the father of the world . Democracy in America is what other small countries are watching , Schumer and Pelosi is openly practicing hatred instead of democracy. Why hate the president .  What example are Democrats showing to the whole world about democracy.  America is bigger than individuals.  Trump is just the president for some years and Trump will finish his term and leave America as he got it. God is with America and Trump  whoever is against the citizens cause ,  will go down first. Psalms 91 .
I want to thank you for your patience sir.  Keep up the good fight.
You are working to hard for the American people but we love you keep up the good work
I want to thank you for your patience sir.  Keep up the good fight.
Take the money from Congress they are not working for their fat paychecks
they already gave him 1.7 billion last year. The republican controlled senate rejected it last year. He has yet to justify 5.7 billion. And why should congress pay for it? Why should we pay for it at all? He promised Mexico would. The new NAFTA doesn’t have Mexico paying for it.... so ???? Our government isn’t working - how is that MAGA??
Schumer and Pelosi looked very ashamed from the meeting . Going in a meeting in a civilised world with that type of heart deserves a lot to think of. United States of America is the father of the world . Democracy in America is what other small countries are watching , Schumer and Pelosi is openly practicing hatred instead of democracy. Why hate the president .  What example are Democrats showing to the whole world about democracy.  America is bigger than individuals.  Trump is just the president for some years and Trump will finish his term and leave America as he got it. God is with America and Trump  whoever is against the citizens cause ,  will go down first. Psalms 91 .
So how is Mexico paying for the wall again? Another false promise. Typical 😂
Build the wall please Mr president
My. President, southern cameroonians need America to stop Paul Biya from killing innocent civilians
Stay 💪 strong we are behind you on this!!!
Support and prayers for all you do Mr. President.
It's time to let the people vote on it
Or let them pay as individuals for those people. See if they want to spend money of there own
I’m standing my ground with you! But guess you Know I Won’t Backdown!
they already gave him 1.7 billion last year. The republican controlled senate rejected it last year. He has yet to justify 5.7 billion. And why should congress pay for it? Why should we pay for it at all? He promised Mexico would. The new NAFTA doesn’t have Mexico paying for it.... so ???? Our government isn’t working - how is that MAGA??
I’m standing my ground with you! But guess you Know I Won’t Backdown!
Donald Trump for Prison 2020 https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/08/paul-manafort-robert-mueller-plea-deal-russia-investigation/2485091002/Paul Manafort, President Trump's former campaign chief, accused of lying about sharing polling data with Russianusatoday.com

Or let them pay as individuals for those people. See if they want to spend money of there own
Thank you, Mr. P for standing up for the Citizen!  Give them an ultimatum; "It's either a Wall or you will cut off Healthcare and Education to the illegal, law breaking, NON Citizen"
US politics is quite puzzling to a lot of us in the UK.  I seem to remember the promise DT made was that the Mexicans would pay for a wall to be built.  Until that money has been made available, it seems undemocratic to take the money of US citizens to pay for it - there are so many good causes that need that money, ordinary people who could benefit from improvements in services.  Also, has anyone ever wondered if it’s really to keep people out?  I remember a big wall being built under those circumstances in Europe post war and it’s main function, far from keeping out the bad guys, ended up preventing so-called free people from leaving their own country, often being shot in the process.  Walls rarely create long term benefits and they mostly separate, they don’t bring people together.  Sadly, isolation policies cost much in terms of trade opportunities and standard of living in the countries that impose such ideas - even here there are short-sighted people trying to initiate debilitating isolation whilst caring nothing for how the economic costs of such plans will affect the least empowered in our society...
What a wonderful speech.  He is such a great patriot for our nation.
If Mexico pays for it. Show us the money. Better yet show us your plan.
We do NOT need this wall, I am a hard working citizen and want to go out clubbing on the weekends without having my price of cocaine upcharged 200%! The only compromise I would be willing to make is if we could open cocaine dispensaries!
Funny how new trade deal with Mexico will pay for the barrier indirectly. So Trump did figure out a way to get Mexico to pay for the barrier. Smart move . Dems can't keep up .
Thought Mexico was going to pay for it. What am I missing here? #MANGA
Mr President  Please do what ever it takes to build this wall. May god bless you and help you.

Mr President  Please do what ever it takes to build this wall. May god bless you and help you.
Dear Mr. President, since you, the senate, and the house of representatives have chosen not to work with each other I suppose that none of you  been denied you salaries in regard to the shutdown...what a surprise.  Does that mean I don't owe taxes for the weeks or months that this shutdown is in effect?  Afterall if I'm not receiving services why should I pay for it?
Are you so clueless that you are not aware Trump refused to accept the $400,000 presidential salary Obama got? His salary is $1 per year to comply with the Constitution.
Thought Mexico was going to pay for it. What am I missing here? #MANGA
President Trump stand  firm  and  build  the  wall.
Damn those airplanes ✈️ and boats 🚣  got past my 5.5 billion dollar 💵 wall again   Damn !   now what  !!
Build the wall Mr. President,we are behind you 100%, best president ever, I pray for you everyday.
Since the democrats have caused the government shutdown let them pay the wages for all the employees not receiving a paycheck because of their drama! Schumer and Pelosi should be the first to make payments out of their own non earned wages!!!
Why don’t you just lie to the American people a few more times. Mexico will pay for the wall. What a joke this clown is.
Start a fund raising for Protecting our USA from those who believe otherwise.And use as tax right off also its for a good cause
"Mexico will pay for the wall." --Donald Trump
Are you so clueless that you are not aware Trump refused to accept the $400,000 presidential salary Obama got? His salary is $1 per year to comply with the Constitution.
Yes!! We need that wall immediately, but must have doors in case if we need them for any reason.
Great job mr. President. Build the wall do whatever you have to do
I know you're a billionaire Trump, just use your own money to build the wall, problem solve!
If everyone in America  pays 17.00 we have  5.5 billing to build a wall
I think the initiative should be taken further than just a fence.
Donald Trump for Prison 2020
While trump wants to build a wall the enemy are already in the Whitehouse, Russia straight in the front door with arms wide open.
Just shutdown the border I guarantee you the Mexican government will build that wall in record time
Martial Law , Build the Wall !
"Mexico will pay for the wall." --Donald Trump
We want to hear from the President, not the news channels.
Build the wall mr president we stand behind you.
Mr. President , you know the way around it. Do what needs to be done for U.S.. BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
While we are at it deport every single illegal that voted in our elections, charge every single American that processed all their write in ballots as votes.................Michael
Great job sir. Proud to call you my Present. We need a wall. Please keep fighting for us.
The most important thing to democrats is using their buzzword tantrums in place of real arguments to control people through mob rule. Nothing new happening with them. Stay on strike all year long if you need to and include cuts to the DNC paychecks to pay actual employees that deserve it. :)
Fact: Illegal border apprehensions are at a 46 year low. Fact: 0 terrorists have been found crossing our southern border. Does this sound like a "crisis" worth harming 800,000 Americans over? Get your facts from reputable sources, rather than this ass-clown president!
Whem Pres Trump says 4000 undocumented illegals crossed over the southern border, the ICE stats suggest he is right!  ICE says •  Over a 10-year period (2005-2014) ICE arrested approximately 4,000 MS-13 members, leaders, and associates. This represents about 13 percent of all gang members they arrested nationwide (31,000) during that period.  •  92 percent of the MS-13 affiliated aliens arrested were illegal aliens.
Keep up the amazing work mr . President .god bless
Stop breaking the law protect our country like you said you would when you took the oath
Martial Law , Build the Wall !
Stop breaking the law protect our country like you said you would when you took the oath
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
IN AND OUT IS PROTECTED UNDER NANCY PELOSI CONSTITUTION
THIS IS HIGH SOCIETY. THESE PEOPLE WENT TO HARVARD AND YALE





DICK IN THE ASS IS BETTER THEN IN AND OUT
DAD IS BETTER THEN IN AND OUT
Keep up the amazing work mr . President .god bless
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
I CAN AFFORD TO LIVE ANYWHERE I WANT
IM THE FACE OF THE AMERICAN DREAM
I CAN AFFORD TO LIVE IN ANY NEIGHBORHOOD I WANT
MY NEIGHBOR WENT TO YALE AND STUDIES CRIMINAL JUSTICE
MY NEIGHBOR FUCKS HIS WIFE AFTER 20 YEARS EVERY DAY
MY NEIGHBOR IS IN LOVE WITH HIS PARTNER
MY NEIGHBORS WIFE RIDES MY BOYS COAT TAIL SHES IN THE IN AND OUT CLUB
IN AND OUT GOT ITS OWN RULES AND REGULATIONS
DAD IS BETTER THEN IN AND OUT
Mark Sharif I'm sure its not just the goverment's you been sucking lmao
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
IM JUST A WHITE MAN TRAPPED IN THIS BLACK WORLD
IN AND OUT GOT ITS OWN RULES AND REGULATIONS
I hope President Trump gets the wall
Dearest Mr President,   I have request your Excellency. There will be NEW YEAR'S EVE and FEAST OF THANKSGIVING on 29th Year of Lebath 2nd Year (on 5th of March 2019th Year).  There will be NEW YEAR on 1st of Azi 3rd Year (on 6th of March 2019th Year).  There will be FEAST OF GOD CREATED DAY (LIGHT) AND NIGHT (DARK) from Sundown 29th of Lebath 2nd Year to Sundown 1st of Azi 3rd Year (evening 5th to evening 6th of March 2019th Year)    Shalom!
They will do anything to stop you! They don’t care what the cost. Keep fighting for us...🇺🇸👍🏻
Please build the wall for the people of the US
Build the Wall! We the people stand with you President Trump!
Build the wall along the southern border.
Thank you Mr. President for keeping America safe! But we also need a beautiful concrete dome to keep illegals from coming in by air. Call your Congressman and demand it today! #BuildTheDome! 🇺🇸
I GOT A COUPLE BILLION AND THE POWER TO SHUT DOWN THE GOVERNMENT- TRUMP
IM JUST A WHITE MAN TRAPPED IN THIS BLACK WORLD
Dear President Trump, I am an American citizen. I uphold the Constitution of the United States of America without reservation. I am one taxpayer of We The People. I call upon the President to make a formal Constitutional declaration of National Emergency to build a necessary, suitable, and secure physical wall across the landmass and length of the southern border of the United States of America, without delay by any and all means afforded the Office of the President and the Executive branch of government. We have a National Emergency. Build the Wall. Thank you.......Karen Hudnall
Nick Demico and so they can use that against him in the election saying see he didn't get the wall built
We the will people will Prevail one way or another we will get our Wall or just piss off the demonrats by having Trump win re-election in 2020 or my personal favorite having them both.  Trump 2020-2024.
Dear President Trump, I am an American citizen. I uphold the Constitution of the United States of America without reservation. I am one taxpayer of We The People. I call upon the President to make a formal Constitutional declaration of National Emergency to build a necessary, suitable, and secure physical wall across the landmass and length of the southern border of the United States of America, without delay by any and all means afforded the Office of the President and the Executive branch of government. We have a National Emergency. Build the Wall. Thank you.......Karen Hudnall
We the will people will Prevail one way or another we will get our Wall or just piss off the demonrats by having Trump win re-election in 2020 or my personal favorite having them both.  Trump 2020-2024.
They don't seem to care about the safety of Americans. I have tried and tried to get a copy of the Democrats plan and the cost of it and can't find anything but political banter anywhere !
Nick Demico and so they can use that against him in the election saying see he didn't get the wall built
Lynn Knuth Pionke is there a document detailing Trumps plan? Or, is it to just “build a wall?”
Use emergency powers roll tanks arrest all the deepstate
Stop begging the criminals and arrest them please
Lynn Knuth Pionke is there a document detailing Trumps plan? Or, is it to just “build a wall?”
Stop begging the criminals and arrest them please
The country wants the government open!
Roberta Anastasia Keep it shut down! We are a military family and fully support the government shutdown. Being a military family and living on post, I have gotten to hear how many other military families feel about the shutdown and 99% of then AGREE!
Amy Miller you are making this up. I am from a military family and we are heartsick over how this draft dodger has ruined this country and now causing hardship to ours.
Ruined our country how? The  Unemployment rate is at a all time low, he has opened up more jobs, even food stamps and government assistance is at a low. He has been doing his best, to do everything he said he would.
Use emergency powers roll tanks arrest all the deepstate
Ruined our country how? The  Unemployment rate is at a all time low, he has opened up more jobs, even food stamps and government assistance is at a low. He has been doing his best, to do everything he said he would.
Roberta Anastasia  she isn’t making it up
It's our America to..we will pay for it
Listen to Trump speak, and then wait for the truth with the rebuttal.
How about using that money to get people treatment for their opioid addiction or help poor kids get the healthcare they need??..a Stupid promise for a stupid useless wall from a stupid and useless “man”..
Standing Strong with you Mr. President. Praying for you especially tonight to make the undecided Americans understand what our Country is facing. Bless you.
Democrats don't care about illegals just as they don't care about us, they use them for control.I support saving our country from power hungry politicians and all of the other dangers and costs of open borders.
Tanya Pittman AMEN SISTA
Democrats don't care about illegals just as they don't care about us, they use them for control.I support saving our country from power hungry politicians and all of the other dangers and costs of open borders.
Don Williams Don you'll be dead way before it's built and be paid for. Old man.
Bobby L Dee and you are a nasty irrelevant punk!  KMA
Standing Strong with you Mr. President. Praying for you especially tonight to make the undecided Americans understand what our Country is facing. Bless you.
“Trump shall become My trumpet to the American people," http://www.rightwingwatch.org/post/self-proclaimed-prophet-god-using-donald-trump-to-expose-darkness-and-perversion/
So can you answer why it wasn’t fully funded when republicans had control of everything?
JUST BUILD THE WALL. TRUE AMERICANS ARE BEHIND YOU, MR. PRESIDENT!
I love my President! we stand with you sir! Keep up the great work.
Fuk off dude your about as stoned as one can get without having a stroke out.  How much powder are you inhaling?  Damnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnn
Yes we want security. The wall is useless!
Just listened to your address to the nation and listened to crying chuck and dementia Pelosi.  They say crap they'd never have said to Obama. Cryyyyying Chuck wants you to open the government.  DON'T DO IT OR YOU'LL LOSE THE BATTLE.  DON'T BACK DOWN KEEP IT SHUT DOWN!!!
Bobby L Dee and you are a nasty irrelevant punk!  KMA
Just listened to your address to the nation and listened to crying chuck and dementia Pelosi.  They say crap they'd never have said to Obama. Cryyyyying Chuck wants you to open the government.  DON'T DO IT OR YOU'LL LOSE THE BATTLE.  DON'T BACK DOWN KEEP IT SHUT DOWN!!!
Ruben Radar Rodriguez    Drusilla Morrison read this post please.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez, thank you for your support. May God bless you and your family.
Stay strong yourself. I’ve been wondering how people affected view the issue, as that’s what matters. God bless. If necessary, find another as this might take awhile.
Chris Carr All federal employees keep their insurance during a shut down so your comment is irrelevant. https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.fedweek.com/issue-briefs/opm-issues-status-update-on-benefits-during-shutdown/amp/
Ruben Radar Rodriguez ahhhhh your own profile reveals you aren't a Federal employee..... More time invested in creating this account but fake is fake....it's been reported to Facebook
Thanks Ruben. Ignore the Dims spewing hatred.
Yes we want security. The wall is useless!
Liz Livingston This analogy is getting old and furthermore not even relevant!
Ruben Radar Rodriguez Amen to that!
Come on guys. We already have walls, let’s just finish the job.
Thanks Ruben. Ignore the Dims spewing hatred.
Thank you!
Come on guys. We already have walls, let’s just finish the job.
Thank you for supporting #PresidentTrump while he continues the push to do what is best for #Americans, and what Americans have asked him to do. #KeepingPromises
Caron ~ Thank you and your wife for bearing this burden for the good of our country.  May God encourage your hearts as we go forward.
HOLD. YOUR. GROUND. We see what the traitors are doing. They want to flood America with cheap labor that they don't have to pay but they can promise benefits to all for votes.
Donald Trump we both from New York you say you was going to put the money up why you trying to take from the middle class you know Mexico is not paying for the wall we need our jobs I got a mortgage to pay New York City you playing with our money
Rodriguez---Thank you & God Bless you & your wife.
The liberals want the illegals to come here for one reason, In my opinion; they are far more intellectually superior than a person who has less than a fifth grade education. So if you can give them the basic necessities of life, food; clothes; shelter; healthcare; ect... They will get a vote that will secure their power. Liberals want control; they demand it. Nothing will ever change it. Narcissism in the form of charity; empathy; and pulling emotional heart strings is how they play the game.
anyone?????
Christy Grubbs I guess not
The liberals want the illegals to come here for one reason, In my opinion; they are far more intellectually superior than a person who has less than a fifth grade education. So if you can give them the basic necessities of life, food; clothes; shelter; healthcare; ect... They will get a vote that will secure their power. Liberals want control; they demand it. Nothing will ever change it. Narcissism in the form of charity; empathy; and pulling emotional heart strings is how they play the game.
Thats a good question
Sorry but you sound like a parrot.

Thats a good question
The democrats are getting more anti American by the day
Maybe if Democrats weren't taking bribe money from the Mexican cartels this wouldn't be an issue. Can't see another reason why Pelosi, Schumer, Obama, Clinton, etc would flip-flop on building a barrier.
Ted Cruiz said use money seized from El Chapo drug cartel.. $14 billion.. just like local police use confiscated drug money to fight the drug problem.
That's what the people put you in office for. When you consider the overall budget, the cost for the barrier is marginal. Having proper ports of entry encourages legal migration, or requests for asylum. WY encourage illegal migration and put law enforcement in jeopardy. The Democrats act like children. Mr Trumps mandate is to lead and protect the country. This is something Fems should support. It's such another instrument to control migration.
UM YOUR PROMISE WAS THAT MEXICO IS GOING TO PAY NOT AMERICANS
Democrats want to secure the border - Trump wants a glass beads curtain made of steel. #MAGGI

The majority of Americans know a wall is not the answer.
If AGT and the Voice can have people from all of U.S. vote on contestants and have results in a real short time, why can’t you propose this on a vote of the American people to see what the majority of the people want? For the wall. Against the wall. Both parties abide by the results being that you all work for the American people! Just saying.
Do your bone spurs stop you from grabbing them by the pussy?
The people that elected him are ignorant.
The border is fine no crisis, you are fear mongering again and you need to stop.
Greetings to all the dear and exalted foreigners who are honorable and worthy. I am an expert and professor of libertarian rights in Iran. I am very proud of the USA and Israel who support my servant so that I can come to your land and serve you. I'm fine with your back ground and kiss your distance. Phone number 989905226236. Gmail mythiranprofessor@gmail. com
The reason they're against President Trump is because they don't want the American public getting used to a president keeping the promises he was elected for. It's just that simple! What's going to happen when the Democrats vote in one of their own and none of the campaign promises are kept...lol
Democrats want to secure the border - Trump wants a glass beads curtain made of steel. #MAGGI
The reason they're against President Trump is because they don't want the American public getting used to a president keeping the promises he was elected for. It's just that simple! What's going to happen when the Democrats vote in one of their own and none of the campaign promises are kept...lol
Most US citizens want more border patrol agents, going after companies that profit from the illegals, and not a wall that won't work.
Gregory James Montgomery same old brain dead crap from Liberal morons Republicans have given amnesty to illegals six times since 1986 and every time lying lowlife liberals promised to secure the border now here we are 30 years later and the lowlife Liberals are still telling the same fucking lies playing the same fucking games without Southern border
Greetings to all the dear and exalted foreigners who are honorable and worthy. I am an expert and professor of libertarian rights in Iran. I am very proud of the USA and Israel who support my servant so that I can come to your land and serve you. I'm fine with your back ground and kiss your distance. Phone number 989905226236. Gmail mythiranprofessor@gmail. com
So we go from Mexico paying for the wall to 800k employees not being paid for weeks? Stop getting your orders from fox and friends and fix this man.
The answer is obviously obvious, and sad.  These people called Congress are at the core of Our Country, and are collecting great paychecks and benefits from our taxes, SO well taken-care of, but SO many of them won't even do their jobs and uphold The Law, so many of them are just plain un-American--all on Our dime.
Good speech Mr President! 👍  You are doing the right thing and what we expect from you, our leader.  Now get the job done and implement the National Emergency procedure!  The Dems response was pathetic, only hoping the opportunity will pass if you cave in to their stupid demands, so that they can continue with the status quo.  Stick to your guns Sir!   We are with you and support you all the way!  God bless you! 🙏
Mexico paying for a wall?  You bombed on that one, big guy.  A wall is not a magic solution for border security in the south. What about  the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans? What about Canada?
They will try and stop you atLl cost because they don’t want American people to like you. The Democrats act like in-mature children
Gregory James Montgomery same old brain dead crap from Liberal morons Republicans have given amnesty to illegals six times since 1986 and every time lying lowlife liberals promised to secure the border now here we are 30 years later and the lowlife Liberals are still telling the same fucking lies playing the same fucking games without Southern border
They will try and stop you atLl cost because they don’t want American people to like you. The Democrats act like in-mature children
Kathyleen Sherrod Nice try. It's over for Trump.
Tim Baldwin I'm sure the whole world has awaited your pronouncement. Mr. Nobody.
Stand firm President Trump!
Tim Baldwin I'm sure the whole world has awaited your pronouncement. Mr. Nobody.
The number of white ppl who make derogatory comments proves my point.  Especially the coward who try to laugh but have nothing to say...because THEY ARE WHITE and the only ppl they know who support this president.
Kathyleen Sherrod Nice try. It's over for Trump.
Don't make promises Mr.Trump that you cannot keep. Secure the border, work on good domestic and foreign relationships. You said mexico was going to pay for the wall, work with mexico you can work it out. Are you able to work well with mexico, central and south america and other nations? There is always a way to do things and it is not impossible to work things out. Be a nation builder, people do change you know, you can change other nations as well. Its how you are willing to relate and work things out with others. Don't make any promises that you cannot keep, it makes you untruthful and someone that cannot be trusted.  Undivide the house, the senate, and make it equal with both sides working together not just one against another. Be of one mind with same vision that sees the best outcome of what is best for the people and other nations. Rewrite, and update the constitution if it is possible it is old, it needs to be revised and up to date. Be a good leader and lead the people to prosperity Mr.Trump.
Is that what Democrats want us to hate them for what they are?
Do it, whatever it takes.Deep inside the libtards  feels the need of BORDER WALL but since they HATE PRES. TRUMP SO MUCH ,THEY DENIED IT NOW.  HYPOCRITES !!!
I demand IT - I am TAXPAYER.                                                                 - I have been in dozens of cities and have SEEN with my own eyes the DETERIORATION, CRIME, LITTER of waterways highways and neighborhoods, , ,etc., etc.,                                        I HAVE TO CONCEAL Carry in Cities where I grew up that were Safe but are not ANYMORE  THANK YOU FOR ALL YOU ARE DOING PRESIDENT TRUMP!
The number of white ppl who make derogatory comments proves my point.  Especially the coward who try to laugh but have nothing to say...because THEY ARE WHITE and the only ppl they know who support this president.
I demand IT - I am TAXPAYER.                                                                 - I have been in dozens of cities and have SEEN with my own eyes the DETERIORATION, CRIME, LITTER of waterways highways and neighborhoods, , ,etc., etc.,                                        I HAVE TO CONCEAL Carry in Cities where I grew up that were Safe but are not ANYMORE  THANK YOU FOR ALL YOU ARE DOING PRESIDENT TRUMP!
And I  glad people aren't making their money.  I am glad the social security, welfare checks and all are coming to a screeching halt.  I look forward to the rioting in the streets because the newly elected Congress would rather support illegals than do their damn jobs.
We all know what you said but you can still change your mind big deal so what! If its better for the people why not? We dont need it. Its a waste of money time efforts and all sorts of necessary peoples talents and disposition towards aspects of you your administration and our country
And I  glad people aren't making their money.  I am glad the social security, welfare checks and all are coming to a screeching halt.  I look forward to the rioting in the streets because the newly elected Congress would rather support illegals than do their damn jobs.
You need to start your own news Network.. Trump news network! Then give it to us straight once a week! Put these pos news out of business!
Kevin Cramer there already is one, it's called TASS
Lots of people are going without pay because of YOU!!!!!! Not the Democrats; Not the Easter Bunny, Santa Claus, or Cupid. It's on YOU!!!! Stop the bullshit, you horrible waste of space.
It's a false sense of security they are going to keep coming through the air ports.
Great Speech Mr President Let's Secure the Border FIRST and then End the Government Shutdown last. Hows that Nancy Pelosi and Chucky Boy Schumer NOT THE OTHER WAY AROUND! :) Stay Firm Mr President
Putting criminals behind bars, that would include you. Now sit back as the mass of foriegn tRump bot comment away
I thought you said Mexico would pay for the Wall Don? So why are you asking Congress to pay for it?
Democrats are playing a childish game that will eventually bite us!
I admire Trump if there is no Trump as the president of the US right now to against China . US may be sinking into the water by China in the next 5 years. So we must vote for Trump and let him do the right way and the right time .
Kevin Cramer there already is one, it's called TASS
I AGREE.... OBAMA WAS DOING WHAT HE WANTED WITH A PEN WITH OUT THE CONGRESS APPROVAL..   GO AHEAD AND STAMP THAT WALL MR, PRESIDENT THE WAY YOU WANT TO PROTECT  YOUR CITIZENS. !! GOD BLESS YOU!!
Paul Gonzalez hahaha that’s a fake news for sure. What’s your source Trump or hank hills daddy
Paul Gonzalez I take the average of multiple sources. No one has said 99% support for the wall. Not even 99% of republicans support the wall
I AGREE.... OBAMA WAS DOING WHAT HE WANTED WITH A PEN WITH OUT THE CONGRESS APPROVAL..   GO AHEAD AND STAMP THAT WALL MR, PRESIDENT THE WAY YOU WANT TO PROTECT  YOUR CITIZENS. !! GOD BLESS YOU!!
Paul Gonzalez I take the average of multiple sources. No one has said 99% support for the wall. Not even 99% of republicans support the wall
Stand strong sir... I AM A GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEE KEEP my check as long as it takes...BUILD THE WALL.....
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on, our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
Paul Gonzalez hahaha that’s a fake news for sure. What’s your source Trump or hank hills daddy
AMAN...THANKFUL WE AMERICANS F I N A L L Y HAVE SOMEONE LOOKING OUT FOR AMERICA...ADMIRE YOUR BACKBONE !!  KEEP UP THE GOOD FIGHT !!! The American people should be able to see it all..like tonight...both sides...they look like hand holding idots !!!  The TRUTH always come to light !!!
NANNN this is a tactic to stop the speaneas ...to stop investigations....because you knew that with the amont that you asked for the game of throne wall.....THEY WILL SAY NO....so .what you do...you use your troll followers with your WALL..SHUTDOWN THE GOV....ALL THIS FOR STOPING OR DELAYING THE INVESTIGATIONS......JUST A SMOKE SCREEN.....YOULL DRAG THIS SHUTDOWN FOR 2 MORE YEARS IF YOU CAN....WHY DID YOU SAY ...YEARS....HUMMMM .....BIZARRE
What's important to Americans is that you open the government so people can get a paycheck
Of all the walls around the world that were built. It held no one out.   Waste of money
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on, our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
We want you behind bars!!
Angel David Hernandez esta gente la neta ke si es pendeja pero ke le ase uno seguir aguantando al elote mal parido 😂
We want you behind bars!!
Angel David Hernandez esta gente la neta ke si es pendeja pero ke le ase uno seguir aguantando al elote mal parido 😂
Yes build the wall !
Yes build the wall !
Keith Rabinowitz They ARE THE DRUG CARTEL, ALONG WITH ALL THE LEGAL AND LAW SYSTEM AND JUDICIARIES. You can't corrupt the entire country without the Powers That Be behind you. They CREATED this morass of evil drudgery.
Communist Bernie Zionist shill
RENEE. MIRROR IMAGE HON?
THANK GOD FOR TRUMP! #KAG
EXPLAIN THE LOWEST UNEMPLOYMENT IN 50 YEARS. RISING GDP. LOWER TAXES. MORE MINORITIES WORKING THAN AT ANY TIME IN HISTORY. LONGEST RUNNING BULL MARKET IN HISTORY. HMM. SOUNDS TO ME LIKE TRUMP KNOWS EXACTLY WHAT HE IS DOING AND HE IS DOING IT VERY WELL. #KAG
Keith Rabinowitz They ARE THE DRUG CARTEL, ALONG WITH ALL THE LEGAL AND LAW SYSTEM AND JUDICIARIES. You can't corrupt the entire country without the Powers That Be behind you. They CREATED this morass of evil drudgery.
January 2017 - Trump inaugurated - GOP majorities in both houses of Congress January 2017 Wall not an emergency February 2017 Wall not an emergency March 2017 Wall not an emergency April 2017 Wall not an emergency May 2017 Wall not an emergency June 2017 Wall not an emergency July 2017 Wall not an emergency August 2017 Wall not an emergency September 2017 Wall not an emergency October 2017 Wall not an emergency November 2017 Wall not an emergency December 2017 Wall not an emergency January 2018 Wall not an emergency February 2018 Wall not an emergency March 2018 Wall not an emergency April 2018 Wall not an emergency May 2018 Wall not an emergency June 2018 Wall not an emergency July 2018 Wall not an emergency August 2018 Wall not an emergency September 2018 Wall not an emergency October 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Democratic majority elected in House January 2019 EMERGENCY  Fact: Border apprehensions are at a 45 year low. There is no crisis at our border. It's fake news.  #NoWall #Impeach #Incarcerate
Mr President, KEEP Gov SHUTDOWN till they give the $5.7 BILLION, EVEN IF it takes 2 more years. PERIOD. FULL STOP!
The most important thing to those idiots are stopping your promises no matter what the cost is.  Funny thing is Bush sr,good old Billy boy Clinton, Bush Jr, that loser Obuma , Killary Clinton all wanted the wall at least that’s what they said when they were running and trying to get the presidency
Americans (both Ds and Rs) want border security.  Not a “wall”.  Bozo T President.
Give ‘em hell Mr President! We’re behind you and have your back! 🇺🇸
Most of your promises sucked, believe it or not, it isn't about you specifically, you just come up with the dumb ideas trying to be stopped.
EXPLAIN THE LOWEST UNEMPLOYMENT IN 50 YEARS. RISING GDP. LOWER TAXES. MORE MINORITIES WORKING THAN AT ANY TIME IN HISTORY. LONGEST RUNNING BULL MARKET IN HISTORY. HMM. SOUNDS TO ME LIKE TRUMP KNOWS EXACTLY WHAT HE IS DOING AND HE IS DOING IT VERY WELL. #KAG
BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT!! THE AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE BEHIND YOU!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Congressional Democrats DEMAND Central America's NORTHERN-TRIANGLE'S WARFARE (The Worst Warfare On Earth) BY GANGS ON HUMANITY to  continue to increase in the USA for the Democrat's USA COMMUNIST POLICE STATE. Democrats are arguing for no wall in order to extend BORDER SECURITY TO EVERY CITY WHILE DEMOCRAT CITIES KEEP SECEDING FROM THE USA TO HELP GROW "THE NORTHERN TRIANGLE'S" HELLISH WAR BY GANGS TO EVERY CITY IN THE USA FOR A COMMUNIST POLICE STATE. #
Walls are a necessity; there's a good reason that we live and sleep within them. Build it and show the world.
How much American blood was shed because of your 7 deferments to Vietnam?  Your bone spurs haven't hurt your golf game.
You want to see how great he is. Look at your stock portfolio for end of year statement ,how many thousands did you loose..  ..Great my ass  There for if your still all for him I understand you don't have a pot to piss in or a window to throw it out. Get yourself right
Most of your promises sucked, believe it or not, it isn't about you specifically, you just come up with the dumb ideas trying to be stopped.
Shut down the IRS and stop taxing our paychecks!! That’ll show them!!!
You are right, President Trump!
If during tonight's speech President Trump would make a graph of a circled colored in 100% to show the entire federal budget - and then tape a toothpick on the circle to indicate how much is needed to build the wall- the left would  be able to visualize what a tiny amount is needed for the wall!!   The left is dim and they need to see the "crumbs" it will cost to preserve and protect this nation.  It is the president's job - was in the oath he swore when inaugurated!!! And he intends to build it!  Thank you Mr President! 🇺🇸
Build the wall!  Don't have!  Congressmen should not be paid during a shut down.  They don't feel the pinch to negotiate.
But you said MEXICO was going to pay for the wall. Was that another lie? Don’t give in Nancy make him get the money from mexico
You said Mexico was paying for the wall! If that's the case, why are you extorting us and demanding that we pay for it #DontheCon??
You want to see how great he is. Look at your stock portfolio for end of year statement ,how many thousands did you loose..  ..Great my ass  There for if your still all for him I understand you don't have a pot to piss in or a window to throw it out. Get yourself right
You said Mexico was paying for the wall! If that's the case, why are you extorting us and demanding that we pay for it #DontheCon??
SO YOU WORK WITH HER AT THAT DIVE BAR HON?  BLESS YOUR HEART.  ;)  @KAG
THE WALL IS COMING!  GET COMFY!
Jill no I’m a contractor that hires Latinos.  😎
Yes we do Mr. President
The process of inspecting the IAEA inspections, which is one of the verification stages of denuclearization in North Korea, is to be announced, and border immigration applications should be made by verifying the identity, disease and finance by 100 persons per month. You can not find it.you choices impasse
No.. Americans want a president
Lie, lie lie. That's it. That's all you do. All the news stations are calling you out on your lies including faux entertainment news that usually lies for you!!! What has this country come to?  The worst president ever and can't wait for the Democrats hold you accountable. Gotta love that subpoena power!!!
I think you can build the wall without making much noise
Just DO IT..BOTH!   Attn:Trump, BUILD THAT WALL; use Powers of Nt'l Emergency! AND, REOPEN the GOVERNMENT! Call their bluff; Don't let Dems dictate-manipulate!-- Delores Holbrook Dixon
52% of Americans oppose the wall.
Jill no I’m a contractor that hires Latinos.  😎
Republicans have given amnesty to illegal aliens six times since 1986 with the Assurance from the lying liberal Democrats that they would secure the Border now here we are over 30 years later and the lying liberals have not only failed to secure the Border but they are continuing with the same lies that they've been telling for 30 years secure the southern border once and for all I'm 57 years old I've been waiting for this to happen since I was 19 and here we are watching The Lying liberals play the same game over and over again with our Southern border they do not care about the security of our country or the security of the American people the lying liberal Democrats will continue to play this game for another 30 years if we let them.
It is not clear that a house without an external fence to protect the security of your borders is my friend Trump
What a sad and pathetic bomb of a speech last night. Ratings were terrible. Reviews were worse. SAD. #wompwomp
Don’t give up. Stand your ground Mr. President.
Yes we do I'm sick of the dems
The promise that Mexico is paying for the wall? The Dems are stopping you from having that happen? What the hell.
Yes we do!!!!
Yes we do President Trump.
Sandy Green Amen sister!
Yes we do President Trump.
Sandy Green Amen sister!
Fools After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
Protect the border. Protect Americans. BUILD THE WALL
Damn straight! Behind you 100% in Wisconsin!!!
Thank you President Trump!! Democrats want a one World Order, that is why they are fighting so hard. Drain the Swamp and expose them all
Fox calls out Trump's lies.  https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/donald-trump-border-speech-fox-news_us_5c356ed3e4b0dbd06601649c?ncid=fcbklnkushpmg00000063&utm_source=main_fb&utm_medium=facebook&utm_campaign=hp_fb_pages
That's a false dilemma. It's a fallacy. There are other options available.
Fools After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
That's a false dilemma. It's a fallacy. There are other options available.
The numbers show a border wall.is not wanted by a majority of Americans. Why does Fox Noise keep spreading this lie when Trump's own handpicked government officials don't even back him up because their own statistics prove he is not being truthful!
Charlene Dickerson incorrect. This is why we voted for him
Jo Anne Howell Sitterson A majority didn't vote for him. Only 34% want a wall, which makes sense because that figure pretty much matches his base.
Charlene Dickerson incorrect again.
Jo Anne Howell Sitterson You have every right to believe what you want to, as I do too.
Build the wall, Sir!!
What's more important to you? It seems that you only care about yourself and building some monument to yourself...
You are using Fake News networks to get out your message.  You are a traitor to your base.
I have a Third Option - Get The Funding Secured and Declare The Emergency So The Border Could be Secured in Months instead of Years. We have More Pressing Issues to Work On. Remember All This Construction Creates USA Jobs.
President Trump please just stop begging them, rule over them w an executive  power!!!
Jo Anne Howell Sitterson You have every right to believe what you want to, as I do too.
It's TIME!  Time to go ALL IN!
Mr President thank you so much for standing in the face of such evil people such as shumer and pelosi. Thank you for caring enough for the very ones coming against you to ensure their safety as well as those who stand with you. Please Mr. President declare the emergency and build that wall. I work everyday right next to a building housing illegal immagrants for ICE. They are bringing them in by the bus loads. These illegal immagrants are draining the tax payers ability to ever get ahead. If pelosi or any of the other evil ones want to fund them then lets drain their pocketbooks not the average american ctizen.
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
It's TIME!  Time to go ALL IN!
The Dems need to grow up.
Fake news, from the fake president.
Your population that want to traffic human beings, take illegal drugs and hire cheap labour will get their fix and people with or without a wall. These drugs and people are bought and hired by Americans. There is your problem.
www.gofundme.com/thetrumpwall  Brian Kolfage
They are playing first person to second to third person on America it's the NYC politicians They made them legal documents with x now they will just blend in with us illegally we have Different laws from immigrants and LGBTQ rights which is discrimination
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
They are playing first person to second to third person on America it's the NYC politicians They made them legal documents with x now they will just blend in with us illegally we have Different laws from immigrants and LGBTQ rights which is discrimination
Communist Bernie first
Works for me.
Let the people vote for the wall
Works for me.
Sharon Joyce yup, Fox News being the most biased
Communist Bernie first
Your ego driven border wall is a waste of money and most Americans (including some Republicans) knows it. You used last night's address to collect campaign contributions from your supporters in the guise of a "border wall fund" when the funds went directly to your re-election campaign. I hope there is a campaign violation related to this and possibly fraud charges.
Love you POTUS 💙
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
ABC, NBC, CBS.. ALL 100% BIASED!
Yes!!! Build that WALL!!!!!!
Jamie Bennett There really isn't.
Yes!!! Build that WALL!!!!!!
THE REAL QUESTION IS......HOW MANY MILLIONS OR BILLIONS HAS NANCY BEEN PAID TO GO AGAINST A WALL. SHE WAS ALL FOR A WALL BEFORE WHEN OBAMA , THE WORST PRESIDENT EVER WAS IN OFFICE. INVESTIGATE IT
Yes!! We need the barrier.
That is Demon rats
Build that wall! Do what you have to do to get that Wall!!! And the ones who don't want the wall...just put them idiots on the other side!!!
Jamie Bennett again and again and again
Build that wall!
Lee Judy you don't like to hear you get out of United States
Ernie Hildebrand what????
Build that wall!
Ernie Hildebrand what????
You are a sick one!
Jeff West trump and his cult are the sick ones.
Lee Judy you don't like to hear you get out of United States
Jeff West trump and his cult are the sick ones.
Jeff O'Kane who was on a ship?
Jeff O'Kane bend over and swap the deck...bitch
Jeff O'Kane I voted for him, lesser of the 2 evils
Jeff O'Kane the drugs do not come from people crossing border iilegaly....the come in from airports, cars, trains...
https://www.facebook.com/160389977329803/posts/2090209427681172/
Todd Schroeder Sir, you don’t have the mental capacity to carry on an intelligent conversation with me. So just stop.     You are wasting my time. Go find some liberal to heckle. Night bro.
As long as the demand for the drugs is here, the supply will find a way here.....the war on drugs .....when will the government learn
Todd Schroeder https://www.facebook.com/1139974519/posts/10212764292359057/
You are a sick one!
Jeff O'Kane that way he can put another pervert catholic in the supreme court, maybe another drunk too
Jeff O'Kane drink the poison.....it does not kill brain cells, the government said so
Jeff O'Kane too bad trump gonna turn your hunting grounds into oil sands.....his buddies need the cash
Todd Schroeder Maybe Democrats will find some dirt on the next SCOTUS appointment in their grade school or Kindergarten years. Stay classy Democrats. Stay...... classy.
Jeff O'Kane we need a little catholic boy that got his penis played with in the supreme court.....go trump
Todd Schroeder Son, just stop. I love bashing you liberal pussies, but you aren’t even putting up an intelligent fight.
Jeff O'Kane not liberal, not right wing....middle of the road.....cannot trust a man the has tricked people for years
Todd Schroeder Your other choice was Hillary Clinton, explain the better option. 🤔
Todd Schroeder Good for you Todd. But I don’t think taking it up your ass is morally superior either. 🤣
Todd Schroeder https://www.facebook.com/1139974519/posts/10212764292359057/
Jeff O'Kane keep the government shut down untill 2020
Todd Schroeder Oh you know they aren’t going to let THAT happen!
Jeff O'Kane more guns at the border, just shoot everybody....like the germans did...go trump
Todd Schroeder Good for you Todd. But I don’t think taking it up your ass is morally superior either. 🤣
Todd Schroeder Go home liberal, you’re drunk.
Keep sharing! https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Todd Schroeder Go home liberal, you’re drunk.
You just went on prime time TV and repeatedly lied. You just lie with abandon.  Shame on you and those who don't stand up to you.
Call your reps and tell them you want the wall. A call is much more effective than just posting on FB.   In Virginia    Warner  202-224-2023,   Kaine   202-224-4024
Keep sharing! https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
BUILD THE DAMN WALL!!!
BUILD THE DAMN WALL!!!
Karen Edwards yeah he does run at the mouth too much for me
Walter Merritt I don't remember voting on a wall. And I vote in every election. And yes I want the wall.
Trump ran on the wall. The American People didn’t vote for him. In 2018 the GOP again ran on the damn wall. Once again the American People didn’t vote for them.
Karen Edwards yeah he does run at the mouth too much for me
Wouldn't mind a wall around Hillary.
A must read.
Trump ran on the wall. The American People didn’t vote for him. In 2018 the GOP again ran on the damn wall. Once again the American People didn’t vote for them.
We support you!
We support you!
Build that Wall !Build that Wall!!
Build that Wall !Build that Wall!!
A country without borders is like a house without walls, it collapses! 🇺🇸
Go President Trump !!
Go President Trump !!
Angie Small-Double I agree.  President Trump is amazing!  MAGA!
Republicans have lost. Get over it. You are Obsolete. Once Trumplstiltsken is out, everything he did, will be nullified. Extinct. A Micky mouse footnote in the history books. Like you, his voters.
Lmao why you little durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo ahhhh ahhh here ya go lil 🐒🍌
Joachim Kretzschmar In your dreams lmfao!!! You a special one I see durrrrrrrp!!!!
Angie Small-Double I agree.  President Trump is amazing!  MAGA!
The dems care only about their political power. Not about America or its citizens.
Kyndra Doscher good summation - dems are total nutjobs on this issue over there 🤪
To the dems, stopping you is more important than all Americans put together.  They are totally EVIL.  God bless you President Donald J. Trump.
United States of America is United again and our enemies are scared not only are we rebuilding the Wall but the Economy Military Jobs Health Veterans Citizens we are Rebuilding The United States 🇺🇸 Bigger Better Faster Stronger
GROW UP DEMOCRATS!!!
Joachim Kretzschmar In your dreams lmfao!!! You a special one I see durrrrrrrp!!!!
GROW UP DEMOCRATS!!!
Terri Brand hello dear
United States of America is United again and our enemies are scared not only are we rebuilding the Wall but the Economy Military Jobs Health Veterans Citizens we are Rebuilding The United States 🇺🇸 Bigger Better Faster Stronger
Terri Brand hello dear
The democrats want power.
Mexico builds it right
And screw the Chamber of Commerce and their "deal".  What is this?  A holdup?!  They are a big part of why we are in this mess with their CHEAP LABOR.
"If President Trump Does What We Are Expecting Tonight...He Will Be Loved And Respected More Than Ever For All Of Us That Are With Him Saving Our Country...And Of Course Democrats Will Find Some Way If It Is Even Possible...To Hate And Disrespect Him More Than Ever...Lové Being On A Winning Team ...Don’t You?" Jr Whatley
Just donated 220 dollars
Keep America safe
Security yes!
"If President Trump Does What We Are Expecting Tonight...He Will Be Loved And Respected More Than Ever For All Of Us That Are With Him Saving Our Country...And Of Course Democrats Will Find Some Way If It Is Even Possible...To Hate And Disrespect Him More Than Ever...Lové Being On A Winning Team ...Don’t You?" Jr Whatley
Security yes!
Why was this not done with in the last two years??? 🤔 When Mexico refused to pay for it , President Trump and Republicans held the House and the Senate for two years.! Why didn't they push the wall through??? Why?
Good question for sure. It’s sad to say he is using it as much as the other side as his 2020 campaign initiative / slogan etc. Sad state of affairs.
Build it! 👊🏻 build it! 👊🏻 build it! 👊🏻
Fake polls from fake news !
Nah, the "national emergency" this evening is the total screw-up by Manafort's lawyers indicating "collusion" with Russian Intelligence. ARE YOU GOING TO ADDRESS THAT ISSUE OF NATIONAL IMPORTANCE THIS EVENING? NAH!
Cheque or money order??? Pablo Escobar’s brother launched $50M GoFundMe to impeach Donald Trump https://www.msn.com/en-ca/news/world/pablo-escobar’s-brother-launched-dollar50m-gofundme-to-impeach-donald-trump/ar-BBRZdI7?li=AAggFp4
Build our wall!
PLEASE TALK ABOUT HOW HONDURAS PRESIDENT GOT KICKED OUT OF PRESIDENCY GUN POINT MIDDLE OF THE NIGHT (MANUEL ZELAYA ) BECAUSE HE DIDNT WANT TO PROTECT HONDURAS BUT TO CREATE THE SAME   OF VENEZUELA.   You ARE PROTECTING USA.   DEMOCRATS ONLY WANT TO STOP YOU SO YOU DONT WIN AGAIN AND THEY DONT CARE ABOUT THE BORDERS!!!!    Democrats and Republicans need to be TOGETHER ANF HELP OUR PRESIDENT FOR A BETTER FUTURE
Good question for sure. It’s sad to say he is using it as much as the other side as his 2020 campaign initiative / slogan etc. Sad state of affairs.
PLEASE TALK ABOUT HOW HONDURAS PRESIDENT GOT KICKED OUT OF PRESIDENCY GUN POINT MIDDLE OF THE NIGHT (MANUEL ZELAYA ) BECAUSE HE DIDNT WANT TO PROTECT HONDURAS BUT TO CREATE THE SAME   OF VENEZUELA.   You ARE PROTECTING USA.   DEMOCRATS ONLY WANT TO STOP YOU SO YOU DONT WIN AGAIN AND THEY DONT CARE ABOUT THE BORDERS!!!!    Democrats and Republicans need to be TOGETHER ANF HELP OUR PRESIDENT FOR A BETTER FUTURE
Jenna Say Paw  yes we do
No way Jose! Get it? Jose?😂
Where are you going to find a new housekeeper and gardener?!
Alicia Thompson yes! We do
Build our wall!
Alicia Thompson yes! We do
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Where are you going to find a new housekeeper and gardener?!
If Not Building Border Security,American may be Fullness Imigrant2...This is Souvereign USA...If American Fullness Imigrant,Some Thing Happen to Sociality People USA...It is Dangerous...Rebuke Govermant Mexico...The Govermant Mexico Have Stopped People Mexico Go To USA...If Many Much People Imigrant Mexico to USA,The People USA Angry&Fight to Imigrant Mexico....I Hope Democrat Understand What Situation People USA...Oke Mr Trumph....God Bless You....Imanuel
Build the wall........ ...
Build the wall. God bless America.
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
You hit the nail right on the head Mr. President.
Joshua James Howard the wall would be funded completely in bout AJ hour lol
You hit the nail right on the head Mr. President.
They will do everything in their power not to help you as they know you will get voted in next year they are just out for themselves just like all the MPs in the UK they don’t give a flying toss about American people and keeping them safe
Trump Inks Executive Order Immediately Halting All Welfare, Unearned Entitlements and Subsidy Payments For 2019 -Illegal Immigration Ceases Instantly.
Republicans dominated for the past two years. Why are you now blaming democrats, that took over the House as of this year, for stalling the building of the wall? Not that it matters, because the wall isn't going to help. There are ways of getting around it. In all honesty, I think you're just doing what every other politician likes to do, blame the opposing party for the delays/screw ups.  Just about every single one of you are a failure.
BUILD THE WALL.   Don't give!!
It would. Americans are sick of the illegals, sick of the corruption, sick of seeing our war veterans treated like crap, sick of Obamacare, sick of the deception and lies of the Democrats, and if Congress doesn't want to do their job, then fire them and we'll handle it ourselves with our President
Yep Keep Building The Wall
Democrats and Republicans have passed funding for border security. You want only your nonsensical campaign promise version. And today, you Tweet that you never meant for Mexico to literally pay for it? You are a very bad joke. Not laughing.
Dump. Ass
Yep Keep Building The Wall
Dump. Ass
I take it you don't understand a marginal tax rate. That's okay a lot of people don't.
Anne Tourjee to ask any person to pay 70% for their success is wrong. I get it. You're ok giving South   America 10.6 billion?
Democrats and Republicans have passed funding for border security. You want only your nonsensical campaign promise version. And today, you Tweet that you never meant for Mexico to literally pay for it? You are a very bad joke. Not laughing.
Anne Tourjee to ask any person to pay 70% for their success is wrong. I get it. You're ok giving South   America 10.6 billion?
Jeff Graziano You're damn right we want him to fail! And he will.
Tim Baldwin  tell me why  .
I take it you don't understand a marginal tax rate. That's okay a lot of people don't.
Stand your ground.
Tim Baldwin  tell me why  .
Nobody believes you.
Wendy Anne OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
Nobody believes you.
What really pisses me off is that the Dumbcrats are fighting you, MR PRESIDENT, on the VERY same things that they were in favor of and the Republicans are letting them do it!
The likes are overwhelming over the laughs . Get use to it Dems . We are here and watching and now stating our support for the American President Donald J. Trump .
Wendy Anne OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
The likes are overwhelming over the laughs . Get use to it Dems . We are here and watching and now stating our support for the American President Donald J. Trump .
Then tell him to stop being buddy buddy with Putin. That’s REAL danger.
Barbara Hansen  Thank you for drawing even more attention to my post!!! 😂😂
2016 : Donald Trump “ Mexico will pay for the wall I promise !!! “   2016: Donald Trump “ Mexico will pay us back for the wall “   2018 : Donald trump “ give me funding or ill withhold 1 million jobs In Jeopardy and close the government..... it’s the democrats fault”   😂 😂 😂 some leader .... your promise was to have mexico pay not put 1 million hard working , blue collar , tax paying Americans out of work
WE HAVE SPENT THE LAST 30 YEARS IMPORTING POVERTY  IT HAS RUINED CALIFORNIA AND IS DESTROYING EVERY SATE IN THE UNION  WE CANNOT TAKE IN THE WORLD'S POVERTY AND SURVIVE!
Barbara Hansen  Thank you for drawing even more attention to my post!!! 😂😂
STOP THE HYPOCRISY!!!!!!  BUILD THE WALL AT ALL COST!!! American Lives Matter!!!!!!!!!!! 👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸✨  https://www.facebook.com/476717839377771/posts/766725050377047/
Stopping you. They hate America
Stand strong, BUILD THE WALL!
OBIE? OKAY. WILL DO!  HE IS A CRIMINAL!
Stand strong, BUILD THE WALL!
OBIE? OKAY. WILL DO!  HE IS A CRIMINAL!
Barry Banzet same here. We the people are ready, tired of playing games.
He has the right to call up the Citizen Militia tonight.   Just as the founding fathers set it up.   The largest land-based army on earth.    A minimum of about 350 million guns, and far more than 25 trillion rounds of ammo.   It may be far more.    And the  vast majority of the soldiers and police will stand with us.   They still stand up to their oaths.
LOCK HIM UP!!!!!!
Stand strong. We are behind you. They well not win. Veto anything they wany, unless it be good for the American people. Noone can say you do not care or think of Americans first.  God bless
You got the money .why don't you build it?! You cry you whine you pout...want Democrats to build more to take out of others pocket you quick to same way you've also lied to the American people Thought you said Mexico will build the wall Mexico will pay?! Ummm
I feel the Democrats Do Not want you having a win on the Wall!! They think without a Wall you won't be elected again,....We are with you President Trump!! Stay Strong! We need the Wall!! You are a Great President and we are Proud of you!!
He has the right to call up the Citizen Militia tonight.   Just as the founding fathers set it up.   The largest land-based army on earth.    A minimum of about 350 million guns, and far more than 25 trillion rounds of ammo.   It may be far more.    And the  vast majority of the soldiers and police will stand with us.   They still stand up to their oaths.
BUILD THE WALL!!!😡😡
and, Americans DON'T want an expansive border wall.  but when the POTUS chooses his favorite approval poll (Rassmusen at the time) and lies about 1% point (49% approval NOT 50%) in order to convince people he's doing great, is it any wonder that we believe that ~4,000 terrorist aliens were apprehended at the southern border when the number was ACTUALLY 6?
next he'll suggest a northern border wall because 41 were apprehended there (more than 6).  and you guessed it, next it will be a giant dome encompassing the entire US.
meanwhile, climate change, election security, record National debt, the opioid epidemic, North Korea, Russia, Iran, disappearing middle-class, crumbling infrastructure, healtcare costs, etc.  just aren't as important as this wall idea.  abFUCKINGsurd.
BUILD THE WALL!!!😡😡
meanwhile, climate change, election security, record National debt, the opioid epidemic, North Korea, Russia, Iran, disappearing middle-class, crumbling infrastructure, healtcare costs, etc.  just aren't as important as this wall idea.  abFUCKINGsurd.
Paul Var the wall won’t address any of the issues.
next he'll suggest a northern border wall because 41 were apprehended there (more than 6).  and you guessed it, next it will be a giant dome encompassing the entire US.
Paul Var the wall won’t address any of the issues.
You are Right Sister!!!
Build the Wall.  Do not back down Mr. President!
Yes we do!!!!!!!
Secure our borders!🇺🇸
You are Right Sister!!!
Secure our borders!🇺🇸
Really good question..... Build the wall ❤️❤️❤️
Wayne Denny  Absolutely
Excellent speech, Mr. President, sir!!
Wayne Denny  Absolutely
Sue Heller you want security get a pacifier
Really good question..... Build the wall ❤️❤️❤️
This is so insane. There is no crisis. You are attacking the federal employees who keep our government running
Sue Heller you want security get a pacifier
Hang in there we're all with you
Andreana Komis hello dear
Hang in there we're all with you
Andreana Komis hello dear
Trump lies...
Cassie Collins Yes he is! That's all he does! LOL!!!
Trump lies...
Cassie Collins Yes he is! That's all he does! LOL!!!
Kate's wall must be built
He is NOT lying!!!!
Drain the swamp the current dems running the house are obstructing legislation that We the people want
Bunch of damn Reptilians everywhere . To hell with these lizzard people . Shapeshift on this 🔫 pew pew pew pew pew pew!!!!
Kate's wall must be built
🚩Here is a statement from  🇺🇸JASON ROBINSON, a veteran 🇺🇸(not me)... (copied).  "My wife is gonna be pissed that I put my dirty laundry out on FB... And I hope every single person on my feed reads this and many share it. You want to know why I’m pissed about the borders and the “Migrant Caravan”? I’m a 90% disabled combat vet, medically retired, like thousands of others. I’ve been out of work over a year, and with the amount of VA appointments, and the amount of time per appointment, who the hell would hire me? I barely pay my mortgage and bills, I juggle repo on my vehicles and termination on utilities monthly, and we eat, ramen and cereal on a regular basis. We shop at Goodwill and frequent PawnShops not only to shop but to get loans to pay bills or maybe get something we need from time to time. Social Security won’t approve me, and State and Federal assistance programs say I am above their “poverty” levels, so they won’t help me. Yet some of you think it’s ok to allow migrants with nothing to offer our Nation a free pass into this country and you cannot tell me that it won’t cost the tax payer anything. I barely get approved for free lunches for my girls at school and the taxes in Virginia I cant afford to pay, and again, you want to allow these migrants to just walk in...and you want me to offer open arms?  How about you take care of us? All of us? I’m not the only one. There are many way worse than me. There are homeless. There are sick. There are hungry. In this nation. That have paid their dues. Born here. Raised here. Paid taxes here. Worked here, served here. Take care of them.  It’s time to close the revolving door of free and take care of Americans first.  Think about that crap for a second."
Bunch of damn Reptilians everywhere . To hell with these lizzard people . Shapeshift on this 🔫 pew pew pew pew pew pew!!!!
We want our tax dollars put to good use!  We don’t want our tax dollars used on an ineffective border wall.  Secure our airports where terrorists are coming in.  READ your security briefings so that you will be informed by the facts and not your imagination
Campaign number 2 build the wall around hairy ball Canadian ladies a******
YES WE DO!! Build the wall!!
I want border security
One of your promises was that Mexico will pay for the wall now theres a shutdown cus they arent paying for the wall cus you want is to pay for it now so thats already a promise unfulfilled and im a Trump supporter but this is getting ridiculous
I want border security
Jason Parkerson they will pay later. It's just a loan. Time to close the border.
Mr. President do NOT cave to the crazy American people hating foreigner loving Democrats. Call a national emergency and build the wall. Or use whatever funds are available for a border barricade and dig a 40ft deep X 40 ft wide trench lined with barbed wire on the Mexican side of the border. Also close the entire souther border. If the Republican Party caves to the dimms. Don't sign any funding packages without funding for the wall. Republicans will never win another election if you don't declare a national emergency and build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL DONALD 🇺🇸🇬🇧
Stopping you.
Americans want border security  not a wall
Mary Stone not in your life time
He is a idiot and a constant liar
Stopping you.
Congress Res. 990 In 2017 alone, ICE arrested 127,000 Aliens for: *1,800 homicide offenses; *5,000 sexual assaults *76,000 dangerous drugs *48,000 assault offenses; *11,000 weapon offenses; *2,000 kidnappings  Whereas ICE Homeland Security Investigations made 4,818 gang-related arrests in fiscal year 2017;  Whereas ICE identified or rescued 904 sexually exploited children;  Whereas ICE identified or rescued 518 victims of human trafficking;  https://www.congress.gov/bill/115th-congress/house-resolution/990/text
Working on border security together and you getting your wall, are two completely different things. Americans do not want your ego wall.
He is a idiot and a constant liar
The number one cause of illegal immigration is people overstaying their visas and the number one way drugs come into the country is through commercial shipping.  TRUMP LIES TO YOU! THERE IS NO CRISIS!
How was the fund raiser?
Working on border security together and you getting your wall, are two completely different things. Americans do not want your ego wall.
Stay strong!  #KAG2020
The numbers also show that Americans wanted someone other than trump to be president.
Richard Rogers you are an idiot
keep up with the news
Kathy Turner Charles 2016 Presidential Election Results: Trump  62,984,828  Clinton: 65,853,514. Not counting the 9,000,000 votes cast for someone else..
Kathy Turner Charles These are what we like to call FACTS.
Stay strong!  #KAG2020
Kathy Turner Charles These are what we like to call FACTS.
Jason Morgan I agree🚧🚧🔨🔨
Kathy Turner Charles 2016 Presidential Election Results: Trump  62,984,828  Clinton: 65,853,514. Not counting the 9,000,000 votes cast for someone else..
They didn't want you to speak longer than eight mins because they know what a fool u are.
Jason Morgan I agree🚧🚧🔨🔨
God bless President Trump and God bless America
Fear builds walls
Stopping you is their goal
We support you. Stay strong.
Mr. President THANK YOU FOR HEARING WHAT WE WANT AND STANDING STRONG FOR US! BUILD THE WALL. STOP THE CRISIS!
Sorry arse Russian assets
Mr. President THANK YOU FOR HEARING WHAT WE WANT AND STANDING STRONG FOR US! BUILD THE WALL. STOP THE CRISIS!
Build it buddy build it now!
Ann Shields What did he lie about?
Build it buddy build it now!
STAND FIRM SIR!
Ann Shields What did he lie about?
Need border security
Maybe some of the Democrats in Congress should be investigated.   I wonder if some might be getting paid by drug and human traffickers.
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
Need border security
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
That’s only what you and your radical base want. You are throwing a childish temper tantrum by shutting down the government. You are a disgrace to this country!
Nick Valenti . Call me a radical. This in my eyes is not a tantrum.  Try reviewing the Democrats past videos on this matter.! For 40 years they on both sides have campaigned on border security and a wall.
Linda Baldes Democrat’s want border security, but sensible border security not money wasted on a ineffective wall.
Maybe some of the Democrats in Congress should be investigated.   I wonder if some might be getting paid by drug and human traffickers.
Linda Baldes Democrat’s want border security, but sensible border security not money wasted on a ineffective wall.
The only reason America sees immigration as such a large issue ITSBECAUSE HE CONVINCED YOU OF IT PEOPLE . Y’all were not even worried about this like that until he started tearing families apart just likeHitler did and started fabricatingthis idea that ONE RACE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR YOUR DISPAIR - we created our own problems . Blame ourselves
Lizzie Mars . Oh please!😢. This has been going on for at least 40 years.  Open your mind and educate yourself!
Nick Valenti . Call me a radical. This in my eyes is not a tantrum.  Try reviewing the Democrats past videos on this matter.! For 40 years they on both sides have campaigned on border security and a wall.
Well are kids are getting dumber I'd say that's a reason for national emergency.
Build the wall!!!!  Please!
Lizzie Mars . Oh please!😢. This has been going on for at least 40 years.  Open your mind and educate yourself!
Build the wall!!!!  Please!
Becky Tucker explain to us all what communism is.
You look it up.  Socialism is defined as the next step TOWARDS communism.
BUILD IT HOSS!!!
You look it up.  Socialism is defined as the next step TOWARDS communism.
Keep exposing communism across New Mexico. Christopher Columbus was Catholic Hispanic and all Christians must unite regardless of domination. Communists divided Christianity
Becky Tucker explain to us all what communism is.
Yes we do!!!!!
Build the wall. 😎😎😎
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall? That was your promise Donny.
Keep exposing communism across New Mexico. Christopher Columbus was Catholic Hispanic and all Christians must unite regardless of domination. Communists divided Christianity
Damn right  we do.
Yes, National Security first!
We support you Mr President
STAND FIRM MR. PRESIDENT <3
Yes they do, but not a wall
Secure the border
What happened to Mexico paying for the wall? That was your promise Donny.
Very good Mr.President
Go sit in the corner ya PO💩🤡.
Thank you Mr President🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
The American People are with you 1000%!  #KEEPTHEGOVERNMENTSHUTDOWN!  #BUILDTHEWALL #MASA! #BESTPRESIDENTSINCEOURFOREFATHERS
Build our wall!
We need the wall!
Sad build the wall
MR PRESIDENT WE DON'T WANT THESE ILLEGAS ENTERING OUR COUNTRYANYMOORE THIS HAS TO END . BUILD THE BIGGEST WALL YOU CAN --WE WHO VOTEDFOR YOUU WANT ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION ENDED .
Yes WE do Mr. PRESIDENT
Zero Lies #WINNING
President Stupid  Strikes Again 😡
Stop the government shut down!!
We sure do 👍👍👍👍👍👍🇺🇸🇨🇱🇮🇱
We want the Wall👍🇺🇸
Our country is falling apart.
Build DA WALL !!!!!!
Yes we do sir.
Sad build the wall
Do not back Down Trump
We all know how crazy liberals are
Stopping all your lies!
The American people demand a border wall !
Yes Sir !!!  We do !!!
We love our President
I want border security!!!!
Yes we do sir.
I want border security!!!!
Mayor of Texas Border Town says wall is pointless, there is no crisis...  https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/Mayor of Texas Border Town: There is No Crisis Here, Trump's Wall is Pointlesstruthout.org
https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/
That's because they have a river on the border. What do the border Patrol agents say?
Devon Tall Trump is building a wall through the National Butterfly Center in Texas, which will wipe out these endangered butterflies. Rio Grande or not.  https://www.nationalbutterflycenter.org/?fbclid=IwAR2fS59lK4K-vJSJoCBpkbpxfXvNnKxdci31x58XcRogayYZ4BPk75iehPY
Devon Tall what do you think the knock name is for the invader crossing the river?
BULLSHIT ARTIST AT WORK?   LOL
How many ppl called in?
Yes we do! First priority our safety! BUILD THAT WALL! I DON'T CARE HOW LONG IT TAKES THE SHUTDOWN!..
A wall won't work.
Standing with you Mr. President!!
Build that beautiful wall!
We support our president!
Great speech tonight!!
Keep your promise TRUMP2020
Devon Tall what do you think the knock name is for the invader crossing the river?
Actually, the Dems are saving America money, because a wall will not stop people from entering the US.     It can be scaled as easy as this   . https://youtu.be/lhNs7HcBW6o
Build That Wall  We Will Back You.....
Stand your ground Mr President.
Donald trump 2020 Donald trump Jr 2024
Yes  We the people want security. !
Yes he is build the wall.
You promised that MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT.
Donald Trump AMERICA GOOD GOOD GOOD GOD bless you Thank you  very much AMERICA AMENA JESUS GOD AMERICA
Let's do it!! #buildthewall
Keep your promise TRUMP2020
sadly,  we know the answer to that
More lies from the far right.
Yes, please build the wall.
He's has two year... Two. Years.
He is the best president 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Unfortunately, the first one.
Build the wall!!! No compromises!
We want border security
Fear mongering POS liar!
Let's do it!! #buildthewall
We stand behind you sir! Build the wall!
Fake promise... fake president...
STAND TOUGH....DO NOT CAVE!!
BUILD THE DAM WALL
Show them for the losers they are!
Yes we do!!!
Can't wait for your speech Mr. President! ❤️
They are fiends on a mission. All they can envision is stopping you, even if it means destroying themselves.
Yes we do. #buildthebarrier
We want that wall
Fear mongering POS liar!
We want that wall
Bullshit lies.
Jill, why are you so angry with yourself?
Yes we do. #buildthebarrier
We do.  Shut it down.
Thank you!
THEY WANT TO BLOCK YOU   STAY STRONG.
Thankyou Mr. President
I support you Mr President 100%
Yes we do! #BUILDTHEWALL
Hold the line Mr.President
Jill, why are you so angry with yourself?
Us legal tax payers do.
Preach it Mr. President...
Impeach the mother.....
Donald Trump 2020 land slide
We want the Wall, BUILD The Wall.
We WANT the wall we NEED the wall and we WILL get the wall
Roger that ICU backup please
We are behind you 💯 %
Please stay the course!
Hold the line Mr.President
The democrats,are delusional   and  crazy too
Utterly ridiculous.
Fact checked by Fox news: https://youtu.be/-Ljzg-koH5Y
Fear is all you have.
Yes we do! And proper vetting
GOD IS THE SUPREME POWER
We are with you from Florida President Trump.Build The Wall...
We know Trump 2020
Please stay the course!
Stand firm mr President
Wall or war... Your choice
Stay Strong. We're with you!
JUST BUILD IT!!! GEEZ.....
Thank you POTUS!!
HUAC would solve a lot of this.
35% want this wall paid for this way.
We know Trump 2020
Thank you Albert he really is the best I have seen .
Damn right......Build the Wall!
Secure the border.
If there is a National Crisis at the Border, and Homeland Security is shut down, and you own the shutdown, just open it back up and work through the issues.
Secure the border
I support building the wall!
That's obvious...democrats just being democrats.
Moore Bullsh!t
Hmmm, but no link. How odd
35% want this wall paid for this way.
Border security!
Is this a trick question?
DON'T GIVE IN!!! GET OUR WALL!!!!!
Dam straight !
Built the wall!!
Amen preach it Mr. President
You need a campaign slogan
Coming soon: ……THE END OF THE ORANGE CLOWN ! ......... 🤡 🔚
U right Trump 😎😎😎
Thank you !!
Hmmm, but no link. How odd
We support you President!
Obama want build wall too
Dig that ditch
Great question .
Cheeto is what cheeto does
Fix our roads & bridges ‼
Yes we Do! #Buildthewall
More bs from you??
Be strong MR PRESIDENT
Thank you !!
Be strong MR PRESIDENT
We want security, but no new wall
Israel must help Americans
Victoria A. Deobald help us do what?
More bs from you??
Bravo 👏🏻 best president ever
plz come take over canada
I want BORDER security definitely...
We want the wall Sir!
We the American people support you Mr President Donald Trump 100%
Border this border that. Geez u sound like a broken record
Secure the borders!!
Not allowed to text it
DO NOT GIVE IN. BUILD THE WALL
Victoria A. Deobald help us do what?
I demand national security!
TRUMP..2020...BUILD THAT WALL!!
Whose numbers?
59 percent of americans are  against it !!! Try again
Good fences make good neighbors
$5.7 Billion for Border Security
U got this !MAGA 👍
DO NOT GIVE IN. BUILD THE WALL
U got this !MAGA 👍
You snivelling con man!
And just for the record you brain-dead liberal moron here's a little fat for you to shove up your ass Republicans have given amnesty to illegal aliens six times since 1986 with the promise from lying liberal lowlights that they would secure the Border here we are over 30 years later and it still hasn't been done and we're listening to the same lies from these low-life liberal scumbags
Yes we do! Build the wall!
Hillary wants it too!  https://youtu.be/AlFi0QUboxs
Yes we do want border security!
This wall stuff again...
obviously stopping you.....
They do not care about America.
Borders Security,
Ms President  Trump   🌎referendum✅?🌏🌍
Keep on doing the best job ever!
#BuildTheWall NOW!
And just for the record you brain-dead liberal moron here's a little fat for you to shove up your ass Republicans have given amnesty to illegal aliens six times since 1986 with the promise from lying liberal lowlights that they would secure the Border here we are over 30 years later and it still hasn't been done and we're listening to the same lies from these low-life liberal scumbags
Secure The Wall
Well it's not working together
I think those Friends cant count 😂😂😂
Keep on fighting for the right thing Mr.President!
Stopping you !
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Stop congress pay checks
BUILD THE WALL Mr. PRESIDENT.
They are looking for voters
Yes they do!
#BuildTheWall NOW!
democrats want OPEN BORDERS!
We want border security!
Stopping you! Anyway they can
American paychecks
AMERICA 1ST, NOT 2ND!!!!
#GoFactYourself#   liar
Let’s do it! And then Drain the Swamp
Real Border Security
Yes sir!!! Build the wall now!!!
Yes they do!
Build the wall!Trump 2020!
lies from the worst president ever.
Still with you ❤️
Don’t give in!!!! America first 🇺🇸
Good job Mr. President
Throw a tantrum tonight big guy!!
I stand with President Trump
Stopping you must be the answer there Mr POTUS.
Build the wall Mr trump
Thank you President Trump❤️
Yes sir!!! Build the wall now!!!
Grow up and learn before u make comments !!!
Americans first!  Build the wall!
So true President Trump!!!
Stand firm, build the wall!
Thank you Mr President
LO C K   I T  D O W N   T I G H T
Not according to the polling!!!!!
We love you President Trump
We're not stupid.
Just do it!!!
Thank you President Trump❤️
YES WE DO!!! CLOSE THE BORDER!!!
We The People want the WALL!!!
How will it secure us, again?
I support President Trump!
Go Trump! We are behind you!!
We stand with you all the way!!!
Trump is the CRISIS !
Amen. Thank you Sir,
Just do it!!!
lol hes such a troll. I love it.
Secure that border
TRUMP 2020...Build our  WALL!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸👍
Build that wall ASAP
Yep build the wall
Electrify the damn wall.
Their goals of communism!
Build the wall.  N. O. W. !
Don't give in!
#45 is the devil
Amen. Thank you Sir,
#45 is the devil
Open up the Government.
tell that to the democrats
I have please leave me alone.  I have high sugar and can't afford to eat properly.  This is not a joke.
Don't give in!
Keeping Americans safe
Do it.....it's RIGHT! !!
Individual 1 telling more lies.
Do you have emphysema?
Stay the course Mr. President.
MAGA Potus your the best ever !!!✝️❤️🇺🇸😃
100%!!! With you Mr. President
anyone with half a brain and some common sense wants security
Build the wall @
I have please leave me alone.  I have high sugar and can't afford to eat properly.  This is not a joke.
We are with you 🇺🇸
Donald Trump, a true G. #maga
Abso-freakin'-lutely
Paul Barron the democrats are holding back progress and the will of the nation
I love your opinion.
Nailing the address! ✊👍
You are a sucker
Build that wall Mr.President
Build the wall @
BUILD THE WALL!  IMMIGRATION REFORM!
This promise needs to be kept too  https://youtu.be/r_Z9Rubof0g
Build the wall, Mr. President
Stay strong!!!
You got my vote on it cheif
Build the wall! Then end the fed!
Wow that's awesome
Like he has done since his Being President
What about A.K. STEEL ASHLAND KY?
Build that wall Mr.President
What about A.K. STEEL ASHLAND KY?
Chicken little all over again!
YOUR NAIVETE IS CUTE SON. SANTA ISN'T REAL EITHER. ;)
THE WALL IS COMING SON. GET COMFY! ;)


Like he has done since his Being President
Yes. Border security. No wall!
😂🤣😂🤣😂🤣 some more lies...
Always full of bullshit
Yes to border security!
Stop paying Dems salary!
Build it now!
Your theme song! Drop Dead Mr. Trump!  https://youtu.be/9az6MMNZJl8

Donny , you are the King Troll . You had 2 years and a majority in Government and did nothing . Now you blame the Democrats .
Yea President Donald J. Trump, they are just so jealous of your good ❤️ and success in helping our Nation.  They had so many years/chances to, during their high paying job to move their BEHIND!  Thank you Donald J. Trump for always thinking of our Nation and for working for FREE!  Please do not allow them to discourage you!  They are not REAL!  Can’t do what they promised!   🙏God bless 🙏 you and our Nation President Trump!
Build the barrier!
No they don’t
Enough games get this built
https://www.wnd.com/2006/09/37956/       older post but still valid
Really can’t wait to laugh
C. None of the above
Build that wall!
No. They don't. Sry bro
Your theme song! Drop Dead Mr. Trump!  https://youtu.be/9az6MMNZJl8
No. They don't. Sry bro
Utterly ridiculous
You wanna see 🖕viva democracy
We need a 30 foot wall!
I want a wall! take a survey!
I want peanuts
You have my vote 2020
Build OUR WALL now.
Amen!!!... Angels SEE
Don't cave build the wall
Keeping you muzzled, motor mouth!
Yes we need border security
You wanna see 🖕viva democracy
Pride before their downfall. Don’t worry Donald J. Trump God has his hand on you! Build that wall!
They jusy want to stop you.
Stand you ground.
YES we do!!!!!!
Stand Strong....
Like he said his promise , Just full of lies.
Yes we do SIR....PLEASE
Don't give in or sign any bills they want for the next 2 years!!!
Yes you go Mr Trump,we want secure borders !!!!!
Use Magna gas!
Yes we need border security
Use Magna gas!
Build that fuckin wall
Christopher Zeko stay in your Trailor Park and Drunk Primate
Yes you go Mr Trump,we want secure borders !!!!!
Close the Border
Build the wall Mr President 👍
When your right your right!!!!
But the Democrats don’t
We need the wall
We are with you President Trump.
So do Canadians!
BUILD THAT WALL MR PRESIDENT
We the people want the Wall .
Christopher Zeko stay in your Trailor Park and Drunk Primate
Stand with Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Will tonights talk be on here live?
Build that wall!!!!!!!!!
Their crimes will be exposed in 2019. Q
Take it down and build the wall..
Build that wall Mr. President!!!
Stay strong Mr. President!
Dam right we do!!!
BUILD THE FREAKIN WALL!!!!!!!!!
We the people want the Wall .
Build the wall President Trump 2020🇺🇸🙏
Obviously stopping you.
Working to secure border. #GoTrump
Yes we do! Thank you!
CLOSE ALL OUR BORDERS
BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT
5.56 secures the border well 😂😂
Give it a rest geez
Thank you! Build the wall.
BUILD THE FREAKIN WALL!!!!!!!!!
Yes we do ! Build that wall !!!
Secure it.... build the wall
Build that wall!
We want border security
Good morning mama ji
We need to start a  petition.
Let's get our wall
Fake news. They have been willing to work with you.
Praying for you!
Yes we do! May God bless President Trump!!
Thank you! Build the wall.
Yes we do! May God bless President Trump!!
Fox news = FAKE news
Praying for you!
Democrats do not want border security
Yes we want our country secure
Yes we need the wall.
#FakeCrisis from a #PropPresident
Stand strong Mr Trump .🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Secure our borders!!!
Build the wall!! Period!!!
Ed Smith I see you rather the Clinton news network CNN
Yes we need the wall.
Build the wall!! Period!!!
Terrible man if the year!
False. Africans existed before Israel. Africans are not isralites
#TRUTH Thank you #POTUS 45💜🇺🇸 :)!
Finish the wall
YES WE DO … BUILD THE WALL.
Great speech, Mr. President!
Not the way you are doing it
It’s not USA . For sure
No they don’t.
Obviously the latter...
Yes. Build the wall.
False. Africans existed before Israel. Africans are not isralites
Yes. Build the wall.
Racists want security
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on, our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
Border security NOT a WALL!
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on, our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
That’s a waste of money ... period
WAIST?  ;)
Racists want security
National emergency!
STOP YPOUR LIES!! RESIGN!!!
Build that wall!!!!
Stay strong
stand stong! dont cave ! build that wall
Yes build the wall
Another con From the Don
Democrats=Enemy of the state
WAIST?  ;)
Democrats=Enemy of the state
I want boarder security!!!
‘Border’ or ‘boarder’? Is a tenant threatening you?
Another con From the Don
Build that wall!
No turning back
Build the wall Mr. PRESIDENT
Yes....build that wall!
Stopping you. Obviously.
Stopping you!
Build that WALL!!!!!
Keep it shut down
Stand strong and build the wall!
‘Border’ or ‘boarder’? Is a tenant threatening you?
Sir you are wrong.
da border in Canada
Secure the border
do whats needed mr. president
Little words from a ignorant man
Stopping you Mr. President🇺🇸
I stand for you Mr. President.
Go President Trump!!!!
Built the wall....!
Stand strong and build the wall!
Go on down to the border today and let those men and women know that unless I get my wall I will not be paying you coming to work every day and find one sucker to do a photo op acting like it is okay so your base is happy.
Love builds bridges not walls!
PLease build the wall!!
Ppl have spoken..why u in office..
Great speech .keep fighting
They will lose this battle
Stand strong  We are with you🇺🇸🇺🇸
Please go away Donald. Soon!
You are correct Mr. President!!
Mexico will pay for it 😂😂😂😂😂
Built the wall....!
Mexico will pay for it 😂😂😂😂😂
I think what’s important is; YOU STOP YOUR CONSTANT LYING
Maryanne Higgins  please tell your Premier to STOP LYING
You are correct Mr. President!!
Thank you! Great speech last night!
No. They don’t want a wall.
I want it done
Yes, but a wall is not the answer.
Demarats, go to he##
I agree......😏😏😏😃😃😎
Keep after it!
Maryanne Higgins  please tell your Premier to STOP LYING
Us true Americans do
You are so fucked
You are so fucked
Build that damm wall
Now USA pays. Not Mexico
FEARMONGERING AT ITS BEST
Stand Strong Sir!
WHERE IS THE PESOS?
Keep lying!!!! #Donthecon
Keep after it!
Build that wall now
Democrats =🐑
if you build it juan wont come
Border security =/= border wall
It's Apparent
Secure the border
GO TRUMP !!!!!!!
We are with you
BUILD THE WALL SIR !!! #WEGOTYOUR6
The Democrats are hypocrites!!!!!!
Keep lying!!!! #Donthecon
We want a wall
no matter who pay's...just the wall
BUILD THE WALL! PLEASE!
laughable ..... numbers show it ... what a joke....
Dont let them
Stand Firm Mr. President!!
Secure the border build the wall
Yes absolutely  they are
The Democrats are hypocrites!!!!!!
Yes we do!  You are right!!
YES WE DO!!! CITIZENS FIRST!!
sure border security
CLOSE THE BORDERS PLEASE !!!
Stand strong.  We are behind you.
dirty politics
Thank you sir. We srand behind you.
Secure the Border
Build that wall!!!
Yes absolutely  they are
Yes, yes, yes
Vote Out republicans.
Stopping you! Build that wall!
Build it, Build It, BUILD IT
The numbers don’t show it.
Stopping you from doing anything for our country!
He is negotiating. Sometimes you have to stand firm.
BUILD THAT WALL!!!!!!!!
HE is not the answer
Build the motherfucking wall.
Build that wall!!!
Build the wall Mr President
Keep the faith Mr President.
Trump for 2020
WHAT IS SO AMAZING ,DEMOS HAVE NOT ONCE GIVEN ANY EXPLANATION AS TO WHY IT IS WRONG FOR THE WALL , yet they have walls around their houses
Stopping you from fulfilling another one of your promises
I sure want Security
Build the wall Mr President
I think we can do both
Thank you Mr. President!
Stand firm Mr. President.
Build the motherfucking wall.
Build that wall!
Secure the border!
We want the wall. 👍🏻♥️🇺🇸
OUR GOVERNMENT IS CORRUPTED.
I’m getting me a yellow vest
You tell him, Sharon.
Sorry. No wall por Donald. 😢
Thank you Mr. President!💯🇺🇸🙌🏻
Stand firm Mr. President.
Thank you Mr. President!💯🇺🇸🙌🏻
Mexico paying for it?
Sorry. No wall por Donald. 😢
It's a start
Yes we the people do
We want the wall. Build it
Stay strong!! Thank you Mr. President!
Fucks News says so, must be true
Bye Trump lovers! It's all over. Nice try but he's finished!
Give it to em Pres!
Yes build the wall
Open up the government theirs another way to get the funds
Mexico paying for it?
Secure the border!
Dam right we do build it
You've got that right, Mr. President!
BuildThe Wall
Impeachment is the only way
ITS OUR WALL! #BuildIt
Thought Mexico was paying for it!!
Stay Strong Mr President!
Protect us please. God bless you 🇺🇸
Open up the government theirs another way to get the funds
Build the wall, Mr. President.
#NationalEmergency  Just do it
❤️🇺🇸💙BUILD THAT WALL!!!!❤️🇺🇸💙
Security yes wall not so much.
Americans want security
Isaiah 54 :17 🇺🇸💗 🙏
BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL!
GOD HAS THIS DON'T WORRY
We are with the President!
We want the Wall
No good deed goes unpunished.
I agree, but no wall
Don't give up!!
🇺🇸 God Bless President Trump 🇺🇸
Dont back down mr president!
The liars wanted it!
Border Security  🇺🇸️👍
BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL!
Just build the damn wall already!!!!!!
All the way with Trump!
Yes please build the wall
Border security
Praying for you
One in the same
Stand strong Mr President
Yes we need this
Don’t give in!
LET THE PEOPLE VOTE
Thank you for representing us!!
BUILD the WALL   We Support You 100%
They aren’t too smart
It's wrong mister Torn Brain
That's right you have pen to
All they care about is stopping you Mr president
I will be watching
Yes,We Do Want It. Thank You President Trump.
Get it done Mr.President
LET THE PEOPLE VOTE
Yes we do!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸
AMERICANS WANT OUR W2S!!!
You didnt say we would
Who's the "pussy"? YOU!!
BTW. Build that Wall.
Faux news, lol
Build  the  wall and  make  el  Chapo  pay.
A communist country is what they  want
Get it done Mr.President
Build the wall! Trump 2020
Don’t give in to the Democrats stand your ground
Build the wall!!! Protect Americans!!!
We need that wall !
Keep fighting Mr Trump
I support trump period.
Come one come all.  Dig under it!
We really need the wall
Love our president...
We are with you! Don't let us down!
A communist country is what they  want
“FOX news is fake” said Donald Trump
Shutdown the border!
Let’s build the WALL.
I want border security!
Stand Strong !!!! build the Wall !!!!!
Love u trump keep doing great
Build it,, and they can't come...
It's all about your ego.
Absolutely, BUILD THAT WALL!
Stopping you from building the wall
We are with you! Don't let us down!
Yes we do Mr. President
Secure our borders!!
Hang in there Mr. Trump. We know you have aces up your sleeve. ThankQ+ . . . MAGA! WWG1WGA! Donald J. Trump 2020
THE WALL IS COMING KIDS. GET COMFY. ;)
WALL IS COMING. GET COMFY! ;)
DOW IS UP AGAIN. THANK YOU TRUMP!
End voter fraud.
Stopping you from building the wall
Build that wall Trump keep us safe!!!
Term limits!
Yes absolutely Right.
Wish we had a wall
Put Schumer and
We need a wall!!!!!
Don't give In!!!!!! We are with you Mr. Trump
Close the border !!!! For good !!!!!
Yes we do want the wall!!!!!!!!!!
Your tax returns
End voter fraud.
Stand strong
Yes we do Mr. President
We love you!!! MAGA!!
Not accomplished with a wall!
Do what you got to do .just do it
NO WALL EVER!!!!!!
Mr President ! Build the wall .
Shut it down and Build the wall!!!
Americans didn’t want YOU. 🤷🏻‍♀️
Secure borders.
Your tax returns
Secure borders.
I WANT SECURE BORDERS...
Denise Bean McLaughlin  I have been to other countries . I have never been able to just walk in . I'm not sure what the problem is . When you go into another country they want all your info . Where you will be staying. How long you will be staying and you better be at customs when you are supposed to be or they are looking for you. Do to trade agreements Mexico will inadvertently pay for the wall as Our President said. I don't understand why people talk like that. That's just crazy .
Americans didn’t want YOU. 🤷🏻‍♀️
BUILD OUR WALL!!!!
Pay the Coast Guard
god bless you . you are very presidental
You got this Mr Trump! We support you
Don't give an inch Mr. Trump.
Still your president snowflake
Thank you President Trump!
Don sounds like he is caving.
brain washed the lot of you..... wake up ffs
Denise Bean McLaughlin  I have been to other countries . I have never been able to just walk in . I'm not sure what the problem is . When you go into another country they want all your info . Where you will be staying. How long you will be staying and you better be at customs when you are supposed to be or they are looking for you. Do to trade agreements Mexico will inadvertently pay for the wall as Our President said. I don't understand why people talk like that. That's just crazy .
Trump's Strategy: DIVIDE & CONQUER
WE DONT WANT A WALL
Just get it done.
Buld the Wall!
Yes we do hang in there
it's clear that the dirty dems will threaten the security and safety of the entire nation just so they can play games and be childish. the wall is something we all wanted...they are still licking their wounds from you winning the presidency. If they want approve a wall, I say we take down every wall they have around their homes. It's incredibly irresponsible of them to act this way!
What a Dick Head
Why not stop the corruption?
And stop d food stamps;;
brain washed the lot of you..... wake up ffs
And stop d food stamps;;
Employee more ICE angents
Why not stop the corruption?
You are RIGHT, DJT!! Just do it! ❤️❤️
100% Build the wall!!
build wall
Employee more ICE angents
AMERICANS WANT THE WALL!
That wall WILL be built
Alaska in May!!!
We are with you, Mr. President!
Stay Strong Mr. President!
We the people want the Wall
Border security!
Stay strong
build wall
Keep it shutdown
Local NBC affiliates are not showing it in Virginia Beach area
Kinda want my hubbies pay check!!!
Your promise was M.e.X.I.C.O.!
We all know the answer to this
Build that WALL! We're with you! 👍
Build the wall Mr. President !
wall discussion, bring it on.
STAND FIRM TRUMP!
wall discussion, bring it on.
Stopping you!
Build the wall Mr. President !
Stand firm mr. President stand firm we have your six!
Stand by your  promises
Keep it shut down Donald!  Stand firm!
Build that wall! 💯
Build the wall. Hold firm.
National Security now!!!
Let’s build the wall!!!🇺🇸 #MAGA
Stopping you!
Do Not Give In!!!
Secure that border!
Build the wall!! Go Trump🇺🇸🇺🇸
Nah, I'm good. Thanks.
As for me, seeing trump in prison
Stop paying them then
You people are sick asf.
delusional as always...
I believe in President Trump
Stay strong , dont give in!!!
Let’s build the wall!!!🇺🇸 #MAGA
Stay strong , dont give in!!!
a wall Maybe just a little Band-Aid on a gaping wound
A step in the right direction
I believe in President Trump
Yes of course 👍👍👍
Stand firm, Mr  President
Build the dam wall!!!!
2020  Big BLUE  Tidal Wave coming
We support our President
Yes we do thank you Trump
Mr President,  Build The Wall
Stay strong sir. We are on your side.
A step in the right direction
Stay strong a. Build the wall.
Democrats are anti-  America.
Yes we do Mr. President!
We love Trump!
Build that Wall.
Boycot tacos and burritos
Lies and bullshit...
Damn straight we do!!
Build the wall.  Enact e-verify
Stay strong sir. We are on your side.
Total waste of air time.
You lie. Neverending. You just lie.
Amen Mr President
BUILD THE WALL!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
yes we do build the wall.
BUILD OUR WALL.
Build that wall. Hold that line.
Build a big WALL!!!!!!
Yes we do!!!🙏🏼🇺🇸
Build the wall.  Enact e-verify
Done more smartly want it.
A wall is not the answer.
YES< AMERICA  WANTS  BORDER  SECURITY !!
Stand firm, Mr President!
Build that wall!
Mr. President, there no way in h-ll that a meaningful dialog would occur with the delusional Social/Democrats. things will only deteriorate. Martial Law would expedite the fix for what ails the delusional Social/Democrats. Immediate arrest of top Democrats & Republicans
WALL WALL WALL WALL 🇺🇸
Secure the border by stopping you.
Secure the borders
Yes we do!!!🙏🏼🇺🇸
I want border security!
Yes we do!!!
I want the wall
Make it happen!!!!
I agree with you!!!!!!!!!!
Is that a rhetorical question?
Build that wall!!!
Yes we do!!!!
We want border control!!!
Secure the borders
We want border control!!!
Federal workers want to be paid too!
Judy Lipscomb They Will!!
Liz Hall Yea when?
Yes we do!!!!
Build the wall! It’s long over due!
Yes, build the wall.
Bunch of lost sheep’s under here smh it’s sad
You go Mr. President!!!!
Go home to Manhattan...
Build the wall. We are with you!!!
Stand firm trump
Build the wall President Trump!!!
Yes give it to us.
Liz Hall Yea when?
no promises have been kept . we have been screwed over time an time again
STAND FIRM. BUILD the WALL.
We do with you all the way
Keep the faith
Only border your Imagination . Wall border not enough !
And more votes.....
😊She's a nice person! HbD
No we don’t can’t u read no dam wall
We are with you!!
Keep fighting for it! Thank you :)
Yes give it to us.
Brian Larson we together will build a Great Wall!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build our wall
How many promises have you fulfilled? https://youtu.be/S4YxzVtWci4
BUILED THE WALL
Get It Done!
Yes we want the boarder now!
Do it sir. just do it.
The democrats.  Lol.
Hang in there Mr. President. Build it.
I want border security.
Keep fighting for it! Thank you :)
You know how to do it.
Lets get this wall built!
We support you ❤️
Correct, My USA
Build it Mr Trump
HEAVEN:  NO WALL.... NO TRUMP!!!!!
EAT A D*CK, MOTHER F*CKER 🤡😂😂😂😂🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽
Stop GOV pay!!!!!
I want border security.
They don't won't you to do either one
No wall! #FakePresident
Great speech last night!
Build that wall.
Military Emergency !
YES WE DO!!! 100%....GO TRUMP!!!
MAGA!!!! BUILD THE WALL!!!!
Yes we want border security.
Stop GOV pay!!!!!
Build the wall! We are with you!
Yes we do TRUMP and we are behind you
Keep on course Mr. President !
We want a wall!!
Repeal 22nd amendment
Best to be prepared than unaware !
WE WANT THE WALL!!!!
We want our fucking money !!! Tf you talking bout
Yes we do don't back down
Build that wall!!!  So very proud of you!  🙏🙏🙏🙏🙏🙏
57% of people don't want the wall.
The democrats, his vanity, prevent him from realizing that Donald Trump is a person of principles vasados in the perseveranica. Its objective is to serve the community with transparency. Your confidence is the border wall to secure the border.
I HOPE he is able TO get it done
President Trump. BUILD that WALL   You got this !
Stand Tall. Be proud
Thank you sir!
Awesome job,Mr.President
Haters gunna hate, Mr. President.
Go Trump! 2020. I support you.
Keep the good job Mr. President
Yes we do don't back down
Will make it Donald, hang in there...👍
Who knows, they always find something 🙃
trumpty dumbty fall off the wall
Waste of money
Great speech tonight!
God bless you Mr. President!
Yes, we do. Build the wall.
end the shutdown
Just wait until we get our landing pads Out on the Ocean
We’re good man. Resign.
Keep the good job Mr. President
Did I hear steel reinforcement
Hell yeah we want a big tall wall!
Stay strong, please
are you can give me a 1mlion $??
AND BETTER FINANCIAL AND SAFE GOVERNMENT
WE WANT BORDER SECURITY!!
That's "We, the people" to you all.
world's dumbest leader ever.
ahh, Donny... BULLSHIT ;)
We’re good man. Resign.
Dems are just mad because you are making them look bad. They've been in politics for years and you come in and run circles around them getting the job done while they just keep flapping their lips..
What time is the speech?
Do it Trump we support this
Stay strong!
Thank you 🙏❤️
Stay firm Mr. TRUMP
IMPRACH TRUMP
We need a coup 🙄
dems don't care about anything but,  arguing
NOT WANT BUT A NEED
ahh, Donny... BULLSHIT ;)
Thank you Mr President!!
Thank you for working so hard for America. 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Please build this wall.
Good morning trump sir
Build that wall!
Strongly support Our President Donald Trump.
Build the wall 😊 Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Secure secure!!
Democrats want to continue destroying our nation
Stay strong Mr president.
NOT WANT BUT A NEED
Looking Foreword to TONIGHT !!!!! :)
no they don't -
Agree and support 100%
BIG ASS WALL PLEASE
We want border security... Now
Build baby build
Stay strong Mr president.
Don't back down Mr. President
Stay the course! Build the wall!
Keep gov shut build the wall
Wake up sheeple!!!!!!
I agree with President Trump.
Build the wall.  Please
my only question why didn't he do it sooner
🇺🇸 Build that wall 🇺🇸 MAGA 🇺🇸
Let’s be smart about it, nitwit.
Build baby build
That answer itself. MAGA
We support you, President Trump! GOD bless you!
Bypass Congress
Stick to it. President Thrump
Damn right we do.
Let’s build the wall!🇺🇸
Keep going Mr. President
Stay strong Trump.
Get Television address Tonight ,Sir <
Keep it shut down.
Let’s be smart about it, nitwit.
The walll for HR1??????
Not with America tax dollar's!
Get em Mr President
Try telling the truth
We already have one
People need there jobs back
Kick their ass. Build that wall
Knot all Americans want boarder security !
Keep it shut down.
You are right on Mr President !
They dont want you to succeed
Build the wall !!!🇺🇸🇺🇸💯
Best president ever!!!!!♥️♥️♥️
So true build the wall.
That seems pretty obvious.
Obstructionist
Ill give you 3 million guesses
We need this so much.
Knot all Americans want boarder security !
Trumph has gone to mad.
Hold strong 💪
what station what time??
Yes we do!!!!
Don’t give in. No DACA. Build that Wall
Trump's got a wall ivankas got them sugar walls 😉
WE WANT A WALL. I STAND BESIDE YOU.
The Heart of America supports you POTUS! The silent major who speak with their votes want border walls and security. The American Government was created to serve the people not themselves!  Thank you for doing your best to fulfill your promises.
We need this so much.
Do yall want to battle with me damn lizzards?
Your promise to the people was Mexico would pay for the way, so if you can’t get the President of Mexico to pay then your so rich you should pay.
Build the Wall. Go Trump 👍
Your absolutely right,
Dont give in. Build the wall!
The best president
We support you.  Build the Wall!
you are number one
The Heart of America supports you POTUS! The silent major who speak with their votes want border walls and security. The American Government was created to serve the people not themselves!  Thank you for doing your best to fulfill your promises.
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10218277645353133&id=1250886953 here's an idea
No they don't.
They want your successful butt
Yes build the wall !!!
get her done MR President.
Democrats are now the ennemies of this country
Build the wall Trump build the wall
We do want border security!
MAGA  Build The Wall
Build the wall!! We need it!
Do what you have to BUILD THE WALL!
Build that wall Trump!!!
I think it's pretty obvious!
Behind you 100 percent sir
Build it! Don't mess up.
Shut up, #DotardTrump !
DONALD J TRUMP ...ESAD
Keep it shut down
Patriot Movement AZ
Stop paying them for doing nothing
MAGA  Build The Wall
I believe a solution will be reached just needs to be sooner
We want a wall
Welcome aboard!
Brown terds flying south
Dems sent open borders
Amen. We do want border security!
Albert needs help!!!!!
Stopping you obviously!
I'm sorry, president
Build that wall !
Stop paying them for doing nothing
Build that wall !
How about a go fund the wall?????
Cindy Diaz Bartone lmao
I'm sorry, president
Thank you Mr President
yes to the wall
Don't give up I'm for you.
Stopping you
Build the flippin wall already.  NOW.
Get this wall built
We support you. Build the wall!!
Don't back down Mr. President.
Stopping your promise to the people
Cindy Diaz Bartone lmao
See you in Moscow   Putin
Secure our Borders
Hurting you , our president it is so obvious
Build build build the wall!!
Working for the secure every family member.
The Trumpanator
No one can stop you ❤
Yes we want Border Security!  You doing Great President Trump
Back u all the way Trump #1
Stopping your promise to the people
Stop the democrat shutdown!
Remember the Alamo, 100 Americans held off Sana Ana's 4000 trained Army for days behind a Wall, without the wall the Army would have marched through Texas changing America in a very different way, built the Wall
Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes me and my 5 want security
Build it baby!
Really ?? When's this happing ?
Yes just build the wall
We support you, Mr President
stop Congress paychecks!
Back u all the way Trump #1
Please  build the Wall!!
WE NEED TO LAUNCH THE CRIMINAL NRA
WE NEED TO LAUNCH THE CRIMINAL NRA
HOLD YOUR GROUND WE HAVE SO MANY HERE WE CAN'T AFFORD .
GO, MR. PRESIDENT!!!!!!!!
Don't put it off.  Need it now!
FINISH THE WALL!
Stand firm, We support you!!!!
yes we do. I speak for my family.
Build the Wall Mr. President. We are behind you.
Don't give in to those turds
Absolutely  true  just get it done
Stop government shutdown!
Yes we do Mr. Trump my President.
Keep it closed til they give it up sir
1. Shut Down the Border.  2. Open Govt.
Prayers for you ........,
I support a border!!
Good fences make good neighbors👍
Build the Wall Mr. President. We are behind you.
That's a trick question
God bless you president
We need the border!
Feed your hatred!
USA was some ather borders to protected
Build the wall! #maga #2020
OPEN THE GOVERMENT!!!!
Good fences make good neighbors👍
OPEN THE GOVERMENT!!!!
Jud Carter bullshit
Kim Miller Ha ha!  Thanks.  I knew you would understand.
Build the wall! #maga #2020
Stay Strong
Build the wall  President Donald trump
> Donald J. Trump, You promised that Mexico would pay for the wall.
I want border security! Thank you for all you do Donald J. Trump
God bless president trump
Fake Crisis, fake President.
Kim Miller Ha ha!  Thanks.  I knew you would understand.
No.  Lying. Don.  It’s. All. About stopping. U
Secure border!
Thank you Mr. President.
Build that wall!
I want border security
cant ya just let that one go......
Absolutely necessary
Just do it !!!!!
yes Mr.President
Fake Crisis, fake President.
yes Mr.President
yes we do but what about an invisible eletric fence
wouldnt that be cheaper how many miles is it
Just do it !!!!!
You promised Mexico will pay for it
Stop fucking with the people or you’ll have riots on your hands
Mr Rakeem I'm building a wall on YouTube also terrorist talk
Democrats are nuts. Build the wall.
You the one I love . By ? For life !!!!!
Behind you 100% Mister President
I so so so support Trump
This American wants his paycheck.
wouldnt that be cheaper how many miles is it
Take it easy Sir & Take care  Best wishes
I stand for border security. Very proud of you Mr President.
Stand firm Mr President!!!
Speed it we need it !!!
I want the wall
Thank you sir!
yes  we need this wall go for it trump
Trump all the way.
Board Strong
and im a veteran too
This American wants his paycheck.
I want border control
God will help you sir
call for a referendum
Stand strong Trump!!!
Make them fold
So just give up then.
Go for it and do not give them not one inch!
Let whine and cry till u get a wall . waste of us dollars!!
You definetely don’t know what to do
and im a veteran too
No work no pay! Stop their pay!
Yes he is doing exactly what we want!
We support you Donald J. TrumpDonald thank you and God bless you sir
Build it!!!!!!!!
And I think you suck.
Um, pretty sure you promised Mexico would pay for your wall, so wtf are you talking about? Talking to you Donnie.
Yes Americans want Border Security!........Who wouldn't! ......Who doesn't! However We The People do not want that DAMN BOONDOGGLE WALL!!! And we are damn tired of hearing about your  WALL and your manufactured FAKE CRISIS!!!
Mainstream media had a week of "he lies" material going full furnace. They don't give a crap about facts. Its the resist movement version of news.
You definetely don’t know what to do
Mainstream media had a week of "he lies" material going full furnace. They don't give a crap about facts. Its the resist movement version of news.
“You fail all the time, but you aren't a failure until you start blaming someone else.” - Bum Phillips, NFL football coach  Everyone agrees we need border security, but the MAJORITY of Americans do not want to spend our money on your cost-ineffective wall.  Give it up, fool!!!!  Most Americans don't support building the wall...  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/cbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall/Most Americans don't support building the wallcbsnews.com
Yes Americans want Border Security!........Who wouldn't! ......Who doesn't! However We The People do not want that DAMN BOONDOGGLE WALL!!! And we are damn tired of hearing about your  WALL and your manufactured FAKE CRISIS!!!
Donald J. Trump  #KAG  "The shutdown sent Republican poll ratings plunging, cost the government billions of dollars and damaged the nation’s international credibility. Mr. Obama refused to compromise, leaving Republican leaders to beg him to talk, and to fulminate when he refused. For all that, Republicans got a slight tightening of income verification rules for Americans accessing new health insurance exchanges created by the Affordable Care Act."  https://www.nytimes.com/2013/10/17/us/congress-budget-debate.html
Press on Mr. Trump!
WALL, WALL, WALL
Yes !! Wall wall wall wall wall
Americans want secure borders but our borders are extensive. Southern, northern, airports and ports. A wall on the southern border is ineffective. Increase border security at all points of entry. People and technology. Stop your silly tantrum and reopen our government
YES, WE DO Uncle Donald J. Trump! Trump True...
As old Hank would say if you don't like our Donald Trump Is Our President you can kiss our 🐴.
BUILD THE WALL SIR  Schumer And Pelosi And The Other Misguided  People Will Eventually Turn On Each Other Just A Matter Of Hour's .
Anne Crossway another poll...hahaha, and from CBS even. BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL SIR  Schumer And Pelosi And The Other Misguided  People Will Eventually Turn On Each Other Just A Matter Of Hour's .
liars and hypocrites...
https://www.facebook.com/derekmke/videos/1233022310195490/UzpfSTE1NDY5MDA4NTY6MTAyMTc4ODI3NTc0NTEwNDk/
As old Hank would say if you don't like our Donald Trump Is Our President you can kiss our 🐴.
https://www.facebook.com/derekmke/videos/1233022310195490/UzpfSTE1NDY5MDA4NTY6MTAyMTc4ODI3NTc0NTEwNDk/
WHAT'S MORE IMPORTANT TO THOSE DEMOCRATS IS STOPPING YOU FROM FULFILLING ONE OF YOUR PROMISES PRESIDENT TRUMP!! THAT'S WHAT YOUR HATERS ARE DOING!! THEY DON'T CARE ABOUT BUILDING NO WALL!! THEY JUST HATE YOU FOR TRYING TO DO SOMETHING DIFFERENT FOR AMERICA!! THAT'S IT!! THEY DON'T LIKE THAT NOR DO THEY LIKE YOU!! DON'T EXPECT FOR YOUR HATERS TO SUPPORT YOU & WORK WITH YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP!! IT AIN'T GONNA HAPPEN!! LET'S GET THE WALL BUILT WITHOUT THEM HATERS!! LORD, PLEASE HAVE YOUR WAY & HELP OUR PRESIDENT TRUMP TO ACCOMPLISH WHAT YOU WANT HIM TO ACCOMPLISH IN JESUS NAME,  AMEN!! THANK YOU JESUS!!  :) PRESIDENT TRUMP FOR 2020!!  :)
Just because it was a campaign promise doesn't mean it is a good thing to do. If a Democrat promised Medicare for all, do you think Republicans would say "well, it was a campaign promise so let's do it."?
liars and hypocrites...
Wall wall wall
I PUT UP A FENCE WITH A GATE AROUND MY HOUSE I DO NOT PUT A GATE AND THINK I AM DONE AND IF I CAN'T AFFORD BOTH AT THE SAME TIME I START WITH A FENCE TO MAKE ANYONE WHO WANTS TO COME IN MY YARD THROUGH THE AREA WHERE THE GATE WILL BE. Pelosi, Nancy (202) 225-4965 Sen. Charles Schumer ph: (202) 224-6542 #BUILDTHEWALL
THEY JUST LOOKED SO BAD. WHEN SHE STARTED TO SPEAK MY JAW DROPPED OPEN. IS SHE FOR REAL.  HOW ABOUT TERM LIMITS?  Gee. There’s an idea.
____________  RESIGN  —————
THANK YOU! ☮️🇺🇲️👨‍🌾
Build that WALL!  THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP AND FAMILY FOR FIGHTING FOR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!  MAY GOD BLESS YOU ALL!  WE KEEP YOU IN PRAYER!
Just because it was a campaign promise doesn't mean it is a good thing to do. If a Democrat promised Medicare for all, do you think Republicans would say "well, it was a campaign promise so let's do it."?
Let’s do it!
As it is writing dont paytronize a influence al person .
Wasn't your promise NO AMERICAN TAXPAYER MONEY WILL GO TO PAY FOR THE WALL, I GUARANTEE IT? How come you can't manage to keep THAT "promise"? Maybe if your administration would stop constantly lying to the American People, they would be more likely to support you..... just a thought, it's obvious you simply are not capable of telling the truth, even when it's pathetically simple to disprove your bullshit.
Oh please get over yourself. If you cared anything about the people you would get over your tantrum and stop your shutdown.
There have been multiple bipartisan solutions to border security that the executive branch torpedoed. #mostcorruptadministrationever
DO NOT CAVE TO THOSE TWO LOW LIFES, PRESIDENT TRUMP, BUILD THAT WALL, I FOR ONE ARE 100% BEHIND SECURING OUR BORDER FOR THE SAKE OF OUR COUNTRY AND THE SAFETY OF OUR CITIZENS !! IF THE TWO OF THEM PELOSI AND SCHUMER WANT TO ACT LIKE TWO BRATS PUT THEM INTO TIME OUT...
When Las Vegas is taking bets anf placing odds on how many times a President is expected to lie during a national address....thats a crisis... Resign...and we might go easy on you regarding russia...
Most of us are behind you President Donald J. Trump SECURE THAT SOUTHERN BORDER!!!!!
The power belongs to the people of the United States not the F***k democratic.
2 years holding the House of Representatives, Senate, White House and you wait until after the midterms to hold your tantrum.   Remember what you said about shutdowns in 2013?
President Trump is right!!! Democrats better realize the American people elected them to do their jobs if they don't do it that should be fired!
2 years holding the House of Representatives, Senate, White House and you wait until after the midterms to hold your tantrum.   Remember what you said about shutdowns in 2013?
The power belongs to the people of the United States not the F***k democratic.
This isn't just about the wall, it's a statement to Congress to work together on border security, immigration reform and upholding our laws by stopping sanctuary city protections. They have kicked the bucket too long and our social benefit systems are being robbed - which includes aid to vets, elderly, children, Medicaid/Medicare, social security. Not to mention the disease not treated and unvaccinated people that is causing uprisings in eradicated illnesses and diseases we had not seen, like this cold started polio. That's what this is about! Be a voice with us in telling Congress to do their jobs. If you can't donate even one dollar, sign the petition at wefundthewall . com! Thank you for caring about America's ability to sustain and help others, the right way! Please share.
#PROUDOFOURPRESIDENTTRUMP!   KEEP AMERICANS SAFE...NATIONAL SECURITY IS A GOOD THING. BUILD THE WALL PRESIDENT TRUMP!  WE ARE BEHIND YOU ALL THE WAY
People overwhelmingly want security but don't let the poll numbers fool you about who thinks a wall is unnecessary or necessary.. With the leftist news outlets brainwashing folks that walls don't work, is it any wonder some buy into that drivel. If those folks were on the border with our border agents, they'd change their minds fast! Walls/barriers work and if they didn't then why put them around prisons, around our military bases, around airport runways and hangers, around electrical transformers and gee, seems under Obama they felt the fence around the White House needed to be taller, Walls, fences or barriers of some kind absolutely work!
President Trump, the demorats continue to buck every change because they are cry babies, BUT what they forget is that YOU ARE THE PRESIDENT and you have researched the best way to secure the borders with the border patrol and they have called for, begged for the 'WALL', unfortunately you have a bigger wall of cry babies in the democrat party that can't get past you being elected.    PRESIDENT TRUMP WE ARE PRAYING FOR YOU AND THE WALL.   WE ARE BEHIND YOU AND ON THE SIDE OF YOU ALL THE WAY!!!!!   GO AHEAD AND MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!!!!!!!!
HERE IS HOW YOU CAN GET YOUR BORDER WALL UP QUICKLY.  https://www.facebook.com/100014708914788/posts/538492803317679/
DUMBOCRATS DO NOT WANT SECURE BORDERS BECAUSE THEY KNOW THE VOTING BASE OF ILLEGALS THEY ALLOW TO VOTE WOULD DWINDLE DOWN TO NOTHING! ITS THE ONLY WAY THEY WILL WIN THE ELECTION! 🙄😡💩🙄😡💩😡💩
AND SO DO THE PEOPLE.MAYBE WE NEED TO RALLY!!!SO WE THE  PEOPLE CAN ALL SHOW WE WANT THE WALL. AND WE WANT IT  NOW!!!!
NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL , NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL.
The majority of Trump's base are white people on food stamps. And if the shutdown shuts that down will they love him then? They don't think about that because they can't think to begin with.
You are so clueless you don't understand how government works....53 Republicans control the Senate but they need 7 Democrats to vote yes...it takes 60 votes to pass a bill to fund government and a wall.
PRESIDENT TRUMP, PLEASE CONSIDER HANDING OUT PINK SLIPS TO REDUCE FEDERAL EMPLOYEES THAT ARE NOT NEEDED. WE HAVE WAY TOO MANY THAT WANT TO SIT ON THEIR @$$$$ES & NOT GET WORK DONE ON TIME OR NOT AT ALL. TOO MUCH INCOMPETENCE AND NOT WORTH THE PAY.  THEY CAN STOP BITCHING AND GET A NON-GOVERNMENT JOB.
I WANT BORDER SECURITY. BUILD THE WALL. WHO CARES WHO GETS A PAYCHECK OR NOT. WHAT'S IMPORTANT IS THE WALL.
I Agree With Yu USA/American President Donald J. Trump That the Border Wall Must Be Built As I Say Don't Be Intimidated By Democrats Especially House of Representatives Speaker Nancy Pelosi as I Say The Republicans Have a Majority in Senate So Build the Wall and Show Democrats Yu Fulfill Yur Promises As I Say God Bless Yu President Donald Trump Very Much.
NEVER THOUGHT I WOULD BE ON MY KNEES EVERY NIGHT PRAYING FOR MY COUNTRY AS MUCH AS I HAVE BEEN OR WILL BE. GOD BLESS AMERICA!!! YES AMERICA NOT RUSSIA. AMERICA NOT THE PERSON IN THE WH. I PRAY OUR CONSTITUTION HOLDS. I PRAY THE FEW FREEDOMS WE HAVE LEFT REMAIN INTACT!! GOD BLESS AMERICAN MY HOME SWEET HOME!!
Balance the budget and collect a surplus then you can have your wall. It is not about YOU!
STUPID IS AS STUPID DOES, FORREST!!!
That's a damn lie...I don't want a WALL!! You are a joke!!                   https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Fcnn.it%2F2CUNw7J%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2n0j2LACmAaIUc_InQcXs09Fu4GlZ4R3NseGn22qDXgk1UvbHTL5BDMNE&h=AT0mUOfKauzN9OZke_-XSrnhSSXGztOdJlZQ8dZepyEl8G728Ufaswr8pWsFnEx9Go4TXZxWwAvyAODEUZCt5FSZfkVQCSJeKR5uopKcxNSVgAP0Wg_a3BFCVK_k6p480n5SfLVtAjn2b8wK1uPmyFC2lVEpYO_hwf1C_p0ZsrEj6twAva34NIYHb9qAhh9knYtMm8OfXRUz4RFYPXdx26UcB1s0f7TiO7TuWDZs9PhovHkNk8nPXqBiLiU905ys52wltPqhVQwHnCltloyWXgaxQeXR9Aau8NqW3FBpc_GBxcq74JybhNvdsP6meaqEC3iSVn8KPMLvR2FwGW-BlDWYfnZJElmsIOWTXTjQM1lOc1pAdBS0AfqWLOflrLZC_lRk3Nx_TVXIa3ra5gjtFpRWfB3RRYSGano6bc2MpZCbsP_M2sWsoD8_uQYZy4KIpu-scpVLSZwmiMLiqsjm8dh-y4XJXxRVRXoBZZqdw-q5R2vsuLrxsmGJF59E_OG3rN66aCTzUctNyKNLTQz9vWMX9ZaM5zSAXOElKCYmYueRe-mYwf_26_jLmwgzcYEAydT6z-D-1J50Vdy1fl50OC-cHE0pAtjLf7nrzKekIuGJwl76UEKleye5uJm1uNqX7pMnA7tBIV4XkJ0dYKewR3tjPWOs6BDPQfCZLv0hs4SJt8ltwD78XqRngaOkTGEMcXPAAHWAn5jL_b703_ZU3Dr0LFB1Ud-94mS6P7Z_kXRDV5TFEMXUQuEXgKsTw8s76WYaOWBd7TEJ7IvwoyAT0VAHG-QuUS2Xt2hJnga-58BwDynnVBEydq9aBSnK3cK5NbEMROZGQa4I3ionM4O5qznsjUfh4pgsi4c59qXWTico1tnSVs0i7izx0o76p_WWDaPn3g
The majority of Trump's base are white people on food stamps. And if the shutdown shuts that down will they love him then? They don't think about that because they can't think to begin with.
That's a damn lie...I don't want a WALL!! You are a joke!!                   https://l.facebook.com/l.php?u=https%3A%2F%2Fcnn.it%2F2CUNw7J%3Ffbclid%3DIwAR2n0j2LACmAaIUc_InQcXs09Fu4GlZ4R3NseGn22qDXgk1UvbHTL5BDMNE&h=AT0mUOfKauzN9OZke_-XSrnhSSXGztOdJlZQ8dZepyEl8G728Ufaswr8pWsFnEx9Go4TXZxWwAvyAODEUZCt5FSZfkVQCSJeKR5uopKcxNSVgAP0Wg_a3BFCVK_k6p480n5SfLVtAjn2b8wK1uPmyFC2lVEpYO_hwf1C_p0ZsrEj6twAva34NIYHb9qAhh9knYtMm8OfXRUz4RFYPXdx26UcB1s0f7TiO7TuWDZs9PhovHkNk8nPXqBiLiU905ys52wltPqhVQwHnCltloyWXgaxQeXR9Aau8NqW3FBpc_GBxcq74JybhNvdsP6meaqEC3iSVn8KPMLvR2FwGW-BlDWYfnZJElmsIOWTXTjQM1lOc1pAdBS0AfqWLOflrLZC_lRk3Nx_TVXIa3ra5gjtFpRWfB3RRYSGano6bc2MpZCbsP_M2sWsoD8_uQYZy4KIpu-scpVLSZwmiMLiqsjm8dh-y4XJXxRVRXoBZZqdw-q5R2vsuLrxsmGJF59E_OG3rN66aCTzUctNyKNLTQz9vWMX9ZaM5zSAXOElKCYmYueRe-mYwf_26_jLmwgzcYEAydT6z-D-1J50Vdy1fl50OC-cHE0pAtjLf7nrzKekIuGJwl76UEKleye5uJm1uNqX7pMnA7tBIV4XkJ0dYKewR3tjPWOs6BDPQfCZLv0hs4SJt8ltwD78XqRngaOkTGEMcXPAAHWAn5jL_b703_ZU3Dr0LFB1Ud-94mS6P7Z_kXRDV5TFEMXUQuEXgKsTw8s76WYaOWBd7TEJ7IvwoyAT0VAHG-QuUS2Xt2hJnga-58BwDynnVBEydq9aBSnK3cK5NbEMROZGQa4I3ionM4O5qznsjUfh4pgsi4c59qXWTico1tnSVs0i7izx0o76p_WWDaPn3g
Tony Jeannette troll
DonnaBarnesToney.....ignorant citizen.
STUPID IS AS STUPID DOES, FORREST!!!
The majority voted for Trump, the majority voted for the wall. Pelosi and Schumer have flipped flopped on this issue over the years and ignored the problem to the point that it’s totally out of control. Mexico will pay for it one way or another regardless.
But you promised the Mexicans would pay for your wall..hold them to it!
Mr. President just do the job that we elected you to do. Secure our borders! Quit sending an olive branch out to the Democrats. Quit asking them to come across the aisle and work together to better the country. we all know the Democrats are not about to do that. They are only about hate and resistance. No bargains, no quarter. #BuildTheWall #Now #MAGA🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
If anyone else was saying the same thing trump all his lies people would be having a cow!!
Will someone please take this oompa loompa’s facebook away smh this is the only carrot I would avoid in this world
Getting your lying ASS out of the whithouse.
Yes Amen America
Go President Trump!
DonnaBarnesToney.....ignorant citizen.
Go President Trump!
Where is his taxes.
Ken Arrington same place every millionaire are moron.dont like it change the law
Yes Amen America
Good job big D keep it up We luv ya
Build T H I C C wal
we support you Mr. President.
We just want OUR wall!!!!
#Save Alappad #Stop Mining
I AGREE WITH YOU M.R PRESIDENT
Don get you another glass of Democrat kool aid.
BUILD THE WALL!   WIDE AND TALL!
Build the wall !!  We no longer feel safe!!!
Ken Arrington same place every millionaire are moron.dont like it change the law
2yr old tempertantrum
Ballonies You are very wrong
Don’t give in!!!
Yes thank you
Secure the border!
They could care less about this country
We need that wall. Build it pleases
Yes we do🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
UP TRUMP 2020
Build the wall !!  We no longer feel safe!!!
UP TRUMP 2020
Border security all the way
Janice Rose so you are happy that actual border security is going unpaid right now?
They are not going unpaid the military is being paid the house is being payed the Congress is being paid. If it was another president that wants this it would be passed with no problem. But the selfish people who want to control our rights and doesn't care about the American people will stop it. What happened to supporting your president what happened to America sticking together the problem is everyone wants to blame the president for everything that is wrong in this country they need to look back on the pervious president and see what they did wrong. The way I see it is this is the only president that all you people out there are criticizen on. It seems like no matter what the problem is it's the president falt when are the people going to Stat take blame for their own actions. The only thing the president is trying to do is make our country safe again, get the drugs the murders and the human trafficking out of our country. I believe in our president and will support our president and I think more people should stand up. Instead of all the hate this country has they should come together to make our country great again.
Yes we do🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
And more term limits!
BUILD THAT WALL!!👍🏻
Stop lying fake president
Liberals are wasted wow!!!!
Build the wall Sir.
THANK YOU SIR!! GO TRUMP!
American borders should be strengthened.
YOU CAN DO IT!!!! AND BUILD IT !!!
They are not going unpaid the military is being paid the house is being payed the Congress is being paid. If it was another president that wants this it would be passed with no problem. But the selfish people who want to control our rights and doesn't care about the American people will stop it. What happened to supporting your president what happened to America sticking together the problem is everyone wants to blame the president for everything that is wrong in this country they need to look back on the pervious president and see what they did wrong. The way I see it is this is the only president that all you people out there are criticizen on. It seems like no matter what the problem is it's the president falt when are the people going to Stat take blame for their own actions. The only thing the president is trying to do is make our country safe again, get the drugs the murders and the human trafficking out of our country. I believe in our president and will support our president and I think more people should stand up. Instead of all the hate this country has they should come together to make our country great again.
YOU CAN DO IT!!!! AND BUILD IT !!!
Show me the Pesos
THE DEMS HAD IT IN 2013. THEY WERE GIVEN 43 BILLION TO SECURE THE BORDER. WHERE IS THAT MONEY?????
They didn’t need it Mexico was supposed to pay for it.
American borders should be strengthened.
love from india to amricans but please love indians also there
I want the wall and drones
Stand firm and BUILD THE WALL!!!
Biuld the Wall 😎
Best president ever. Build the wall
Thankyou, Lord, I am a proud Canadian!!
Build that wall aready!
WE LOVE YOU!!! You are 🔥🔥🔥
Unbelievable https://youtu.be/k4sxOP-_WqE
They didn’t need it Mexico was supposed to pay for it.
Unbelievable https://youtu.be/k4sxOP-_WqE
ZOYA. WE WANT THE WALL. THAT IS WHY WE ELECTED TRUMP.  NOT YOUR COUNTRY!
WE LOVE YOU!!! You are 🔥🔥🔥
We Americans dont want border security
Stop killing sea lions!
https://media.8ch.net/file_store/0fb7a32b5a9e587ce2b1cecaf77bbe32340f91d8a4e7c57096dd73ea9c4987d4.jpeg  MAGA   WWG1WGA
Behind you -rooting for you -USA USA USA -and this great nation to stay sound and sovereign!! Our man- President Trump!!
campaign promises broken first 2 years 1. didn't repeal and replace obamacare 2. mexico isn't paying for his wall 3. stock market reaching new lows everyday 4. Hillary still not in jail 5. didn't release his taxes 6. only swamp that's draining is his own administration 7. hasn't added any jobs promised 8. No new ethics reforms to reduce the corrupting influence of special interests 9. making collage more affordable  10. hasnt Provided matching contributions for low-income families to the dependent care savings account 11. Allow Americans to deduct child care and elder care from their taxes 12. Reduce the number of tax brackets from seven to three, and likewise greatly simplify tax forms 13. Propose and pass tax simplification bill in which the largest tax reductions are for the middle class 14. Let states manage Medicaid funds 15. Leverage public-private partnerships and private investments through tax incentives to spur $1 trillion in infrastructure  16. Direct the secretary of the treasury to label China a currency manipulator 17. Impose a five-year ban on White House and congressional officials becoming lobbyists after they leave government service 18. my coal miner buddies are still broke
Hold Fast on the Wall! God is with you! Save America!
The Democrats have branded you as a bully and will resist  your administration until you are no longer President. I am a proud American and support you. Common sense doesn't exists in Congress.
He’s over-reacting and has fabricated a lot we’ve heard and has it occurred to you that God may have directed them to the border, something God does, and our nation’s humanity is being tested? Aren’t y’all taking heed to the real facts so many have been trying for you to believe? Caution, ;for God could change life as we all know it! Fear that!
and this is very much my country, I have ancestors who came over on The Mayflower.
He’s over-reacting and has fabricated a lot we’ve heard and has it occurred to you that God may have directed them to the border, something God does, and our nation’s humanity is being tested? Aren’t y’all taking heed to the real facts so many have been trying for you to believe? Caution, ;for God could change life as we all know it! Fear that!
Did you just ignore everyone saying build the wall and say no one wants it. 😂🤣😂🤣😂
Nola Combs "Everyone" implies a majority.  This is complete bullshit.  The majority do not want this, because they can read and understand facts.  It's a waste of money.
https://www.politico.com/story/2019/01/08/poll-voters-blame-trump-gop-for-shutdown-1088207
The Democrats have branded you as a bully and will resist  your administration until you are no longer President. I am a proud American and support you. Common sense doesn't exists in Congress.
https://www.politico.com/story/2019/01/08/poll-voters-blame-trump-gop-for-shutdown-1088207
Dan Loeffler with you right there, along with the President
Nola Combs "Everyone" implies a majority.  This is complete bullshit.  The majority do not want this, because they can read and understand facts.  It's a waste of money.
Dan Loeffler with you right there, along with the President
Dont promise what you cant deliver and stop lying
Klaus Shaven durp durp durp dur dur dur durrrrrrrppppp durp durp!!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzzzz!!!!
We are with you President Trump don't let these liberals stop you. The constitution says the President is responsible for security of our boarders.
Americans want a Wall, and put the dems. om the other side of it, while you are at it.
Very true President how ever if the retarded Republicans would stop being so nieve an just decriminalize cannabis in the bill they proposed. The dems would be back at the table. 33 percent of that tax revenue from the decriminalization of cannabis would go to the wall. If your using all 50 states as an example that 33 percent would build the wall an still have some left over. I dont have a party choice however I recognize how corrupt an evil all parties are
Since it's our border. Take the money they ve given to you already, open the government the get a go fund me page so the whole Americans will contribute to it. I have 50 dollars for it already. We all need a secured home let alone a country.
What's the crisis? Tens of thousands of people coming into our country illegally every year.  Why is Trump declaring it a crisis now?  Because Democrats and Republicans FAIL to secure the border.  Both parties failed to do what was needed for DECADES.
We want security where it needs to be, not funding a self made crisis and ego stroke.   I’m looking forward to the hilarity of your circus show tonight. Remember to get out of your seats folks and actually researching the numbers since the potus has a history of lying. #TrumpsFakeNews #TemperTantrumTrump #DumpTrump #TheTrumpShutdown
Klaus Shaven durp durp durp dur dur dur durrrrrrrppppp durp durp!!!!🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzzzz!!!!
Don't believe the FAKE news! Trump was voted in by the people! The people want a wall and border security! The people want better care for the veterans, seniors & homeless! The people want our politicians to take care of US first! Stop the fighting and take care of business!
No matter your political standing you must love and protect your country.  Just hating 1 man is not a good answer, grow up.
Speak the truth in Love for our Country America and all
Yes, most Americans are not brain dead like the Democrats....for one thing it costs this country over 200 billion per year for illegal aliens payout as opposed to $5 billion for a wall....do the math...its common sense to do the wall...
Stopping the wasteful Trump monument is the important thing.
No what’s more important is not spending a bunch of tax payer money when you said someone else was going to pay for your pet project.
Don't fold Buddy you got the Trump card.
“I think that anyone who’s been familiar with the southwest border and the terrain ... kind of recognizes that building a wall along the entire southwest border is probably not going to work,” Gil Kerlikowske, the commissioner of the CBP since 2014, said shortly before leaving office last Friday.
This whole thing is a disgusting waste of time and money. What kind of 'leader' wants to shut the government just to bully his way to a 'win'?
“I think that anyone who’s been familiar with the southwest border and the terrain ... kind of recognizes that building a wall along the entire southwest border is probably not going to work,” Gil Kerlikowske, the commissioner of the CBP since 2014, said shortly before leaving office last Friday.
Tim Kennelly
hey grandma you probably know a lot about filling up diapers
Don't fold Buddy you got the Trump card.
🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻  THE UNITED STATES PRESIDENT, COMMANDER, AND CHIEF IS TRYING TO PROTECT THE AMERICAN PEOPLE AND SAVE LIVES... THE FIRST FAMILY HAS MY FAMILIES SUPPORT 100% PERIOD !!!
YOUR promise donald WAS that Mexico would pay for a wall or did you forget that "small" detail!
You just got $800 BILLION more dollars for defense - you can't find the money in there?? Ask the DOD to repay the $12 TRILLION they LOST. Come on, man, we're hurting out here.
Agree wholeheartedly Mr President.   No offence though. I caught Ur address from the Oval office. YOU  NEED  TO  BE  ABLE  TO  STEP  BY  STEP,  EXPLAIN  YOUR  REASONINGS  BETTER Sir.  But I wholeheartedly agree with U Mr President
The ONLY thing Democrats care about is blocking you regardless of what you’re trying to do!  Then in 2020, they will say that you made promises you couldn’t keep.
hey grandma you probably know a lot about filling up diapers
President Trump your doing a great job, build the wall
Joshua 1: 9 Reina-Valera 1960 (RVR1960)  9 See that I command you to be strong and courageous; Do not fear or be dismayed, for Jehovah your God will be with you wherever you go. GOD BLESS THE U.S.A FOREVER!!! GOD BLESS PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP FOREVER!!!
Because you are taking their votes away. Lol
Unfortunately it’s stopping you from anything you do. They are sore losers and they can’t se past the end of their nose.
Build the WALL and make the dems pay for it with their ill gotten gains. You can do it because after all you are the Greatest American President Ever and you are Making America Great Again on a Daily Basis 🇺🇸👊🇺🇸
Ahead of Trump address, a new poll shows how many Americans say there's a 'crisis' at the border
tRump university was a scam!!  tRump was sued & had to pay millions of $$       Trump University was never a university. When the “school” was established in 2005, the New York State Education Department warned that it was in violation of state law for operating without a NYSED license. Trump ignored the warnings. (The institution is now called, ahem, “Trump Entrepreneur Initiative.”)              https://www.nationalreview.com/corner/trump-university-scam/
The liberals are not concerned about the security of the USA.  All they want is "POWER"  If they can defeat this wall then they can declare themselves a winners.  They will be all powerful and pass any impeachments and obstacles that they want
The FBI of Los Angeles just said to me on the phone that investigating drugs is not a federal matter.
Pelosi & Schumer reminded me of the old western scene photo-op; . This is where the undertaker has the bad guys corpses lined up in their coffins, propped for viewing, & the photographer takes the historical pic.----- P & S are a pathetic display of the dysfunctionals bringing down America to communist-globalism.
So first year we save 270 billion Next yr we save 275 billion Wow that's simple math for democrats to understand Looks to me like wall pays for itself and is a money maker
Pelosi & Schumer reminded me of the old western scene photo-op; . This is where the undertaker has the bad guys corpses lined up in their coffins, propped for viewing, & the photographer takes the historical pic.----- P & S are a pathetic display of the dysfunctionals bringing down America to communist-globalism.
How about instead of sending 54 BILLION in FOREIGN aid, you take care of Americans first!!!!!!!!!!
Valentina Hansen I totally agree.  Why are we blowing away $54billion  on countries that could not care less about us.  Use that money to build the wall.
He should not be doing it at the expense of those of us who work in some of the most stressful and dangerous positions that no one else would
The FBI of Los Angeles just said to me on the phone that investigating drugs is not a federal matter.
Yeah, but they don't want a wall.  How about you keep America safe by resigning?
Is your promise based on studies and and expert testimony or just a political whim?
Pres. Trump says there's a 'national security crisis' at the southern border that justifies shutting down the government -- but illegal border crossings last year hit a 46-year low, and the U.S. military has already sent home half of the 5,900 troops that Trump ordered to the border before November's election.
native American you are suppose to be smart..guess not
Taking welfare and ssi from the people is not helping us. Alot of people are gonna be homeless cuz of trump he is a pis
He should not be doing it at the expense of those of us who work in some of the most stressful and dangerous positions that no one else would
Taking welfare and ssi from the people is not helping us. Alot of people are gonna be homeless cuz of trump he is a pis
Mary Kay Gaffney why don't you go live on the other side of the wall if you don't think it is an issue and see how safe you are
Heather Stevens why dont you?
Mary Kay Gaffney What hole do you live in
Heather Stevens the shithole trump created at present
native American you are suppose to be smart..guess not
Heather Stevens the shithole trump created at present
yeah.... a lot of Republicans think the wall is a stupid idea, too.
82% OF AMERICAN CITIZENS WANT THE WALL. IT'S THE #1 CONCERN OF ALL AMERICANS.
Jill Travassos Not true, not even close. Let's see your source, because you are either lying or someone misled you.
I'm american, it's not my #1 concern.
Mary Kay Gaffney What hole do you live in
How about using our resources to actually serve the people....no wall.
It's obvious to everyone, if they are truthful, that their main goal is to stop Trump from fulfilling his promises, rather than work in the interest of America and its citizens.
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
Your promise was Mexico will pay, not 'We the People'. You lied. Again. As usual....
James Mattis’ resignation letter.   Dear Mr. President:  I have been privileged to serve as our country's 26th Secretary of Defense which has allowed me to serve alongside our men and women of the Department in defense of our citizens and our ideals.  I am proud of the progress that has been made over the past two years on some of the key goals articulated in our National Defense Strategy: putting the Department on a more sound budgetary footing, improving readiness and lethality in our forces, and reforming the Department's business practices for greater performance. Our troops continue to provide the capabilities needed to prevail in conflict and sustain strong U.S. global influence.  One core belief I have always held is that our strength as a nation is inextricably linked to the strength of our unique and comprehensive system of alliances and partnerships. While the US remains the indispensable nation in the free world, we cannot protect our interests or serve that role effectively without maintaining strong alliances and showing respect to those allies. Like you, I have said from the beginning that the armed forces of the United States should not be the policeman of the world. Instead, we must use all tools of American power to provide for the common defense, including providing effective leadership to our alliances. NATO's 29 democracies demonstrated that strength in their commitment to fighting alongside us following the 9-11 attack on America. The Defeat-ISIS coalition of 74 nations is further proof.  Similarly, I believe we must be resolute and unambiguous in our approach to those countries whose strategic interests are increasingly in tension with ours. It is clear that China and Russia, for example, want to shape a world consistent with their authoritarian model - gaining veto authority over other nations' economic, diplomatic, and security decisions - to promote their own interests at the expense of their neighbors, America and our allies. That is why we must use all the tools of American power to provide for the common defense.  My views on treating allies with respect and also being clear-eyed about both malign actors and strategic competitors are strongly held and informed by over four decades of immersion in these issues. We must do everything possible to advance an international order that is most conducive to our security, prosperity and values, and we are strengthened in this effort by the solidarity of our alliances.  Because you have the right to have a Secretary of Defense whose views are better aligned with yours on these and other subjects, I believe it is right for me to step down from my position. The end date for my tenure is February 28, 2019, a date that should allow sufficient time for a successor to be nominated and confirmed as well as to make sure the Department's interests are properly articulated and protected at upcoming events to include Congressional posture hearings and the NATO Defense Ministerial meeting in February. Further, that a full transition to a new Secretary of Defense occurs well in advance of the transition of Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff in September in order to ensure stability Within the Department.  I pledge my full effort to a smooth transition that ensures the needs and interests of the 2.15 million Service Members and 732,079 DoD civilians receive undistracted attention of the Department at all times so that they can fulfill their critical, round-the-clock mission to protect the American people.  I very much appreciate this opportunity to serve the nation and our men and women in uniform.
Help me understand. Democrats say border crossings are down, how do they count them if they sneak over where there are no walls? Help me understand Democrats say drugs come in through truckers. Should be able to stop them? None come in where there is no wall?
I'm american, it's not my #1 concern.
Funny that you cut tons of programs and things when you first went into office saying we had no money for health care and education and so forth but all of a sudden we have money for a wall? Are you lying to us again, Donnie?
Mr. DJ Trump I am sure that the members of the house, the speaker of the house, and the senent wasn't elected to block what you are doing to protect America and it's borders. I have noticed that these same ones go out of their way to block your plans, even if they wanted the same thing when they were in Obama's cabinet and presidency. Please don't give up your plans, you are doing a better job than any one before you. I praise God for you.
Your promise is whack! You just want something built with your name on it.
It’s all about you it doesn’t matter what you are in favor of they are against a bunch of terds
Everything you promise will be rejected by Democrat because they want you to see fail on your administration. Illegals are Democrats safety net voters. Why was Obama and Democrats gave 150 billion dollars cash to the enemies and not allowing to protect US citizens?
you not getting a wall
[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[ do it 👍
So first year we save 270 billion Next yr we save 275 billion Wow that's simple math for democrats to understand Looks to me like wall pays for itself and is a money maker
[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[[ do it 👍
they say believe in Jesus but Jesus is a man and any man who makes another man a husband is Gay and what will theoutside countries do to a bunch of gay men!
and Allah is a false God where he should not be associated with nor should these dumb muslims assocuate themselves with such a false maggot
you not getting a wall
and Allah is a false God where he should not be associated with nor should these dumb muslims assocuate themselves with such a false maggot
Jacquelyn Scherer how would you suggest securing the border? Honest question.
Jacquelyn Scherer he is speaking on behalf of Americans he has walls an armed guards.
Jacquelyn Scherer that’s my problem no one is telling us how we will secure our border just saying no to a wall for spite isn’t going to help.  I would like the benefits they get for seeking asylum cut off
Brandon Sikes It’s already being done.  There are cameras, patrols, armed guards.  Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 18 years.
Brandon Sikes It’s already being done: cameras, armed guards, patrols, searches of cars.  Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 18 years.
they say believe in Jesus but Jesus is a man and any man who makes another man a husband is Gay and what will theoutside countries do to a bunch of gay men!
Brandon Sikes It’s already being done: cameras, armed guards, patrols, searches of cars.  Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 18 years.
Gian Dovidio that analogy makes you look like a idiot. Just fyi. Do we put a wall on east and west coast?  Canada?  Its a 10th century solution thoughtof and supported by people who are intellectually challenged.
Shawn Caulder they are both the same thing in principle. the government functions like the rules of a household on a bigger scale. people who live in a home are governed by those rules, and walls of a home are meant to allow authorized people to enter just as the walls of a country are meant to only allow authorized people to enter. its interesting how you do not seem to be able to internalize such an easily understood idea
yes there should be a southern and northern border by 2030
Brandon Sikes It’s already being done.  There are cameras, patrols, armed guards.  Illegal immigration is at its lowest point in 18 years.
If your mouth is moving you are probably lying
The laid-back head of a Russian state bank was an unusual choice of emissary -- and brought an unusual present. What was he after?      https://foreignpolicy.com/2017/07/25/why-did-russia-send-sergei-gorkov-to-meet-with-jared-kushner/
The President's most important job is to protect the borders of the United States. It's a no brainer.
Trump people need to realize ever American is documented either by birth certificate social security card other forms of ID what makes them special????
The Schumer, Pelosi shutdown continues. They don’t really oppose a wall, just a president elected by the people!
yes there should be a southern and northern border by 2030
Securing the border was supposed to happen already, President Obama said he would do it, what happened?  Before that 30 yrs ago after President Reagan granted amnesty . All the walls and fences in Europe to keep immigrants out and smuggling out but that's ok.
Clearly the Democrats ARE offering border security. Pelosi agreed to a lot of what you asked for. Only sticking point is the wall. The wall will not be effective. You lied about that and a lot of other things.  STOP LYING TO THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!
Securing the border was supposed to happen already, President Obama said he would do it, what happened?  Before that 30 yrs ago after President Reagan granted amnesty . All the walls and fences in Europe to keep immigrants out and smuggling out but that's ok.
you said big beautiful wall.  That is what we expect, not a token section of slatted fence
Americans want border security. Americans DO NOT WANT an ineffective 4rh Century solution to a 21st Century problem.  Americans want to see you REMOVED FROM OFFICE AND LOCKED UP for the criminal you are.  When that happens it will be a great day in the USA!
Mike Pence MR. VICE PRESIDENT -- EXCELLENT JOB TODAY!!! YOU HANDLED THAT SLEAZY JOHN KARL SO WELL!! STAY VOCAL!!! Good Morning America CBS GOP Fox News Judge Jeanine Pirro Lou Dobbs POTUS Donald J Trump Lara Trump
Poor desperate grasping gormless liberal parasites and their incestuous checkout line tabloid entertainment news.
We need to get the after you dialed in after you we can't lose America again
Stand Strong President Trump 💪🏻 We The People Are Standing Behind You 🇺🇸
Stopping you, Mr President. They hate you and everyone who voted for you. They want socialism and one world government. Stand strong. Build the wall.
Clearly the Democrats ARE offering border security. Pelosi agreed to a lot of what you asked for. Only sticking point is the wall. The wall will not be effective. You lied about that and a lot of other things.  STOP LYING TO THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!
TTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTT
You promised the Mexicans were going to pay!
Becky Lao they all ready have.
Mike Stoumbaugh show me the money honey
So if that’s true why are WE supposed to pay for it?
If we would stop paying the illegals that are already here, the ones held at the border we could..  You are paying congress and the illegals becky lao,,  unless your on welfare..  then we're paying for you also..
TTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTTT
You can't fulfill your promise if you need funding from outside of Mexico.
Border construction and cleanup America of communist and socialist supported by Democrat far left party.
I think you answered your own question Mr President. The great American people are lucky to have you fighting for them.
Um hiding fact USA had electric car 90 s that out raced sports cars but demand all now buy hybrid ...,oh yes made by dog eaters and whale killers
YOUR PROMISE:  who’s gonna pay for the wall?  WHO’S GONNA PAY FOR THE WALL?   PROMISE BROKEN!!
You promised that the Mexican government was paying for it, fulfill that promise
If we would stop paying the illegals that are already here, the ones held at the border we could..  You are paying congress and the illegals becky lao,,  unless your on welfare..  then we're paying for you also..
You promised that the Mexican government was paying for it, fulfill that promise
You damn right!!!!!
Stand strong! Thank you for trying to protect us!❤🤕
You said Mexico would pay. You lied.
Keep the stand...they are playing softball... You play hardball!
The Democrats are not preventing you from a campaign promise, getting funding fron Mexico is!
Then open the government and send troops. Cant be that bad if you're sitting in your office while keeping the government shutdown.
Democrats are cutring their own throaghts acting the the way they are.
BUILD THE WALL!!!! God bless President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I doubt anyone will read this or take this seriously, but I'm going to say it anyway. Instead of building a wall, why can't we build a set of barracks every say hundred miles, then from that have a set posts every 20 miles in between, then send our National Guard there on their 2 weeks a year and maybe a couple weekends a year? Man could you imagine the benefits of that? Our National Guard would get actual training. We pay them anyway, the labor would be cheap... Then if someone would decide to invade America from the south they'd be screwed cause we could send our troops to these barracks. If the national guard isn't enough people, then also let I.C.E. and the border patrol use these facilities.
You damn right!!!!!
I doubt anyone will read this or take this seriously, but I'm going to say it anyway. Instead of building a wall, why can't we build a set of barracks every say hundred miles, then from that have a set posts every 20 miles in between, then send our National Guard there on their 2 weeks a year and maybe a couple weekends a year? Man could you imagine the benefits of that? Our National Guard would get actual training. We pay them anyway, the labor would be cheap... Then if someone would decide to invade America from the south they'd be screwed cause we could send our troops to these barracks. If the national guard isn't enough people, then also let I.C.E. and the border patrol use these facilities.
Kyle Sakamoto God had a wall build check it out it's in the bible ,keep reading you might learn more than that stupid.
Historically, walls aren't the most effective. Time after time throughout History, walls were built and failed. Walls didn't stop Alaric's sack of Rome in 410. Walls didn't stop the sack of Constantinople during the 4th Crusades. During the Medieval era, walls were built around cities and there were Catapults and battering rams and other siege weapons that destroyed those walls.  Read some of the historical texts from Locke and those who influenced the thought of Early Americans and the Founders.  I argue that if Washington and Jefferson were to be brought back in this era, they would argue that walls are not needed and not American. They would probably argue that after rising against kings and queens in their era to have a more Democratic system of government, that perhaps the next stage involves forming more partnerships with other nations and countries and that being Nationalistic and Isolationist is not the best direction for our nation to progress.  How about you study History and Theology and do Biblical exegesis instead of believing the lies of those in power and being driven by fear of those different from you. Go on a study abroad or cross cultural mission trip to South America and learn to appreciate the customs of those who we deem as the "other."
BUILD THE WALL!!!! God bless President Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stop acting like the two are related.
100/100 PERCENT WITH YOU MR PRESIDENT. All thoes who would impede sensible border protection share in the guilt and responsibility for the deaths of innocent Americans..how can one not care for anothers child is staggering.  https://www.facebook.com/189531267729007/posts/2494717580543686/
Hello my baby ...I'd like to know if you will be sugar baby....for a start I promise I will pay you 500$ twice a week for weekly allowances if that going to be enough for you   Please text me on hangout @deangeorgecain1@gmail.com                 Or  Kik me @ deangeorgecain1          Or text me        2027534298
Instead of using fact checkers, they should just add a laugh track to Trump's speech. Hit the laugh track every time he lies
More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
We sure do NOW DONT GIVE IN TO THEM!! No compromise without wall funding-veto EVERY SINGLE ONE of their bills til they stop obstructing! Dems care nothing about American citizens, our security or economic well being!
No, President Donald J. Trump, the "dims" will try to stop you at every turn...BECAUSE THE MAJORITY OF AMERICA LOVES YOU!  They can only succeed if the majority loves them!
Historically, walls aren't the most effective. Time after time throughout History, walls were built and failed. Walls didn't stop Alaric's sack of Rome in 410. Walls didn't stop the sack of Constantinople during the 4th Crusades. During the Medieval era, walls were built around cities and there were Catapults and battering rams and other siege weapons that destroyed those walls.  Read some of the historical texts from Locke and those who influenced the thought of Early Americans and the Founders.  I argue that if Washington and Jefferson were to be brought back in this era, they would argue that walls are not needed and not American. They would probably argue that after rising against kings and queens in their era to have a more Democratic system of government, that perhaps the next stage involves forming more partnerships with other nations and countries and that being Nationalistic and Isolationist is not the best direction for our nation to progress.  How about you study History and Theology and do Biblical exegesis instead of believing the lies of those in power and being driven by fear of those different from you. Go on a study abroad or cross cultural mission trip to South America and learn to appreciate the customs of those who we deem as the "other."
Times they're changing remember. Promises promises promises parole parole paroles. C'est pourquoi ? Forget your promises and be realistic! Dear Mr President., 😳😔☕☕🏃wanna coffee? 😀
Keep the government shutdown. Build the wall. Clean the swamp!
There are lots do,sir. Stop wasting time on this and work hard to position your country back to the top
The brown people are coming!  The orange man says the brown people are bad. He tells me to be scared.  Scared is great.  I am orange.
And we the people know it! Build the wall! Demonrats biggest fear is the truth and the American people
You promised Mexico would pay for it.  You took full responsibility, nay, PRIDE, in shutting the government down.  Your lies aren't working.
You are so proud to shut down the country. Your words.
Stand your ground Mr. President! Millions of Deplorables are behind you!!!
Stopping you they don’t care about America!!!
You can fool some people sometimes, but you can’t fool all the people all of the time.
No, President Donald J. Trump, the "dims" will try to stop you at every turn...BECAUSE THE MAJORITY OF AMERICA LOVES YOU!  They can only succeed if the majority loves them!
You can fool some people sometimes, but you can’t fool all the people all of the time.
Your promise was and will forever be known that " We're going to build a Wall, a great wall!! Aaand MEXICO'S GOING GO PAY FOR IT"!!! Liar!
And in the end they will. when they are no longer coming into our great country. And costing us millions of dollars every year. And no longer killing our American people.
Dave Tuttle he will not get his wall, he will get money for border security. I think you should thank your lucky stars that a terrorist doesn't try to pull another 9/11 while our government is shutdown while a few hundred TSA saying "I don't care, I'm not getting paid!"!! When there is no incentive for their being present people care less!!
Dave Tuttle https://www.facebook.com/16810678/posts/10106299741773949/
Stopping you they don’t care about America!!!
French canadian here , and i would love to see a prime minister in canada like your president , america , but we got a Unicorn lover instead . Wow
Obama wanted a lot of good things an obstructionist GOP stopped.  Welcome to reality. Not tv
Bro, no one is stopping you from having mexico pay for the wall like you promised. I dunno what you're trippin about. Democrats say mexico should pay too lol, get it done then.
Fasten you seatbelts folks ,I seen a sign and that sign   reads ,stop the hate or you will be haltered .  Signed by God .
Mr. Pres. I have a great idea to solve this shutdown and stickier boot into the Democratic Party's mouth. Tell them that you will give them the hundred and $150 billion in foreign aid, And make sure they give you the $5.8 billion for the wall. Here's the deal breaker, but I think this might work. The $54 billion if they want to add to that foreign aid, and you should do this like on camera so the whole world can see, that that $54 billion will be spent at home here in America to take care of and fix the homeless problem. Damn I need to be in politics. Because not only the Republicans would be satisfied, the Democrats would be satisfied and now America would be satisfied that is both parties would be spending $54 billion to help solve the homeless issues. Damn I'm good. Let me know what you think Mr. Donald J. Trump !... let me know if you want me to come work for Sir . /Salute - Oh and I'm prior service too Mr. President =)
Coming soon: ……THE END OF THE ORANGE CLOWN ! ......... 🤡 🔚
Democrats are aimed at stopping you.  they don't care about the citizens of our country. They care about illegal aliens.
Dave Tuttle https://www.facebook.com/16810678/posts/10106299741773949/
Democrats are aimed at stopping you.  they don't care about the citizens of our country. They care about illegal aliens.
Linda Martin  Wow! You are ate plumb up with it.
Linda Martin unlike dems he will shoot straight. U appeasement folks that want everyone to be winners off some one else money are living in la la land. Maga
Donald J. Trump is the President of the United States of America, he is MY President, he is YOUR President, He is OUR President, you do not have to like it, but We The People do not want to hear your whining and crying, so put the pacifier in your mouth and have your mommy change your diaper because that is the only thing you can get changed, then get into your safe space in the fetal position for at least the next 6 years.
All border security is needed. Right now, most of it is shut down due to your Shut Down, that you claim you own. We all heard you. The 3rd shut down in less than a year.   How can you hire and keep the best and brightest, if you refuse to pay them? You're destroying our country.
Sorry they don't count. Only the democrats wants are taking  presidence over the needs of the American voters
Fox entertainment is just that! Try a different source!
The DumpTrump Controlled The House And The Senate For TWO YEARS! WHY DIDN'T THE REPUBLICANS GIVE HIM THE MONEY FOR THE WALL!!?? BECAUSE THEY DON'T WANT IT!! WHY WAIT TO FIGHT WITH THE DEMOCRATS?? Y'ALL BETTER WAKE UP!!
A poll on FB,asked  1) You want the wall hit <3  2) If you don't want the wall,hit 😡 After over 3,300 responses,they only got 2 😡 Only TWO LOL Yet,the liberal media tries to tell us more than half of Americans do NOT want the Wall. LIARS!!!!!
Opening the border so people can get paid and then discuss the issue with democrats. It’s not fair how we have to hold the Americans people hostage for this.
Which people? Trump is a manipulator. Don't be fooled. The wall is a scam. So us most everything Trump says or does. He's also a miscreant, a fraud, and lewd. Don't lose sight of these.
Linda Martin unlike dems he will shoot straight. U appeasement folks that want everyone to be winners off some one else money are living in la la land. Maga
Which people? Trump is a manipulator. Don't be fooled. The wall is a scam. So us most everything Trump says or does. He's also a miscreant, a fraud, and lewd. Don't lose sight of these.
Ben F. Gilbert  speak for yourself you dummy.
Build the Wall!
you gotta love people who delete there comments...lol
Opening the border so people can get paid and then discuss the issue with democrats. It’s not fair how we have to hold the Americans people hostage for this.
you gotta love people who delete there comments...lol
Just please reopen the government. Millions are in need of food stamps, military retirement pay and many more of pay checks. Please mr. President
Keep it shut Mr. President...the millions she talked about can get a real job in the private sector....surely they are not that incompetent that only government can offer them a job?
Edward Dennis Toppe shut up idiot
Ha Ha...thanks for the laugh....yep, all you can do is resort to name calling....you know I am right.
Build the Wall!
Why is our media arguing against the wall? They're supposed to be reporting on the pros and cons....not lobbying against our President enforcing OUR sovereignty!!! If the President is elected because he promised a wall...then of course he should do everything to build the wall.
We as a nation have been very blessed for a very long time. I can’t believe God would have us treat and talk about these people, many innocent and truly wanting a better life like your ancestors, the way Trump and others are doing. Hasn’t enough barbarism happened everywhere white peoples have settled? You’re not superior and God I think is teaching you that right now, especially Trump.
Those who supported walls, fences, barriers, etc. for the US-Mexican border BEFORE the current POTUS took office, but now have some hardliner's objection to it, also have a moral and political obligation to explain why they have changed their minds. If these partisan tools can't justify their reversal with REAL WORDS, then they should be ignored for disrespecting our intelligence.
Keep the government closed until the wall is completely built! Build the wall!
Ha Ha...thanks for the laugh....yep, all you can do is resort to name calling....you know I am right.
You looked at the TelePrompTer. You did not look the camera in the eye the way Presidents give Addresses to the People of the United States.  It was awkward, monotonous and numbers sounded very inflated.  You were told to make this address despite your better judgment.  It was weak, and left it to the Democrats for a solution.  Weak and very unpresidential on your part.  Open the Government. Set talks for border security.  You can do it immediately.  Congress will still try to find their zippers.
The same year that Trump's FCC Chairman Ajit Pai killed broadband privacy and cheated Network Neutrality to death, the Trump tax plan delivered a $20B windfall to AT&T -- both Trump and Pai claimed that the measures would stimulate the economy and trickle down to the rest of us.  Now, AT&T is saying thank you to America by prepping mass layoffs in ten of its operational hubs in New York, California, Texas, New Jersey, Washington State, Colorado, Georgia, Illinois, Missouri, and Washington, DC. They've also cut investment in broadband rollout.  https://motherboard.vice.com/en_us/article/nepxeg/atandt-preps-for-new-layoffs-despite-billions-in-tax-breaks-and-regulatory-favors
A wall would employee lots of people on a BS build, with drug trade being a billion dollar trade , I am sure they can come up with quick ways  to put holes in the wall.
There are real hard drug dealers. There are real terrorists. There are real cartels. Oil and drug cartels are puppet mastering our nation. It has to stop.
The corrupt CNN and MSNBC is colluding with the Democrats to spread lies and cheat the 🇺🇸 of the Wall boycott those crooks and imprison them
Build the God Damn Wall! You want to come in do it Legally! DACA Sucks!  BUILD THE DAMN WALL!
How is it possible the Liberals, Socialists, and Democrats do not want safety and security for American citizens?  More importantly, why in blazes would anyone vote to put these knuckleheads in office as elected officials allowing them to spread ....fertilizer to the entire planet.
Build the wall. Secure our borders. Keep America and Americans safe. President Trump you are the greatest President America has ever had. Please once again secure our borders.  Prayers for you President Trump.  May God always Bless you🙏
Im a Filipino residing in the Philippines. Your Pres Trump has political will. He will do what he promised even against all odds for the betterment of the American people.  Great leader. Deserving to be reelected.
BUILD THE WALL. TRUMP ALL THE WAY 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Millions of Sane Americans Stand With You. Whatever it takes to build the wall.
You are supposed to represent the people of this country. You are clearly incapable of that job, as you are oblivious to the fact that the majority of this country doesn’t want your wall!
PAPER TRAIL NEVER LIES!  HANG ON! IT'S ABOUT TO DROP LIKE A FART IN CHURCH!   https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
Yes, WE the people want more border security!  Democrats do not care about the American people!  Don't end the shutdown until the Democrats want to do the right thing and fund border security.  WE the people stand with YOU, Mr. President!
Subash Shrestha loves you, President Donald J. Trump
On 21st December Donald Trump tweeted  “With so much talk about the Wall, people are losing sight of the great job being done on our Southern Border by Border Patrol, ICE and our great Military. Remember the Caravans? Well, they didn’t get through and none are forming or on their way. Border is tight. Fake News silent!” So after being “tight” on 21st December  there is now a national emergency?
Americans do not want the wall. That is a mis statement.  Only a few want it, most think it is a scare tactic.    Try using an independent source not Fox.  You might get accurate and unbiased information if you made measured and thoughtful actions and statements
You will not overthrow the government of the United States of America tonight.
Only your 38 % raicist base want the border wall, as you Donald the CLOWN Trump would say "SAD "
Stand Firm President Donald J. Trump. ❤️
Maybe they haven't heard of them insurgents that have been pretty much going to war vs natives and Americans using guerrilla tactics. Trump is right, the terrorists are real homegrown or not, America and the reservations need better security and better laws.
How many people have a fence around your property? Why do you have a fence? Do you have locks on your doors? Why?  Take a moment and think about the question.
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
The wall is a monument to yourself. That's it.
The promise is, “Mexico will pay for the wall.” Keep your damn promise.
Vicki Oldham https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/2019/01/08/president-trumps-desperate-nonsensical-claim-that-mexico-is-paying-wall/
The wall is a monument to yourself. That's it.
Vicki Oldham https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/2019/01/08/president-trumps-desperate-nonsensical-claim-that-mexico-is-paying-wall/
Over stayed Visas is a bunch of bull.  50,000 a month cross through Texas, New Mexico, California and Arizona undetected every month.
And how in the hell would you know? Do you stand at the boarder and count?
John Decker, fake profile, fake account
Vicki Oldham  Child, that was campaign rhetoric.  You didn't expect Mexico to wtite a check did you? It appears that with the mess at their border because of the caravans, they are incurring some expense. We also have a new trade agreement with Mexico.
gofundme WeFund The Wall
Get it done, or shut it down. God bless you, Mr.President.
Thank you President Donald J. Trump!!
They Prefer Sending Money To The Foreign Countries For Obortions,Instead Of Keeping America safe.  Take There Pay And Hold It.
If they do the actual fact-checks; Trump has been fighting/stating the same for over 20 years about border security; its not “politics” to him…meanwhile Schumer and Pelosi have signed for the wall 16 times already… Who are the liars here? They need to stop this government shut down by getting to work like they’re paid to do and negotiate a compromise. Stop putting politics before the people.
BTW 👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Exactly!
John Decker, fake profile, fake account
Exactly!
They might but not what you’ve proposed. It’s not obstructionist when what’s being proposed is wrong and stupid
Marc Inghel yea it's a lot better to feed and give medical to the folks that have never paid a dime in taxes. What tv crock of bull
BTW 👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Marc Inghel yea it's a lot better to feed and give medical to the folks that have never paid a dime in taxes. What tv crock of bull
Look, have you ever in your life been to the Mexico border in any state that it’s shared? I have a couple of times. It’s just as dangerous as being in the woods and walking past a hungry bear before winter. Women are raped and their clothes are left on trees as trophies! You’re clueless! Hopefully trump builds his wall so when you get old and die your kids left behind have some protection! Protect our borders. Build a wall!
They might but not what you’ve proposed. It’s not obstructionist when what’s being proposed is wrong and stupid
Look, have you ever in your life been to the Mexico border in any state that it’s shared? I have a couple of times. It’s just as dangerous as being in the woods and walking past a hungry bear before winter. Women are raped and their clothes are left on trees as trophies! You’re clueless! Hopefully trump builds his wall so when you get old and die your kids left behind have some protection! Protect our borders. Build a wall!
Suck it up
You are playing the stupidest game with semantics.  Replace the term “border security” with wall and the statement is false.  You need to recognize we all want secure borders, your the dim wit that keeps making it about a wall
Stand strong most of the American people are on your side.
No but you lied that Mexico was going to pay for it,maybe you asking wrong folks to pay for your wall for border security.
Were with you President Trump
Look you lie a lot! Its to the point no one believes you anymore.
True
Stopping you
WALL IS COMING. GET READY. TRUMP HAS THE AUTHORITY. GAME OVER. ;)
Not even you wants a wall. Otherwise you would not have backed out of the funding compromise before Christmas. Enough to find the wall for 2 years. Shame.
Ever have the feeling you've been cheated?  https://www.justsecurity.org/62156/terrorists-southern-border-myth-reality/  Taken at face value, rhetoric from the White House and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) would lead Americans to believe that the United States is facing a terrorism crisis at our southern border. The picture being painted is one in which thousands of terrorists have been stopped crossing our southern border to infiltrate the Homeland. If that were true, that would indeed be a crisis.  In reality, no such crisis exists.  Our federal courthouses and prisons are not filled with terrorists we’ve captured at the border. There is no wave of terrorist operatives waiting to cross overland into the United States. It simply isn’t true. Anyone in authority using this argument to bolster support for building the wall or any other physical barrier along the southern border is most likely guilty of fear mongering and willfully misleading the American people.  Why do I know this? As Director of the National Counterterrorism Center (NCTC) from December 2014 until December 2017, it was my job to lead the government’s efforts to collect and analyze all available information about terrorist threats to the Homeland. It was my responsibility on behalf of the Intelligence Community to synthesize and present that terrorism picture to our most senior decision makers – up to and including the President of the United States — so that sound decisions could be made about how to protect the Homeland from terrorist attack.  Here is ground truth on this issue. Terrorist groups like al-Qa’ida and ISIS spend time talking about, brainstorming and even fantasizing about ways in which they can do harm to the United State. At times, those conversations have certainly included discussion of ways in which terrorist operatives might be inserted into the Homeland. But we also knew from intelligence reporting that terrorist groups have very high regard for our Homeland Security capabilities, including our border security. They know we had become a much “harder” target than at the time of 9/11 and that getting their operatives into the United States is an extremely challenging proposition. Cont-
BS
Let the president do his job protect America, build the wall protect our boarders. Americans want border security.
Build the wall just tell the cia to lower their coke prices
I think Republicans are smarter than Democrats these days, despite being of the left-wing persuasion. And before you think it's none of our business here in Europe, remember your country is quite important to all of us. God bless The President!
FOREIGNERS, that’s what's important to the Democrat cabal. Foreigners and the Democrat votes they will bring.   America and Americans first!  Build it!
Paper trail never lies! Supreme Court ruling today! Robert Mueller's money trail from Donald Trump to the Russians! Hold onto your hats and your Depends undergarments! That money Trail never lies honey never never never never never never never lies! This man that was on the brink of Ruin just a few years ago is suddenly back on top again just like his son-in-law and his son in laws family who were in debt over 500 million dollars and on the brink of bankruptcy but suddenly... Everybody's fat and happy since the election. Who could it be? Well it ain't Satan! But it's close! Vlad the Putin!
Whats more important to you, winning your next election or a wall because as it stands the longer this lock down goes on the less likely you are to be the face of America in 2020... which is something your poor little penis... sorry Ego would actually not be able to take. You'd be heckled as a failed president.
Stopping you
A BITTER WARNING TO THE AMERICAN MEDIA You are accomplices in murder if something ever happens to our President   WESTERN EUROPE AfD leader blames media smear campaign for ‘assassination attempt’ on state chairman  https://voiceofeurope.com/2019/01/afd-leader-blames-media-smear-campaign-for-assassination-attempt-on-state-chairman/?fbclid=IwAR1dZEvQ5_A_bBaxvKRNzyaH6N84llcUIFYEPXzwQBuDPLIdjnt1gZCtMAU#.XDUAo2ViSGd.facebook
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Con Man Trump addressing (LYING TO) the Country right now and has already lied by stating that the “wall” will pay for itself & blaming Congress for the shutdown.   https://m.huffpost.com/us/entry/us_5c34c016e4b01e2d51f79e62
So put money towards more ICE agents. better vetted and trained, creating jobs in the process.  Put more money into weapons and tools for border agents.  Put more money into tech for better surveillance and tracking.  Enact safer gun laws to protect our citizens from the real threat of Americans who use Ar-15's against our schools and public venues.  Be sensible, factual and actually do some good, instead of lying to the people you're supposed to protect.
We people can see what the democrats are doing.  They are using their personal opinions of the president, to make themselves appear more powerful, and try to damage his future and accomplishments.  It's not about what the democratic people want that should determine what happens to our money, alone. It is about what we the people want.  We  the people voted our president in office, because we see what he is capable of doing. Not to let the democrats stop the president in fulfilling his promises to us, the people. Seems to be some very disrespectful, devious, jealous and rude people in the democratic party towards our president. Democrats who think they are right to ridicule our president, are not right.   It doesn't matter, whether you like the way our president acts, behaves, walks, talks etc.. What matters is to stop holding the president back, from his potential talent. Just because you, are afraid to be hidden behind, and want to be heard, doesn't make your actions correct.  Show respect. Stop hindering our President progress... I have never seen such disrespect, towards any other president in all of my life, as I see with this president. We the people don't want our President to be disrespected.
expect to see TRUMP WORKING at his best tonight "LIKE A BULL IN A CHINA STORE"
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
Impeach
Trump: "Mexico's gonna pay for it!" US Taxpayers: "Then why are you trying to shake us down for the cash?" Trump: "The wall will pay for the wall! Something-something strongly negotiated trade deals, bigly!"
Whats more important to you, winning your next election or a wall because as it stands the longer this lock down goes on the less likely you are to be the face of America in 2020... which is something your poor little penis... sorry Ego would actually not be able to take. You'd be heckled as a failed president.
Yes!
Pelosi and Schumer looked like they saw a ghost. They sure are polished liars.  Haha.  And, of course, the mainstream media immediately began to spin what was said. This is better than WWE Rassling!
Hell yea!
Yep
Go trumpster
Nope
Trump: "Mexico's gonna pay for it!" US Taxpayers: "Then why are you trying to shake us down for the cash?" Trump: "The wall will pay for the wall! Something-something strongly negotiated trade deals, bigly!"
Yes we do.
Mjaye Benally why you litlle durp durp durp dur dur duuuuuurrrrrpppp!!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzzz!!!!!
Yes we do.
Yes  we do
YES WE DO!!!!
Resign!
Mueller
Stopping you.
JBTFW! ❤️🇺🇸
Wtf
Border
Mjaye Benally why you litlle durp durp durp dur dur duuuuuurrrrrpppp!!!! 🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝🐝buzzzzzzzzz!!!!!
Love you
Susan Urena could you hold your breath while you wait on that not-happening impeachment?
Susan Urena I have 3 college degrees you dumb twat
Love you
No.
Yes he is.
MAGA
Yes we do!!
To stop you
Go 45
Crazytown
Susan Urena I have 3 college degrees you dumb twat
MAGA 🇺🇸
Stopping you
Yes
Stopping you
Exactly!😊
Electric fence
🐷💩liar
Lies.
Yes we do!
Covfefe
Crazytown
Covfefe
Leung Freuy our God Emperor speaks
Yes that's correct.
Yes we do!
MAGA!
Yes
Trump-chan, please host meme review to save the internet from communism!
❤TRUMP❤
BUILD. THE. WALL.
Faux news.
Yes we do
Bullseye
Yes that's correct.
Exactly
LOL Bullsh#t
Yes
Yes
STAND!!!
Yes we do
Liar.
Bullseye
Yes, we do!
Never mind
Build it!
Liar.
Agreed!
Wow
Amen!
Absolutely
POS!
Just do it
False dichotomy.
Just do it
#USAinJO     #Whitehouse #FBI #Fox_News #ABC_News #CNN #Donald_J_Tramp #Speaker_ryan  Dear Mr, #JIM_BARNHART #US_Empassy_in_Jordan  Kindly take a look to my case and give me few minutes to explain my problem ..  As we are American company and we pay tax and our ID company is     EIN 35-2517909  DUNS: 004044035  My case is related to what is happening in Jordan with tobacco and cigarettes and it is in summary:  I entered container 40 feet of American cigarettes to Aqaba port and my goods had been stolen and someone put bricks instead of my cigarettes and I face many problems with the custom and till date nobody is helping me to solve it ..  We had talked to the Jordanian government about the problems faced by American companies in Jordan. I have encountered a problem with customs for two years.  1- The goods were sold according to official invoices and received a check in progress according to the custom in Jordan and export. 2 - The goods were cleared and loaded in containers 40 feet under customs supervision and a customs lead was placed. 3- The container was delivered to the customs team's patrol according to the duly written book. 4- The customs circular book was received from the customs office of Aqaba, which is subject to inspection of the lead by the competent examiner at the container port. 5- A description of the customs at the container port has been explained that the goods inside the container smoke are identical to the customs declaration inside the yards of the port. 6 - When reviewing the clearing company of the port of containers to pay the port fee did not find the container on the port system and was informed port for field research. 7 - The representative of the clearance company was informed that the container according to the cameras entered the port at 2:34 pm (note that according to the cameras entered the port the previous day at 11 pm). 8- The customs of the port have been asked to inspect the container on the fact by the commission .. Where bricks were found instead of cigarettes inside the container .. Based on what has been made it is quite clear that the responsibility lies between the Jordanian Customs and the Aqaba Container Terminal beyond any doubt.  Because of all the above I lose my money and I couldn't enroll my children at school or send them to State to study there.   I want a solution because we collapse because of this problem.  On the other hand , I can't pay to the bank mortgage and my house in Jordan at risk from the bank ..  I need from your highness to solve my problem so I can teach my children and pay for bank .  Your quick reply is appreciated.   Thank you for your time ,   Moe AL Hazzam MO Hazzam
Yes we do!!!
build it !
Build it
Right!
YES WE DO
Wall Now
Build it!
False dichotomy.
Yes we do!!
Agreed
I’m with Trump 🇺🇸
U GO SIR !
No wall.
So true
And now
Yes we do :)
Exactly!!  ❤️🚂🇺🇸
Build it!
Exactly!!  ❤️🚂🇺🇸
Build it!
Yes
I love you
Yes we do.
yes we do
💖Trump!
Stop Them
Yes we do.
Exactly!!  ❤️🚂🇺🇸
I agree.
No.
Liar
Keep #MAGA
Wall please
Maga!
We do
Build It!!!
Yes
MAGA!🙏🏼🇺🇸
Amen 🙏🏼
Stick to it
Mueller time! Hahahahaha
Get'r done
Yes we do
Boss
Cry baby
Yes
Build it
Get em sir
Good question.
Omg. This guy.
Sad.  Just sad.
More lies...
Build the wall!! 🇺🇸
Yes we do!
Cry baby
Yes we do!
Yes we do!!!
Fake  crisis.
Exactly
Build it
Yes we do!!
Build it!
Yes President
Yes we do!
Yes President
Melanie Snyder mine too girl ❤️❤️
Trump🇺🇸
Absolutely !!
Exactly
Right
Delusional!
Go man go!
Yes we do!
Looks like the People want the wall built. To hell with the Dems.
Melanie Snyder mine too girl ❤️❤️
Looks like the People want the wall built. To hell with the Dems.
Yes we do
Yup 👍🇺🇸
You are not working together with anyone. You are being a big baby. You are thumping around demanding something unreasonable and taking your toys going home if you don't get it kicking everyone on the way out. Insane. You need to put the people back to work and negotiate sensible border security.
Fire them!  Lol
Ousting you!
Propaganda
Build it!
Dam right
Gfy
Wow
Dave Miller hey your TDS is showing maybe you should take a dose of stfu.
Wow
Gfy
John Sgouros ...and they won’t come
Tell em sis
John Sgouros ...and they won’t come
Yes
Purely hate
Don’t cave
Amen!
LIAR!!!😡😡😡😡😡
Go kick there asses
A+
Yes we do!
Absolutely
Gfy
Amen
I know I do
Wrong Again
LIAR!!!😡😡😡😡😡
Absolutely!
No we don't
What
YES !
For you Mr. President.
Holy crap🤦‍♂️
Yes
I agree
Just.  Stopping.  You.
Our Border!
Wrong Again
Liar
Yes
Go Donald!!!
Amen!
W Trump.
Nope!
Amen.
Yes ..sir
Don't fold!
Our Border!
Don't fold!
Can we put Matt Hoffman on the side of the wall.
Never trust a liberal🤔🤯🤬
Talking about you!!!
I bet you are 🤔🤯
😂😂😂 no thanks, it’s liberal run.
What 🤷‍♀️🤷‍♀️
Yes ..sir
What 🤷‍♀️🤷‍♀️
Joel Stormo but, believe me, he promised we wouldn’t have to pay for it, or are we only counting partial promises? How’s that Obamacare replacement treating you?
😂😂😂 no thanks, it’s liberal run.
Mexico
Build it
Yes I do!!!
Yes we do
Do the.  best
Joel Stormo but, believe me, he promised we wouldn’t have to pay for it, or are we only counting partial promises? How’s that Obamacare replacement treating you?
Trump2020
WALL
No we dont
No wall!
Yes we do!!
Yep !!
Do the.  best
Yep !!
You lie.
Scott Williams Umm. . .say it loud: " Americans want A DIFFERENT PRESIDENT."
Yes we do!!
Absolutely!!
Exactly
F snoop dogg
BuildthseLl
Yes we do!
Yes we do
Scott Williams Umm. . .say it loud: " Americans want A DIFFERENT PRESIDENT."
Resign
Yes  we  do
Fascists
Amen!
Yes we do.
Gfy
Yes we do
Yes:: we want d wall;;
Yes, we do!
Your on fire 😆
Absolutely
Well said.
YES, we do.
Amen
Gfy
Ha
Exactly.
Build it!
I'm with ya
We do!
YES!
Trumps on. Turn your televisions and radios on and turn up the volume.
Amen
I agree
Trump2020!!
So true
Hold fast!!
Yes we do!!!
Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build it!
Yes we do
America First! #MAGA
Trumps on. Turn your televisions and radios on and turn up the volume.
Yes we do!
Obstruction!
Any president who is working to keep his campaign promises not only deserved to be appluaded, he deserve to be celebrated. Thumbs up president Trump for putting your people first.
Yes
Yes
Yes we do!
Yes ... we need it
Wall!
Resign
America First! #MAGA
Yes
Build it!
Yes sir
Build it !’
Yes we do.
Yes we do.
Yes we do!
Build it.
Ass
It is very true Quang Doan Duong, we need our security
Resign
Lies lies
Stoping you
Amen
Amen
U r 👉🐒
It is very true Quang Doan Duong, we need our security
Go trump
That right
Both
Lies
Your promise was to get mexico to pay for the wall, liar in chief 😏
Lies
Roman Abramovich....is a Russian billionaire with ties to Putin, a friend of trump, and co-owner of a number of steel mills in the US, and quite 'coincedentally', the only mills capable of producing the rail lengths necessary for the wall...and conveniently, there are no tariffs for the Russians. Starting to make any sense yet?
Go Trump!
Yes we do!
Exactly
U r 👉🐒
No we don’t
Yes we do!
😂😂😂😂 Ay3ka
yes we do
I dont care
Yes
Yes Sir ! ! !
Exactly
Do it Pres. Trump
MAGA 2020
Exactly!
Amen
Liar
Yes
Amen
Yes Sir ! ! !
Liar
No weeeeek dont
Mexico!!
Yes we do!
Yes we do
Yes we do
Yes.
Amen
Yes
Maga
Americans want border security; the majority (69%) just don’t think a wall is an effective way to do it.
Build it
YES we do!!!
Fake news
Stopping
Great Prez
Yes we do!!!
Yes!
Yes
Yes
Amen
There's far more important issues to deal with than building a fucking wall!
Lie baby
Yes we do!
Great speech!
Shut up.
Yes we do!!!
Build it!
Suck my ass!
Build it!
Amen!!
Build it
F'king Whack job!
yes
Yes
Gfy
Wow!
Gfy
Suck my ass!
GFY.
Both .
Yes we do
SAPPERS
SAPPERS
Merica 🇺🇸
Build it.
Yes we do!!
Gfy
Yes we do!!
Dick
MIRROR IMAGE SON?
Jill Travassos  you are a turd 💩
Build it.
Love you ❤️
Yup
Wall
Stoping you build the wall president trump the people stand with you🖖
whats more important to the republicans? bowing down to a dictator or having a president that actually listens and makes deals instead of throwing temper tantrums. Border security yes, opening up gov. yes, giving into a spoilt entitled brat that thinks he know everything better than everybody else including his generals NO. Collusion proven, election meddling proven, corruption proven..getting closer to swamp thang everyday. Indite, impeach and lock him up!
Build it!
Fox News
Jill Travassos  you are a turd 💩
Amen Bob !!!
Yes yes ye
YES, WE DO!
Don't cave!
I like
Get it passed
Thanks
No we dont.
BARF!
Fox News
YES WE DO
Yeah
Good
Now!
Yes
LIES!
BARF!
Build
Demorats don't care about this country they care about citizens of other countries and the kickbacks from the cartels.
Both
Hero
Amen
yes, i do!
LIES!
MAGA. 🇺🇸
Fake news
Distraction
Thank you
Yes
Yes
Ask those "numbers" to contribute to GoFundMe page for the wall.  Open the damn government!
yes, i do!
Stop calling them Democrats. They are no longer Democrats. They are Communists. Party first. Country last. Communism's core tenant.
The sad part about your comment is that it has nothing to do with what is best for the country. All that matters to you is getting your way at all cost. The facts don't support much of what you say. You lied to us about who would pay for the wall. You lied about carrying the mantle for the shutdown. You lied about being proud to shutdown the government, holding it hostage and putting 800,000 people out of work. Working together means give and take on both sides, and not everyone else should give and you just get to take.
Hold all the pay for those who don,t want the wall Release The Names Of All Who Used The slush fund. Make Them Pay it Back. More Cleaning Needs To be Done Mueller Belongs In jail with comey,rosenstein,Kelly holder,Rice Lynch,Schiff Clapper,Brannen Obama clintons And more. Get The Scun Out..
OPEN the portion of goverment that YOU are holding hostage!! What's wrong with you??? You are the one that said "I'll take the blame and NOT blame you Chuck!!!!!!! What's wrong with YOU?
If anyone wants to contribute to the education of the planets climate changes for future purposes, you can donate to the Magnetic Field Monitoring Centers, payable to Nna Emeka. Contact me. Magnetic Field Monitoring Centers hopeful to have been informative and wishing everyone well through the climate changes. https://m.facebook.com/story/graphql_permalink/?graphql_id=UzpfSTEwMDAwNjQ3NDY5NzgzMjoyOTI2NTg1Nzg0MjMzODgz
Uhhh.... your promise was Mexico would pay for it... you even wrote a written statement saying THEY WOULD PAY.  So you are stopping yourself because you made false proclamations.
NO WALL, NO FENCE, NO BARRIER AND NO MORE LIES. MUELLER WON A HUGE VICTORY TODAY IN THE US SUPREME COURT. YOUR DEFLECTION SPEECH WON'T STOP THE GAVEL OF JUSTICE THAT IS COMING DOWN ON YOU NOR THE TRAIN CALLED ROBERT SWAN MUELLER III. YOU'RE ONLY SO SMART AND YOUR LUCK ALWAYS RUNS OUT. IT'S OVER, DONNIE. #evilcackle #witchesdroppinglikeflies
You’ve had the Republican majority in the Congress and senate for two years.. you couldn’t get this passed when you had a majority of Republicans but it’s the Democrats fault? Stop the blame game, stop tweeting and yammering and try to pull the country together by being a role model and professional business man that you are supposed to be
Ask those "numbers" to contribute to GoFundMe page for the wall.  Open the damn government!
You’ve had the Republican majority in the Congress and senate for two years.. you couldn’t get this passed when you had a majority of Republicans but it’s the Democrats fault? Stop the blame game, stop tweeting and yammering and try to pull the country together by being a role model and professional business man that you are supposed to be
Retiring Border Chief says Trump wall is waste of time and money. https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trumps-border-wall-waste-time-money-retiring-border/story?id=44978156&cid=share_facebook_widget&fbclid=IwAR0pVc6X3cluWJSHyg0mMsRlizx7wwK2sTBt-0qPQuCl3_EUy_OqwVbqAegRetiring Border Chief Calls Trump's Wall a Waste of Time, Moneyabcnews.go.com
https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trumps-border-wall-waste-time-money-retiring-border/story?id=44978156&cid=share_facebook_widget&fbclid=IwAR0pVc6X3cluWJSHyg0mMsRlizx7wwK2sTBt-0qPQuCl3_EUy_OqwVbqAeg
NO WALL, NO FENCE, NO BARRIER AND NO MORE LIES. MUELLER WON A HUGE VICTORY TODAY IN THE US SUPREME COURT. YOUR DEFLECTION SPEECH WON'T STOP THE GAVEL OF JUSTICE THAT IS COMING DOWN ON YOU NOR THE TRAIN CALLED ROBERT SWAN MUELLER III. YOU'RE ONLY SO SMART AND YOUR LUCK ALWAYS RUNS OUT. IT'S OVER, DONNIE. #evilcackle #witchesdroppinglikeflies
Your campaign stunt is coming back to screw you. You never wanted a wall. You lied.
News is saying the wall ball is in Trumps court—- NO ITS IN THE DEMOCRATS COURT.  Dems are just standing there with their thumb in their ear.
Bullshit
support you
Agree
Lies already
Wall!
Pro Trump
https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trumps-border-wall-waste-time-money-retiring-border/story?id=44978156&cid=share_facebook_widget&fbclid=IwAR0pVc6X3cluWJSHyg0mMsRlizx7wwK2sTBt-0qPQuCl3_EUy_OqwVbqAeg
Pro Trump
Wall!
Trump 2020
Build it
Promise
WALL!
Build it!
Revolution
I agree 100%
Cacil
Natalie Harris Gilbert build the wall! Protect America! MAGA!
Cacil
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Jesus Weeps! Mike Pence, a “man” who states he is a devoted follower of Jesus Christ LIES to his fellow Americans concerning Southern Border & defends the LIES of Donald J Trump. HE IS NOT A MAN OF GOD!   https://www.google.com/amp/s/thinkprogress.org/pence-defends-trumps-lie-presidents-dont-support-border-wall-f71c1ad56e10/amp/Pence was asked about Trump’s blatant border wall lie during interview. It didn’t go well.thinkprogress.org
TROLL ALERT!!!
Drey Claude This is not a Trump issue. You must be 2 year's old. It's been a big issues since. President Reagan. Bush Clinton bush Obama all recognized it. Finally someone wants to fix it
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
I agree 100%
Working together!!! 💪
They are not interested in one thing or the other, they are concerned about their own skin. In other words, they will try to get you in the pan in every possible way. Even with the worst tricks and feints. Be assured. The snot lives and keeps trying to kill you. Flatten them before they do.
tttttttell
Hi
Amen
I'm from Germany and I know the meaning of a wall. Build the wall! Build the wall!! Away with the Deep State - every day of delay are innocent dead more.
ALL HAIL EMPEROR Donald J. Trump!
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
My eight year-old daughter, Gina Maria Theresa Rose Panella wrote a poem for you:   —Don’t be what you isn’t.  Just be what you is.  ‘Cause if you is what you isn’t, you isn’t what you is.—             Then she said, “Stand up to those bully Democrats President Trump.  You are so much smarter than them.” I got a feeling she watches Justice with Judge Jeanine.
Thank you Steve!
My eight year-old daughter, Gina Maria Theresa Rose Panella wrote a poem for you:   —Don’t be what you isn’t.  Just be what you is.  ‘Cause if you is what you isn’t, you isn’t what you is.—             Then she said, “Stand up to those bully Democrats President Trump.  You are so much smarter than them.” I got a feeling she watches Justice with Judge Jeanine.
Yea shutdown Sandra Cuevas
Go Pres. Trump. We aĺl know that you only want the best for your people.
To be secured , you need 2nd wall between Canada and the US ,fence America in like Israel !
Your promise, President Donald J. Trump, was to have Mexico pay for The Wall. Why are you stopping from fulfilling your promise?
We got your back President Donald J. Trump!
Thank you Steve!
Build the WALL!! America first!! Trump 2020!!!!
Do you feel like all the drugs that have been pouring into this country and all the gun runners crossing into America and the gangs that keep people from leaving their homes after dark speaks to being safe?  There was a day when parents were not fearful of the kids playing ball in the yard or walking to the corner store for a treat OR the ice cream man? Today children are not free to live like the days of yesterday because this is now the home of drugs evil and destruction.  It is a terrifying place for people.  We are no longer the home of the free.  We are not free.  We are slaves to our government and the other riff raff who do not belong any place but prison or sent to the place they ran from to bring terror and destruction to a place that was once proud and strong and clean.  If government would do the job we elected them to do without being the greed ravaged froup it has become America could be great again.  But the Lord will have to return to clean up the mess now.
Build the WALL!! America first!! Trump 2020!!!!
Do you feel like all the drugs that have been pouring into this country and all the gun runners crossing into America and the gangs that keep people from leaving their homes after dark speaks to being safe?  There was a day when parents were not fearful of the kids playing ball in the yard or walking to the corner store for a treat OR the ice cream man? Today children are not free to live like the days of yesterday because this is now the home of drugs evil and destruction.  It is a terrifying place for people.  We are no longer the home of the free.  We are not free.  We are slaves to our government and the other riff raff who do not belong any place but prison or sent to the place they ran from to bring terror and destruction to a place that was once proud and strong and clean.  If government would do the job we elected them to do without being the greed ravaged froup it has become America could be great again.  But the Lord will have to return to clean up the mess now.
The promise you made is Mexico would pay for the wall.  You are not keeping your promise.
Sue Schuster Aalykke durp durp durp dur dur  durrrrrrrrrrrppppp durp durp !!!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒 ooooohh ooooh ah ah !!!!
Sue Schuster Aalykke I prefer he not keep ANY promise regarding that wall. Border security does not equal a wall.
Ann Parish Harper I agree.  Mexico would rightly never pay for a border wall.  I was being sarcastic.You can see what I wrote on his facebook page tonight.
I QUESTION, HOW IS ALL THE DIVISION AND THE HATE AND FEAR MONGERING AND EVIL THOUGHTS AND ACTIONS MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN? IS THIS “THE LAND OF THE FREE AND THE HOME OF THE BRAVE”? GOD BLESS AMERICA? COULD GOD SOON BEGIN TO WONDER WHY? IS AMERICA BECOMING NO LONGER WORTHY? IS THE END NEAR? IT’S TIME TO CHANGE TO PLEASE GOD!
God don't mess with a son of a b****
Mexico will paid the wall? Trump need to pay taxes and pay the wall :)
ONLY THING THEY CARE TO DO IS STOP THAT WALL AT ANY COST! ... EVEN IF THE COST IS  THE DESTRUCTION OF AMERICA AS WE KNOW IT... LOOK AT THEIR ACTIONS...
Boarder security and a wall are two different things! You just want the wall because of your inflated ego...smh
Actually any of the polls I have seen recently say 56% of Americans DO NOT want the wall.  http://fortune.com/2018/12/12/trump-border-wall-poll/
No matter your political standing you must love and protect your country.  Just hating 1 man is not a good answer, grow up.
Ann Parish Harper I agree.  Mexico would rightly never pay for a border wall.  I was being sarcastic.You can see what I wrote on his facebook page tonight.
Your promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it.  Keep Your Promise.
You promise Mexico will pay the wall.
Azzahra Nur they will through Tariffs if it's even 1 to 2 percent that pays it back fast
Your promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it.  Keep Your Promise.
OVER 15,000 PEOPLE DIE FROM HEROIN EACH YEAR...THAT IS 327 PER WEEK!!  90% to 94% of heroin consumed in the United States COMES FROM MEXICO!!  70,000 AMERICANS DIED OF OVERDOSES IN 2017......58,220 AMERICANS DIED IN THE VIETNAM WAR!!  FIGURE THOSE OUT AND NO DOUBT WE NEED THAT STRONG WALL.
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
Trump is now pinning his near-term political future on his promise of a wall that would no longer be a wall, and that neither Mexico nor Congress is willing to pay for. All of this in the service of a campaign promise that never had broad public support in the first place. Trump supporters are a minority in this country, not "we the people".
Americans want you behind bars. The end.
Azzahra Nur they will through Tariffs if it's even 1 to 2 percent that pays it back fast
THE RUMP is the enemy of truth, justice and honesty and the enemy of REAL AMERICANS !!!
If Trump declares an "emergency" it just proves he's the biggest baby on the planet. There is no "emergency", you blubbering drama queen.
Use your emergency powers. Enough with the  communist enemy with in our own government  and their lying  propaganda  deep  state media arm. Expose them all. Talk straight and tell the whole truth.
The only thing needed to prove fake news is Hillary won oops wait a second
Millions of Liberal junkies don't want their drugs from Mexico to dry up and the cartels are known to buy politicians. The DNC Chuck Schumer Speaker Pelosi are on their side but really? http://thefederalist.com/2019/01/02/central-american-countries-helping-middle-easterners-illegally-enter-united-states/?utm_source=deployer&utm_medium=email&utm_campaign=newslink&utm_term=members&utm_content=20190108235300&fbclid=IwAR1TQUQfKVBqpC8Dj-PNbt8JpQvDxntJzuk661RvoerWnDyTFCCnElQIHQc … al Shabaab terrorists? #BuildTheWall
If you declare an emergency, when there IS NO EMERGENCY. that is ABUSE OF POWER.  More ammo to get you impeached, so go ahead.
We've needed a wall for a long long time and finally we have a Pres. that has the cajones to do something about it. That's why the Dems don't like him 'cause he can't be bought . This man loves this country so much that he gave up practically everything to protect our country. Close the borders till the Dems cave. The ball's in their court. MAGA 2020!
We've needed a wall for a long long time and finally we have a Pres. that has the cajones to do something about it. That's why the Dems don't like him 'cause he can't be bought . This man loves this country so much that he gave up practically everything to protect our country. Close the borders till the Dems cave. The ball's in their court. MAGA 2020!
Why don’t you change it to ports of entry.......your statistics don’t support a wall. Plus it’s ridiculous. Democrats are giving you hits, ports of entry.....
That's right trump! Stop the welfare for immigrants and free health care, they'll leave.  If they do work, They come here make money and send it back home. They are good for nothing
Americans want security, 70% don't want the wall. Pay attention Cadet Bonespurs. And your "promise' was do the doucebags in your base, not to the majority.
Ron Wissler then why is he still demanding it?
We are all sick and tired of these evil Dems President Trump !! Ct here !! Trump 2020!!!❤️🇺🇸 MAGA please !! Border security should be a priority !!
These Democrats are unbelievable!! They do not care about your safety!! I can hardly believe this BS they are telling and to belittle the president !! His main campaign was to secure our borders and we voted for him to do what he promised he said he would ... now the Dems want to say that , that is not what the American people want? WHAT?  Are you kidding me .... we would only want Legal immigrants to this country not ones who think they can just push and free load off us and expect us to change our laws.  Do you taxpayers want to pay for these illegals . The healthcare and housing , food etc that we would have to supply to them gives them handout that we Americans don’t even get!!  You either come her legally or stay out !!   BUILD THE WALL
It will cost us American taxpayers way more money than this dang wall will cost to build!! Unbelievable!!
We are all sick and tired of these evil Dems President Trump !! Ct here !! Trump 2020!!!❤️🇺🇸 MAGA please !! Border security should be a priority !!
My President is being Obstructed by Democrats from doing the job We The People overwhelmingly elected him to do. He promised us border security and protection, and we want OUR tax dollars used to erect “steel slats”, not brick walls like surrounds the Obama’s and Pelosi’s mansions, to name a few. If the Dems continue to obstruct the work of our President, maybe they should be paid by merit/hour? Something We The People should consider discussing to vote on for the next election!
Yes we do, and do do they! They do not want to give you success!!  Democrats say: see below quotes...  "Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make no progress." -Senator Chuck Schumer, 2009 "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented and unchecked." -Barack Obama, 2005 "I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to try to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders." -Hillary Clinton, 2008
It will cost us American taxpayers way more money than this dang wall will cost to build!! Unbelievable!!
Trump will be remembered as the greatest economical President of all time. Obama will be remembered as the transgender bathroom free cellphone food stamp president. Us Republicans haven't seen democrats so upset since we took away their slaves. The democrats are going down faster then Bill Clinton's pants in a Arkansas whore house.
Sheryl Helmich What's wrong with you!!!!😳😳😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Angie Glass-Finegan Great build it to keep Americans safe.
Liz Hall  I'm a DECENT American citizen, work, pay my bills, and educated!! I just don't agree with the method he's using to get what he wants. It can be accomplished thru other means without hurting so many people in the process. I'm not looking for a fight just stating my opinion, and it's my right!! I guess you weren't taught, "If you can't say something nice maybe you shouldn't say anything at all."
Liz Hall  REALLY?
Liz Hall  I'm awake! I never said he hasn't done good for America!! Re-read what I've said!!
Trump will be remembered as the greatest economical President of all time. Obama will be remembered as the transgender bathroom free cellphone food stamp president. Us Republicans haven't seen democrats so upset since we took away their slaves. The democrats are going down faster then Bill Clinton's pants in a Arkansas whore house.
Liz Hall  I'm awake! I never said he hasn't done good for America!! Re-read what I've said!!
I want to know , since when does anyone get to go on National tv and debate our President of the United States? WTH! I don't get it! Pelosi and Schumer have an under mining agenda. I don't know about you, but they are freaking scary. This would have never happened in any other presidency. I demand that Pelosi and Schumer should be removed from office!
so many parrots in here, lol
Rodney Martin Trump is more of a drama queen than the Kardashians, lol!
I want to know , since when does anyone get to go on National tv and debate our President of the United States? WTH! I don't get it! Pelosi and Schumer have an under mining agenda. I don't know about you, but they are freaking scary. This would have never happened in any other presidency. I demand that Pelosi and Schumer should be removed from office!
Rodney Martin Trump is more of a drama queen than the Kardashians, lol!
Irma Nava you're completely classless!
so many parrots in here, lol
Irma Nava you're completely classless!
THERE IS NO CRISIS..YOU ARE A STUPID IDIOT..CONGRESS PLEASE IMPEACH THIS MOTHERFUCKER
It’s really sickening the way MSM is covering the anticipated speech and saying it’s not going to be factual and there is no crisis.  Get all your facts out there — especially the fact that they are proposing money from our budget and tax dollars to build a wall in Tunisia.  The minuscule percentage of the budget that 5B is and the billions paid out every year in “social programs” for ILLEGALS, including the cost of sanctuary cities, prison, opioid epidemic, human trafficking etc.  There better be a comprehensive plan of immigration reform, e-verify, a census with the citizenship question on it, cleaned up voter rolls, a consistent election process in all states, etc.  Do Dems not want it nor see that you were elected because you promised this reform — it’s not a political promise it’s the job you promised to do.  And it’s what we voted for.  They offer no solutions, just opposition.  Design the wall based on what the border patrol tells you they want and need — not the Dems.
President Donald Trump is the best & he has made national security a priority. The liberals are only a stumbling block because he will build the wall. Trump for the win. #MAGA2020
You are correct President Trump.  It is 100% about keeping you from winning in 2020.  The Dem's hate America and are obsessed with power at levels unimagined in our nation's history.  Keep fighting, because we really have nothing left to do.  We love you and we love your beliefs.  We know your heart and we know that you are our last Hope.  If the dems win, the nation is doomed and we will be flooded with cancers disguised in human flesh that will be unbeatable. We will be poisoned till death as a nation.  Please keep fighting.  I am so glad that Lindsay Graham is on your side and he is willing to back the TRUTH. Keep fighting Mr. President we love you!
According to Nancy Pelosi's own speech, "only 2,500 ILLEGALS came across the boarder last week." According to her own speech about a week ago, each illegal "only costs the US Tax payers $70,000 a year." So lets break this down into "factual" numbers according to Ms. Pelosi. Those 2,500 illegals will costs the American Tax Payers $175,000,000.00 (that is 175 MILLION) in the next year. If the 2,500 is an average week then that is 130,000 a year in ILLEGALS. It will cost the American Tax payers over 9.1 BILLION DOLLARS a year to support them! This is only to feed, house, educate and give them health care. If any of them commit a crime and is arrested, then the figure goes up because then US Citizens PAY to DEFEND them! These figures come from the Nancy Pelosi's speeches to convince US Citizens that there is no crisis at the board. REALLY??? Democrats use them to SLAM Trump but neglect to give the full picture! Wake up America and BUILT THE WALL!
Donald Trump you will get the wall and a lot more.  And of course, Pelosi and Schumer will take credit for it.  Obama will say he orchestrated it back when he was just a freshman chimp.  But who cares, you're getting the wall.
I am certain it's to stop you from fulfilling another promise.  But, hopefully the Dems will grow up and realize that our nations future successes depend on building this wall. The American tax payer can not keep paying for housing and food for all of these illegal people. We already have enough homeless and hungry people to care for.
"Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make no progress." -Senator Chuck Schumer, 2009  "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented and unchecked." -Barack Obama, 2005  "I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to try to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders." -Hillary Clinton, 2008
ILLEGAL isn't a RACE..ITS CRIMINAL.  The people who claim its inhuman-where are they with American Vets? Homeless citizens? THIS Border Security is about trying to destroy Pres Trump..and to allow more illegals into the US... IRONICALLY the DEms want BACKGROUND CHECKS for US CItizens BUT not for illegals?? Besides increasing disease, crime, human traffiking, drugs AND hundreds of thousands of illegals without skills/education/money or the ability to be independent... and these illegals want to be on the welfare of American taxpayers-----CAN the DEMS give us reason WHY we should have open borders???
SHUTDOWN: O.K.  Again.  Let me try to explain the procedure again:  Let's say that Trump gives up on getting the wall funded. *stick with me*  Does that immediately end the shut down?  For the people who received an indoctrination instead of an education, the answer is NO.  The HOUSE needs to pass the bill *the CR*.  Then it goes to the SENATE for approval.  Once both the House and Senate pass the bill, THEN it goes to Trump.  If Trump signs off on it, the CR becomes law and the shut down is over.  If Trump doesn't sign off on it, the shut down continues. Then and ONLY THEN, it will be a Trump shut down. I know I lost most of the Democrats with this simple but TRUE example, but that's how it works.  NOW:  Explain HOW the shut down happened?  A bill *the CR with wall money* passed the HOUSE and went to the Senate.  The SENATE did NOT pass the bill because they need 60 votes and there aren't 60 Republican Senators.  So the bill *the CR* NEVER made it to Trump to sign or to veto, which means Trump DID NOT cause the shut down and IS NOT responsible for those who are not getting paid.  Trump is trying to find ways to GET THOSE PEOPLE PAID.  I know that I lost the rest of the Democrats who believe, despite the truth, facts and the legislative process, that Trump is responsible for the shut down. If people want to blame anyone for the government shut down, Blame Schumer and his sycophants in the Senate for shutting down the government and starving sick children and single mothers.
The Democrats don’t give a rats ass about the American people!! They just want to stop President Trump from for filling his word!! unlike that Traitor Obama!! It’s time we bring Obama to justice!!! Arrest And convict him of treason!!! And if the minorities want to riot in the streets. We got nationalguard to take care of that problem too!!
I'll keep posting it until these Democrats get it through their thick skull. Technically it's not "his" wall, It is America's wall. I'm not trying to offend you in any way. I'm just trying to explain that the government is designed so that before January the government sits a budget for agencies and proposed bills, the budget has to pass through both branches of government before it will become settled. Okay, since we get that our government is designed this way, many presidents before Trump has shut down the government. Including Bill Clinton twice (Full government shutdowns, not only a partial) & Obama (During 2013, to pass obamacare with even more funding and costs) which was a total disaster and we spent 2 billion dollars on a website for obamacare that still to this day doesn't work. He forced Healthcare down Americans throats or they could be jailed for not having it.Under Obamacare, you must have health insurance or pay a tax penalty. For 2017, the penalty is $695 per adult (up to a family maximum of $2,085), or 2.5% of household income, whichever is greater. HE FORCED IT DOWN OUR THROATS! FORCED IT! He added more debt to the U.S. government through obamacare than any bill in history and and caused the U.S. debt to raise exponentially more than every previous president COMBINED. I want to be clear, the Democrats supported a border wall and border security before 2015 when Donald Trump ran on this issue. They're actually videos of Hillary saying that she supported legislation to build a border-barrier across the southern border to stop illegal immigration. This plan however is being held up by the Democrats because they want to see Donald Trump fail and not get the wall. NOT BECAUSE OF THEIR RHETORIC of walls not working because every wall that has ever been built for illegal immigration including China's border wall built in 1960, helps stop illegal-immigration. In fact, 65% of the world is covered in borders. It's just the way that it works. The border wall that has been proposed by the Republicans requires 5.6 billion. That is 0.1% of the Budget that they have agreed to on funding the government which would have no affect to any Tax-payers because you wouldn't notice a 0.1% increase to the budget.Newly released research by the Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) done for the Department of Homeland Security indicates that 170,000 illegal immigrants crossed the border successfully without going through a port of entry in 2015. While a significant decline in crossings from a decade ago, it still means that there may be 1.7 million successful crossings in the next decade. If a wall stopped just 9 to 12 percent of these crossings it would pay for itself.DEMOCRATS: -Voted against Kate's Law -Voted to keep Sanctuary Cities -Voted to expand catch and release -Voted against increased vetting on refugees -Voted against legislation to remove gang members -Voted against the deportation of violent criminal aliens. -Voted against funding for a wall and increased border security. It wouldn't affect anything.For the one's who say that "walls don't work" & the ones who say that "We don't have an immigration problem in the United States." Yes, we do. (Yes I have prior knowledge of the Berlin Wall & why it was wrong, the Berlin Wall was constructed to keep people in instead of keeping them out) China has had a border wall next to Hong-Kong since 1960 to keep illegal-immigration under control. In 2015, Hungary built a border barrier on its border with Serbia and Croatia. The fence was constructed during the European migrant crisis. Attempted border entries have fallen since the barrier was constructed. During the month of September 2015 there was a total number of 136,296 migrant entries, and within the first two weeks of November the average daily number of intercepted migrants decreased to only 315, which is a reduction of more than 4,500 each day. Israel cut its illegal immigration rate by "99 percent" by constructing a 143-mile fence along its southern border from illegal immigration about 16-17 thousand apprehensions to only 18 people period, so if you tell me that border walls don't work I'm going to refer to the statistics until you can prove me otherwise
Arrest all alien enemy Invasion who voted here for espionage and apply the law that states no UnAmerican activity can serve in Congress Standing in front of a Foreign Flag with Pride is treason. You have the power use it Audit arrest espionage and send the military to census California. Your statement about needing Foreign Nationals pizzed a lot off USA kids were denied seats filled with Foreign Nationals... you promoted replacing us with them .
President Donald Trump is the best & he has made national security a priority. The liberals are only a stumbling block because he will build the wall. Trump for the win. #MAGA2020
Arrest all alien enemy Invasion who voted here for espionage and apply the law that states no UnAmerican activity can serve in Congress Standing in front of a Foreign Flag with Pride is treason. You have the power use it Audit arrest espionage and send the military to census California. Your statement about needing Foreign Nationals pizzed a lot off USA kids were denied seats filled with Foreign Nationals... you promoted replacing us with them .
So, you would rather the dems  give all the tax monies to illegals instead of to vets?? You aren't making any sense! Trump wants the wall so that illegals will stop bleeding us dry so that veterans get care FIRST instead of criminals
I'll keep posting it until these Democrats get it through their thick skull. Technically it's not "his" wall, It is America's wall. I'm not trying to offend you in any way. I'm just trying to explain that the government is designed so that before January the government sits a budget for agencies and proposed bills, the budget has to pass through both branches of government before it will become settled. Okay, since we get that our government is designed this way, many presidents before Trump has shut down the government. Including Bill Clinton twice (Full government shutdowns, not only a partial) & Obama (During 2013, to pass obamacare with even more funding and costs) which was a total disaster and we spent 2 billion dollars on a website for obamacare that still to this day doesn't work. He forced Healthcare down Americans throats or they could be jailed for not having it.Under Obamacare, you must have health insurance or pay a tax penalty. For 2017, the penalty is $695 per adult (up to a family maximum of $2,085), or 2.5% of household income, whichever is greater. HE FORCED IT DOWN OUR THROATS! FORCED IT! He added more debt to the U.S. government through obamacare than any bill in history and and caused the U.S. debt to raise exponentially more than every previous president COMBINED. I want to be clear, the Democrats supported a border wall and border security before 2015 when Donald Trump ran on this issue. They're actually videos of Hillary saying that she supported legislation to build a border-barrier across the southern border to stop illegal immigration. This plan however is being held up by the Democrats because they want to see Donald Trump fail and not get the wall. NOT BECAUSE OF THEIR RHETORIC of walls not working because every wall that has ever been built for illegal immigration including China's border wall built in 1960, helps stop illegal-immigration. In fact, 65% of the world is covered in borders. It's just the way that it works. The border wall that has been proposed by the Republicans requires 5.6 billion. That is 0.1% of the Budget that they have agreed to on funding the government which would have no affect to any Tax-payers because you wouldn't notice a 0.1% increase to the budget.Newly released research by the Institute for Defense Analyses (IDA) done for the Department of Homeland Security indicates that 170,000 illegal immigrants crossed the border successfully without going through a port of entry in 2015. While a significant decline in crossings from a decade ago, it still means that there may be 1.7 million successful crossings in the next decade. If a wall stopped just 9 to 12 percent of these crossings it would pay for itself.DEMOCRATS: -Voted against Kate's Law -Voted to keep Sanctuary Cities -Voted to expand catch and release -Voted against increased vetting on refugees -Voted against legislation to remove gang members -Voted against the deportation of violent criminal aliens. -Voted against funding for a wall and increased border security. It wouldn't affect anything.For the one's who say that "walls don't work" & the ones who say that "We don't have an immigration problem in the United States." Yes, we do. (Yes I have prior knowledge of the Berlin Wall & why it was wrong, the Berlin Wall was constructed to keep people in instead of keeping them out) China has had a border wall next to Hong-Kong since 1960 to keep illegal-immigration under control. In 2015, Hungary built a border barrier on its border with Serbia and Croatia. The fence was constructed during the European migrant crisis. Attempted border entries have fallen since the barrier was constructed. During the month of September 2015 there was a total number of 136,296 migrant entries, and within the first two weeks of November the average daily number of intercepted migrants decreased to only 315, which is a reduction of more than 4,500 each day. Israel cut its illegal immigration rate by "99 percent" by constructing a 143-mile fence along its southern border from illegal immigration about 16-17 thousand apprehensions to only 18 people period, so if you tell me that border walls don't work I'm going to refer to the statistics until you can prove me otherwise
So, you would rather the dems  give all the tax monies to illegals instead of to vets?? You aren't making any sense! Trump wants the wall so that illegals will stop bleeding us dry so that veterans get care FIRST instead of criminals
Glenn Lord Sr. My, my, you are such a strong believer in our Constitution, aren't you comrade?
And you are holding back vets much needed money over all this unnecessary nonsense! Shame on you! You know a lot of them need meds and counseling and rehabilitation and doctors and to pay for their and their families to have housing! You are heartless, cold blooded and selfish and on a very big ego trip and people are or will suffer. That’s not good! You’re not a good person.
And I am not your comrade or your friend, in fact you are part of the evil trying to turn our country into a communist state.
He mentioned how the Obama's have a wall around their house. Well that seems wise considering ALL Republicans are fucking psychopathic gun hungry want to be racists and killers.
And I am not your comrade or your friend, in fact you are part of the evil trying to turn our country into a communist state.
Build the wall.  It wont prevent illegal invaders totally but will significantly reduce their chances to get in.  We have been Promised a wall since Jimmy Carter but it has all been talk and no action.  The majority of Americans support you stay strong.
Yes Americans want Border Security Democrats want Border Security everyone wants it except you Donald Trump you want a wall. So what's more important your useless wall or putting Federal employees back to work because both Republicans and Democrats have pushed bills with Border Security funding and or Government Funding and you've said no because wall Funding was not written in. You own this shutdown you initiated it and now continuing it.
Children in flint no water companies in Florida dumping cancerous toxic waste at our back door killing everything causing salt water fish to be extinct by 2048, cost of living constantly goes up every month trump is in office as it is and going to be worse with this wall. So it makes exactly 0 sense to build it.
26 days Clinton shut down 16 days Obama in history of government shut downs only 3 times republicans controlled house  stay strong secure border stop all taxpayer funding to ALL illegals in country and get term limits with ban on lifetime benefits
They  don't care about America they just want to see failure. I stand with you Mr. President. We needs more border patrol, and ICE, we need the wall. The American people , the taxpayer can not bear the burden of paying for never ending caravans and all their needs.I'm not against immigration. But it must be done legally in a organized manner. Congress, Chuck and Nancy, the Dems .and the Luke warm Rep. Get busy do your job.
He mentioned how the Obama's have a wall around their house. Well that seems wise considering ALL Republicans are fucking psychopathic gun hungry want to be racists and killers.
They  don't care about America they just want to see failure. I stand with you Mr. President. We needs more border patrol, and ICE, we need the wall. The American people , the taxpayer can not bear the burden of paying for never ending caravans and all their needs.I'm not against immigration. But it must be done legally in a organized manner. Congress, Chuck and Nancy, the Dems .and the Luke warm Rep. Get busy do your job.
For two solid years Trump has had the White House and the Republicans have had control of both the Senate and the House.    In the two years that Republicans controlled it all they won a few very hard fought battles.   Democrats fought hard but were unable to stop Trump's Tax reform bill, Supreme Court Justice appointments, and Federal appointments.    Now Trump wants Americans to believe that the reason his wall has not been built is because the Democrats have stopped him.  He couldn't get enough support for his wall from his own party.   Now that the Democrats regained control of the House, Trump is using Federal Workers, Federal Contractors, farmers, the list goes on, and the most vulnerable among us as collateral damage while he throws a temper tantrum and shuts down the government with threats to not reopen it until he gets his way.   Prior to shutting down the government, Trump proudly stated on national TV that he would take the full credit for the shutdown and was proud to do it.   Now suddenly, none of this is his fault.  It's the fault of the Democrats who for two solid years were just trying to keep their heads above water because of the power and control Trump was wielding.   The success of the Democrats in the Mid-Terms are a testament that the American people overall are not happy with Trump's presidency.   One of the corner stones of Trump's campaign was to build the wall.   I'm personally old enough to remember when Mexico was going to pay for it.  :)   Trump is nervous about his bid for re-election.   He feels he has to get this wall up as a matter of his own political survival.   Shutting down the government is a serious issue.   Trump is using the government shutdown like an impetuous child.  He doesn't care who gets hurt.   He spews hate and fear to Americans rather than working with his own party as well as Democrats to come to an agreement on rational border security measures.   His is not the behavior of a rational person and most certainly is not acceptable for someone holding the position of President of the United States.   He is acting more like a terrorist than a president.    Disgusting.
Karen Harvey the pathetic one is Grump, a HUGE PATHOLOGICAL LIAR, AND PUSSY GRABBER PSYCHOPATH, WHY DONT YOU,, ALL HIS SUPPORTERS, AND HIM PAY FOR A WALL THAT HE PROMISED OVER A THOUSAND TIMES THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR??? NOW MILLIONS OF AMERICANS LIKE MYSELF SHOULD BEHELD HOSTAGE , WITH OUR TAX DOLLARS TO PAY FOR A FUCKING USELESS WALL THAT 75 PERCENT OF AMERICANS DONT WANT, AND DONT CARE FOR??  HE SAID THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT, WTF HAPPENED TO THAT LIE HUH??
I hope you bring up charges for treason against Nancy Pelosi Chuck Schumer Dick Durbin and anybody else that has boldly stood against the protection of America. All while they tried to pass a 54 billion dollar foreign aid Bill.
Karen Harvey the pathetic one is Grump, a HUGE PATHOLOGICAL LIAR, AND PUSSY GRABBER PSYCHOPATH, WHY DONT YOU,, ALL HIS SUPPORTERS, AND HIM PAY FOR A WALL THAT HE PROMISED OVER A THOUSAND TIMES THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR??? NOW MILLIONS OF AMERICANS LIKE MYSELF SHOULD BEHELD HOSTAGE , WITH OUR TAX DOLLARS TO PAY FOR A FUCKING USELESS WALL THAT 75 PERCENT OF AMERICANS DONT WANT, AND DONT CARE FOR??  HE SAID THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT, WTF HAPPENED TO THAT LIE HUH??
They all knew Chuck and Nancy did a crappy job on rebuttal, because they kept sending out more and more moronic Democrats to say something, Bernie, that drunk driver Beto from Texas, and the crazy Cortez chick all came forward. Then the professional liars in the corrupt media took over to tell us why Americans don't deserve protection, and why illegals should come ahead of US citizens. I watched none of it, I turned it off after the POTUS spoke but, but my daughter's twitter feed was on fire. Great job Mr President, stay strong, your voters are still with you.
The game is uncovered.. Bring more illegal immigrants to get more votes for the (democrats!!) . Build the wall .
Democrats  are also killing ILLINOIS,
When will the liberal voters realize these Democrats are as fake as plastic and could not give two Hoots about anyone but their own egos ...winning politically is all they care about... that means votes getting votes and getting more votes from the dead from the prisoners from the illegals more refugees more refugees more votes... Libs to all illegals: we will give you free housing free money free tax refunds free welfare free healthcare come to us all you who are burdened and we Democrats will do whatever we can to warehouse you in poverty crime and squaller all of you just vote for us ... and guess what the stupid lame & wimp Republicans won't speak up and stop us
I hope you bring up charges for treason against Nancy Pelosi Chuck Schumer Dick Durbin and anybody else that has boldly stood against the protection of America. All while they tried to pass a 54 billion dollar foreign aid Bill.
Build the wall and take pay away from the Dems while the govt is shut down
Split the country in half.  Democrats on one side Republicans on other.   Bet anything Dems will need our assistance. #changemymind
What i didnt understand of what the democrats are saying Pelosi and Schumer is ridiculous. The border needs to be secure. They are giving false facts. What's their answer to the killings by the illegal immigrants???? But Pelosi and Schumer don't care.
Maybe President Trump should just use all of the time on air playing the past Democrats views on the border and illegal immigrants.  Pelosi, Schumer, Obama, Clinton’s and Biden.  Then their air time would be trying to explain what has changed.
The Republican Congress came up with a budget in December that passed the Senate 100-0. Trump agreed to it at first, but then backed away because Sean Hannity, Ann Coulter, and a few other right-wing media activists told him not to sign it because they didn't like that it did not address his wall - it had prior been suggested that border security and the wall be looked at with separate funding. When Trump backed out, he took responsibility for the shutdown. He even said so publically on television. So to deny that Trump is solely and utterly responsible for this is outright delusional and a perversion of the facts.
"Illegal Immigrants" are not immigrants, they are invaders. Immigration is a legal process. A stand against the wall, is a stand against the Constitution they took an oath to support and defend:   U.S. Constitution - Article 4 Section 4 - The U.S. Constitution Section 4 - Republican Government. The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature cannot be convened) against domestic Violence.
Build the wall.. And id love to throw Polosi and Chucks ass over it! Democratic Party is a bunch of idiots.
In the 80's, and probably today, as well, I'm sure California would know. We have two air-force bases, numerous National guards, several hundred ballistic Nuclear missiles, the shortest distance to the major cities in Russia, a dam, that if leveled by them, with 600 feet of water behind it would level every dam down the entire Missouri river system, possibly stopping near St. Louis. Sometimes I don't care what those stupid liberals in California want. North and South Dakota had to live through the "Cold War" very differently than they did, We would have been the first place hit in an all out nuclear war. But, it made us tough. I don't think California would want to mess with North Dakota. Who gives a crap about money. We got plenty here in this state, a surplus. How you doing California? Also, the Government shut-down, and the China negotiations, are actually having no effect on us here. We got plenty of grain bins. Please understand President Trump's point of view. Short term tough times, for our future generations. This isn't about him, or even me, and he knows that. It is about our kids and grand kids, long after I am gone.California, go fight for yourself. I as a North Dakota guy would fight for my neighbor, but I am done fighting for your twisted politicians.
It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I suggest that if you aren't vigorously fighting other forms of wasteful spending as hard as you are this, you simply are speaking out for one reason. You hate Donald Trump.  So what is the harm if we over protect our border? What if it slows the flow of illegal drugs just enough to save a few lives. I know my family has lost a couple young men to drugs over the last couple years that maybe would still be here if it wasn't so easily accessible.   What if it keeps just a few murderers out of our country. Isn't it worth it? Haven't we wasted money on worse things than this?  Are you so petty that you would oppose this out of spite while not opposing the other billions we waste or the $50 billion a year we just give away to other countries?  It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I bet most of you never fought so hard for such a small percentage of the budget.... until Donald Trump became your president.  Seems pretty obvious to me what your motives are!
Congress will not listen anyway so we need to start looking into that problem as America is tired of the silly things going on.  Build the dam or wall and let President of the USA finish a job that should have been done 30 years ago.
Can you tell Nancy Pelosi our values are American lives.  Can you tell Schumer American lives are the most Nobel cause and worth every expense. And tell the Democrats to stop lying saying they  want border security The American people are not stupid because their actions do not match their words.
It’s pretty obvious to anyone who isn’t a complete idiot that they will do anything to keep you from doing things that you promised to do, because they all know as mostly “career” politicians, that you are only supposed to tell people what you think they want to hear, and never actually carry out anything that would actually HELP your consistency. And, you also should talk out both sides of your mouth and change your position on a given issue any time that the wind changes direction! And, like Obamacare, (said Speaker Pelosi) “You have to pass a bill first in order to see what’s in it!” And, like John Kerry, sometimes you can be “for something before you are against it.” They are all scum-sucking SWAMP CREATURES! Build The Wall!
President Trump: It’s time to order the arrest and deportation of undocumented DACA and illegal immigrants simultaneously and immediately in all sanctuary cities. So, Democrats will have no way but to give the border wall funds not only $5.6B but for  $25B in exchange of DACA temporary stay pending the passing of comprehensive immigration law. Americans are waiting for your iron fists and we will be supporting you to exercise your emergency power to utilize existing military defense funds if border walll funding bill failed at the Senate and thereby, strongly execute immediate arrest and deportation undertakings  for the protection, security and safety of the American families and children.
I thinks it’s funny how people are bitching about this government shutdown when Obama did the exact same thing for freaking Obamacare.  At least a border would help keep criminals, drugs and illegal immigrants out our country.
And the United States needs a wall
They disagree with you Pelosi and her crew.  You are right in what you said.  Let them open their gatesst their homes  or let them go for a jog in New York or California by themselves with no security or even. Mlm their family.  Lets see how many illegals may hurt or kill them.  I as an Anerican born and raised here want a wall.  Put all our tax dollars to use in our country not given out freely to other countries.   Stay strong please.   Don't give in please.  I want my grandkids to live in a better America. And you are the one to do it.
Wish, we could have you in Europe. You're the best leader entire planet. Drain the swamp in Europe too, please POTUS 😍
This is the Chuck Schumer Shutdown, Schumer is like a little spoiled brat! Chuck talks out of both sides of his mouth! Schumer, Obama, and Hillary all have said they want a wall but today if they would give money for a wall, it would be a win for the President! They don’t want the President to win bottom line! I want the wall!
In the 80's, and probably today, as well, I'm sure California would know. We have two air-force bases, numerous National guards, several hundred ballistic Nuclear missiles, the shortest distance to the major cities in Russia, a dam, that if leveled by them, with 600 feet of water behind it would level every dam down the entire Missouri river system, possibly stopping near St. Louis. Sometimes I don't care what those stupid liberals in California want. North and South Dakota had to live through the "Cold War" very differently than they did, We would have been the first place hit in an all out nuclear war. But, it made us tough. I don't think California would want to mess with North Dakota. Who gives a crap about money. We got plenty here in this state, a surplus. How you doing California? Also, the Government shut-down, and the China negotiations, are actually having no effect on us here. We got plenty of grain bins. Please understand President Trump's point of view. Short term tough times, for our future generations. This isn't about him, or even me, and he knows that. It is about our kids and grand kids, long after I am gone.California, go fight for yourself. I as a North Dakota guy would fight for my neighbor, but I am done fighting for your twisted politicians.
@SpeakerPelosi The Democrats are not just calling the president a liar they are calling DHS Liars border agents Liars ice agents Liars American people Liars they won't even listen to these people all of these people should sue their employer fornot making their jobsafe timestrike
They'll do anything to obstruct. Build the wall and tear down the Democratic Party. MAGA
Build the wall don't give in to those low life liberal thugs that put every thing and every illegal above America and our citzens. Stick to your base we elected you to drain the swamp.
My last words your is the worst president ever United States of America you worse than bush I cannot depend on you no more never did New York City we all know you for the crap but I guess is what it is the worst president ever in the United States in America
Yes, we need border security.  Thank you President Trump for fighting.  Stay strong!  We need a barrier & immigration reform.  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 Democrats continue to show that they don’t really care about the American citizens- only illegal immigrants & their own power.
Let the working people get their paychecks and the poor people get their food stamps! Stop Congress paychecks and the senate paychecks. But all of us that weren’t born with a silver spoon in our mouth might need to feed our children!
Send all the immigrants to California. It will wake them up
Nancy pelosi. Headed off the cliff and trying to take us with her. She headed to the devil pit
I don't know how you do this job for free to take care of a country where so many people bitch and complain!! I would've quit a long time ago and let them get screwed! You are AMAZING!
They do not want to w9rk with Trump.  They never wanted a wall or more secure boarder.   SHAME ON OUR SENATE AND CONGRESS
Soon u build the dam wall they gonna build damn tunnels to still come thru to the United States
Time to remove Pelosi and Schumer
F Mexico. Don't want those peasants to pay. The American....true Americans will pay.
The Dems have proved what they want, Socialism to take this Country down.  How disgusting for them not to be American enough to want to do what is best for it.  Just like NY Gov and Ca,  govs wanting to give illegals free medical, while we taxpayers foot the bill.  That's not even crazy, it's downright evil.
Mr. President, do not falter or sway (not that you would). You have been so good for our country.  This Democratic Party has ulterior motives... to keep our nation divided. There’s gotta be a way, a law, a loophole to start getting these treasonous people off capital hill and out of our government.  How can people who do not protect US citizens hold any political office?
I want to puke whenever I see these childish so called democratic leaders screwing up the country I fought for! Now Wisconsin doesn’t have a governer! That skinny little weasel screwed us all the first day in! We should all have to pass an SAT test before we can vote! Of course that is set up by teachers so forget that idea! Oh boy am I screwed!!
The Border Wall is a very Important part of the Security, Protection and Safety Of our Country and our Citizens and the Far Left Liberal Democrats were for it when Obama was in office but they are now against it because they Hate Trump!! What a bunch of Hypocrites these People are!!! They are all about themselves and Power hunger and don’t give a rip about the Security, Protection and Safety Of our Country!! They have made their millions and billions of dollars and some have become wealthy from and in America but they don’t want to give back and do what’s Good and Right for America!! We are seeing the true characters and who these Far Left Liberal Democrats are And how they are using America for their profits and catering to Illegals and outsiders!!! Unite and Prepare ourselves for Trump 2020 and Stand Up for Our Country and be Bold to Keep Our Country and our Values!!! Pray for Our President and All the People in His Administration And also for Our Country!!  Lina
Here's my suggestion, place robocop out there he can secure the border. Well shoot all the intruders, use your drones blow them up, use your anti-personal & tank mines. Electrocute them thru fences or walls whatever you plan to build out there. Airstrike em use your gunships, attack helicopters. Place the fear of God into them and what the people are all about blowing sh*t up and shooting all intruders that try to enter without proper documentation. Well its all an inside job you and your admin say people this, people that, its all inside and already orchorestrated long ago and planned ahead of time what things need to be done. Dont forget us natives to this land here up in Alaska, we need structure and much help, stop letting the federal gov dictate our way of living up here in the great State of Alaska. We need to hunt, fish, eat, and work just like everyone else in the lower 48. We aint rich like you, if your too rich to earn your wage and decline your wages as president give your wages to me. I will be.
Nancy pelosi. Headed off the cliff and trying to take us with her. She headed to the devil pit
Bad news for Liberals I found out through my sources that..... Nancy Pelosi is an illegal Immigrant
Dear President Trump,  To get the funds to build the wall cut all of the exorbent benefits that the Senate and Congress are given. Let them find their own insurance and pay what we the people have to. We scrimp and pay and can barley survive on what we make.  Let them give up their tax breaks, insurance, take a huge pay cut, this way they can actually see what the American people are dealing with. You sir, are already setting a grand example with taking no wage. We appreciate the fact that you have done this.  There are to many senators and congressmen and women who have made millions off of the American people.  Sir, it has been awhile since we have had a person in the Oval Office who actually loves our Country. The things that they are proposing to do will not help the border Patrol any. We need the wall.  Better yet, make the ones who are protesting the wall live in border towns without their walls and security. Make them live in the neighborhoods who are turned upside down from drugs and gangs. The Congress and Senate live in a fantasy land they need a real dose of reality.  Strip it all away, make them live as we the people live.Let them live with the reality of their idiotic bills and laws they make. Let them walk in the shoes of our law enforcement, soldiers, border patrol agents etc.shoes. Hit them where it hurts, like they do us.   President Trump,  My husband and I stand beside you and what your trying to do.  Keep up the good work.  Cheriee
As the House of Representatives welcomes its first two Muslim congresswomen, Texas Republicans will vote on Thursday over whether to remove Tarrant County Republican party vice-chair Shahid Shafi from his seat because he identifies as a Muslim-American.  The vote comes after some members of the county party put forth a motion to remove Shafi, a Republican trauma surgeon and Southlake City councilman, from his position due to his Islamic beliefs.  Dorrie O’Brien, a precinct chair, expressed fear that Shafi would uphold Islamic law over the U.S. constitution and that he might be related “to Islamic terror groups.”  Bunch of racists
I definitely hate DemocRats/Liberals/Socialists. Got to do something about these idiots!
We want more than that Mr. President, we want the swamp criminals in DC that have been selling our country out all these years to be prosecuted and incarcerated!
Build the wall or keep the government shut down stop pay for senate and house redirect those wages to pay federal workers.
Build the Wall!  Send the Democrats there to see it for themselves but probably won’t change their small minds. They like illegal aliens, drugs, child endangerment and human trafficking and future democratic voters. Stand strong President Trump and God Bless you and America. 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Here's my suggestion, place robocop out there he can secure the border. Well shoot all the intruders, use your drones blow them up, use your anti-personal & tank mines. Electrocute them thru fences or walls whatever you plan to build out there. Airstrike em use your gunships, attack helicopters. Place the fear of God into them and what the people are all about blowing sh*t up and shooting all intruders that try to enter without proper documentation. Well its all an inside job you and your admin say people this, people that, its all inside and already orchorestrated long ago and planned ahead of time what things need to be done. Dont forget us natives to this land here up in Alaska, we need structure and much help, stop letting the federal gov dictate our way of living up here in the great State of Alaska. We need to hunt, fish, eat, and work just like everyone else in the lower 48. We aint rich like you, if your too rich to earn your wage and decline your wages as president give your wages to me. I will be.
Duh stopping you from lying to the gullible American people. You lie so much that they have live fact checkers listening to the lies that come out your mouth. Mexico not paying for the wall, coal industry is evaporating quicker than it did when Obama was president 4000 terrorist lie was debunked immediately, all the living president said they never spoke to you about a wall you claim they did, the wall is going to be made out of concrete,steel, fence,gate,cotton,paper etc.the Democrats need to talk to that doctor that claim mentally your sane lying to the American people should not be allowed every lie will get debunked with facts
Curtis Burke a lot of them actually do belong there.
CURTIS. AMEN!
Duh stopping you from lying to the gullible American people. You lie so much that they have live fact checkers listening to the lies that come out your mouth. Mexico not paying for the wall, coal industry is evaporating quicker than it did when Obama was president 4000 terrorist lie was debunked immediately, all the living president said they never spoke to you about a wall you claim they did, the wall is going to be made out of concrete,steel, fence,gate,cotton,paper etc.the Democrats need to talk to that doctor that claim mentally your sane lying to the American people should not be allowed every lie will get debunked with facts
Build the wall and put Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer on the other side.
LOL All the Dems got is shutdown! They don't even talk about the American people that were killed, raped, and beaten by illegals. They don't even tell you about the walls around their own home or how they wanted the walls before Trump got in office. Dems need to get out of this country!
Yes; we do want border security. The Dems who won’t support Donald Trump are all about hatred. They prove repeatedly they don’t care about US Citizen safety. They are protected with armed body guards daily,  homes with walls, and videos showing their support of a border wall during past administrations. They are lying hypocrites putting our country in greater risk each and every day. They are so afraid if they agree to fund the wall that Trump will be re-elected in 2020. They are willing to risk our lives with another 9/11 or worse!! We are talking about “illegal” immigrants here; “illegal” being the operative word! If some disastrous incident occurs, it’s all on you Democrat’s and your blatant political anger. You’ll never have a Democratic President in the future if you don’t protect this country, because we won’t forget who was really responsible for any terrorists acts!!!!
Border security, safety, for the U.S., the citizens is a must.  We have been promised a barrier for 3 decades, promised Comprehensive Immigration Reform only to see it die, ignored, dismantled before our eyes.  The economy can not tolerate the drain, expense of the vast population of illegals.  We do not have enough Border Patrol agents with the necessary tools to adequately to protect our Nation.  In 2017 63% of illegals were on Welfare.
I did not vote for the current President, but I do see the need for building a wall.  Immigrants years ago came through Ellis Island and were “checked out” both medically and for any criminal record.  Why do people think we should just let anyone into the country and not check them out first.  We have enough crooks in our country as it is (especially in Washington DC).   I am sure drug cartels have paid out millions in bribe money to keep our borders open.
I think if you can’t get the Dems to budge on the wall you should bus all the illegals trying to enter Texas to California on a regular basis.   See how much they can put up with before they start back egging for the Southern border wall. They want them, they can take care of them. Texas wants the wall....
I am not a US citizen and don’t live in US. Trump is the best president ever. But all democratic supporters are fool. This president wants to do so many things for his citizens, but they just don’t wanna see it. They are just too brain washed by their politicians.
CURTIS. AMEN!
I am not a US citizen and don’t live in US. Trump is the best president ever. But all democratic supporters are fool. This president wants to do so many things for his citizens, but they just don’t wanna see it. They are just too brain washed by their politicians.
I don't understand what the issue with the wall is, it's a win win scenario… we create construction jobs while it's being built, dissuade illegal immigration and by doing so help raise the wages of normal American people, because ANY supply of people who are willing to work for less than the average American will bring the wages down… so what if produce has to get a bit more expensive if we don't have to deal with the other negatives that come with illegal immigration: crime, drugs, etc.
As he offers alternatives and negotiates, the dems shut it down. No compromise from those scum, they deserve no respect. Btw Nancy Pelosi should be asking for the wall in San Diego to be torn down.
Democrats are only in office because of illegal immigrants voting for them
I read this post about the bird feeders and while I totally agree with it I felt it's missing an analogy to support the wall. So let me add the proper anology and explain the need for the wall. (added to end of bird feeder story)  (copied and pasted)-----> I bought a bird feeder. I hung it on my back porch and filled it with seed. What a beauty of a bird feeder it was, as I filled it lovingly with seed. Within a week we had hundreds of birds taking advantage of the continuous flow of free and easily accessible food.  But then the birds started building nests in the boards of the patio, above the table, and next to the barbecue.   Then came the crap. It was everywhere: on the patio tile, the chairs, the table ... everywhere!  Then some of the birds turned mean. They would dive bomb me and try to peck me even though I had fed them out of my own pocket.  And others birds were boisterous and loud. They sat on the feeder and squawked and screamed at all hours of the day and night and demanded that I fill it when it got low on food.  After a while, I couldn't even sit on my own back porch anymore. So I took down the bird feeder and in three days the birds were gone. I cleaned up their mess and took down the many nests they had built all over the patio.  Soon, the back yard was like it used to be ..... quiet, serene.... and no one demanding their rights to a free meal.  Now let's see...... Our government gives out free food, subsidized housing, free medical care and free education, and allows anyone born here to be an automatic citizen.  Then the illegals came by the tens of thousands. Suddenly our taxes went up to pay for free services; small apartments are housing 5 families; you have to wait 6 hours to be seen by an emergency room doctor; Your child's second grade class is behind other schools because over half the class doesn't speak English.  Corn Flakes now come in a bilingual box; I have to 'press one ' to hear my bank talk to me in English, and people waving flags other than ”ours” are squawking and screaming in the streets, demanding more rights and free liberties.  Just my opinion, but maybe it's time for the government to take down the bird feeder.  If you agree, pass it on; if not, just continue cleaning up the crap!!  (Added analogy)  ......while it appeared all was back to normal I soon realized I had another issue on my hands. With the birds busy coming in droves to my feeders my attention was focused on them and not on the ants that were sneaking in unnoticed seemingly right beneath my feet. Taking advantage of the mess being left behind by the birds. Some of the ants had made permanent homes in and around my porch. While others simply came and went unnoticed taking what they wanted back to there own home.      When I got rid of the feeders everything seemed peaceful. But that was not to be the case. Wasn't long and without the distraction of the birds I began to see the ants. I went to the hardware store and got aunt traps to put up where I could see them coming from. They would fill up almost immediately but the rest of the ants would just re-route themselves and continue coming. They had found other resources to feed on inside my house and soon I had ants in my Crawlspace where I couldn't see them. But they would appear on my counters, in my trash can, in my cupboards. It was out of control. My daughter was petrified, she tiptoed around the house in fear. Me and my wife would try to comfort her and race to her screams. I tried to get them under control but no matter what I tried the ants just came and came.      Then one night my daughter woke us with a scream. It seemed a red ant colony had built a nest in my house as well. I had been annoyed with the other ants, I had even decided that spending a few bucks everyday to try and fight back was better than spending alot more hiring an exterminator. But these red aunt's were vicious. They were very aggressive and very mean. They had attacked my daughter while she was sleeping and had swarmed and bitten her all over her body.      I had had enough...I realized then that something had to be done. This was no longer just a nuisance, it was threatening my family's health and well being. I knew it was time to call an exterminator even if it would cause me to pull from my savings. It was my responsibility to make our home safe for my family.     The next day I called the exterminator. He explained to me he would need to first put up a barrier to stop the ants from coming in. That was the first step of a long process. He would use a special spray that would form a barrier the ants could not cross. He then would search in every dark space in my home to find the ants nests and exterminate them.      He then explained how much it would cost. I sat with my wife and discussed the proposal. We both agreed that it was going to be a burden financially at first. But that in time we would be able to rebuild our nest egg in savings. That in doing this we would save money in the long run by not having to put money out daily to battle the ant problem. We knew we would have to pay a little annually to have the exterminator maintain the barrier but it would be much less than the initial cost and something we could budget in and make doable. Ultimately we agreed that our daughters safety was paramount and chose to pay.     It's been a few years now and every once in a while we do still see an ant here or there. We have no idea where they get in, but when we find them we kill them and we call our exterminator and he imidiately comes to check on the situation and spray where needed.      My daughter runs and plays throughout the house now no longer worrying about about the ants. She sleeps peacefully at night. I wish I had called the exterminator sooner, my daughter should have never had to be hurt for me to come to that decision.
I heard California,and New York said they will pay for all including illegals health care,🤔 On who’s money taxpayers.....hell no let the wealthy elites pay since they want them here ,like sanctuary cities,celebrities for cheep labor ,and wealthy elites,and business people to pay as little as possible for the cleanup of their mansion and democrats to get their votes to gain power .......STAND UNITED TOGETHER AND WE WILL WIN...... WWG1WGA ✝️👍🏻🇺🇸
The last 4 letters in American and republican are I can. The last 4 letters in democrats is rats.
We always wanted safer borders. Most Americans didn’t realize what a wreck the wall was till Obama started letting them pour in to the US. Our Government doesn’t tell us a lot and I am glad Trump is the first President that cares about Americans and wants to fix this issue that has needed fixed since 1986. Finally have someone wanting to not pass the buck. And for Democrats to cry it’s immoral is laughable. Any Civilizations have had Walls. Many countries now have same walls or better. Look at Israel’s and it’s working look at their statistics.
WE want a wall it's our family's affected by illegal not your's you all have a wall around your house
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
We are tired of these criminal rat lines crossing our border ... drugs, human trafficking, gang members, criminals ... it has cost America and Americans greatly ... It is time to stop the flow ... so many women and children are at risk ... investigate the orgs who sponsor all this chaos ... hold them accountable ...
We are tired of these criminal rat lines crossing our border ... drugs, human trafficking, gang members, criminals ... it has cost America and Americans greatly ... It is time to stop the flow ... so many women and children are at risk ... investigate the orgs who sponsor all this chaos ... hold them accountable ...
The MAJORITY of the American people DON`T want your stupid and pointless wall. YOU Egomaniac want it.  MORON, no clue whatsoever about anything he is doing or talking about. FOX : Fake News and Liars. Trump : Fake President and pathological LIAR.
Josh Wilner...Liberals defined..."there is no unit of measure for that level of stupidity"....Albert Einstein
The MAJORITY of the American people DON`T want your stupid and pointless wall. YOU Egomaniac want it.  MORON, no clue whatsoever about anything he is doing or talking about. FOX : Fake News and Liars. Trump : Fake President and pathological LIAR.
Carol Roberts Soutar I am not a liberal nor am I a sucker with an IQ of less 50 like most Trump supporters.
Jefferson Woods I'm in agreement that a wall/barrier is needed, long past due!  Sorry I don't have messenger.
Carol Roberts Soutar I am not a liberal nor am I a sucker with an IQ of less 50 like most Trump supporters.
Jefferson Woods I'm in agreement that a wall/barrier is needed, long past due!  Sorry I don't have messenger.
Just declare emergency and build the wall...
Linda Mckenzie yeah see how fast it changes when it's one of their family members
HELLO DEMOCRATS - You can not say a President is unfit to Lead the Country just because you disagree with him. We Conservatives thought Muslim Barrack Hussein Obama was unfit to lead America a Christian based Nation.
Beverly Wurts we aren’t a nation based on any religion, but I’m sure you dropped out before middle school.
Linda Mckenzie yeah see how fast it changes when it's one of their family members
Beverly Wurts we aren’t a nation based on any religion, but I’m sure you dropped out before middle school.
He can't run from prison!!
Nancy Edgeworth you mean like hiliary and her husband did? Saying things like that only proves how stupid you really are if you believe it.
And when you are wondering why you can't write off your interest on your mortgage, or healthcare, or why you can barely itemize anything on your taxes this year. You'll backpedal as he does.
Dann Hamblin not really. Because with true change comes sacrifice. And not that bs change obama preached while he uncle tomed his way through 8 years. Real change like securing this country for the people who live here making the country better for the ones who live here. People are tired of hearing about the poor poor immigrants and illegals who have it so bad. Screw them. America first. This country has spent far too long neglecting it's own to benefit paco and his 37 kids that jump the border and get the dream handed to them. I'll sacrifice a few write offs to see this country made better for the ones who have been here and contribute to it. Than have those write off I worked hard for handed to Jose and his family.
HELLO DEMOCRATS - You can not say a President is unfit to Lead the Country just because you disagree with him. We Conservatives thought Muslim Barrack Hussein Obama was unfit to lead America a Christian based Nation.
Dann Hamblin not really. Because with true change comes sacrifice. And not that bs change obama preached while he uncle tomed his way through 8 years. Real change like securing this country for the people who live here making the country better for the ones who live here. People are tired of hearing about the poor poor immigrants and illegals who have it so bad. Screw them. America first. This country has spent far too long neglecting it's own to benefit paco and his 37 kids that jump the border and get the dream handed to them. I'll sacrifice a few write offs to see this country made better for the ones who have been here and contribute to it. Than have those write off I worked hard for handed to Jose and his family.
Yes we surely do
And when you are wondering why you can't write off your interest on your mortgage, or healthcare, or why you can barely itemize anything on your taxes this year. You'll backpedal as he does.
Yes we surely do
They should show all the homes with walls around them, of all those saying the walls don't work, publish them so everyone can see their hypocrisy!!
Bill Upham yes, let’s be Russia or North Korea. You idiot.
They should show all the homes with walls around them, of all those saying the walls don't work, publish them so everyone can see their hypocrisy!!
Bill Upham yes, let’s be Russia or North Korea. You idiot.
Build A northern border wall too BOOM!
Simple solution to building the wall. Allow all illegals in, provide them with a “Welcome aboard package” which includes the immediate right to vote along with  affordable housing but they must agree in writing to register as Republicans/Conservatives then see how quickly Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the Resistance Party coughs up the $5 billion 🤔
Build A northern border wall too BOOM!
Exactly
Tom Moslak lmao you sir are a fucking joke . Sit your ass down you clown .
What about all the middle eastern illegals pouring across the Canadian border? This is more of a problem than those coming in across Mexico’s border!!!!
Build the wall!  Put the hammer down on city and state officials who enact fugitive safe places and obstruct ICE.  Charge them with treason
Tom Moslak What tree did you crawl out of?
The Democrats are so full of crap. My niece was the victim of an illegal. He had been deported 3 times prior to shooting her in the face with a stolen police officer’s gun and killed her. He was a drug dealer to boot.  He sold heroin and cocaine. Each time he was deported he was back within days. He wasn’t here to seek the good life and he ultimately damaged my family, almost beyond repair. There is a border crisis. It is not a manufactured crisis. It is the Democrats who are having a tantrum. I am furious! Mr. President DO NOT BACK DOWN!!! 🤬
Mike Rojas doesn't matter who shuts the government down! Are people supposed to pay their bills due now with back pay? Shut up 😂
The Democrats are so full of crap. My niece was the victim of an illegal. He had been deported 3 times prior to shooting her in the face with a stolen police officer’s gun and killed her. He was a drug dealer to boot.  He sold heroin and cocaine. Each time he was deported he was back within days. He wasn’t here to seek the good life and he ultimately damaged my family, almost beyond repair. There is a border crisis. It is not a manufactured crisis. It is the Democrats who are having a tantrum. I am furious! Mr. President DO NOT BACK DOWN!!! 🤬
Build the wall by any means necessary we need it keep the illegals out.
80% of Americans support border security.  Democrats want votes from Illegal Aliens and supporters of Illegals Aliens. Fact counties on the US Southern border and in California changed to Democrat because of influx of Illegals and Supporters of Illegals.
BUILD THE WALL! STOP ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS!
How do you Republican Government workers feel about your President now?  You do know, he can care less about you or your families.  Its all about him getting his way.  Nothing else matters to him.  Go ahead defend him now.
The new trade deal with Mexico does pay for it. Not to mention they could allocate the funds ceased from drug cartels to get it started. Then the money from the 134 billion we pay out every year to deal with the illegal immigrants once they get in could be used because the wall will dramatically drop the number getting in.
Mike Rojas doesn't matter who shuts the government down! Are people supposed to pay their bills due now with back pay? Shut up 😂
The Dem's Credo... Create Jobs by creating criminals, encourage lawlessness and disorder in our society. Think of all the jobs that thrive off of this negative part of society. Figures, lawyers are one of the biggest profiteers, with prisons, law enforcement, criminal justice and reform, healthcare, welfare, all the non-profits that support this system to grow... and the companies that are needed to support them. When a groups whole outlook on life is, let's just mess things up so we can profit by it, is messed up thinking. To say it politely. A lot of Republicans think this same way. Drain The Swamp!
maybe if you didn't rip off all us hard working americans with your corporate tax cuts the Dems would have let you spend 5 billion on a wall, how many billions of dollars did you rip off from the goverment with your tax cuts? if you are so fucking rich build the wall yourself!
Another thought:  When and if the Democrats ever get full power, one government run national healthcare system, like Canada, is their biggest goal - listen, actually listen to these socialists.   We will be so busy trying to get a simple cancer test or doctors appointment- we Americans might just need to climb that wall and cross into Mexico just to see a doctor!!  😱
President Trump is the greatest President our Nation has ever had!!! It’s a shame that the enemy of our Nation (So called Main Stream Media; Also known as the Propaganda Arm of the Democratic Party) are so successful and effective in deceiving so many good Americans through their deception and lies!  I wholeheartedly support our great President who is working so hard despite the worst opposition any President has ever faced; working to protect and defend our Nation, our Constitution, our way of life.
The wall is be needed, if we keep letting all the illegals in why have laws to make people come in legally. Why have laws at all!  Our safety should always come first. Thanks for standing up for us.  Keep fighting! We Stand behind you!  Put America First!
As usual the Democrats /Liberals are stupid.
Someone kill this fool trump already. Honestly learn your own fucking history. Ms13 was founded on the streets of L.A when honest migrants fleeing civil war are thrown in with Waring African American gangs. So what was America's solutions you sent them back to  El Salvador. A combination of extreme poverty and the effect's of a long and brutal civil war allowed this group to explode out of control.   Thankfully my parents chose Australia. But your problems have been around for a long time and it's not just Hispanic Americans that are the problem. African Americans have suffered time and time again nothing has gotten better, then we can jump to the real problem in America GUN'S! how many high school shootings have there been now fucking wake up to your self Mr president Karman is coming to bite you in the ass. It might not have been you that made all the problems but you haven't helped them either
Being Democrat is a mental illness and we all saw the evidence tonight. DRAIN THE SWAMP AND PUT TERM LIMITS on the Senators and the House members.
in our state of me. they voted in a severe liberalist who is going to break our back.   democrat,of course. stand your ground mr president
When will the North wall be built? Keep those dirty Canadians out too!
The Democrats don't give a rats about the American people, what we need or what we want. They DO however care more about illegal immigrants. They will stop at nothing to stonewall OUR President even if it cost thousands of Americans there lives
AMERICA HAS YOUR BACK.  THANK YOU FOR CARING. FINALLY A PRESIDENT WHO CARES ABOUT AMERICAN CITIZENS!! #KAG
You noticed that neither Schumer or Pelosi responded to Trump's question: if walls don't work, why do you two have them around your houses?  All Democrats in Congress know why they don't want a wall. All Republicans & Conservatives know why. Who we need to get to learn why are Hillary's Useful Idiots.
President Trump is the greatest President our Nation has ever had!!! It’s a shame that the enemy of our Nation (So called Main Stream Media; Also known as the Propaganda Arm of the Democratic Party) are so successful and effective in deceiving so many good Americans through their deception and lies!  I wholeheartedly support our great President who is working so hard despite the worst opposition any President has ever faced; working to protect and defend our Nation, our Constitution, our way of life.
You noticed that neither Schumer or Pelosi responded to Trump's question: if walls don't work, why do you two have them around your houses?  All Democrats in Congress know why they don't want a wall. All Republicans & Conservatives know why. Who we need to get to learn why are Hillary's Useful Idiots.
Jan Wemyss oh I know! That’s the Only reason they are fighting the wall! They Can’t Win Without the Illegals votes
AMERICA HAS YOUR BACK.  THANK YOU FOR CARING. FINALLY A PRESIDENT WHO CARES ABOUT AMERICAN CITIZENS!! #KAG
Jan Wemyss oh I know! That’s the Only reason they are fighting the wall! They Can’t Win Without the Illegals votes
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
Denise Walker  Democrats won California and New York because of illegal voting.
California and New York democrat leaders are offering free healthcare for all illegal aliens no longer at hospital emergency rooms brcsuse it is a financial strain and physicslly impossible but now thru private doctors. Who the hell are private doctors going to bill? With an americsn citizen they bill their insurance company but who gets the bill with free illegal alien care? The American medical system will become like Cuba or Venezuela - doctors will quit or retire early. Medical facilities will close.
So funny watching the Dems have tizzy fits that Trump is speaking to the People. They even came out and spoke of their fear that people might actually believe the President instead of them.  Panic runs amuck.  Heh.  I would like to see McConnell bring the existing bill to the floor for a vote and go around Pelosi since it has already passed the house. I would love that one passing and leaving her to pout over her loss....Do we have enough votes with the newbies in the Senate?
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
I have no problem with your wall as long as Mexico pay for it as you’ve said a million times.  It’s a waste of our money to build your ego wall
I'm feeling pretty confident that is the democrats strategy..
Details AJ? Betsy Devi’s is killing the schools and ahe’s One of you
I have no problem with your wall as long as Mexico pay for it as you’ve said a million times.  It’s a waste of our money to build your ego wall
Details AJ? Betsy Devi’s is killing the schools and ahe’s One of you
Michael Brian, you are a faceless troll and Donnie Trump lost the midterm elections bigley and there will be oversight!
I'm feeling pretty confident that is the democrats strategy..
The liberals all hopped on this page to cause damage the same way the illegals jump the wall to cause damage. Get out!
Michael Brian, you are a faceless troll and Donnie Trump lost the midterm elections bigley and there will be oversight!
The liberals all hopped on this page to cause damage the same way the illegals jump the wall to cause damage. Get out!
Build the wall build the wall build the wall 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Do not give in. Do not trust the Dems. They will lie until the cows come home.
Trump childish Clown President of USA of Putins grace soon you in Orange.  You are only a Moron . But Democratie is stronger HONESTY os stronger.  You insane Liar and Cheater
Build the wall or leave the government shut down until we get it .
TreSa Sanfilippo You are IGNORANT AND SO UNINFORMED. GO BACK UNDER YOUR TREE AND WAIT FOR THE BAD ILLEGALS TO COME AFTER YOU. WE NEED THE WALL...
Do not give in. Do not trust the Dems. They will lie until the cows come home.
Democrats have NO interest in securing our border to PROTECT the Legal citizen, they are totally focused on the ILLEGAL CRIMINAL!
Rebecca Schilling Brown Wow! That's a whole lot of typing for nothing because Trump is finished.
Democrats have NO interest in securing our border to PROTECT the Legal citizen, they are totally focused on the ILLEGAL CRIMINAL!
THIS is  what Nancy Pelosi just  said about Americans who agree with the President of the United States of America..((((This will be done on the backs of the middle class they profess to champion. All they care about are new ignorant voters.)))))   Their policies are a major disaster for the United States of America. If you have children and grandchildren, wake up so they can enjoy the freedom and self-determination we take for granted. If you don't it will disappear forever.
Rebecca Schilling Brown Wow! That's a whole lot of typing for nothing because Trump is finished.
I finally figured out why Trump leaves the White House an  takes his weekend vacations. Ready, drum roll please, Even Trump needs a break from his bullshit.   Also, I'm pretty sure Trump can issue a National Emergency to build his wall at the South Border. First we are still in a War on Terror and if Trump can prove just one possible terrorist enter the US through the South Border then securing it should be top priority also if you take in account how many Americans were killed by illegal immigrants that entered the South Border he can cite that it's in the best interest and safety for Americans to stop them from entering which would be a National Emergency. So Democrats just make the deal and get our Federal Government workers paid.
I finally figured out why Trump leaves the White House an  takes his weekend vacations. Ready, drum roll please, Even Trump needs a break from his bullshit.   Also, I'm pretty sure Trump can issue a National Emergency to build his wall at the South Border. First we are still in a War on Terror and if Trump can prove just one possible terrorist enter the US through the South Border then securing it should be top priority also if you take in account how many Americans were killed by illegal immigrants that entered the South Border he can cite that it's in the best interest and safety for Americans to stop them from entering which would be a National Emergency. So Democrats just make the deal and get our Federal Government workers paid.
Nekole Hinojosa Liberals = Zombies lol
That's right, Bonny, they will do anything to go against the President! He's thinking of the safety of All Americans, that's what the Dems should be focusing on as well!!! BUILD THE WALL!!!
Nekole Hinojosa Liberals = Zombies lol
That's right, Bonny, they will do anything to go against the President! He's thinking of the safety of All Americans, that's what the Dems should be focusing on as well!!! BUILD THE WALL!!!
I think Schumer and Pelosi are lover's or some thing where they can't get their head of their ass
Build that wall. Stand your ground . They all wanted the wall but never did it. They just hate the fact that you will do it!
Build wall stop giving illegals benefits and stop paying those help with shutdown and if they don't want wall let's them take care of illegals and take responsibility if an illegal breaks the law in any form
Obama will go down in history as “The Greatest President of all Time”.   Trump will go down in history as a clown. A failure. A traitor.   Great job dumbass.
I think Schumer and Pelosi are lover's or some thing where they can't get their head of their ass
Term limits on reps & congress and these thieves would start working FOR THE PEOPLE and not to line their own pockets at our expence. #MAGA
Lisa Duarte-Garcia lol what the hell does that have to do with anything? It's about trying to fix the problems many promised but just said it for election votes. That's what you are seeing now, and honestly I don't really seeing anyone sneaking into Mexico or Venezuela or an other south american country unless they are trying to hide. Every country has its own killers, child molesters that are probably allowed to do it because child marriage is still legal some areas, and all that etc..etc..etc. is available anywhere. Maybe a wall will or will not have an impact, but we won't know till we try. I mean it works for most countries
Term limits on reps & congress and these thieves would start working FOR THE PEOPLE and not to line their own pockets at our expence. #MAGA
Lisa Duarte-Garcia lol what the hell does that have to do with anything? It's about trying to fix the problems many promised but just said it for election votes. That's what you are seeing now, and honestly I don't really seeing anyone sneaking into Mexico or Venezuela or an other south american country unless they are trying to hide. Every country has its own killers, child molesters that are probably allowed to do it because child marriage is still legal some areas, and all that etc..etc..etc. is available anywhere. Maybe a wall will or will not have an impact, but we won't know till we try. I mean it works for most countries
The wall will never be built, it's just a hoax... If someone wanted it to be built, they'd make it happen, LMAO... Don't be a puppet...  There's so much more to the story..
Your an ignorant man, it doesn’t matter if you build a wall.  It will not stop American Born serial killers, drug dealers/users, rapist, murderers, bigots, child molesters, etc., etc., from being in this country.  As long as the demands stay in the USA the supply will keep coming
The wall will never be built, it's just a hoax... If someone wanted it to be built, they'd make it happen, LMAO... Don't be a puppet...  There's so much more to the story..
If people can't see by now that the news media are being TOLD what to say to the American public because they're run by the elites and the democrats don't have OUR best interests in mind I guess nothing will
Kim Miller omg..you're still asleep....
Kim Miller whatever you say libetard DEMONCrat.  Lol
Denise Malloy Davis your fake "patriotism" is sickening, asshole. Get back on your meds.
Denise Malloy Davis trumpturd
Nancy Edgeworth turd.
Why don't you and other millionaires buy the wasteland properties along this border and do as you wish with your private property... A wall doesn't have to be on an exact line of property.  They built gas pipelines for miles and miles through citizens property.  You're telling me property can't be bought that runs close to the border in a zigzag line that has a private wall built on it's property???
Nancy Edgeworth nah bitch I mean people like you and who you vote for.
Greg Merz you two need to move out of the U.S. If you don't support our president asshole
Nancy Edgeworth turd.
Greg Merz you two need to move out of the U.S. If you don't support our president asshole
You are a lunatic.....spare us impeachment and resign tonight.
All about the framing POTUS! Poll Americans and ask "Do you want a secure border?" Obviously the response will be overwhelmingly "Yes". Poll Americans and ask "Do you support the idea to build a border wall?" The response is going to be overwhelmingly "No", because most Americans know that's a stupid and inefficient strategy for securing our borders...
Who died and made you the expert? Just cause they spoon feeding you that bs .
Micheal Marceaux that's why I used the qualifier "most". I do realize there are some unfortunate souls out there in denial about the fact that the vast majority of undocumented immigrants entered the country legally, and then didn't leave when they were supposed to. I do realize there are some unfortunate folks so simple-minded they can't imagine ways to circumvent the 'security' of a wall. Don't worry Michael, I didn't forget about you, I said "most". ;-)
Justin Dewey 74% of the voters want the wall.
Carol Chisumvii per the Politico poll, 44% support the wall. Per the Reuters poll, 41% support the wall. Per the Hill poll, 34% support the wall.  Now, I hate polls. They often have flawed methodology and can be misleading. That being said, they are probably a more reliable source than your ass, which is where you pulled that "74%" number from...  To be fair if you meant to comment that 74% of "Republican voters" or 74% of "Trump voters" support the wall - I believe you, and if you edit your comment to include that qualifier, I will delete this criticism.   Sources: https://www.politico.com/story/2019/01/08/poll-voters-blame-trump-gop-for-shutdown-1088207  https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-shutdown-poll/a-growing-number-of-americans-blame-trump-for-shutdown-reuters-ipsos-poll-idUSKCN1P223U  https://thehill.com/hilltv/what-americas-thinking/423709-poll-shows-americans-are-split-on-feelings-toward-border-wall
You are a lunatic.....spare us impeachment and resign tonight.
But but Mr. President the dems need all the illegals for Votes. If illegals Voted Republican u see how fast Nancy and Chucky boi would be down at the border laying the bricks down as we speak. #Buildthewall
Build the wall I’m with you all the way
Carol Chisumvii per the Politico poll, 44% support the wall. Per the Reuters poll, 41% support the wall. Per the Hill poll, 34% support the wall.  Now, I hate polls. They often have flawed methodology and can be misleading. That being said, they are probably a more reliable source than your ass, which is where you pulled that "74%" number from...  To be fair if you meant to comment that 74% of "Republican voters" or 74% of "Trump voters" support the wall - I believe you, and if you edit your comment to include that qualifier, I will delete this criticism.   Sources: https://www.politico.com/story/2019/01/08/poll-voters-blame-trump-gop-for-shutdown-1088207  https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-shutdown-poll/a-growing-number-of-americans-blame-trump-for-shutdown-reuters-ipsos-poll-idUSKCN1P223U  https://thehill.com/hilltv/what-americas-thinking/423709-poll-shows-americans-are-split-on-feelings-toward-border-wall
Close the border and stop legal and illegal immigration until all the illegals are deported no matter where they are from. Don't reopen the borders or immigration until the southern border is secure and we have a better way to round up folks who overstay their VISAs. It is ridiculous how sorry our government is performing. They screw up everything they have their get their hands on.
Why is it oue responsibility to pay you for your medical problems, cant work my back hurts,cant work hurt my neck, cant work my knees hurt, look people it is not the governments duty to provide medical and money to its citizens, it's your job as a citizen to get a job with insurance benefits
Melody Hutchison Really and what type of Pres do you think Obama was. Trump hasn't cut off benefits for those who need it. Medicare and Medicaid both received Raises and so did SS and SSI.
Melody Hutchison. Wont need to worry about your health problems if a illegal blows your ass up best be worried about that.
Missy Turner if the government doesn't reopen by the end of the month Trump has just said on the news that we're losing ALL government programs.  Call your local Social Security office.  They will tell you what I have just said. I WORKED HARD FOR MY SSA AND MY MEDICARE privileges until I couldn't do ANYTHING . I had a herniated disc in my back and c3 thru c7 are messed up.  I'm only on Medicare not Medicaid and it pays for all my medicine. I only receive  $936 a month. ] p
I have worked since I was 16 years old.  I have always supported my kids. Don't tell me I have NO RIGHTS.  I have every right to receive what I paid.
Close the border and stop legal and illegal immigration until all the illegals are deported no matter where they are from. Don't reopen the borders or immigration until the southern border is secure and we have a better way to round up folks who overstay their VISAs. It is ridiculous how sorry our government is performing. They screw up everything they have their get their hands on.
I have worked since I was 16 years old.  I have always supported my kids. Don't tell me I have NO RIGHTS.  I have every right to receive what I paid.
Perhaps you would be willing to take illegals into your home and support them with your own money
Cheryl Phelps yes cunt I would.
Missy Turner if the government doesn't reopen by the end of the month Trump has just said on the news that we're losing ALL government programs.  Call your local Social Security office.  They will tell you what I have just said. I WORKED HARD FOR MY SSA AND MY MEDICARE privileges until I couldn't do ANYTHING . I had a herniated disc in my back and c3 thru c7 are messed up.  I'm only on Medicare not Medicaid and it pays for all my medicine. I only receive  $936 a month. ] p
Cheryl Phelps yes cunt I would.
Nadine Azarian you're delusional. Why you spout so much hate?
Perhaps you would be willing to take illegals into your home and support them with your own money
Nadine Azarian you're delusional. Why you spout so much hate?
ILLEGALS ARE COSTING US OVER 200 BILLION A YEAR. YOU ARE DAMN RIGHT WE WANT A WALL!
Jill Travassos - where did you get that number- give me an actual citation please.
No, they don't want your wall, you stupid, disgusting, lying, POS moron!!  How many lies are you going to tell tonight?  Ya know, they're placing bets on it!! Did you know that?  And maybe you should read USA Today's 9 facts about the border before your delusional speech tonight!!
Jill Travassos - where did you get that number- give me an actual citation please.
Build the wall it will pay for itself by saving what we spend on illegal welfare now.

Walter Garcia uneducated on the subject obviously bro...
Matt Smith You must be talking about yourself sister!
Build the wall it will pay for itself by saving what we spend on illegal welfare now.
Matt Smith You must be talking about yourself sister!
Ryan Steinmetz and you a Brainless dump individium of a Primate Trumpee. SHUTUP   stay in your Trailor Park Drink Beer play with Weapons and her Drunk.
Walter Garcia uneducated on the subject obviously bro...
Build the wall; throw democrat voters to the gators.
Ryan Steinmetz and you a Brainless dump individium of a Primate Trumpee. SHUTUP   stay in your Trailor Park Drink Beer play with Weapons and her Drunk.
Build the wall; throw democrat voters to the gators.
Eric Heyrman what habe you got in your Coffee this Morning?? You must a total Moron
Trump, promise us , the TRUE American people, that you fight them fuckers til your last breath. TRUMP 2020 BABY !
Eric Heyrman what habe you got in your Coffee this Morning?? You must a total Moron
How about you learn some English. 😏
Adam Watts After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
Pull an Obama and get out your pen!
This is all political and obstruction by the Democrats and we all know it. They will do anything to stop Trump and destroy our country. Just look at what they are celebrating in Congress now. Anti Semitic Muslims swearing in on Korans and defiling the halls of Congress.
God Bless President Trump.   God Bless the USA.   I am tired of my tax money being used for any immigrant or illegal alien.  If they cannot pay their own way and for their children they do not belong here.   Please President Trump.  Keep fighting for our nation.   MAGA.  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Adam Watts After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
Not only do we want border walls and security, it is a must. we should not have to build walls to keep Illegals and drugs but we do, it's a shame that they want to continue to break our laws, build that wall and keep them out, we stand with President Donald Trump 100%
️  It is not Trump's Wall It is the People's Wall #FundTheWall #TRUMP2020 #America1ST 🎯💯🇺🇸️
Democrat lawyers have been trying to trash the Constitution by misinterpreting the 14th Amendment to expand citizen rights to illegal aliens.  It a subversive lie.    Here’s what the Supreme Court actually said about ‘birthright’ citizenship by Daniel Horowitz • October 31, 2018     Rep. James F. Wilson, R-Iowa, the chairman of the House Judiciary Committee back in the 1860s who helped draft the 14th Amendment, spoke emphatically that it was “establishing no new right, declaring no new principle.” “It is not the object of this bill to establish new rights, but to protect and enforce those which belong to every citizen,” declared Wilson in 1866.  There’s no more authoritative exposition of the 14th Amendment than the first court case after its ratification, the 1872 Slaughterhouse cases. Justice Samuel Miller confirmed that “its main purpose was to establish the citizenship of the negro” and that “the phrase, ‘subject to its jurisdiction’ was intended to exclude from its operation children of ministers, consuls, and citizens or subjects of foreign States born within the United States” (emphasis added).  Writing for the court in Elk v. Wilkins (1884), Justice Horace Gray asserted that the phrase “subject to the jurisdiction” is “not merely subject in some respect or degree to the jurisdiction of the United States, but completely subject to their political jurisdiction and owing them direct and immediate allegiance” (emphasis added).  https://www.conservativereview.com/news/heres-what-the-supreme-court-actually-said-about-birthright-citizenship/
Don’t forget a wall on Canada... proven place of entrance and then plop a roof on everything...
Anyone else find it concerning the President is pushing an opinion piece here?
Demorats just cannot get over that Hillary lost, and will do anything to gain power and stop the president from protecting the US from invasion by illegals.  They even stooped so low as to send bombs to themselves to gain sympathy.
They don’t care about Americans, they care about power! Y’all need to impeach the judge who gave the 21 day release judgement. Just saying that is just stupid!  Our courts are overrun and they just want to keep letting people in! This is not immigration it an invasion that has been ignored for to long! Thanks for my rant! 🇺🇸
Build The Wall.. Close the Borders.. NO ASYLUM !!!!
God Bless President Trump.   God Bless the USA.   I am tired of my tax money being used for any immigrant or illegal alien.  If they cannot pay their own way and for their children they do not belong here.   Please President Trump.  Keep fighting for our nation.   MAGA.  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build The Wall.. Close the Borders.. NO ASYLUM !!!!
Pelosi, Schumer and other Democrats #1 goal is to obstruct, indict and impeach President Trump at the cost of the American people, they do NOT care about us! Democrats in powerful positions only know how to lie, cheat, steal, obstruct, spread hate/violence, corrupt, cover for each other, make everything about race, attack religion, play on our emotions, and get away with all types of crimes on their way to getting what they want. They support open borders and abortion. They are NOT above the law even though they think they are untouchable. Progressives/Socialists/Communists ALL think the same, just at different levels of insanity.
https://www.facebook.com/realCharlieKirk/videos/388989571873719/
Even your own party does NOT WANT your stupid wall! This is why the Senate passed a CR last year with 100% voting yes! This is also why they never passed it the past two years when the gop corporation controlled all three branches of the government.  End your tantrum now.
https://www.facebook.com/realCharlieKirk/videos/388989571873719/
Build the wall and electrify it.  If they took care of business in the 1980’s we wouldn’t have 20 million illegal alien moochers that pay no federal and state income taxes and their employers dodge some taxes too.
Marie Phillips Licamele false. Idiot.
Pelosi, Schumer and other Democrats #1 goal is to obstruct, indict and impeach President Trump at the cost of the American people, they do NOT care about us! Democrats in powerful positions only know how to lie, cheat, steal, obstruct, spread hate/violence, corrupt, cover for each other, make everything about race, attack religion, play on our emotions, and get away with all types of crimes on their way to getting what they want. They support open borders and abortion. They are NOT above the law even though they think they are untouchable. Progressives/Socialists/Communists ALL think the same, just at different levels of insanity.
Just saw the President’s address and the Demon-rats response.  I stand by Trump 100%.  I would like to know was there a puppeteer with his hand stuck up Pelosi’s butt to make her look animated?  Where her eyes scotch-taped open?  Are all Democrats morons? Remember it wasn’t so long ago that they wanted the wall and all of a sudden it’s “immoral?” No one talks about all the  huge corporations who want illegals in this country because they are cheap labor.  Did anyone notice that Pelosi and Schumer never mentioned anything about the American workers and backbone of this country being descimated. Nor did they talk about all the drugs, crime and killings by illegals or the overwhelming burden on our healthcare system Just to name a few issues.  I
Unique among presidents, Trump has divided loyalties. He has entangled his business interests with his official duties, creating the impression, if not the reality, that his own financial interest — not his duty as president — guides his thoughts and actions.  The Founding Fathers, savvy students of history and human nature, were highly attuned to the risks of public corruption — actual or perceived — and inserted language into the Articles of Confederation and later into the Constitution to guard against such human frailties. They wanted to make sure that anyone who held a public office would serve only one master: the American people.  A farewell to kings For the Founders, public corruption wasn’t just a theoretical danger. They viewed it as the primary threat to their independence. Living in a small, fledgling country, the Americans feared that the European powers would seize control of the American democracy by flattering and bribing our officials.  The kings and princes of Europe were masters of the art. The British king had corrupted Parliament by providing titles and sinecures, a major contributor to the split between the colonies and Britain. The true history of the 1670 Treaty of Dover had just been published, which revealed that King Louis XIV of France had bribed Charles II of England with a secret pension, a beautiful and beloved French mistress, and a promise of protection. In exchange, Charles had agreed to convert to Catholicism and to join Louis in his costly and fruitless war against the Dutch, his former ally.             https://www.marketwatch.com/story/the-founding-fathers-would-have-impeached-trump-in-a-new-york-minute-2018-08-10
Build the wall. 159 immigrants rescued from a drug cartel. A wall willl hopefully prevent this.
Neither democrats just hate Americans and like killing and destroying American families!
Build the wall, no matter what it takes.
AMERICANS WANT A WALL. DEMOCRATS STINK. AND STUBBORN .
Dems don't care.  Hate the President more than they love America. Political lying thieves.
Stopping u. Democrats are for Illegals instead of the American people...sad!👎
Marie Phillips Licamele false. Idiot.
Democracy should be for all not just a Chosen Few
The Democrats are nothing more than evil obstructionists and America haters!  The wall is absolutely necessary and not an option!  Build the Wall!
You are trying to keep criminals out and the geat unwashed lefties bitch, piss and moan. Turkey kept people fleeing a WAR out with a wall funded by the E.U and no  one bats an eye. Go figure. 100% behind you Sir.
Your promise was for Mexico to pay for it.  I think that's what the big stink is about.
When Trump says the southern border situation is a national emergency, what he really has in mind is a Trump emergency. He's the boy who cried wolf. He would send our war fighters to the border to start building a wall so Ann Coulter will be nice to him again.  "The basic factory setting on the perception of Trump is: gigantic douchebag. This is a man who manufactured fake Time magazine covers featuring himself with the headline, "Donald Trump: The 'Apprentice' is a television smash!" so that he could put framed copies of it on the walls of his clubs.  His business is convincing people with lowbrow taste to give him their money." http://www.anncoulter.com/columns/2018-12-19.html
Pelosi had spoken for 8 hours about Daca. If these people are so important to her she should be willing to make a deal for them-right thing to do. Now is the time. Everyone knows our immigration system needs to be fixed so we don't have more Daca people. A wall will help secure border, reducing drugs and gangs flowing into this country. Liberals helped organize this caravan, now claim it's not so bad?  We don't want to care for anymore illegals when we have too many citizens that need help.
Here’s the thing say he does declare a national emergency and uses the money set back people will still bitch. They’ll say it’s not an emergency. Say it gets the government open again. People will still bitch. The money is there to be used. This is a win-win. We get the wall and dems dont have to contribute. But I garauntee they’ll try to stop him from using the money and people will still side with them.
BUILD IT & they will NOT come over it illegally❗️
Stopping u. Democrats are for Illegals instead of the American people...sad!👎
Being responsible stewards of the budget, you fucking moron.
Keep it shut down-citizens ahead of ILLEGAL immigrants.
It's all about "your Promise"  We know You demented Adderall snorting lunatic.
They know Mr President. They know we want border security. A wall, technology, more boots on the ground.... all of it! We know that they don’t care what the American people want. It isn’t about us at all. It’s about them. Their special interests, their foreign aid, their gun confiscation, their tax hikes... the lists goes on and on. Don’t budge Mr President. We all know who owns this shut down. Let them shoot themselves in the foot. They’re comical.
i want border security  b  cus of isis  taking advantage of the fact the border is wide open  and the politicians are STUPID
Unless Mexico is paying for the wall you're  not fulfilling anything so stop patting yourself on the back.  You are a big fat liar.
All I can say is I hope there is no Thunderstorm and Lightening tonight while Trump is standing there telling all those lies...he will get struck down and burned to a Crisp!! Lies will always come back to haunt you!
Until an illegal shoots one of them, they won't be behind you!
BUILD IT & they will NOT come over it illegally❗️
Until an illegal shoots one of them, they won't be behind you!
Sure are a bunch of whiny bitches here. Guess what, the democrats wanted border security too...until Trump wanted it. You democrats are a special kind of stupid.
Walt Stapf you’re off base. Again.
Walt Stapf bitch.
Kim Miller great talk! You really made a “point” there.
Diane Glauber Gee, that hurt...what ever point you were trying to make.  You haven’t the faintest idea what I do. Btw, don’t care.
Diane Glauber Also, I’m pretty sure I smell your cat from here! 🤮
The two obstructionists Pelosi and Schumer represent the two largest Sanctuary States in the Country. Where do you think illegals flock to the minute they sneak in? How the hell can anybody in their right mind vote for these two criminals. Elections are definitely corrupt and fixed. Especially in those two States.
how the hell did they  come in   for 9 11 it wasnt crossing the borders cubans came in by boats they come in by tunnels semis crossing canada borders  get the fricken truth meth is made in usa murders and rapist are here and the biggest con are the presdient his family and goons he is a  fricken traitor to our country
so many brain washed trump spporters who    believe his lies instead of facts just dont the kool-aid
They are not interested in one thing or the other, they are concerned about their own skin. In other words, they will try to get you in the pan in every possible way. Even with the worst tricks and feints. Be assured. The snot lives and keeps trying to kill you. Flatten them before they do.
Protect our country Mr. President!! Stop the *rats from trying to ruin our county. Can't spell *democrats without rats. Please secure the country and continue strengthening job numbers and the enconmy. Don't listen to all the bots they have manifested on Twitter and the hatters that would reject the cure for cancer if it came from you!
Trump.....................hunanitys.   Hope.  Against.  devil
A wall doesn’t secure our border!!!  It steals land via eminent domain from Americans. It kills animals. And it won’t stop people or drugs!!
His followers are as delusional as he is. This idiot could shoot their mother and they would still think he's God.
If anyone believe they don’t want a wall they need to think if someone in your family members were killed by illegal how would they feel . One more death of Americans citizens being killed by illegal is one to many.
its time to take out the trash Mr President and while your at it, any government shutdown should include those who cause the shutdown. Law makers cannot make laws they are not obligated to live by, please get that changed. Law makers should be held to a higher standard.
Diane Glauber Also, I’m pretty sure I smell your cat from here! 🤮
its time to take out the trash Mr President and while your at it, any government shutdown should include those who cause the shutdown. Law makers cannot make laws they are not obligated to live by, please get that changed. Law makers should be held to a higher standard.
You are full of Bullsh*t, you Orange Mobster: https://www.facebook.com/1632011487/posts/10215718598271259/
Melody Nehls  Really, cultist, because I don’t lie repeatedly to the American people.  Hey Melody, don’t get your pussy-grabbin’ panties in a bunch, all I am doing is just sharing FOX NEWS, your news gods, and how they fact checked the Liar in Chief.  Ask me no questions, I’ll tell you no lies! 😉
Melody Nehls  By the way, Melody, I should have commented that that is a very deep and cogent counterpunch, spoken like a true member of the tRump Crime Family Cult.  You win!
If anyone believe they don’t want a wall they need to think if someone in your family members were killed by illegal how would they feel . One more death of Americans citizens being killed by illegal is one to many.
Build the Wall  No Amnesty  Don't let the swamp tangle you up in court on the state of emergency.
I want border security but a stupid wall is a really dumb waste of money.
Sorry Mr President, but that is a stupid question!  Stopping you is much more important to democrats. They don’t care about the people who will die, every day, at the hands of illegal aliens, or the drugs and disease they bring with them. They have completely abandoned the protection of American citizens and their rights. It’s called TDS!
TRUMP you had two years of complete control and your GOP didn't get it done on the wall. Its your shutdown your fault get Mexico to pay for the stupid wall.
Great address to the nation, President. Trump, regarding the national security crisis we are facing at our southern border and the ABSOLUTE need for an up-to-date barrier for the SAFETY and SECURITY of the AMERICAN PEOPLE!🇺🇸  Chuck and Nancy (Dumb and Dumber) looked like a couple of IDIOTS trying desperately to explain why the American people don't need the best safety and security possible at our southern border!!!!
Via technology ... not a medieval wall ... your promise was Mexico would pay for it, ya dumb fu@k.
Oh stop... Dez Ippolito!!..white men r very few..but they DON'T get by with NOTHING..illegals have been proven to break OUR laws... hurt ..rape..kill..that's how u show..u want in our country??....Hopefully UR legal..if not go home..stop trying to make trouble here in America blaming white men..if u do a per centage..in prisons b4 opening ur discrimination mouth...it's Mexicans and blacks..so u stop ur discrimination against whites just to get ur way!!.this is OUR.. AMERICA.. We don't want invasions..stay in ur own country ..fight to keep ur country safe.. as we do in USA..💕🇺🇸.
border security, keep government shut down until Demorats decide to negotiate on border wall/barrier/security whatever it is they want to call it. Stop funding sanctuary cities that choose to break the law and house illegals, let them do it on their dime not ours. What foreign aid can be halted no money anywhere until secure borders 30 years is long enough to kick this can down the road.
Democrats are only interested in hurting America.  Filthy trash.
Melody Nehls  By the way, Melody, I should have commented that that is a very deep and cogent counterpunch, spoken like a true member of the tRump Crime Family Cult.  You win!
Democrats are only interested in hurting America.  Filthy trash.
You scared of innocent women and children coming to get you, Spanky? Lying, coward, fear-mongering motherfucker! No wall for you, Donny boy.
Maria Shafer Shut your ole dumb obviously misinformed ass up .
border security, keep government shut down until Demorats decide to negotiate on border wall/barrier/security whatever it is they want to call it. Stop funding sanctuary cities that choose to break the law and house illegals, let them do it on their dime not ours. What foreign aid can be halted no money anywhere until secure borders 30 years is long enough to kick this can down the road.
Maybe all this wall obsessing makes Trump tired. He certainly seemed low-energy during his Oval Office address. “He makes Jeb Bush look like a combination of Mighty Mouse and Bruce Springsteen,” a friend of mine said after the president finished his nine-minute speech to the American people.  For every viewer whose response to the talk was “Wow, we should do something about immigration!” there must have been a hundred whose first reaction was “Why does this man keep sniffing?” Deviated septum? Nasal polyps? Trump’s breathing has actually sounded strange for a long time, but most of us have chosen to ignore it rather than engage in a national conversation about the president’s nose.  If you watched the address — and really, you could have, it was only about as long as it takes to microwave popcorn — you saw a 72-year-old guy squinting at the teleprompter and making rather alarming breathing sounds while reading a speech about how we need a wall to protect women who are “sexually assaulted on the dangerous trek up through Mexico.”  This is not a man who should wrap his arguments around the idea of protecting women from sexual assault. But also, gee, he sounded like Uncle Fred who you haven’t seen for a while and suddenly he shows up for Thanksgiving with weird colored hair and vacant eyes and he’s talking into his mashed potatoes. Gail Collins, NYT 🤣😂
Build the damn wall!  I am sick and tired of my taxes supporting other countries and illegals .
We need the wall and we need politicians who do not support their OWN COUNTRIES CITIZENS but instead support illegal immigrants and foreign countries  before America to be relieved of their jobs!!
Look, you lying narcissistic moron. Enough of your lies, Mr Dennison. Tread Carefully tonight.
Donald Trump is the most inept, corrupt and unscrupulous embarrassment the US has seen.  History will judge him as a traitor.
FB is censoring this:  Build the wall.  If it can stop 1 rape tree, stop 1 child from getting raped or trafficked, stop 1 murder, stop 1 terrorist from entering and spreading extremism like a disease, or stop 1 load of heroin from entering our county and destroying 1 life, etc. It's worth the price of the wall.  YOU CAN'T PUT PRICE TAGS ON PEOPLES LIVES CITIZEN OR NOT!
BUILD THAT WALL no matter how you get it. Tax the hell out of all those places they send money to mexico and it will be paid for. also NO NEW illegals on welfare/food stamps or free healthcare.that alone will save money on the wall.
Illegals are important to the democrats
Maria Shafer Shut your ole dumb obviously misinformed ass up .
THIS AMERICAN wants the damn government back to work, and then you idiots can play your damn games. You're putting the whole country at risk with the TRUMPSHUTDOWN!  Meanwhile more terrorists have come in from Canada, but I don't hear you talking about building a NORTHERN WALL!!
Yes but not a fucking wall that Americans are being told they have to pay for! What happened to the Mexicans who you said were going to pay for it? Friggn loser!
Stupid dems living behind walls daily.... lol
BUILD THE WALL ,tell the democrats to go to hell
How long Is a stupid political class going to allow illegals to come in and drain our treasury and kill our people?????  This is being done to America on purpose folks!!!!!  BY THE STUPID RATS!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP I WILL NOT STAND FOR IT ANY LONGER! Mr.President Trump call "State Of Emergency" and "Build That Wall" now and lock all of these commies up.
Lier lier pants on fire!!! Americans with common sense do not want to blow 5plus billion on a wall. Trump is looking to line his pockets and the pockets of his pals. That’s the only reason why he wants a wall. You said Mexico was going to pay for the wall. Make them pay for the wall like you promised and open our government back up. America is not one if your crappy or failed hotels.
It is as simple as this if we only enhance border security by putting additional troops at the border our troops will get criticism for shooting the drug dealers that are coming across illegally. What other option would they have since they are not coming in one by one but in droves. A wall will keep them out and ultimately safer than enhanced border security.Mexico has already offered them asylum and many took it but many did not. They have killed many of our border agents by throwing rocks and our president has issued the okay for our agents to defend themselves so be careful what you wish for. This is an invasion orchestrated by our very own Democrats in our govt. Our president is not going to blink, the stakes are too high.
It's obvious what is important to those devils, but stay strong Mr. President.  Build the wall and make America great again.
Useless wall. Just like your useless wig on your head.   Neither accomplish anything.
Illegals are important to the democrats
Useless wall. Just like your useless wig on your head.   Neither accomplish anything.
IMPEACHING THAT MOTHERFUCKER!!! #NOWALL #IMPEACH #TreasonBellsRinging
Cherokee Roze oh you must be related to nocahontas..
It's obvious what is important to those devils, but stay strong Mr. President.  Build the wall and make America great again.
Yes...Let me be clear...I'm all for securing our border...Technology can do it cheaper, more efficiently and with less environmental impact. Spend my tax dollars on technology! NOT on a STUPID WALL!  https://www.realcleardefense.com/articles/2018/03/19/high_tech_surveillance_critical_for_effective_border_control_113214.html
Unless YOU'RE DUMB, DEAF AND BLIND, WE ALL know damn well the last TWO YEARS REPUBLICANS and Trump held ALL the power! WHY didn't they get this done? BECAUSE YOU CAN'T FUND A DAMN SLOGAN! The Republicans knew it, Trump knew it, and even his campaign knew it was just a slogan "to keep the attention of The Stupid Party". Donald Trumps OWN WORDS! What an abuse of power and a waste of money to all the networks. But hey...it's not Trumps $ so who gives a damn...right?
These are not just Demirats your dealing with. They are Anti-American monsters that are dead set on destroying America! Let's END THEM!
Build the wall!! Then Lock her up or vice versa
15 of the 19 terrorist responsible for 9/11 were SAUDIS !!! Just a theorie......Saudis planned the destruction of the twin towers, so the US had a reason to ask them for help to fight against Taliban and Al Queda....for that they needed a lot of weapons from the US. Good deal for both ....thinking ...
Border security is of the utmost importance to our nation. What many people don't understand is that legal immigration is one thing ,but illegal immigration is quite another. We need security on our southern border ,and we need it now! Our President, is trying to protect and defend our country from foreign invaders and should be applauded not admonished for it.
Brain dead dems couldn't care less about the American citizens. They only care about the illegals so they can get their votes I the illegals are too blind to see it  & they don't care, all they want is an open door into America & all the handouts. !!!!
Democrats are damn fools and the enemy of the USA!!!
Cherokee Roze oh you must be related to nocahontas..
Democrats are damn fools and the enemy of the USA!!!
There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.
Tyrone Brummeyer to long.
Helen Selgren Lyman,   Yeah, I suppose most Trumpets won't be able to concentrate long enough to finish it.  Oh well.
Brain dead dems couldn't care less about the American citizens. They only care about the illegals so they can get their votes I the illegals are too blind to see it  & they don't care, all they want is an open door into America & all the handouts. !!!!
Democrats are damn fools and are the enemy of the USA!!!!
You should throw these traitorous Democrats in jail!
They deport illegal criminals and they keep coming back.   You can sure tell who's side the  democrats are on.      Wake up America!
Your promise was: Mexico is going to pay for a Wall! The problem is 🤔 From the beginning your reasons for a wall were as useless as you have been👎👎👎👎No Wall! Dump trump!
Demonrats are straight from hell 👺👹 ... stand your ground against pure evil!!!
They want to destroy America! and you got in there way. BUILD THAT WALL🇺🇸 TRUMP 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
This foreign Institution has been doing Financial business with Donald Trump and the Russians. This is the tie. This is the proof. This is the Big Kahuna. But you guys just keep on getting distracted by the stupid wall but make no mistake, he knows all about this and he has been fighting this tooth and nail since September. He called in all 10 DC circuit judges to weigh in on this and one of them recuse themselves. And guess which one it was yep one of his former nominees and former legal advisor. This is the money Trail and the money Trail never fucking lies. This is huge. Huge.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
It would appear, don, that only half of America is behind you The other half seem to think you're a moron
Build a wall between USA and Canada too.  Canadians are being drained by illegal cross border immigrants coming from USA as well. Thank you!
Helen Selgren Lyman,   Yeah, I suppose most Trumpets won't be able to concentrate long enough to finish it.  Oh well.
Impeaching and locking you up, motherfucker!!
It's truly sad that the democrats hate Trump so much that they risk all of our American citizens safety. To hate one person so much and put so many in danger while they live behind their gated walls! And to top it off to want open borders for illegals to come into our country and get benefits that American citizens can't even get! Power hungry democrats want that almighty vote and the only way to get it is to keep the border open and have illegals vote for them!
hey ted cruz is offering a solution. please look at it. build the wall using other money and F the democrats. they are showing the rest of the country how useless they really are!
Democrats want to take you down at all cost. They are Pure EVIL !  Take your billions and buy a huge Island and take all us Republicans there to live ;)  Donald J. Trump
B R E A K I N G  N  E W S :::: Trump has two parts of brain, "left" and "right". In the left side, there´s nothing right. In the right side, there´s nothing left !  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)
Yes, he needs our prayer. Prayer works and God will make a show of all this evilness. We are in the fiery furnace and God sent Donald Trump to protect us. Thank You, Lord, for giving us a President who truly cares about our nation and its people. Protect him and may everything he puts his hand to prosper. Even now, the Democrats stand fast in their wickedness. All liars go to Hell. They need to rethink what they are doing. When this is all said and done, God will triumph and we are his people so we will share in the glory. In the mighty Name of Jesus Christ, I submit this evil unto thee, my God. May Your glory and honor shine so bright. The blind cannot see and evil has only evil to protect it.
Dont back up an dont back down..full steam ahead Trump .if they stay in your way become a John deere mower an mow them duckers down..
Dow is where it was one year ago, deficit is approaching ONE TRILLION DOLLARS, National debt is 22 TRILLION, Ford is laying off 20.000 workers, gas is up to 3 Dollars and interest rates go up rapidly. Lower and middle class people don´t have one penny more in their pocket, but rich people got tax cuts !!! Great work of the orange CLOWN !!
This fight with con man Don isn't about border security. It's about the symbolism of a wall as a metaphor for demonizing nonwhite immigrants and immigrants from [expletive] countries. It's about the final statement in the narrative to protect America from changing demographics.  "Make America Great Again" was never about great. It was about white.  No imminent threat from undocumented immigrants exists. Illegal immigration has been falling for the last two decades, and it was at its lowest in 2017. Half of illegal immigrants don't cross illegally but rather overstay a visa that was secured legally. Those who say illegal immigrants pose a threat to police and American citizens — just another exaggeration. Studies have shown that undocumented immigrants commit crimes at a rate that is 85 percent less than native-born individuals.  #TRUMPSHUTDOWN!!!
Wait ass swipe your campaign promise said Mexico would pay that's the promise you made so forget it
Build a wall between USA and Canada too.  Canadians are being drained by illegal cross border immigrants coming from USA as well. Thank you!
We have literally been promised a border wall by spineless politicians for the last 30 years, and we're tired of being lied to by the government we fund. Get it done once and for all.
Build the wall, NO amnesty, STOP allowing them to enter,why do we need to provide 52K beds and medical treatment, these foreign invaders are bankrupting America. STOP ALL welfare to illegal aliens and refugees and make it retroactive, get them out.
Build the wall and secure our borders 😊👍🏻
First evidence shows that the caravan moving north was initiated by social media spread by republicans to give Trump another reason for fear mongering before the midterm elections.
Build the wall and use the stroke of ink pen. It would of been nice if the Democrats would work together. They refuse to help
Americans have been BEGGING to seal that border since at least 1986 and both parties have FAILED.  Why do we even pay these people?? They completely destroy everything they get their filthy hands on and then try and.convince us they're doing us a big favor.  And democrats are the worst of them two evils by far. Their insane "sanctuary" policies are KILLING Americans and bleeding us dry financially.  Build the freaking wall and seal the border already.  Chuck and Nancy need to get the hell out of the way and let Americans get to work and get it done..
Build it and they won't come....Build that wall build it tall.
Build that wall and build it the way you want it . Screw them Dems and Libs .
Donald J. TrumpDonald you say you want the rapes to stop, yes, I agree ... but how is it any different when a white man does it and gets away with it? He is still walking free!!!!  But a Mexican does it and you say that's why a wall needs to go up???
Wait ass swipe your campaign promise said Mexico would pay that's the promise you made so forget it
The dumocrats are like selfish children, no I take tat back,  it's worse. They're committing treason against the U.S.
Shut the hell up, what about the KKK or the people right here in America, you are a disgrace using the wrong people for this wall!!!!!
America wants border security. AFTER YOU LEAVE YOU IDIOT !!
It funny how Shumer calls it a tantrum .. It takes two and I feel like Shumer and pelosi are acting like bullies and babies. They act like Trump alone can stop the shutdown..What's wrong with them giving the money and putting people back to work.. They act like Americans are stupid... Pay for the wall and get people back to work OR you going to act like babies and act like it's only up to Trump.. When the truth is You two could stop the shutdown and put people back to work today.. Voters need to remember this and Vote you out of office
Lets build that mother fucker.... Ill lay the first fucking brick
Gambling sites are taking odds as to how many times this fucker is going to lie to the American people tonight.. I say every other word will be LIES since he's a PATHOLOGICAL LIAR
Stopping you from lying to the American public Stupid!!!  https://youtu.be/-yfIxBjOw3o
They know when you cut their voters from running the border......they are finished. You are just one step away from making the Communist Democrat party a prehistoric fossil. They will dry up like water on a hot 120 degree day when the flow stops. They know it!!
There is one way and one way only to get them back for all the hell they put this President through..
Donald you stupid smuck.  You haven't fulfilled your promises and villafying a specific race, lying, trying to win support while doing this just means you have sunk to an all time low.  No Wall.
Donald J. TrumpDonald you say you want the rapes to stop, yes, I agree ... but how is it any different when a white man does it and gets away with it? He is still walking free!!!!  But a Mexican does it and you say that's why a wall needs to go up???
Getting your batshit crazy ass out of the White House. Criminal incompetent fool.
We stand with you POTUS!!! Build the wall and expose these liars and evil deep state to the world!!  Lets do it!!
Yes Mr President our country need our walls to prevent tragedies to our children and women and against every America citizens. This has started by obama changing our immigration laws to allow immigrants to enter our country illegally and able to stay and get free everything. And over congress which didn’t stop him. Just like everything he has done for them and not for the citizens. And because they themselves said they was for security and protection at our border and have a wall to keep out immigrate but to deport those here as well. So have they. Not as much as they should have. Plus it is what democrats want to do for our border but refuse to just because of who is our President.
Protect the nation —- build the wall and do all other measures to protect our country.  Spend our tax money on USA CITIZENS.
The only thing on the minds of the democrats is to get rid of the President and they will do anything and will not stop because they are afraid of him
Democrats are biggest idiotic threat to America
They are brainwashed by evilness Freeze freebies to ilegals. They will plea Pelosi n schummer for wall.
Democrats don’t want a wall because they love border crashers more than they love AMERICANS.  Democrats are evil. Protect illegal children while approve murdering legal American babies. 100% evil.
Do you people who are egging him on to build the wall, understand what you will lose if that money is directed there? You're all ignorant dimwits! Please understand the consequences of putting up 5 Billion Dollars for this ridiculous wall. Who do you think he's going to get to build it? Will he create a business of his own? So HE can profit. Or will he give it to one of his mates who will pay Trump a percentage, personally, just to gain the job? There's way more to this than what Trump is saying Factual Stats show immigration at the southern border is at its lowest. How can you just accept everything he says? He is a lying, criminal conman!
Donald you stupid smuck.  You haven't fulfilled your promises and villafying a specific race, lying, trying to win support while doing this just means you have sunk to an all time low.  No Wall.
I think every city should have check points for illegal immigrants along with the wall ...If democrats want to hinder the wall being built then start by showing the American people just how many illegal immigrants are already here
Build the walll...dont cave to lunatics
Lost my daughter Thursday night from drugs. Build the wall to keep out Illegals, drugs and human trafficking.
Stopping you from perpetrating fraud with your bogus wall which you support with untruthful claims and statistics. You are a pathological liar.
https://www.forbes.com/sites/stuartanderson/2018/06/25/there-is-no-crisis-at-the-border-and-dhs-stats-prove-it/?fbclid=IwAR328oMyTHSr48CMGSpyHe76PTY0lPWU16AzuxBER1JpsYrlq54hWMas_Bg#4d20e31112aa  Sure, we want border security.. what we don't want (+60% of the country) is to piss away billions of OUR tax dollars on your INCOMPLETE FENCE because of this imaginary crisis you invented.
Build the WALL! We the people want it now!
I thought Mexico  was paying for the wall,  so when are you going to clean up the large inner cities,  rapes, murders, drugs, suicides, Americans Terrorists, Catholics children being molested,  and this is coming from Americans.....
Disgraceful that Democrats have no compassion for the killings of innocent Americans by Illegals. reaction
We all know the Answer to this.. They would rather spend Billions to Murder Innocent Babies and Foriegn Countries then take care of thier own.. Build the Wall!!!
Most illegals come here the same way his wife did in airplanes  and stay  on expired work visas
You are destroying America Trump
Most illegals come here the same way his wife did in airplanes  and stay  on expired work visas
38 is not even near enough to half the voting public you idiot !  To claim America anything you must have at least 50 percent of the voting public supporting you and you do not !  Your a lair !  4,000 terrorist turns into 12 suspected and only 6 at the southern border , the drugs come in cars and thru the 60 tunnels we have found , your wall is stupidity and nothing more !  That's why 62 percent of us know it and are opposing you !  And over 50 percent are calling for your impeachment so yes America wants you gone , not a wall , four walls around you called a jail cell !
JIM.  THE PRESIDENT HAS THE AUTHORITY TO PROTECT AMERICA AND CAN BUILD A WALL SON. GET COMFY ;)
THE WALL IS COMING!
We all know the Answer to this.. They would rather spend Billions to Murder Innocent Babies and Foriegn Countries then take care of thier own.. Build the Wall!!!
Has anyone thought of cutting the incentives for them to come here illegally? Asking for a friend.
Instead of shutting down government benefits, let's shut down illegal alien benefits!
You don't even realize it dummies bc your heads are so far up Trump's ass , but he's going to put this country in a recession. #TheGreatDepression2019.  #FuckTrump. #DontArgueWithMe
You are scum A small hand small dick Scum slum lord
Build it and move the liberals to Mexico
Build the Wall! Declare National Emergency!
Stopping you, are the Democrats #1 purpose.....of their stupidity...they need to pull there heads out of the sand.
THE WALL IS COMING!
You could have the cure for cancer or the solution to world peace and the Democrats will still try and stop you !
Many from the GOP as well, you troglodyte.
Your a damned lier! Take responsibility for your actions
Buddie americans dont want a stupid wall, they want livable wages, free health care, affordable education, etc . Thats what Americans want.
Build it over Congress approval, nothing will turn people against you more than if they cannot pay their bills , put food on their table , pay their rent... no matter how loyal they are ..because it is human nature and survival THEY'LL turn on you.... it's not that they will just blame the Democrats they will start to blame you.
Do not believe one word of what N. P. and C. S. say.  . If you open the government, They will tell you to take a flying leap.    Stick to your guns.  Why don’t they acknowledge that you are asking for 5.7 billion to build a Wall but it is costing 150 billion a year to support the illegals.   Even without counting the crime, drugs, diseases, terrorist, etc, that is coming across our southern border.    It’s a “No Brainer”  for a reasonable thinking person. Why are they putting illegals needs over American citizens needs..  They took an Oath to uphold the Constitution of The United States of Americat but they seem to be violating that sacred Oath By not protecting and taking care of American citizens over illegals.
Build the wall. Keep pushing forward. USA!!
Arizona native here, and I am SICK of watching our communities turn into Mexico.  CLOSE THE BORDER! BUILD THE FUCKIN WALL!!!!
All the foolishness about a crisis that does not exist is to divert about the indictments that will include Chump and Chump Jr. Little Donny half scoop met with Russian agents during campaign. Collusion and obstruction is a real thing. You idiots can believe all the lies if you want. Chump knows his goose is cooked. REAL Americans will take back our country. All you traitors can stick with Chump .
Democrats  idea  of  border  security  is  no  security  at  all,  no  border,  welfare  for  these  leeches  and  massive  future  voter  fraud.  We  may  need  a  bloody  civil  war  to  fix  this.
Stopping you, are the Democrats #1 purpose.....of their stupidity...they need to pull there heads out of the sand.
This American looks forward to the day that justice prevails and your orange ass is in an orange jumpsuit.
Democrats stop being difficult...you are all a bunch of traders to America and Federal Government.  Shame on you.  I believe we the people are going need the vote to shut you down.  If you Democrat’s continue to leave our borders unlawfully open....all the terrible tragedies will hit in your families.  Don’t you love your own families?  Stop being stubborn like children.  Help your loved ones and America.  You Democrats are hiding information you don’t want leaked out to America or your families.
Obstructionist PIGS, give the American people what they want . . . BUILD THE WALL!
I bet a ton of money with my bookie that trump will lie 53 times in 8minutes. I need the money since the government is shut down. Come on trump don’t let me down you lying bag of 💩🤞
The last 3 presidents started wars in other countries that created no benefit to the American people, and we paid for them.  Trump wants to actually do something for our country that would benefit the America people and half the country hates him for it. What a time to be alive in politics.
Mr President, I think you know the answer. Forgive those that are too stupid to recognize taking responsibility. They dont take responsibility, they toss it on others and try to shame them for it. THe American people are on your side!
Democrats  idea  of  border  security  is  no  security  at  all,  no  border,  welfare  for  these  leeches  and  massive  future  voter  fraud.  We  may  need  a  bloody  civil  war  to  fix  this.
Donald Trump is creating a political problem to win up coming election....... he just manufacture his own problem with lies , hate and deceit turning a brother against brother nations against nations manipulation they ignorant for political and selfish gain.....
You are an idiot! You said that the woman who said, "Impeach the Mother f'r" was sooo horrible. Seriously dude???? You also said that on national television. So dont go and diss someone for exactly what you did. It is hypocritical. You would think that a so called POTUS wouldnt say that on national television either !! Have some respect for yourself.
They all need to visit the border and walk along it for awhile - see the places where there is not much to keep the dangerous ones from just walking into the USA.  I think they're all too chicken to walk along the border - it's a dangerous place!
LIAR. No, law enforcement did NOT request 5.6B for a wall. NO, Dems did not ask for a wall and then change their minds when Trump was elected. NO, drugs do NOT flood over the border with illegals, and no wall will change that.
Exactly! What Is important to the Dems?? Aside from stomping around over every little thing you say and do, the asshats look completely freaking bananas and might I add, far removed from the reality that is the American People.
Build the wall 👍🙏 keep pushing it. Or declare natural disaster and build anyway. Wonder how much cartel $ they getting to fight this 😉👍
we have to get rid of these democrats...and at this point I don't care how it's done....
Build the wall!!!!! We need to secure our border. #maga
We can secure the border without a wall. Trump’s a disgrace! He needs to be impeached, then imprisoned!
Sorry but I feel that we need boarder control, and I don't care how we get it! wall or no wall we need to keep friends and family safe. i am all for people coming here and making a better life for themselves but for the love of god please do it the right way. so many are coming over here bringing illness and getting almost everything for free. how is that fair to those of us who are busting our asses everyday and still struggling to get by and get the help that we need.and for those saying that we don't need boarder control it's just wrong. it's as though you are saying that you approve of these illegals coming here and doing god knows what ever they want without any rules or punishment. and if any of you can come up with a better idea for boarder control other than a wall of some sort, do tell inquiring minds want to know, and by the way in order get boarder safety money has to be spent. nothing comes for free!! but here's and idea hows about thousands of contractors come together bring materials and tell Donald J. Trump were here to build your wall. oh but wait congress will say oh HELL NO YOU CAN'T DO THAT!!
Hold the LINE SIR! These Evil bad actors THEY DO NOT CARE ABOUT ANYONES LIFE...Just look at what Pelosis district is criminal drug infested street scum ...she lines her Bank account with foreign aid funds ...AUDIT  Sure Schumers is a well..SOROS PENGUIN PUPPET!
Sorry but I feel that we need boarder control, and I don't care how we get it! wall or no wall we need to keep friends and family safe. i am all for people coming here and making a better life for themselves but for the love of god please do it the right way. so many are coming over here bringing illness and getting almost everything for free. how is that fair to those of us who are busting our asses everyday and still struggling to get by and get the help that we need.and for those saying that we don't need boarder control it's just wrong. it's as though you are saying that you approve of these illegals coming here and doing god knows what ever they want without any rules or punishment. and if any of you can come up with a better idea for boarder control other than a wall of some sort, do tell inquiring minds want to know, and by the way in order get boarder safety money has to be spent. nothing comes for free!! but here's and idea hows about thousands of contractors come together bring materials and tell Donald J. Trump were here to build your wall. oh but wait congress will say oh HELL NO YOU CAN'T DO THAT!!
Campaign promise is circumstantial to factual problem: Social and Financial due to illegal immigration and illegal harboring of illegal aliens.
We’re not talking marijuana, we’re talking heroin, fentenol, fake prescription percodine, crack, meth, ectisy, Molly, rat poison cocaine.................
We can secure the border without a wall. Trump’s a disgrace! He needs to be impeached, then imprisoned!
This country is going to hell in a hand basket. People claim they don't see color, we're all one race or that "all lives matter" those are the same people that are all in for this wall. Do you know the type of stuff people have to do to smuggle drugs in this country? Every race steals, kills, and lies. Do I hate Trump? No, but I don't care for his vulgarity either. It's not his fault that people are falling for the okeydoke though. People should have a mind of their own. I'm neither Democrat or Republican, I'm a human being that has empathy and compassion for those who are suffering. A Mexican man (who was legal born and bred) told me the conditions living in Mexico, and they're barbaric. Of course people want to come to America, the supposed land of the free and home of the brave, the same way people wanted to escape from England and ended up here. How do we know that the Native Americans didn't have a law about illegals entering in their country?
We want border security and our tax dollars to stop paying for all these illegals who come here plop their babies out and expect us to pay for them, they were born while their parents committed a crime, they should be considered illegal as well. We are the ones forced to feed, educate and give til our own go without.
You deranged mofo  Its no reason to shutdown the government
Now Hawaii can make money off of Hawaiian grown marijuana and maybe we can open some new prisons.  Democrats have not given us, United States Citizens, Financial Security, so they are now offering Socialism.  I’m not following their parade
Pelosi and shummer are as big a threat as illegals crossing our boarders because they are domestic threats they need to be behind walls and bars. Drain the swamp
Hawaii Harbors Illegal immigrants!!!!!!  Then Hawaii asks the Federal money, that they separately need because of the Unions who hold Citizens of Hawaii hostage: State Workers Union, Stevadores Union, police Union, hotel workers union, stage workers and film workers union, who all make more than the Teachers Union.  Everyone wants to work for a Union for retirement.  And Union Heads want power.  Prices go up.  Hawaii residents have to pay the ship yard workers union in San Diego and again in Hawaii before they can go to the store for toilet paper.  So Hawaii’s Government asks the Federal government for money, “because Hawaii is using its precious space for The Marines, Navy, Army and Airforce.”  Who suffers, the Tourists, Hawaii residents, and Hawaii’s Public School System is the worst.
SOMEONE PUT A MUZZLE ON THIS MENTALLY ILL NUT JOB.
Democrats want to secure the border -- as long as we're not wasting taxpayer money.    (1)  Most illegal immigrants are visa “overstayers" (Hire more personnel to track visa holders.  A wall won't help.)  (2) According to the DEA, almost all drugs come in through legal points of entry (invest in more agents and scanning technology.  A wall won't help.)  (3)  Private citizens own much of the land slated for the wall, and will lose farm and ranch land to government use of imminent domain.  (A wall is unfair to landowners.)  (4)  According to MIT engineers, the wall would cost $31.2 billion. Homeland Security estimates it at $22 billion.  But take those cost estimates and consider the following.  According to the Cato Institute a 700 mile border wall, which has been built, was estimated at $1.2B.  However, as is usually the case with public works projects, the price rose precipitously to final cost of $700B. That’s almost a 600% increase.  (What we know for a certainty is that the true cost of Trump’s wall is going to be far more than his puny estimate of $5B.  Are we going to stop the project once we’ve spent $5B?  No.  Taxpayers will be on the hook for whatever the cost increase will be.)  What Democrats want is a 21st century solution to a 21st century problem.  Leave it to Trump to not think outside the box, and instead propose a 4th century solution.
We’re not talking marijuana, we’re talking heroin, fentenol, fake prescription percodine, crack, meth, ectisy, Molly, rat poison cocaine.................
Democrats want to secure the border -- as long as we're not wasting taxpayer money.    (1)  Most illegal immigrants are visa “overstayers" (Hire more personnel to track visa holders.  A wall won't help.)  (2) According to the DEA, almost all drugs come in through legal points of entry (invest in more agents and scanning technology.  A wall won't help.)  (3)  Private citizens own much of the land slated for the wall, and will lose farm and ranch land to government use of imminent domain.  (A wall is unfair to landowners.)  (4)  According to MIT engineers, the wall would cost $31.2 billion. Homeland Security estimates it at $22 billion.  But take those cost estimates and consider the following.  According to the Cato Institute a 700 mile border wall, which has been built, was estimated at $1.2B.  However, as is usually the case with public works projects, the price rose precipitously to final cost of $700B. That’s almost a 600% increase.  (What we know for a certainty is that the true cost of Trump’s wall is going to be far more than his puny estimate of $5B.  Are we going to stop the project once we’ve spent $5B?  No.  Taxpayers will be on the hook for whatever the cost increase will be.)  What Democrats want is a 21st century solution to a 21st century problem.  Leave it to Trump to not think outside the box, and instead propose a 4th century solution.
Seems to me the people who don't want border security are the same people who should be on the other side of the wall. I see your dumb smiling faces. Let me ask you... what if your mother, sister, brother..etc was raped or killed by an illegal? Or for that matter overdosed on one of the many drugs coming from Mexico. Where would you stand then?
SOMEONE PUT A MUZZLE ON THIS MENTALLY ILL NUT JOB.
We overstand you don't have to be Smart to talk to your Ignorant Cult members. They'd rather have $5 Billion for a irrelevant Wall that Mexico was supposed to pay for, than $3 Billion for Health care. I wish 45 the "Pied Piper for Imbeciles" would cut Food Stamps and Welfare so the 60% of his cult members that receive them would starve to death.
Donald Trump Jr is tied to El Chapo's Mexican drug cartel. These photos prove it. The same Latvian banker Don Jr is in photos with also was behind a massive Russian money laundering scheme as well. Because, of course he was.   https://thesternfacts.com/trump-jr-now-tied-to-mexican-drug-cartels-money-laundering-scheme-5906b8d4ce5d
Democrats say drugs are all being stopped at the border crossing.  Just shows how dumb they really are.
Drugs seized at THE PORT not BORDER. #NoWall   End #TrumpShutDown   https://6abc.com/$17-million-worth-of-fentanyl-seized-at-port-of-philadelphia/3690305/
With all the monies that have been giving to the Bushes, Clintons, Obummer all these years for border security and I'm not talking about 5b we're talking about 100's of billions, why are we having this problem? Answer...it's used to do what they said it was going to be used for, but they give it to companies  they have intrest in and get kick backs from it, ( you know like give the contracts to family members) It's away to keep these billions of dollars going. Now they know that there is someone who will use every penny to fix this problem. And no need for all these bilions every year. That and a loss of illigal votes
Build the wall! Get rid of those who say no! Wish it worked that way anyway 🤷‍♀️
Screw these filthy Democrats ... cancer of this country, the filthy pigs!!!
Build that Wall.  Taxpayers can’t finance the world's uneducated people, taking hard-earned $$ from our families.  We're angry & fed-up with globalists expecting us to educate & give free medical care to the world’s population while our children suffer here in America.   Globalists/socialists should not be making laws & decisions for American citizens.
I can tell you. You would blame Trump! Probably because the wall wasn't built fast enough!
It's so easy for those who don't live on the border to not want a wall, to say we dont need it. They dont live on the border they dont have to deal with drug smugglers, rapists or human traffickers breaking into their homes. If you dont want a wall a DARE YOU to move to the border and leave your doors open!!! I guarantee you'll be singing a different tune in just a short few days. You dont care for american citizens safety then you're not an american!!!  Daddy president put the crying tantrum toddlers in a corner and now they're pissed of about it. Libtards Sucked on Obamas tits for too long and got coddled!!!
just listen 2 silly Nancy , now that other idiot , don't know his name , just a idiot , wot a tool , stand firm Donnie , good move against the EU yesterday thanks !
Your Promise was for Mexico to pay for the Wall, your a liar.
Fulfill your promise that Mexico will pay for your stupid wall!
No, Americans don’t. Just idiots who buy your bullshit
Chump your such a liar.   https://news.gallup.com/poll/235775/americans-oppose-border-walls-favor-dealing-daca.aspx
Being a trump supporter must be a lot like being an abused woman in an abusive relationship, no matter how many times you get punched in the face all the I'm sorry's and I love you's make it ok, it must be a psychological reaction to not being able to let go of it, trump supporters feel committed at this point because you all voted for him, fought for him, argued for him, and now you see what a failure he is being president, being a human being, being a descent person and caring when he doesn't, yeah trump supporters, YOU ARE the beaten woman in the relationship, and trump is is the abuser who says sorry it will never happen again!! and you just stay with him again and again and again...
Build the wall. the  Let migrants apply legally and not trec miles through dangerous   terrain.
Too bad about the pay,  let them starve,  it's on Nancy
Build that Wall.  Taxpayers can’t finance the world's uneducated people, taking hard-earned $$ from our families.  We're angry & fed-up with globalists expecting us to educate & give free medical care to the world’s population while our children suffer here in America.   Globalists/socialists should not be making laws & decisions for American citizens.
Too bad about the pay,  let them starve,  it's on Nancy
If DONALD TRUMP THINKS IMMIGRANTS ARE SO DANGEROUS, WHY DOES HE KEEP MARRYING THEM?
Marilyn Weingartner Legal vs illegal big difference .
Micheal Marceaux last ho illegal. Fake docs
Micheal Marceaux. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT.
That was really ignorant Marilyn Weiner..  Why do we need sanctuary cities for illegals if we're all supposed to be so safe.??  This is our country not theirs..  I have rights also..
Trump won’t open government or help our farmers... yet he’s helping a Brazilian!   Trump farm bailout money will go to Brazilian-owned meatpacking firm, USDA says.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/business/2019/01/09/trump-farm-bailout-money-will-go-brazilian-owned-meatpacking-firm-usda-says/
Build the wall. the  Let migrants apply legally and not trec miles through dangerous   terrain.
Next send all ‘refugees’ back to their home where they can elect and give Pelosi citizenship in their country to be President and steal their tax dollars.
Ok we are down with border security ..............but.........your wall is fucking dumb.
Americans should be happy. In canada our dumbass leader has turned the country into a jesus homeless shelter. We're taking everyone in and paying them to come here. Its astounding how it's even happening.
Does anyone ever check out the stats on the likes, angry, funny, sad etc.... on these posts. Maybe all the liberals should get a clue. Americans do want the wall and immigration reform. We simply cannot sustain this country with this many immigrants pouring in and costing american's all sorts of funds. We have our own citizens living on the streets, children going to bed hungry, and drugs. Don't need more coming here for us to deal with. DO IT LEGALLY!
Build the wall declare a National emergancy
Ignore Pelosi and the nittwitts.... BUILD THE WALL!  We see how she stands for the red, white and blue by her actions against our veterans just this past week.  She’s trash....worthless. Can’t stand her.
I want the wall .  You know why? So many of us latinos come over here to escape the craziness of our home countries. Why do we want that same craziness infiltrating America? You gotta be a special kind of stupid or you must really hate America with a passion and want it to fall.
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall. How are democrats stopping that? Fuckwit
Build the wall!  They had 25 years and did nothing.
Trump won’t open government or help our farmers... yet he’s helping a Brazilian!   Trump farm bailout money will go to Brazilian-owned meatpacking firm, USDA says.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/business/2019/01/09/trump-farm-bailout-money-will-go-brazilian-owned-meatpacking-firm-usda-says/
Build the wall!  They had 25 years and did nothing.
Hey! You actually said something with some truth in it!!! Americans do want border security! That's what Democrats are standing up for! They want methods that are more likely to be effective than your huge wall. They are willing to continue talks about border security - which don't have to include a government shutdown. They had agreed to a funding package that included money for wall repair and some building, where applicable, but you refused to budge unless they totally capitulated to your demands for funding your wall. Way to show you care about our people - not!  Democrats are quite willing to work on improving border security. They also want legal immigration, rather than illegal immigration. But calling anyone coming to our borders "illegals" is not right. They are only "Illegals" if they try to avoid the vetting process. There is a lot of work needed to improve the immigration situation, but your stubborn insistence upon doing it only your way will get nowhere fast.
If you believe this bullcrap, then tell please tell PeterPan and the Easter bunny, hello....geez....do you have walls around your house???
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall. How are democrats stopping that? Fuckwit
Why is Chuck Schumer always with evil Pelosi ??! Both evil
trump is a fear monger!  trump must be impeach immediately, so that America can recover from trump's destructive actions!
Dont  give  in  to  their  bullshit.  My  lights  are  on,  trash  was  picked  up,  water  still  running.  Keep  it  shut  down  till  congress  funds  the  wall.
Oh go on build the wall, it'll keep all you Trump-loving idiots in 😂🐐
Build the wall. Don't wait on the Democrats. Bill every adult $150, even illegal immigrants working here. Then reimburse legal citizens the $150 after we are in a National State of Emergency.
build wall with armed guards to shoot
Build the wall then put the Democrats on the other side since the love the illegals so much
If you believe this bullcrap, then tell please tell PeterPan and the Easter bunny, hello....geez....do you have walls around your house???
Let the man do his damn job the American people voted this man in and he kept every promise he made! Build the wall keep out the heroin influx, illegal people we know nothing about, murders, etc.
Why can't we Send those who have to do Court ordered community Service work or who are incarcerated and in the overcrowed prisions that taxpayers are paying for to clean up the trash in the National parks.  They get paid 3 square meals a day, a bed, a roof over their head, libraries, gyms, tvs and game rooms...  There is No reason they shouldn't be put immediatly on a guarded clean up detail.  They can re pay with Civil Service duties. Put the tracker ankle bracelets & wrist bands on  them while being watched with armed guards and put them in tgere to do clean up work.  However ... It's a shame people cant take a trash bag in on their own or are so lazy and not more considerate to pick up after themselves to begin with.
If everyone else put this country first and quit obstructing, we’d all be doing a whole lot better. People that are so jealous of the rich keep shooting themselves in the feet trying to raise taxes on their own employers. Put your extended hand back in your own pockets, go to work, and pay for what you want! Fake News and Fake Humanitarianism is the enemy of this country!
The democrats are  disgraceful and hypocrites. They all wanted the wall, they got money ey for a wall that was never built, 46 billion to be exact where did that money go? Is that why they are multi millionaires on a 174 k a year job? People need to open their eyes about the democrats. They care nothing for the people. Their hatred is fueled by Satan because God is love . Support the democrats and you’re supporting Satan
You promised your supporters and all amaricans that Mexico is paying for the wall yet now you shutdown the government over paying for the wall. Typical Trump lies coming to the surface.
They all need to move to a beloved socialist country of their choice!
Build the wall then put the Democrats on the other side since the love the illegals so much
They all need to move to a beloved socialist country of their choice!
Stupid President of the year!
Al-amin Abubakar stupid comment of the day
You promised your supporters and all amaricans that Mexico is paying for the wall yet now you shutdown the government over paying for the wall. Typical Trump lies coming to the surface.
Al-amin Abubakar stupid comment of the day
Fat ass stated a few illegal immigrants that murdered American citizens but fail to mention the numerous domestic terrorism killings by a thousand fold....mostly white. Lying motherf.cker.
F u
Di Wilson truth hurts bitch
Stupid President of the year!
Dems don’t care they just want to bitch and tell lies keep up t great work mr president and ty
Build the fucking Wall Mr Trump!!!!
Thank you President TRUMP,  hopefully these two will slither under their rock, they are both Evil, and look like they are  demonic, they would rather see U.S fail, then do,the right thing
Build the wall. The laborers tax withholdings is around 30% and taxes paid by other workers and materials add lot's more to the government coffers so really the wall pays for itself and saves untold amounts of welfare. BUILD the WALL now.
You dipshit. That’s not an either or! We don’t want your fence! You are holding a country hostage for something the country does not want! Grow up baby!
Di Wilson truth hurts bitch
You dipshit. That’s not an either or! We don’t want your fence! You are holding a country hostage for something the country does not want! Grow up baby!
trump is a little whinny lying bitch
Yeah ok look in the mirror lil 🐒here have a 🍌
Build the wall. The laborers tax withholdings is around 30% and taxes paid by other workers and materials add lot's more to the government coffers so really the wall pays for itself and saves untold amounts of welfare. BUILD the WALL now.
Yeah ok look in the mirror lil 🐒here have a 🍌
SIT DOWN DON, YOU FAT MOTHERFUCKER!!!Play Video
Kimberley Gray  so if this was Obama asking for funding for a wall, would you still be against it?
Yes, just like I was against Obama's high level of deportations and his use of drones.
I have also written several nasty letters to my very liberal senators regarding thier support of Israel.
I am sorry that I didn't make your point for you.
trump is a little whinny lying bitch
we have 20 to 30 million illegals in OUR country now. How many will be enough for you 100 million? The Democrats will be happy when the USA has collapsed and they can start their Marxist country.
We want border safety. Build the wall!!! Democrats you really know how to make yourselves look stupid!!!!! 😠 😠
Build the wall Stay shutdown until they fully fund the wall
Build the wall protect america
I suggest someone raid Pelosi's vineyards.. You'd find lots of undocumented immigrants there
Build the wall it only can help
DO NOT GIVE IN TRUMP, FIGHT THESE STUPID DEMOCRATS THE AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE WITH YOU BUILD THE WALL
We NEED the wall....the security....SO sick and tired of the taxpayers having to house, feed, educate, medicate illegal aliens !!!    They need to come here LEGALLY.
I am sorry that I didn't make your point for you.
We NEED the wall....the security....SO sick and tired of the taxpayers having to house, feed, educate, medicate illegal aliens !!!    They need to come here LEGALLY.
Actual American here. WE DO NOT WANT THE WALL.   There’s thousands of things that 5 billion could be better spend on then a half ass wall.   Also, why are there so many Non-Americans saying “Best President Ever?”...... Trumps vocal fan base is a bunch of fake accounts. Trump’s cabinet is guilty.   Real Americans value human life. This isn’t Russia
Eric E. Murdaa umm yes we do ...(actual american)
Matt Smith Did you know that almost ALL illegals get here via Airplane? Literally NONE get through the southern border.
DO NOT GIVE IN TRUMP, FIGHT THESE STUPID DEMOCRATS THE AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE WITH YOU BUILD THE WALL
They want to stop You My President. You and Your Administration has outed them and they are feeling how naked they really are. I stand with You! Your not alone. Stand Strong! Pelosi & Schumer look like fools. They like their time in front of a camera. They talk the talk but can’t walk the walk. I can’t wait till they are all on the debate stage. The Garbage they spew and blame others for what they themselves are guilty of.
You should get Chucky and Nancy to accompany you on your border trip, and maybe get a first-hand idea about what is needed, from the people working the front lines every single day. Last set of interviews I heard, every border official said the wall would help IMMENSELY. Of course, I might be foolishly optimistic that these two clowns would pay any attention to people that are actually working the problem. I can dream, right?
All you Trump supporter believe everything that Assclown tall you if you all was so freaking bloody Smart you would Fact check everything
Your promise is about as good as your marriage vows. What happened to Mexico will pay for the wall, I promise. Your an ASSHAT.
Too many clowns responding.  Hello dumbasses, we have thousands entering ILLEGALLY.
You don’t have to build a wall to secure the borders you fucking dumb prick!
Stand your ground, Mr President. The American people are behind you. We need the wall. More and more of these caravans will be coming. We need to put a stop to unwanted illegals getting into our country bringing drugs, human trafficking and disease into our country.
Half these posts aren’t Americans at all but Russian bots 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 fake ass Americans!
Matt Smith Did you know that almost ALL illegals get here via Airplane? Literally NONE get through the southern border.
Half these posts aren’t Americans at all but Russian bots 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 fake ass Americans!
You got the first part right, Cheeto. Stopping your incompetent, traitorous ass from hurting this country any further should be priority number one!
Oh, ouch, what a cutting reply, Mikey! Just what I'd expect from a highly intelligent tRumpie, though!
Steve Pecenka Its my way of cursing you out without getting banned . So yeah I am pretty intelligent lol. Its fun and therapeutic at the same time . We all know yall got 🐒monkey brains I give out 🍌
Micheal Marceaux LOL-Sure Mike. Having to use emojis to express your deep thoughts is a sure sign of intellect.I'll bet you're every bit as smart as the orange buffoon in the oval office. You know, the idiot who claims every word, every stupid action, is the biggest, the best, in the history of the world. Only a lying, insecure, narcissistic stable genius  feels the need to constantly proclaim what a genius he is. So yes, you're pretty intelligent using the tRumpie yardstick.
Stand your ground, Mr President. The American people are behind you. We need the wall. More and more of these caravans will be coming. We need to put a stop to unwanted illegals getting into our country bringing drugs, human trafficking and disease into our country.
Border security yes...your asshole wall to please the Trumpkin Bumpkins, Looney Limbaugh, Transvestite Coulter, Hack Hannity, Loopy Levin, Crackpot Carlson, Ichabod Ingraham, and the rest of the Fox Fake News CLOWNS...:No way Stumpy!
Build it then close the border till Mexico pays up!
Build the Wall!!!!!!  Don't cave into them!  Stand your ground - make it happen!
Stopping trump all together they hate him they can't keep their promises not their word and the hate him cause he can what bunch if dumb ass flakes
U SAID U MAKE MEXICO PAY FOR THAT WALL U LIAR. PAY FOR THAT WALL U RICH FUCKER.
Yes we need borarder security. I have no problem with imgrants comming into America. If they get background checks and come in the correcy way. Legaly!!!. Become a Us citizen and that means in all ways Honor our nation and our flag learn to speak english. Work and pay taxes like I do.obey the laws of our Great Land. They adapt to our nation not us,to there ways. Yes serve in our militaryif of age to do so.
not going to happen you moron -  go and pay gold instead and leave running of the country to any one else.
Steve Pecenka you were the one being a condescending little prick talking about my intelligence. I reversed it and merely explained why I do the symbols lol .
What's most important to Americans is stopping you from screwing us out of our tax dollars to build your stupid f'king wall so you can repay your debt to Russia by way of "US Steel" provided by Evras North America, whose parent company is Evras and 31% owned by Russian billionaire, Trump family friend and close Putin ally, Roman Abromavich. No doubt, also, your motivation to place tariffs on steel from outside North America.  YOU SUCK!
You have conflated “border security” with a wall that won’t work, you incompetent buffoon. Resign and play some golf before your prison sentence.
Border! Term limits for these idiots.
Americans want their fucking paychecks clown
Declare a national emergency president.. we stand firm with you. We know that anyone with common sense knows we need a secure border. The Democrats are the ones causing the shutdown.  They just gave millions  to Europe for abortions but zero for safety for Americans safety.  All country's need secure borders ,just as we need protection and safety in our own homes  we need the wall   Build the WALL.
BUILD THE DAMN WALL! It's OUR money, OUR country and OUR wall!
We need the wall in Somalia please come and build
The Democrats don’t care about the American people they care about their pockets and that’s all that’s it they don’t care whether we live or die you Mr. President care and that concerns them get in there and get the job done we got a boost these Democrats out of office
Basically,  anything to stab you in the back sir. That's what the Democrats will do.
Time to hold the Democrats accountable. Americans first. They need to be cornered by pissed off Patriots and citizens now. They should prioritize citizens over illegal immigrants.
not going to happen you moron -  go and pay gold instead and leave running of the country to any one else.
Time to hold the Democrats accountable. Americans first. They need to be cornered by pissed off Patriots and citizens now. They should prioritize citizens over illegal immigrants.
We all want security but the wall isn't going to fix anything. This isn't the Ming Dynasty. We don't have hordes of Mongols pillaging our towns. It didn't work then or now.
The Israel wall has been very effective at keeping bad people out.
Edward Dennis Toppe Israel is incredibly smaller than the United States not to mention that wall and Israel is really apples to oranges.  The people coming to America are seeking a better life and running away from violence low wages and poverty. There is no way in the world that there is not a better option.
Basically,  anything to stab you in the back sir. That's what the Democrats will do.
Edward Dennis Toppe Israel is incredibly smaller than the United States not to mention that wall and Israel is really apples to oranges.  The people coming to America are seeking a better life and running away from violence low wages and poverty. There is no way in the world that there is not a better option.
Your just as IGNORANT as you look.
Oh really. Look at France and England. They are being killed by all of the illegal immigrants who invaded their country. Walls work! Build the wall!
The Israel wall has been very effective at keeping bad people out.
Oh really. Look at France and England. They are being killed by all of the illegal immigrants who invaded their country. Walls work! Build the wall!
Last year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
Linda Lynch build that wall!!!!!!
LaVerne M PhillipsLast year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
Linda Lynch you know that isn't the only issue. If an American commits murder, they are prosecuted and laws are put in place. Your point is silly.
Jill Diberardino-Coggin Last year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
Your just as IGNORANT as you look.
Trump is a dumb ass. He clawing for what $5 billion dollars for a wall. A bipartisan bill was presented to him last year with $25 billion for the wall. This in exchange for DACA. Trump rejected it. Trump is an idiot savant. Even if I had voted for this jerk I would feel the same way.
Everyone should start flooding all Democrats in Washington to BUILD THE WALL.  Calls, emails, faxes whatever!
Oh Mr.President they rather see you fail then coming together and helping our Country.If you fixed everything and made it great again.They wouldnt know what to do with themselves....IDIOTS!!
You have already broken your "promise." Mexico will not pay for this wall, fence, or barrier. And now you think it's A-OK to saddle Americans with this foolish thing. It will not be a wall in tribute to you, you egocentric idiot.
Build the wall now before more Americans get killed by the illegals
Jill Diberardino-Coggin Last year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
Damn mainstream media ...sick of them lieing.....and screw Schumer and Pelosi ....lieing bitches
Don't use my tax money to build no damn wall. You said in your campaign that Mexico was going to pay for the wall now your saying the wall will pay for itself through a trade deal. I don't care of you are a Republican or a Democrat This man has shut down the government and people are unable to pay mortgages and provide food for their children and you have the nerve to talk about all the killings of women and children. During your campaign you didn't give a rats ass about women or children. Jesus fight this battle because it is yours I'm just disgusted and sick to my stupid because he has the never to talk am humanity
You are JUST A LIAR!! You’ve never kept a promise in your life. Why? You can careless for anyone of us!
It doesn’t matter what you want for our country the Democrats will not agree with you.  You have done more for us in a long time. The democrats are so stupid and only care about themselves and not what is best for our country.   #prayforourpeesident
Thank you President Trump. The answer is obvious and many sound-minded citizens know the answer. GOD HELP those who can only insult and obstruct. Here's a bible verse: see if it resonates with anyone and can show a minute ability to abstain from vulgarity. I probably don't want your opinion anyway. Jesus said, "Satan has come to only steal, kill, and destroy." You don't have to be a genius to see that one side is BUILDING and the other just intends to DESTROY and do everything harmful. My peace comes from knowing that GOD knows. Drunken, idiotic words and behavior do not escape him. The people have done nothing but harm our government MUST repent and turn from their wicked ways instead of taking a BIG FAT PAYCHECK for doing harm. Many don't like that their tax payer-money is going to drunken fools who hate God and people. So, dear President, TAKE HEART, because no vulgar language will stop our prayers or make God LESS than GOD. Every person is a "vapor, a mist." Jesus said you don't know if you one more hour on earth. Take His wise words, obstructionists, and REPENT. He will forgive and replace your heart of stone with one that is soft toward him and others. It's a better deal than what the Dems. have going. TAKE IT.
Take the Dems out to the trash and get these Muslims out of govt office
yes yes yes still think  middle of night load a cargo plane full of money and land it in the desert  have contractors thier  give them it tax free to bulid the wall..  better then what Obaxxx did  and they didnt say anything PROBEN SOLVED
You are a idiot, all candidates make so called promises -but cannot get them approved.  We are a Democracy not Russia.
The democrats are more concerned with stoping the president responsibility's and campaign promises than they are American's safety!!!! Democrats are making themselves look really bad and foolish!!! It cost the US more per year to take care of all these illegals than to build the wall........think about it!!!! Just build the wall and save money and lifes at the same time!!!!!!!!!
Build the wall now before more Americans get killed by the illegals
The democrats are more concerned with stoping the president responsibility's and campaign promises than they are American's safety!!!! Democrats are making themselves look really bad and foolish!!! It cost the US more per year to take care of all these illegals than to build the wall........think about it!!!! Just build the wall and save money and lifes at the same time!!!!!!!!!
except for his base which are ust as stupid as he is
Try forming an actual sentence before you call someone stupid.
ok ur stupid as that jackass of a moron
You are a idiot, all candidates make so called promises -but cannot get them approved.  We are a Democracy not Russia.
Stupid wall idea! Open the government you big ass child
build the wall !!!!!!!!! I'm so sick of hearing people say that there is no crisis on our borders. there sure as hell is. if you don't think so then take some of the people coming over and let them live in your house.
Piss on Shitmer(Schumer). Keep it shut down. We support you Mr. President!!!
we have to now worry about canada boarders too that fool up there is letting everyone in too. travel ban on America safety first. how soon those celb snowflakes forget 911.
this brain dead jackass is blowing gas over his address while americans are suffering
The democrats and most of the republicans want America destroyed. They want this country to be communist.
Let's see what the ratio of smart/morons are in this country. Let's hope we can outvote the morons who want FREE STUFF and are clueless as to WHO PAYS FOR IT. Those who want SOCIALISM don't want the wall.  Those who want SOVEREIGNTY (a free country) WANT THE WALL.  All you people who want socialism why don't you just pack your bags, get the hell out and leave the rest of us patriots alone. You socialists ARE A DISGRACE TO OUR COUNTRY AND EVERYTHING IT STANDS FOR. Now... GET OUT!!! Go find a country that share YOUR values!!!!
Yes we want borders secured..Democrats need to vote for this..or get voted out of office.!
Let Pelosi and Schumer stand guard on the border for a month like our Americans do and see how fast they would agree or maybe they should meet the parents, spouses that have lost their loved ones due to illegal aliens. As part of this nation we want to feel safe in our own country....and we do not....fix the problem Pelosi and Schumer...and don't blame the President for this, this is your fault so stop blaming our President.  How can you say your part of this country when you won't help the rest of us Americans feel safe maybe it's YOU who wants recognition because you don't like our President.  He is not the puppet you all are used too, so get off your high paying butt and really do something for us who love our country!!!
ok ur stupid as that jackass of a moron
Build the wall, give Daca kids a path to citizenship, establish a program for all current illegals to obtain citizenship by paying a fee, requirement to take a constitution class and English classes, and a path to make them tax paying and off government free programs within a time period or deport them!
Ashamed of this immoral Congress!  They are ignoring the core value of the Constitution to serve and protect the citizens by valuing illegal immigrants over the welfare and safety over its own citizens
I thought you said Mexico was paying for the wall? Stop holding hard working Americans hostage for your personal gain...treasonous bastard! And, when did you idiots get conned into believing we needed a wall? Pathetic followers.
Build that wall!  Fix those horrible immigration laws!
Build the wall, keep our borders secure!
Build the wall. Don't let them win or America will lose.
Nancy and Chuck are rebellious, anti-American, pathetic excuses for 'Leaders' when they refuse to 'offer solutions' to this situation...OH Thats' right, they can't think on their own and are not creative enough to come up with anything....did I mention brainless. I hate how they are anti American and we pay them! They are to serve and protect, not abuse and accuse, and its immoral to support Illegal activities and Illegal people. Thir JOB is to serve and protect Americans!! Treasonous!
BUILD THAT WALL.  If the Democrats want to push you, they better wake up out of their dream. You've got the rest of us standing behind you.
Schumer & Pelosi lying... as usual...misrepresenting the entire issue!!! Their deceits are being seen...their once sheep are starting to turn in to wolves hungry for retribution to being lied to and deceived for so long by these globalists socialist commies!   My response: Mr. President...DO NOT END THE SHUTDOWN UNTIL YOU GET THAT WALL!!! They all SAID they supported it when it got them votes...hold these liars to their words now!
The border isn't the issue you orange turd.
Let Pelosi and Schumer stand guard on the border for a month like our Americans do and see how fast they would agree or maybe they should meet the parents, spouses that have lost their loved ones due to illegal aliens. As part of this nation we want to feel safe in our own country....and we do not....fix the problem Pelosi and Schumer...and don't blame the President for this, this is your fault so stop blaming our President.  How can you say your part of this country when you won't help the rest of us Americans feel safe maybe it's YOU who wants recognition because you don't like our President.  He is not the puppet you all are used too, so get off your high paying butt and really do something for us who love our country!!!
Just find the 50 Billion dollars they were suppose to already have allocated then use that. Maybe Schumer and Pelosi pocketed some to build walls around their property. Investigate how they both became rich on their salary. Start taking money back from all of them for misuse of funds. I am sure they will help fund the wall then.
Just do it.  Sick of all this political positioning, wasted time and money.  GET IT DONE!  It's time to stand and protect our country and citizens.
Well USA is being plundered, and the fatality of legal persons is a devastating issue! As if WE Vets, and American born for generations...have no rights!  On a footnote, its very personal when one of your blood is drugged, raped in a horrible beating..violent enough to remove memory, physical  assault on entire body, robbed, left in a ditch like in a Biblical chapter. Barely lived, never the same. 4,000 in '16, '17 never talked again.  They had to be buried. 4,000 Americans unaccounted for, and not suspected of being indigent! The pirates are here by the tens of thousands of all nationalities and causes.
Dem-rats are worried that TRUMP will be the one that builds the wall! They want it...but they don't want his name attached to it. What a great achievement for the president to pull this off. History baby!
Build the wall that's all what matter.
Build the wall and enforce the laws!
I hope you will be able to clean DC.. Hoping you have all the evidence to make them all go to jail!!
Feds want paid you fucking blonde turd
Take the illegal immigrants challenge tonight and leave your doors unlocked while you sleep 😉   I bet you won’t!!!
The border isn't the issue you orange turd.
It was a stupid, narcissistic promise with no basis in fact.
Maybe get mexico to pay for it and stop being a crybaby bitch?After all,that was the promise,was it not?
Your job as president is to boost our ecconmy a wall would put us in a recession. Meanwhile China is trying declare war on us while your trying to separate us from our neighbors downsouth with the border wall money you can spend on our military defense to keep us safe from an imment attack from the Chinese government instead of making America a luxurious country which would be spoiled by mistreatment on one another as Americans.
IMPEACH TRUMP!!! TRUMP FOR PRISON!!! REPORT FAKE NAMES AND PROFILES!!! Eradicate the trolls!!!
Build that wall. It doesn't matter where the money comes from. We do not need or respect the democratic party. They have proved to be worthless.
To the democrats every illegal is a family looking for a better life, to the republicans it's a gang banger whose been deported 3 times before, or an ISIS terrorist in disguise. Truth is its both, good people and bad people. But we cannot help the good people until stop the bad people with a wall and make everyone go through at least as much security as at an airport.
Do what you have to do. Build the wall! They are arrogant assholes who waste billions of dollars on ridiculous crap every year! They don't care about anything but their own agenda not the people of this country. Build the wall 🇺🇸 Thank you for caring about us 💜
Democrats don’t care if anyone one dies. They love violence and crave corruption.  They steel all our money and give it to illegals and keep the rest for themselves.
You are an ignorant, useless human being.  I hope you die soon.  Very soon.
Take the illegal immigrants challenge tonight and leave your doors unlocked while you sleep 😉   I bet you won’t!!!
You are an ignorant, useless human being.  I hope you die soon.  Very soon.
I want the border secure.  I live in Texas and I can’t tell you several times  I hired someone with a Social Security number that turned  out to be fake when I filed it with Social Security. I never knowingly hired anyone who was illegal. That means that I paid someone $20 an hour for 40 hours a week and they did not pay any income taxes because they lied.   If you’re an illegal alien you cannot pay income tax because you do not have a Social Security number. Think about that Americans.
Karen Ann Bradshaw aren't taxes withheld from gross pay?
Maureen Gallagher Kawa - you’d have to ask my CPA.
Just put the military on the job put small bases every 40 miles
Make it where only US citizens can vote and the Democrats won’t give a rats tail about immigration.
Stopping you, because Democrats are idiots
So at this points the loves + likes = 14,086  laughs are 274.  Hmmmm
Democratic did not say we was going to pull up the wall you said come on trunk stop playing without money I got a building to manage be honest I rather deal with the Bush family you're the worst president I ever had in my life
Trump please don’t do this. We know you rich as hell but WE NOT. Everybody don’t have millions billions and trillions you shutting the govt down messing w ppl money is ridiculous those Mexicans going to find a way to do wadever they gonna do regardless of a WALL! A wall trump ?! A damn wall bro ? 5billion dollar wall ughhhhhhhhhh you really pissing the Americans off
A clean bipartisan bill was before you, ask Lil’ bitch McConnell where it is.
Stopping you.. Democrats are evil ! Stay strong in this trump !
YES, President Donald J. Trump. Americans want border security. You hear us clearly. BUILD THAT WALL. KEEP STANDING STRONG FOR THE PEOPLE. The Democrats couldn't stand to see you fulfill another one of your promises. You are showing them how a President ought to work for his country, his people and his God. If they had any true morals they would feel the shame. They are here for only their political games,  power and control and you shined the light on their darkness for those who wouldn't believe it. That's why they hate you so much. The light you shined on them showed more of who they truly are. PURE SELFISH EVIL. You busted them and now they are so angry.  We THE PEOPLE are ever so grateful for you. Thank you from the bottom of our hearts.
Maureen Gallagher Kawa - you’d have to ask my CPA.
Open Borders an easy way to attack America with bio-agents . CDC have identified anthrax as one of a few biological agents capable of causing death and disease in sufficient numbers to cripple a developed region or urban setting.
Don't give up Mr. President! Perhaps you should send Chuck and Nancy to one of the more active areas along the border for a while and then see if they feel the same way. We need this wall.
Americans do want border security! What we don’t want is those 2 morons in charge holding up the funds. There acting like  pissed off jealous children.  Enough !!!
2022243121 This is the # to contact your representative ... demand funding for border security now!!! SHARE SHARE SHARE
Is it time for dumbass to start lying and blaming yet?
We need this wall built...enough of illegal immigrants entering this country for how many years now?
Democrats have pure evil hate for Trump and America. Their choice is greed and power. Americans are becoming more aware. Less freebies to illegals will build the wall period.
Democrats don’t care how many people are killed by illegals. They don’t want him to fix this country...
BUILD THE WALL!!! ARREST THE DEEP STATE COMMUNISTS!!!
Yes we do! Build the Wall !!! In the meantime redirect all illegals to Schumer's and plus he's house. They can provide the room and board for them and then figure out how to get them out
YES, President Donald J. Trump. Americans want border security. You hear us clearly. BUILD THAT WALL. KEEP STANDING STRONG FOR THE PEOPLE. The Democrats couldn't stand to see you fulfill another one of your promises. You are showing them how a President ought to work for his country, his people and his God. If they had any true morals they would feel the shame. They are here for only their political games,  power and control and you shined the light on their darkness for those who wouldn't believe it. That's why they hate you so much. The light you shined on them showed more of who they truly are. PURE SELFISH EVIL. You busted them and now they are so angry.  We THE PEOPLE are ever so grateful for you. Thank you from the bottom of our hearts.
Yes we do! Build the Wall !!! In the meantime redirect all illegals to Schumer's and plus he's house. They can provide the room and board for them and then figure out how to get them out
Steve Calvin get them on assistance and they are gov owned! Dems count on this...it is a form of control.
BUILD THE WALL!!! ARREST THE DEEP STATE COMMUNISTS!!!
You just need to start blasting out little videos where all these dems have said they are for border security.  Call them out on their hypocrisy.  I bet they fold instantly.
Build the the wall Trump keep us safe,piss on That Bitch Pelosi!!!
They already made illegal x on they birth certificates now all they gotta do is cross the border it's a set up Build that wall by any means..
Shut it down.  Government spending is out of control.  I’d rather spend money on a wall then to support illegal immigrants pouring into our country
Yeah but a working government will suffice
Lost another irrational fb yesterday over this issue.  She called the President the “liar in chief” and accused me of having a “hateful heart” when I said that an illegal Dominican drug lord who lives in my hometown in RI, and has been arrested multiple times, should be deported.  🙄  Unfriended her! Why are people lacking common sense?  The wall isn’t going to solve all the problems if states (like RI and MA) refuse to send illegals that are arrested to ICE for deportation.
Nancy Pelosi has a wall around her house, yet she doesn’t want a wall to protect the American people. Chuck Schumer locks the doors to his home and office, but doesn’t want a wall and Ports of Entry to protect the American people. The Democrats not only want to give billions to other countries, but they want to give $12 Billion MORE this year, which they seemed to find the funds for, yet they refuse to allocate less than half that amount to protect the American people. The Democrats voted for a wall and tougher border security for President Obama, but refuse to support border security under President Trump. Schumer is mad because he claims President Trump hasn’t given him any words on how the money is spent, but was perfectly fine with passing Obamacare without reading the Bill. Democrats hate President Trump, and they hate everyone who voted for him. And they are willing to make all of us pay for that.
Call a national emergency and bypass the idiots.
Amen 🙏🏼 we will get our wall weather you like it or not.Democrat leaders hate God.Republican want what God wants.We love babies and would never kill them like the Democrats.Who do you think God will help.Baby killers or People who want Gods word to rule our land.The wall is only about keeping our country safe for our people.And anyone can come here If they obey the law and come in by the rules.We are all made and loved♥️by God🇺🇸
Steve Calvin get them on assistance and they are gov owned! Dems count on this...it is a form of control.
You are a national disgrace and a global embarrassment.  You are also a fraud and a pathological liar.  Do go to jail soon. 👋🇺🇸 #MAGA
Trump rocks! Nancy and Schumer are idiots.
They want to stop you, but please keep doing what the American people voted you into office to do!!! Many people pray for you daily and for the protection you need from the maniacs on the 'other side'.....
Build the wall and at the same time focus on true reform.  It shouldn't take a person years and thousands of dollars to legally immigrate.    Make it easier to immigrate while at the same time eliminate ANY access to welfare benefits which should be for citizens only.  Build the Wall,  Thank you for finally being the President who will do what is right to protect the border and put principle, values above the needs of a political party.
The Democrats are being ASSHOLES. The American people want the wall, but they won't give an inch. Just to make Trump look bad. I hope there's a landslide victory for Trump in 2020.
Buy commercials giving arrest stats, educate voters on dangers. Dems don’t care, only want illegals to vote
Build  the  wall.    Control  who  enters  our  country.
Get back to work. You're not accomplishing anything except hurting your own people.  ...idiot
Amen 🙏🏼 we will get our wall weather you like it or not.Democrat leaders hate God.Republican want what God wants.We love babies and would never kill them like the Democrats.Who do you think God will help.Baby killers or People who want Gods word to rule our land.The wall is only about keeping our country safe for our people.And anyone can come here If they obey the law and come in by the rules.We are all made and loved♥️by God🇺🇸
F*cking appalling!!! Words do not express the hope I have that these assholes feel the worst pain imaginable as they burn in hell for eternity.   Thank you Mr. President Trump and all who support the defense and security of this country.
They’re stopping you from showing your tax returns!? SOB’s P.S. “Or else I’ll shut it down” is not “working together”.
Build the wall, steel barrier!
they are so full of hate for you that they see nothing good in what you are trying to achieve for the Americans.   I for one do not favor illegal aliens taking over our country.   If they want to join in the legal fashion then fine but otherwise get your scrawny ass out of here!!!!
Yeah he promised Mexico would pay for the wall the lieing SOB.
Build that wall and take the pay of Congress as well as the little guys
They are demons. Thank u I wish you could fire there asses
The dumbocrats are the ones to blame for government workers not getting paid. Pull your heads out of your ass and give this man our president the money he needs to protect our country by building that wall. What's its gonna take?!?!? Your mother, sister, daughter, son, father...the list goes on of people that we love that we can lose or be harmed by these people you're protecting and accepting into our country. Not to mention the expense that we have to undergo when they come in.
They are demons. Thank u I wish you could fire there asses
Turn that border into a canal! Dig it deep enough that the sides become a natural wall. Then the US and Mexico get trade growth from the canal being used, and we get a deterrent to illegal border crossings!
Jason Jones  a canal in a drought desert area????
Canals need water, right?
Peggy-Lynn Reeves A good portion has the Rio Grande, not desert area. It’s feasible, look at the Suez Canal.
Why do illegals think it is the American taxpayers responsibility to make their dreams come true.  We should take the hundred and50 billion $ a year we spend on illegals and put it into our infrastructure our teachers and everything else that is already here
Will you PLEASE STOP JERKING Around and just CLOSE The F&&ing BORDER!!!!!!
Your promise was to have Mexico pay for your stupid wall not us Americans Fucktard! Don't sweep that HUGE detail under the rug about your so called promise
he is the most stupid mother fucker ever why this punk is fucking with all american people money irs and tax season has nothing to do at all with ur fucking wall bitch mexican people dont jump walls that was back in the days mexicans cross the border walking also in cars even traveling u so the most disgusting human being in the whole world u shutdown irs for ur ego bullshit we got nothing to do with ur damn wall done deal we work and we pay taxes year by year
Don’t give in to those parasites.
bastard shrestha showing 2 times payal,abhilasha shreshth  in joe biden likes,comment, n namrata shrestha father showing me,tat u are with another 2 namrata bastard ,to me u are making servant to use me,tat i should share for tat all,sooooooooooooooooooo u boring, u are soooo boring man, knoxx very romantic, hob soooo flexible smart good,your choice,your tribe useless boring, greedycheap,health disturbance poison lady, u will see one day, tat u will loss,becoz u are very very proudy lier man,those man lie with cultured girl,they will definitely loss,material istic u win,but inside u are poor.
The biggest threat to security is him. By shutting down the government he has caused the TSA to become weaker which means threats can come via  airports. Food stamps which people depend on are not getting them which will result in a increase of crime because people get desperate. federal workers are not being payed not knowing what or if they will get paid. If you support trump you have no compassion or foresight to see who your ignorance is effecting. You do realize your country is in trillions of dollars of debt and he wants to spend what you don't have. His grandmother was an illegal immigrant the same thing you say was said to his own family members.
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall.
Drag them POS dems to the boarder in the middle of no where and leave them over night
I Am Sick And Tired of Pelosi And The Bunch 😠 Fire them All and lets get people in there that supports and works with our president not against.   We the people of the US needs to start making a stand and get them out. They have set comfortable for too long now getting a good paycheck and if they cannot put the citizens best interest at heart first then they need to be let go.. Bye-Bye ✋
Peggy-Lynn Reeves A good portion has the Rio Grande, not desert area. It’s feasible, look at the Suez Canal.
I Am Sick And Tired of Pelosi And The Bunch 😠 Fire them All and lets get people in there that supports and works with our president not against.   We the people of the US needs to start making a stand and get them out. They have set comfortable for too long now getting a good paycheck and if they cannot put the citizens best interest at heart first then they need to be let go.. Bye-Bye ✋
Murdering babies globally>protecting the U.S.A.
Gary Fiktus stupid
Susann Lund democrats are not stupid,just immoral.......
ahh priorities..priorities......
Drag them POS dems to the boarder in the middle of no where and leave them over night
Trash speech from a trash president
I'm in Mexico right now. Every h ilme here has a wall around it, a fence around it and razor wire all along the rop. So if the Mexican families need this ro be safe, then why should we ler MS13 run freely into the U.S.? The democrats say only 6 terrorists caught at the norder. Guess what it only takes ONE TERRORIST to cause a mass casualty!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!! Sir you have a phone and a pen just like Obama did!
Bomb Mexico NOW before they attack !!!
Whatever rump, you started this asshole. It's all on you. You said you would take the blame, but of course you folded, you ass!
Build a wall and legalize recreational pot. That’s how you win in 2020. MAGA
Walls keep prisoners in jail wall can keep asshole out
Stop belittling Blacks and Latinos like a lot of us aren’t professionals or educated and only do menial jobs. Not true! Remember, we had a President, Obama. We’re not in the slavery days! Remember those days when y’all beat, hung and raped us at a whim, for nothing as usual, just cruel. Stop crying and acting like y’all are so innocent and helpless with your mass murders and serial killers and rapists.
A wall that can be bypassed or destroyed, not to mention most drug traffic comes through air and sea, and most illegals use a legal passport or permit, look it up, not mention the effect on the wildlife this wall could have, i am all for security but there's got to be smarter ways to accomplish it and to invest our money
ahh priorities..priorities......
Then hire more border control security and use the funds to pay them not build a pointless wall, you twat.
Build wall. Shut down border. Deport ever single SOB that’s here illegal. Be making trillions because not feeding scum. MAGAFOREVER!!!!!!!
Democrats are just obstructionists that need to be hung for treason...
Build the wall. Somebody that knows how, start a GoFundMe.
Build the wall.  If walls don't work then the next DNC and RNC will not put a wall around the arena area they are at.  Lets all hold our breath.  They will be putting up walls...just wait.   What a bunch of elected idiots.
Shut down is fine! We hope for a New Party! No more corrupt Democrat Party! Please install not only Border Walls but An American People Freedom Party! What’s in America is for America until people out there learn to come into our country legally!
How about Congress take their pay, ALL OF IT, away to pay those who are not getting paid if they are so 'concerned' for the American people?! How about that?  MAYBE then they will get off their high horse ass n heads out of their asses get this shut down over with!!!
The vermin would sell out their country to get more votes.
Pelosi and Schumer are full of bull. It is their goal to deny you anything.  https://youtu.be/uDIrbU33o_Q
A wall that can be bypassed or destroyed, not to mention most drug traffic comes through air and sea, and most illegals use a legal passport or permit, look it up, not mention the effect on the wildlife this wall could have, i am all for security but there's got to be smarter ways to accomplish it and to invest our money
We want border security and we are tired of taking hardworking taxpayers money being used to take care of these people what the people nor and raised in this country I mean it's crazy how many people I know that both parents work overtime and they still have no health insurance I just don't get it sometimes I think democrats have dumbed this country down so much that maybe another country will just nuke us democrats won't shut up till there's nothing left
We do.  The Democrats need to get their heads out of their tails and fund the wall.
They are not after you. It's a dumb idea you narcissistic idiot.  What's more important is putting that money back into the nation not in a flaming barrier that provides nothing back.
Anyone else think that perhaps the real reason the left doesn’t want this is possibly the old divide and conquer thing, possibly created by NWO to make this country fail?  The wall makes total sense, at least financially. But the left doesn’t want to pay for it. But they’ll pay subsidies for a sanctuary city. Two words. Illegal ( meaning not legal) alien ( meaning not of this nation) . By that definition, which is a very basic one, how can the left condone the immigration problem?  The wall needs to be in place!
Build the wall & lock them all up!!!
Thank god he’s off the air. What a fucking liar. Remove him by any means possible to preserve the constitution.
Only terrorists and stupid people are against the wall.  TRUMP 2020!
They dgaf about the American people, stop anything with trumps name on it at all cost, at any measure.  Lie, scream, distort, propagandize.  They dgaf... do what needs to be done at any cost.  Dont give them an opportunity or heads up on anything, that gives them time to twist and lie thier asses off.  We support you mr president, we voted for you to do, not play politics with these moronic crackheads...
smart border security, not a dumb ass wall.
Build the wall, anyone with a little common sense no we need it
Pelosi and Schumer are full of bull. It is their goal to deny you anything.  https://youtu.be/uDIrbU33o_Q
Build the wall, it is sad they try calling illegal immigrants, migrants, no they are illegal immigrants
you gotta make a consequence fit the argument : Shut down just the entitlement programs that illegals come here for at the hands of un-willing tax payers, then re-open the rest...you’ll never lose this way.
Republicans are such sheep.  Are you all too dumb to actually see what this guy is doing.   Distraction Distraction Distraction.  Wake up people.   There is no crisis at the southern border.  The crisis is taking place in the Pumpkin man’s head.
Build the wall and then deport all criminals.
Instead of spending all this money on the wall why don't we use some to fix it up a little bit, but  also use some to strengthen our immigration laws, and also fix our welfare system. Instead of helping the lazy jerks that sit at all all day why not give them a reason to work instead of just giving them food stamps, section 8 and public housing. Why don't we reserve those things for the actual working middle class people who other wise can not afford to live and support their families even though they are working 40+ hours a week!
Please don’t activate the fucking obama care
Hopefully they'll come to their sences
GRAB MERICA BY THE PUSSY AND BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall, anyone with a little common sense no we need it
Wow, the garbage that is going on right now is absurd.  We've heard many Presidents say that border security is imperative yet it is still a problem today.  Why, because it's never been addressed like Donald J. Trump is addressing it.  Change is HARD, we cannot continue to allow floods of people to come here, for 1 many are ill and our healthcare systems are already taxed, 2 many/most don't speak English and if their children go to school the teachers have to accommodate/bring in additional bi-lingual teachers (another expense on our tax dollars)...I need to shut up.  Open borders aren't fair to those that want/need to come here legally and to allow them will only bring the U.S. down to a marginal/minimal way of life.  Not fair to anyone.
Screw the leftist losers!!!
Stop being a pussy and make those faggets build the wall
I believe in legal immigration but not illegal immigration.  If this continue this country will become a cesspool.  We have enough crime from our own citizens. We don’t need criminals from other countries
The majority don't want a wall. There is no security crisis at our southern border. You're shutdown is hurting families and the economy. You're keeping children in cages and allowing them to be physically and sexually abused. NO WALL! This is not Germany.
If you build the wall my generation will tare it down. The wall is almost as dumb as Trump saying there has been a border issue in the US for thousands of years... How can anyone support this lying, ignorant wanna be dictator.
Build the wall, deport all illegals, no benefits of any kind for illegals/"refugees" Tel them the American Frere Ride is over.
Your a FUCKING JOKE, CANT WAIT FOR BREAKING NEWS TO BE TRUMP HAS BEEN KILLED
You would have to be wilfully ignorant, or just a complete moron to not know that Trump is the most corrupt president in our nation's history.
GRAB MERICA BY THE PUSSY AND BUILD THE WALL
Your promise has been broken you fucktard. You said Mexicans were going to pay for that wall. Now the very people that voted for you are now not getting a paycheck, quit working, and now not protecting our country. So full of yourself but a great salesman you are.
Soon as food stamps run out the Democrats will be crying for border security to
Build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall
Please don't forget to pray that God be merciful to us, for allowing our country to get this way.  For anyone who has the mind to do it, let's get on our knees and ask God's forgiveness for turning our backs on him.  We're the ones who have elected silly and evil people to our lawmaking offices.  Now we have to pray for rescue from them, that is, from the evil one who motivates them.  God bless.
They're a bunch of pathetic weirdos scumbags
Both sides have played the border wall card. Its just different now because... ya know... the POTUS is a dickhead.
We need to be protected from your worthless ass, you fucktard.
You are protecting us this idiot Democrats they don't want to give it to you that money because they're jealous you're going to be success that's what they don't want to give it to you
Lmao Asshat up there says gas is up to 3 bucks a gallon lmao must live in a blue state, here in Ohio it's under 2 bucks. Build that wall Mr President
You would have to be wilfully ignorant, or just a complete moron to not know that Trump is the most corrupt president in our nation's history.
Lmao Asshat up there says gas is up to 3 bucks a gallon lmao must live in a blue state, here in Ohio it's under 2 bucks. Build that wall Mr President
You are a disgrace to the American people
Robin Strampe Wonders Your mother just posted. She wants that basement thoroughly cleaned up as soon as your finished playing on the computer. I told her I’d tell you.
David Regan really?? That's the best you got?? That's so over played. Move on to an original "insult" please.
You are protecting us this idiot Democrats they don't want to give it to you that money because they're jealous you're going to be success that's what they don't want to give it to you
David Regan really?? That's the best you got?? That's so over played. Move on to an original "insult" please.
Right now we need security at our airports where we are actually stopping thousands on our terror list. Agents aren’t being paid.  You sir are a fraud.   Do us a favor and crawl back into your reality tv hole    You make a piss poor human.
why do you think we need a wall,, they don't just come through the airports ya know..  tell it congress..
...Cheryl Ostrow ...Please Do Not Breed...
Robin Strampe Wonders Your mother just posted. She wants that basement thoroughly cleaned up as soon as your finished playing on the computer. I told her I’d tell you.
It'll be great when the wall is finished them we can really fix our problems and not have to worry about illegals coming over
We need to secure the border, get rid of sanctuary cities, and really fix our country.
We need to stop allowing illegal aliens to come here and have babies to get them social security numbers! If you don’t have SS# neither should your child.
BUILD THE WALL!  American security and safety over political garbage!
We need a country with  common sense.we need a press that tells both sides of a story so people can judge there selves.ive never seen a country so messed up
Finished the border wall fence, it will help secure our border esp. our country security. Why much America spend to control the invasions of illegals w/ more coming plus those American cities w/ sanctuaries for those illegals
...Cheryl Ostrow ...Please Do Not Breed...
Finished the border wall fence, it will help secure our border esp. our country security. Why much America spend to control the invasions of illegals w/ more coming plus those American cities w/ sanctuaries for those illegals
How are democrats stopping you from building a wall you said Mexico would pay for? Is it because you lied and are now trying to stick American tax payers with the $25 billion dollar wall. Your stupid wall idea only covers a small percentage of the country and does absolutely nothing to stop the 40% of immigrants that fly in. Your $25 billion dollar wall will do nothing to stop illegal immigration. Why dont you just be honest and admit you know how to embezel and extort a ton of money from this wall project.
Dennis Coughlan sssssshhhhhh
Susan Davison, I know right. The truth isnt something these trumpanzees want to hear.
Dennis Coughlan I don't get it, if I want to keep you out of my yard and I build a big ass wall with Barb wire on top with cameras , with sensors on the ground, your saying it won't stop you? It will stop   95% of it for sure
You must not have seen the videos of the fat woman with children walking across the very high 4' off the ground piece of wire and walking right in. Clueless
Mike Stoumbaugh, no it won't. Because if you build your wall like trumps, its only going to stop me from the south entrance. I've still got access from the East, West and North.
We need a country with  common sense.we need a press that tells both sides of a story so people can judge there selves.ive never seen a country so messed up
What a twat you are. The only reason you want to build that wall is to have your name on it The Trump wall. Like the The Trump tower. You selfish twat. Nothing is normal coming out from your little ugly piggy mouth 🤮
Go Trump. People seem to forget that the Clintons and the Obama government did nothing to sort out the border problems, so thousands of illegal immigrants under their rein poured into America and have robbed America of jobs, taxes and people's lives! Trump is trying to solve a problem caused by years of bad government but now you DemonRATS blame him! Guess you forgot The DemocRATS closed down the government too when they were in power. Apply legally to come into America and not illegally! Keep up the good work and don't let these snowflakes into power ever again. MAGA
the border is secure. you are unfit for office. RESIGN.
Would be an interesting experiment to put a wall around CA and see what kind of secure life they would end up with bearing in mind their mindset on allowing the illegals to stay in the US.  They want them, now live with them all confined to CA, but then again, you would have to keep them all within that wall.  I wonder just how long it would take before the people told the governor "Your Fired".
What an ass Mexico was supposed to pay that was the promise
Every poll taken shows that the majority of Americans don't want your expensive, unnecessary, stupid vanity wall which you want only so that you can brag to your uneducated base that you kept your promise. Even if you got the wall,  you.lied over and over again that Mexico would.pay for it. Trumped up fake crisis by a lying,  cheating, unqualified jerk of a president desperate to save his.own corrupt hide! Reopen the government and stop lying (if that is even possible!)
Even if you somehow get your stupid wall you still wouldn't be keeping your so called promise. Remember, YOU PROMISED MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT. Now you want American tax payers to pay for it.
Build the wall and drain the Pelosi swamp!
Build the wall and take the Democrats money and pay for the wall ESPECIALLY Nancy polsie's that dried up prune has got it lol
Mike Stoumbaugh, no it won't. Because if you build your wall like trumps, its only going to stop me from the south entrance. I've still got access from the East, West and North.
Build the wall and take the Democrats money and pay for the wall ESPECIALLY Nancy polsie's that dried up prune has got it lol
In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments.  Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
Build the wall and drain the Pelosi swamp!
Bwhahaha 😂 you promised Mexico would pay for it you dumb-f! 😂 remember? “Who’s gonna pay for it?!?!” At your klan gathering. 😂
Keep it shut down, Mr President. We know you are fighting alone up there. But WE THE PEOPLE have your back. To Hell with those gutless republicans who refused to use the "nuclear option". Damn all of them.
Impeach the dumbass orange man
33% of people (aka your base) are the only ones that want it. You’re a complete dumbass.  I voted for you because I’m independent and you said you would drain the swamp and you weren’t a politician. You are a traitor to the US and tax cheat that uses the oval to line your pockets while you spread lies to your base because they are too uneducated to call you out on your BS. You should be ashamed of yourself.
Build the fucking wall and cage yourself.
When the wall is finally built throw Pelosi and Schumer over it.
I’m neither party but if you think a wall is going to stop drugs from coming in here and the murder rate is going drop you are crazy and believe me I’m all about protecting our country been there done that. If you want to convince me about boarder protecting put in mine fields, gun towers with air support from Apache helicopters. It will be 100 times effective a lot cheaper and guess what... it will produce jobs especially for our veterans! Once you see love ones getting their heads blown off better yet blown to pieces I bet you stop trying to cross! VIOLENCE is the ANSWER 💯🇺🇸💯a wall what a joke! Where you thing the drugs and real terrorist are coming from! It’s sure not south of the boarder! They fly in from ALL over the world and let their VISA run out! Americans are stupid and I can’t believe you let some rich politician scare y’all like a bunch of babies! I don’t live in fear 💯
Obviously, the thing that is most important to the demoncrats is to destroy America.
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE....
They hate anything about you, it’s crazy. Just keep it. I’m  sorry for the people that aren’t getting paid but this is the only way that we’re ever going to have a secure country, if we don’t do this now there’s going to be Mayhem!! Alll  is you’re trying to do is secure this country why would anybody be against this, it makes no idea unless there something political behind it then it makes perfect sense!!!! Drain that SWAMP!!!!!!!
Build the wall or bring back the scalp trade
The DEA doesn't want the wall because it won't help. Drugs come in primarily through normal points of entry, or by boat, plane. Illegal immigrants, on the scale that affect american jobs, come in via overstays. It's pure bullshit. We don't need this wall. Illegal immigration across the southern border has been trending down and is now net NEGATIVE. The idea that the wall will improve the US Job market is nonsense. What is at stake here is bigger than $5bn in the federal budget. It is about making decisions RATIONLLY and on the basis of facts and analysis of them. https://foreignpolicy.com/2017/08/29/trump-says-border-wall-will-stop-drugs-heres-what-a-dea-intel-report-says/
2020 no more bullshit go Trump . Don’t stop now
Oh dear , but didn’t they(terrorists )fly in an attack New York ..... you should not be letting government employees shoulder the burden of the shut down , its not their crisis and when senators are about to receive a pay increase...... the world is watching an sniggering at this circus !!!
The Democrats are only refusing because of who is asking. That is it. They did not act like that when Obama was President. He should have been thrown in Prison along with Hillary...but they did nothing. But yet, they keep going after President Donald J. Trump. It doesn't matter what it is, they will keep working against our President and every member in the Federal government that is doing that needs to be kicked out of Office. We want our elected Officials to what we elected them to do, and that is to secure our borders and keep our country safe. We write their pay checks...it's time they do their job..or get out!
Yeah, border security, not a pointless fucking wall
Lock them up for treason!  They are not for securing our border but willing to spend tons of money for illegals??
Build the wall. Keep the government shut down with no pay till its funded. Citizens and taxpayers safety first. Why are we paying taxes to political hacks not serving us but their own interest in a first place? Perhaps we should stop paying till the swamp is drained and term limits are in place.
Obviously, the thing that is most important to the demoncrats is to destroy America.
Build it on Mexico side
Democrats just want cheap labor and votes .phony bastards
Build that wall!!! Suck it up and get over it ,you crybaby Dems! You don’t care about the people ( the US citizens or the immigrants) you just hate Trump because he stands for the people not his own agenda. 😡
Build that wall Trumpy. Promises made promises kept!
Build the wall get on with fire all the demo rats we don't need them anyway
Send ALL the illegals to Ca. and let them deal with the problem. See how long that last.
Most of amerika want you to go back to Russia
Shut up already you blowhard. So sick of your lying face I could puke. Worst president of my lifetime, hands down.
Build the wall cos it's job creation. Use steal so you have to paint it which is more job creation. Give Mexicans proper work visas so they don't get exploited . Spend money on this and stop the oil stealing wars that pay terrorists.
Build the wall. Keep the government shut down with no pay till its funded. Citizens and taxpayers safety first. Why are we paying taxes to political hacks not serving us but their own interest in a first place? Perhaps we should stop paying till the swamp is drained and term limits are in place.
Shut down the boarder period. The lost trade would be Mexico's share of the build and for those US businesses that lose revenue on the can claim from the pot of money not being paid to illegals and noncitizens.
Our country is in massive debt. Letting in more and more illegals will continue to make OUR debt, healthcare cost, job loss, and lots of other problems increase. Who's going to pay for it? Increase taxes? There's going to be a point where the government asks to much of its citizens and it will cripple all Americans into relying on a government that can't afford it. The problem is wasteful spending by our government. I know a lot of people think the wall is wasteful spending but I ask you, compare it to the next 10 years of taking care of new citizens who can't take care of themselves? Majority of the people crossing the border illegally are not skilled and are looking for our government to take care of them. If it continues it will be our largest economic downfall in history... And we are doing it to ourselves. One party wants this, why? Simple, future votes... Anyone coming across the boarder currently has the chance of becoming a citizen and will vote for the party helping them... That will silent your vote as current citizen.... Something to think about.
Mr.President  You have to shut down obamas state of emergencies. And take down these crooks. The time is now. Before the next bunch of crazys steal their way into our government.  Look its time to fight these crooks. File state of emergency and tell America what these crooks have been doing. And their plan to bring America down. Please I see the time. And Americans at least some have no ideal. But you know the truth and if you wait . These people will keep it up until America is gone. The power is yours to save America from foreign powers and these sick sick evil people. GOD is real and to save America is to break the back of this state and government crooks. You can tell yourself these people will back off. They will not. And if they tell you this they are evil liars . You know the truth. Now save this NATION before its destroyed and can't be fixed. You are the Man. And our prayer and hopes are in you . Because GOD allowed you this time.  Remember this maybe the only chance we as true Americans get. Thank you. And may GOD guide you with power to destroy evil. I Believe. So do what's right.
As long as it KEEPS ILLEGALS OUT OF THIS COUNTRY works for me! BUILD it right in the first place so we won't have to keep doing it! You'd THINK, with AS MANY Congressmen/women that are MILLIONAIRES, that they would HELP to make our country safer, but they're so tight fisted and require so much more of us citizens. They want this country to fail so they can make it a socialist country!
Why don't the president STOP the free ride for the illegal immigrants that are in America illegally?? Stop the free ride!!!
The companies that used to be in America and move to Mexico make them pay for the fucking wall like Chrysler GM Hersey must I go on . I hope President Trump gets this message those companies went to Mexico for cheaper labor and then fucked the American people out of jobs. Never again will I buy a American product that was Built in Mexico.
Build the walls and then put bombs along it.
Please HELP to STOP CORRUPTION in Romania! Thieves and convicted people in the Government! NO ETHICS! Political system over Justice.  Communism undercover! Thank you and GOD bless us!
Democrats are not afraid the wall won't work. They are afraid the wall will work! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA
And all I here from the Democrats is raise taxes without the wall. I'm beginning to see more problems from Democrats then from Mexico. Cut Mexico off now!
Build the wall cos it's job creation. Use steal so you have to paint it which is more job creation. Give Mexicans proper work visas so they don't get exploited . Spend money on this and stop the oil stealing wars that pay terrorists.
They suck President Trump! Thank God ur President. America still has a chance
Yes. Keep us safe from them and all the disease they bring with them. I cant afford to get sick thanks to Obummer care. <><
Stand your ground Mr. President.  Build that wall! It's time that America does for the American people.. stop all foreign aid, induce term limits theres too many corrupt people in congress. We need to do away with big pharma ( the ones lining the Democrats crooked little pockets and turning them against their own country), Nancy and Chuck also need to be held accountable for putting America at risk by causing delays to national security.
Ask pelosi why do you have a wall around your house. I’m so sick of these brain dead Dems. You are the ones I’d like to impeach. DO YOUR DAM JOBS!
Democratic Party are all a bunch of hypocrites! Please build the wall and drain the swamp! You are doing a wonderful job as our president! Thank you and God Bless you and our nation🇺🇸🙏
Here's a thought on how to help fund the wall/fence/barrier and indirectly make Mexico pay for it. Levy a $20 tax on every money order being sent from individuals in the US to individuals in Mexico. Millions leave our country every day in the form of money orders sent from here to there. Many illegal immigrants work here, live on very little so they can send thousands back home with the plan of retiring there. That is money that benefits Mexico's economy instead of ours.
Stopping you is always #1 for the Democrats. You could say you were giving all of your wealth to everyone below the poverty line and they would do everything to stop you.
They want illegals to come in! They’re gonna need workers for the marijuana fields.... 😲🤔🤷🏼‍♂️
Walls work where you put them.  Let’s get walls going where Border Patrol has identified they want them. What can it hurt?  This country blows enough money on stupid stuff. Amazing how Obama could stuff planes full of cash to Iran but nothing for Trumps wall?
And all I here from the Democrats is raise taxes without the wall. I'm beginning to see more problems from Democrats then from Mexico. Cut Mexico off now!
Walls work where you put them.  Let’s get walls going where Border Patrol has identified they want them. What can it hurt?  This country blows enough money on stupid stuff. Amazing how Obama could stuff planes full of cash to Iran but nothing for Trumps wall?
Oh my god some one needs to give me a call because I live down south and illegals kill our animals and breaking in to houses while children are sleeping to steal; there are barrels set out with high flags with Augua to stop them from damaging our property
Lora Hill you're right the closer you get to the border the worse it gets. But if you listen to mainstream media or the Democrats nothing wrong with our borders.
James McCaskill I know and it makes me so mad that everyone has an opinion but never experience the effects
Lora Hill Well one reason is all the mainstream media will show is some women and kids trying to come in. Not the thousands of drug runners who terrorize anyone who gets in your way. Or the one officer who covers 1000 square miles. Are the families whose lives are threatened by the cartels.
James McCaskill  yes and we the family comes in to support them is about6,000 dollars a month
Lora Hill it's has to stop now or we will become a 3rd world country. But that's what the globalist are hoping for. I for one don't know what to do but get ready to fight. Just wanting on someone to say GO!!
They want illegals to come in! They’re gonna need workers for the marijuana fields.... 😲🤔🤷🏼‍♂️
Lora Hill it's has to stop now or we will become a 3rd world country. But that's what the globalist are hoping for. I for one don't know what to do but get ready to fight. Just wanting on someone to say GO!!
We  do  not  need  a  fucking  wall!    We  need  a  better  president!
Paula Gluck and you obviously need a brain . Says the one with the last name that's the sound when I chug a beer lol. Gluck the duck
James McCaskill  yes and we the family comes in to support them is about6,000 dollars a month
You promised mexico would pay for it.Lies are all you bring to the table.Worst president in the history of our country.
Dear president  Trump,I am  so  sorry  for  the  way  you  are  being  treated .  I thank  God  for  putting  you  in  the  White  house  I hope  you  succeed  in all you  plan if it's   in  God's  will. God's  will and his plan must come first. If you  let the Lord  lead you  then the devil has no power . WE will  be  praying  for  you .
Yes, border security is a must and special for a republic. If not the hyenas, zebras, and the wild dogs will enter the republic and take cover under democracy as every hooliganism is done under democracy.
No we don't want another wall Trump, we need better trade and jobs...we need cheap illegal immigrants to do our dirty work
My Prez, do what i elected you to do! Hell with stupid idiots with fences around their yards!
Anyone that can’t see this is political is a pure idiot !!!
Chuck and Nancy want to build a wall with the bodies of American Citizens. They have a good start. Their illegal aliens slaughter Americans daily. Among other hideousness crimes.
We need more to stop those who would enter illegally, wall/fence/whatever you want to call it - BUILD IT (so they don't come) ;) lol
Paula Gluck and you obviously need a brain . Says the one with the last name that's the sound when I chug a beer lol. Gluck the duck
Donald, with all your billions, why don’t you build a 50 foot steel wall around yourself and stay there. We need to protect ourselves from you. You are crazy, corrupt and dangerous !!!
Illegals are bringing disease like HIV and TB and sticking us with the bill
Yes Build the Wall, our security is at risk, I’m convinced that Dems care more about illegals than the citizens they are sworn to protect 😡 Ask yourself why they want all this chaos at the border??? Who’s getting kickbacks from all the drugs that come across #followthemoney
Donald your doing great. Build that wall and tell the Democrats to go to hell. They are worthless deal killers. We love God Country and proud your our president
Hey do you stupid trump supporters ever feel it in the ass?
I say that Trump you should demand the justice department to file criminal charges against local leaders, and state government leaders who knowingly violate: U.S. Code › Title 8 › Chapter 12 › Subchapter II › Part VIII › § 1324                                                                                             (iii)   knowing or in reckless disregard of the fact that an alien has come to, entered, or remains in the United States in violation of law, conceals, harbors, or shields from detection, or attempts to conceal, harbor, or shield from detection, such alien in any place, including any building or any means of transportation;                                       Sanctuary cities????
We sure do! 100% behind you Mr. PRESIDENT do not let Dems kill America! Fight Fight Fight you are RIGHT!!!
No. They don’t.   "Because the people of this country don't want criminals and people that have lots of problems and drugs pouring into our country. So I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it," Trump continued, seemingly oblivious to the fact that he was taking ownership of a potentially costly and unpopular breakdown in federal government operations.
Forget the Wall.. Just take away the reward.  Enforced laws make it illegal to hire Illegals.. Laws with teeth and severe penalties.  Simple.
We need more to stop those who would enter illegally, wall/fence/whatever you want to call it - BUILD IT (so they don't come) ;) lol
Build the wall, borrow the money from Mexico, then don't pay it back.
Its not fair that we pay taxes for illegals and the fact that they have bought up 75% of dallas where is all this money coming from whentheyco.e from nothing why do we have to pay for them ??? Also how do illegals file taxes with no legal documents?? I have a diverse family and i am for every one but this is not right nor fair to us BUILD THE WALL!!
Wow what a fucking coward .... rump is in the sewer where he is most comfortable spewing crap 💩
I want immigrants to come here legally we have drugs and crime overflowing from the border build the wall
Them Democrats need a pay cut all useless!! Build the wall ! You are the president
Democrats want more Illegals so they get more votes
I wish congress would get off our president Trumps back and let our President do his job and keep his campaign promise and make our country safe or has congress and the American people 4-got 911. We the Americans  pay our taxes, pay our own bills p ay for our own homes work for supporting our family.  What does the Illegal immigrants pay for ?
Americans do not want to pay for border security.  Just your uneducated trumptards.
They will never go for anything just because they hate and love to spite the President.
Schumer and Pelosi 2  slimey snakes that look guilty...
Build the wall! How many of you have fences around your yard and would prefer someone to knock on your front door before walking around your backyard, fences protect you and your family the border is the same thing we're not against immigrants just illegal immigration!
69% don't think your temper tantrum Wall is necessary at this moment. 59% OPPOSE  it altogether. Grow up you inept, paid grades educated, coward. Bone spurs kept your chickenass out of military service but they don't seem to hurt your fatass playing golf.
President Trump. Have a group of people make a list of all the crimes committed to American’s from illegals. Plus all the illegals that are working and getting paid money who are not paying taxes. I would bet that number to be in the billions. These facts will show congress that we need a wall.
Americans want better pay and less cost of living . Good health insurance and less medication idiot
They want power and greed..at our expense. I'm so sick of congress.
Build the wall, toss those who oppose it over it and let’s see how well it works!
We live on the border. Its scary at best! The country has no idea of the drugs and criminals and drug runners pouring over the border. BUILD THE WALL. We support the shut down.
Build the wall! It’s the morally correct thing to do because it will save lives.
Build a wall, after the wall is build then what? All illegal aren’t able to get in any more, You think your still safe? Not! God made haven and earth he never put walls in haven and he never put wall on earth! You were born with out a wall, right? You came through your mother’s camel. She didn’t put a wall for you to be born out right? Think about that. If you put a wall to everything you don’t want in then you have a big problem. I’m not saying illegal to come in to the USA. Without papers. Is there a wall in hell? Nope! You choose haven or hell?
You would not say he’s the best president if you were not receiving a pay check. I have work on my desk that needs my attention. People are counting on me to do my job.  Let Mexico pay for the wall as he promised. Oh wait, Mexico said go f_ck yourself.  A wall is not a solution!!!
They will never go for anything just because they hate and love to spite the President.
Your promises are worthless, just like you Trump.
The wall is already there, so it's obviously not doing much good considering you're still bitching and moaning about illegal immigration. How about you come up with a better idea to combat illegal immigration?!? You complain about the security concerns for the country not taking into consideration that tsa agents are doing a very shitty job at American airports because they're not getting paid. YOU are making us vulnerable to terrorists!!
Over 40 years of B S Lying stories from both sides .And it's Trumps fault ,I don't think .Any one that doesn't know this yet isn't paying attention or just plan stupid ,Build that Fucking wall that should of been built over 40 years ago .End Of Story !! Hate Trump ,what a joke.and the joke is on the American people and your so called Politicians are laughing their asses off ,Wake Up America !!
We should have had more secure borders 30 yrs ago or more. The illegals  and drug runners and murderers would not be so rampant in our country.  Democrats DO NOT CARE ABOUT THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!!!! THEY  ARE ONLY CONCERNED WITH STOPPING TRUMP NO MATTER WHAT. We may have to suffer a bit more, but we need him to stay strong for what this country needs for all of us to survive. This is AMERICA! Not Mexico, not Guatemala,  not Saudi Arabia.........etc. THIS IS OUR COUNTRY.  THE AMERICAN WAYS. TAKE YOUR WAYS BACK TO YOUR COUNTRY. NOT OURS!!!
Pelosi should be bent over and spanked and Schumer should be bitched slapped! Talk about lying bullshit these two Stir It Up!
There is no crisis at the border. you Are fueling hate. Your paranoid.
Your promise was taxpayers would not pay for a wall, that Mexico will pay for it!!! Looks like you lied!!!! You want a wall so bad why don’t you pay for it??? Start a go fund me account for all your supporters that want this wall built and let them pay for it and you match them!!!  Why don’t you invite all the federal employees to your hotel to stay and feed them until the shut down ends!!! I don’t feel sorry for the ones who stand for you, they are getting what they deserve by voting for you.
BUILD THE WALL DO NOT BOW DOWN TO THE DEMOCRAPS.
The Democrats are the enemies within.  They will leave no stone unturned until they destroy America from within. Build the wall Mr. President!!!
You would not say he’s the best president if you were not receiving a pay check. I have work on my desk that needs my attention. People are counting on me to do my job.  Let Mexico pay for the wall as he promised. Oh wait, Mexico said go f_ck yourself.  A wall is not a solution!!!
Give everyone in the federal government except Congress their paychecks and build the damn wall
I would just like to say the Democrats don't give a rats ass about the citizens of the U.S. Why do they keep calling it Trump's wall???? THIS IS THE AMERICAN CITIZEN'S WALL!!!!! WHAT IS IT THEY DON'T UNDERSTAND ABOUT THAT??? This is why we elected President Trump to do. The American people have spoken...BUILD THE AMERICAN CITIZEN WALL!!!!!
You said Mexico would pay for it, so go get the money from them you clown
Then get it built your the president, to hell with those clowns.
Build the wall, but pay the Coast Guard!
Interesting poll. Americans are certainly concerned about all manner of things. So...no explanation why "government" is at the top of the list and rising, while "immigration" is below that and falling? Oh, 16% of (mostly Republican) Americans think immigration is a problem, what a dramatic result! I've got an explanation. Fox News lied. Like you do, every time you open your mouth.  You know, it's almost like it's more important to us that we don't have a bunch of indolent, lying shitbags in Washington than that we build a worthless monument to xenophobia and paranoia. Go secure yourself.
Why must the libs stay on this side of the wall after we build it? Cant we deport these treasonous devils,its clear they hate this country? Just saying build that wall and deport anyone who doesnt like our countries freedom.
There are a lot of dumb ass-- in this world sorry about the ass-- but quite necessary and Donald Trump ain't one of them just a man of his word and that's most important stand by your word
The Democrats are the enemies within.  They will leave no stone unturned until they destroy America from within. Build the wall Mr. President!!!
There are a lot of dumb ass-- in this world sorry about the ass-- but quite necessary and Donald Trump ain't one of them just a man of his word and that's most important stand by your word
Let's see how many lies can be told in 8 minutes! Everyone should FACT CHECK this idiot when he's done. Oh and Manadort conspiring with the Russians....imagine that as idiots campaign chair ...again imagine that!!!  Maybe idiot should build a wall around himself...oh wait the WALLS r closing in on him.
Maureen Ryan Two years you people have been chasing the Russians. So, tell me, WHAT did the Russians do to influence your vote? Did you see something that we missed?  Tell us, what EXACTLY are you looking for? The FBI can't find it, the CIA can't either, Pelosi can't say what it is, neither can MSM. What are you looking for? Please tell.
What no come back?.
Why must the libs stay on this side of the wall after we build it? Cant we deport these treasonous devils,its clear they hate this country? Just saying build that wall and deport anyone who doesnt like our countries freedom.
Im with trump but you said Mexico would pay and now alot of people american people will be fucked come Friday and that's bullshit...don't we have enough people struggling paycheck to paycheck and now you made alot of people unable to pay bills come Friday.
schumer and pelosi are pieces of crap. I hope there is a hell.
Stoping an ignorant moron like you sir, that’s what’s important
What will help is an immigration system like Canada and validation of immigration status. Visitor and employment visa’s are straightforward. Employers who hire illegals need big fines. They should use employment agencies to take immigrants who qualify.   Trump could also accept the recommendation to put more judges and immigration lawyers at the point of entry.  This would reduce the the misery of 60 per day and reduce the desperation of the thousands of poor huddled masses we used to welcome.
Build the wall i stand for trump
Shut yo fat, old ,wrinkly, bald ass up .Casket waiting for you!
Part 2 of the article I started: Terrrorists Know the U.S. Border Is Not Secure  A Costa Rican immigration service official whose jurisdiction includes the Golfito camp disclosed that at least several other U.S.-bound suspected terrorists also were pulled from this camp since Qoordheen’s March 2017 arrest, likewise based on significant derogatory U.S. counterterrorism intelligence. The Costa Rican official declined to provide specifics of the intelligence beyond that it involved terrorism, offering only that: “Most are good, but some are bad.”  The American public was never told that Qoordheen and other suspected terrorists were pulled off U.S.-bound migrant routes in distant Costa Rica and Panama because such information is usually classified or not disclosable, in line with standard practice to protect ongoing investigations and operations.  That necessary opacity, unfortunately, seems to have given life to denialism about President Trump’s claims that terrorists are among migrants from countries of terror concern, like the Middle East. The skeptics have demanded proof then cited Trump perfidy when protected intelligence wasn’t provided. Trump’s assertions were thus ridiculed and dismissed as unsupported fear-mongering.  But the rejectionists, many of whom obviously do not know that a central homeland security practice is threat preemption, are wrong. Down here, on the southern-most leg of migrant routes to the American border, it is they who invite ridicule and eye rolls.  American, Panamanian, and Costa Rican law enforcement and intelligence officials are engaged in actual programs here to hunt, investigate, and deport real terrorist suspects who are, in fact, discovered among the thousands of migrants from the Middle East, Horn of Africa, and South Asia funneling through this section of Latin America—as President Trump said and as I saw and heard on the ground.  Migrants from Bangladesh and Sri Lanka processing through Costa Ricans customs at Paso Canoas on the Panama border. They are working at it here because sheer geography pushes tens of thousands of U.S.-bound migrants from all over the world who pass from South America landing zones through these two countries as they push north. Panama and Costa Rica are chokepoints on the migrant trail where “extra-continental” travelers, as they are sometimes called at the American embassies, can become known in the greatest concentrations.  Terror Migrants Pulled From U.S. Border Routes Some acknowledgements of terror travel through these countries—and of the American efforts to mitigate it—are in public evidence, even if the underlying reporting remains confidential.  A December 19 Immigration and Customs Enforcement statement, for instance, announced the deportation of U.S.-convicted Brazil-based smuggler Sharafat Ali Khan after time served for transporting at least 100 aliens from Pakistan, Afghanistan, and Bangladesh through South and Central America to the United States. The statement offered this nugget, with the usual lack of elaboration: “Several of the individuals smuggled by Khan’s organization had suspected ties to terrorist organizations.”  The new statement seems to comport with earlier reporting by The Washington Times that one of these individuals was an Afghan involved in a plot to attack in the United States or Canada and had family ties to members of the Taliban.
You promised Mexico would pay for it!!!! What a dirt bag liar 🤥
Build the wall, stand your ground
What no come back?.
Build the wall, stand your ground
Kiskhan Kweon You would have to be wilfully ignorant, or just a complete moron to not know that Trump is the most corrupt president in our nation's history.
Tim Baldwin https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCha7BwcF4itfzFr9DAUqdNw
You promised Mexico would pay for it!!!! What a dirt bag liar 🤥
Give them hell President Trump!
Build the Wall! Hillary for Prison !
Boarder became stronger than it had ever been under Obama, anywhere that needs a fence has a fence lol. Poor fella, Trump looked so deflated and pissy during his pathetic oval office rant.  If our Russian hooker piss loving POTUS actually cared about illegal immigration he'd stop hiring them at his failing golf courses and address Visa overstays. But nope, not a peep about how illegal immigration actually occurs lol. Thank Allah that a patriot like Mueller continues to destroy the Trump daycare
Is that true or did you hear it on FOX NEWS and from most STUPID LIAR ever, Donald Duck Dumb TRUMP ?? https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10212453211837070&set=p.10212453211837070&type=3&theater
Tim Baldwin https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCha7BwcF4itfzFr9DAUqdNw
Anyone want to play the Trump drinking game today? The words are: criminals MS-13 Wall Obama Collusion HRC Steel Slats Billions and Billions Terrorists The wall has already been built Mexico will pay for it See through steel Very dangerous southern border Drugs
But without illegals, who could the Democrats use for extra voters?
Build the wall and if pelosi and Schumer don’t like it they can move to Guatemala
Jackass. More than half the country doesn’t want your stupid wall
BUILD THE WALL AND STOP THE INFLUX OF ILLEGAL FOREIGNERS FROM AROUND THE WORLD!!
Fox News is a propaganda machine for Russia’s handpicked candidate—Trump.  Good Americans would abandon Fox and put effort into removing their heads from Trump’s ass.  Trump is a wife beater and fraud. A conspirator and adulterer.
If you promised to rape someone, would you say we had to choose between you raping someone or border security? You're an idiot.
More americans are shot in mass shooting by white christian republicans than anyone coming here from south of the border. We need a wall around them
If you promised to rape someone, would you say we had to choose between you raping someone or border security? You're an idiot.
No spelling mistakes, couple big words......who typed this for you  Donald you douche?
Allen,  was not talking to you... you're no hero... quit trying to pretend you are, you're gutless like your orange hero.....pathetic.
Fox News is a propaganda machine for Russia’s handpicked candidate—Trump.  Good Americans would abandon Fox and put effort into removing their heads from Trump’s ass.  Trump is a wife beater and fraud. A conspirator and adulterer.
Allen,  was not talking to you... you're no hero... quit trying to pretend you are, you're gutless like your orange hero.....pathetic.
I say let them have shithole Cali and shithole ny and build walls around those too.
We might need a wall around Ca for the protection of Americans.
No spelling mistakes, couple big words......who typed this for you  Donald you douche?
MAGA - Morons Are Governing America and Many Are Getting Arrested as well as many more are resigning the dumptanic while they still have some integrity, morals, values, principles, and respect for our country of which this regime has none. Border security is needed, but not a archaic vanity wall that is not needed and serves no purpose other than the moronic liar in the WH and his sycophant minions and Jim Jones cult45ers.
I hope he goes around them all and builds this wall.............this is a national emergency, we can't afford to take everyone in. These illegals will bankrupt  our country. Our benefits are for us, not for them!
Build the wall! Without shutting down the government you hypocrite! You said your for the people...
BUILD THE WALL OUR LIVES AND FUTURE DEPEND ON IT.
Except the chump has no clue how to work together. Hrs nothing but a goddamned bully and liar
LMBO you have kept NO promises you say you have but you have not...FACT CHECK IT   Most Americans are blaming you for the shutdown and in2020 that will be very good news..Keep it up moron because more and more people are hating you..
We might need a wall around Ca for the protection of Americans.
Build the North Wall first. That’s where the real terrorists enter the country.
Americans also wanted you to do something about our children being killed in our schools. Did you do anything about that?  No of course not. Big money donations from the NRA stopped that . Didn't it???? You pathetic hypocrite 👹💩
The caravan was real. The chaos at the border is real. The 4000 murders the last two years by illegals is real. The 90% of the drugs flowing through the border is real. The fact that elected officials sworn duty is to protect the nation is real. Democrats are a disgrace.
Finish the Trump Wall protect Americans anything else is just stupid .
Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer have tax payer paid for 24 hour Security Protection as do all politicans yet she does not want average Americans protected and refuses to vote for the wall to protect America. HYPOCRITE
You aren't getting a wall motherfucker
What’s important? Truth ! Facts!  https://www.pbs.org/newshour/politics/trump-says-theres-a-crisis-at-the-border-heres-what-the-data-says
Media has been putting a narrative completely negative towards you about this but what else is new ! They suck and you Rock !! Keep fighting the American citizens fight
TrumpShutdown  https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?tid=ss_fb&utm_term=.acff4bbb2568
"And without faith it is impossible to please Him, for whoever would draw near to God must believe that He exists and that He rewards those who seek Him." Hebrews 11:6
Remember President Trump , the Dems are the party of slavery , Jim Crowe , KKK , Neo Nazi , Black Lives Matter , Black Panthers , Antifia , Santuary states , And Cities , Now they want open borders, illegals to vote and drive without citizen ship , and our Benefits, plus no rule of law , what the hell going on here Wake up America shame on the Dems Trump Strong 💪
I still say that if we cut all aid to illegals,  no more birthright citizenship, or chain migration they will not want to come.
I'm so glad Trump pulled this stupid ass stunt, he has no chance at all in 2020 now, his base is between 20 and 25 percent of legal voters laughable idiots, all of them and they will lose.
2/3 of Americans don't want the wall, so quit lying you orange dildo.
seeing your fat ass die in prison
More importantly! The kind of news not told by CNN and these other globalist,  no more borders, deep-state-controlled media!: Donald Trump - Red Dawn is Here  and America better Prepare!  https://youtu.be/Cj52fYsOVF8
Sir , it doesn’t matter to them , it’s you they despise, nothing you can do to change that. Just move on to the next agenda , hire more border guards and patrol it heavier , hate to say it but there will be no wall of barrier to protect us .  Voting-for  you again ! To another victory We know who is to blame for lack of security for votes
Please hurry up Armageddon lol I cant wait till these brain dead dumbacrats or dealt with by the very things they asked for .I will be lmao. The Third Temple is coming . Babylon and this new Sodom and Gomorrah will perish ha ha ha ha haaaa!!!!
I have done some research this past week and found information that has me upset and needing to share.  1. When an immigrant comes to the US and claims Asylum, they are given an expedited hearing within 1-3 days. If they are found to have a credible cause for asylum (which they know exactly what to say), they are given a court date and released into the US. They are then considered an asylee. Since 2007, asylum claims are up 1700%. 2. Once they get asylee status, they can apply for a social security number, Medicaid, and (in States that allow it) other assistance.  3. In most states, all you need to vote is a social security number.  4. Because of extreme backlogs of court dockets due to the increase of Asylum claims, The average wait for their final asylum hearing is almost 3 years.  5. During this 3 years, if they have a child (anchor baby) their chances of getting granted Asylum increase exponentially!  6. The illegals and non- citizens are counted by the census bureau and are included in the US population.  7. A State's population determines how many seats a state gets in the house of Representatives. 8. A State's population determines how many electoral votes a state is given. California would have 9 less electoral votes if the illegal and non- citizens were not included in the population counts.  9. Perfect reason why sanctuary cities/States have been created. It is to overwhelm the system for political gain. Getting the population up in sanctuary cities/States = political advantage and power through exploitation. I now understand why the Dems want an open border. They have figured out a way to exploit our elections by using existing immigration laws. I can't understand for the life of me why this information has not been used to justify why we need a wall and a secure border. Please share this information to everyone you know. The excuses the Dems are using to keep the border flowing must be exposed.  Thank you!
It's my way or I'm quitting and going home,  so there.  you need a moral compass. your administration is a disaster. I guess you'll quit going on programs cutting down others. I can't wait till your gone so we can lock you up. most corrupt administration ever. you're guilty as charged. when you have generals calling you an idiot, you're an idiot. best people? lololol  republicans are nothing but stupid bullies that need a gun to fight. real red snowflakes. also a federal judge called Flynn a traitor  along with  Manafort.
TrumpShutdown  https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?tid=ss_fb&utm_term=.acff4bbb2568
It's my way or I'm quitting and going home,  so there.  you need a moral compass. your administration is a disaster. I guess you'll quit going on programs cutting down others. I can't wait till your gone so we can lock you up. most corrupt administration ever. you're guilty as charged. when you have generals calling you an idiot, you're an idiot. best people? lololol  republicans are nothing but stupid bullies that need a gun to fight. real red snowflakes. also a federal judge called Flynn a traitor  along with  Manafort.
YOU DO HAVE A CHOICE! --->Donald Trump can me a canadian citizen please have a sliver of the northwest angle? we can share the land with you please! 120 people are usa citizens there that cant get to canada they will have dual citizenship if you do this!!! this will make us all legal immigrants it will solve everything! Its a flaw in the map that benjamin franklin made and didnt finish the map before he passed away do this before canada closes and usa moves in and leaves you or even worse family investigations for more deporting !!! we are all family noone should be deported!!! Theres no time to waste do it before everything is destroyed please!!!? WE NEED EACHOTHER!!!# I Dont want to have to leave!!! I dont deserve it nor anybody else i dont want to stay here with usa citizens in a tent! We deserve more than that all of us!!! Please iam begging you!!! I dont want usa citizens in poverty like me here its horrible!!! 😭😭😭😭😭😭Please?! I cant even send a 100 dollars to a philipino girl in the phillipines for food or ill get charged for fraud. https://youtu.be/WGKU8awk7VgThis Land Is Your Landyoutube.com
https://youtu.be/WSjMuKh1Wpo
I have done some research this past week and found information that has me upset and needing to share.  1. When an immigrant comes to the US and claims Asylum, they are given an expedited hearing within 1-3 days. If they are found to have a credible cause for asylum (which they know exactly what to say), they are given a court date and released into the US. They are then considered an asylee. Since 2007, asylum claims are up 1700%. 2. Once they get asylee status, they can apply for a social security number, Medicaid, and (in States that allow it) other assistance.  3. In most states, all you need to vote is a social security number.  4. Because of extreme backlogs of court dockets due to the increase of Asylum claims, The average wait for their final asylum hearing is almost 3 years.  5. During this 3 years, if they have a child (anchor baby) their chances of getting granted Asylum increase exponentially!  6. The illegals and non- citizens are counted by the census bureau and are included in the US population.  7. A State's population determines how many seats a state gets in the house of Representatives. 8. A State's population determines how many electoral votes a state is given. California would have 9 less electoral votes if the illegal and non- citizens were not included in the population counts.  9. Perfect reason why sanctuary cities/States have been created. It is to overwhelm the system for political gain. Getting the population up in sanctuary cities/States = political advantage and power through exploitation. I now understand why the Dems want an open border. They have figured out a way to exploit our elections by using existing immigration laws. I can't understand for the life of me why this information has not been used to justify why we need a wall and a secure border. Please share this information to everyone you know. The excuses the Dems are using to keep the border flowing must be exposed.  Thank you!
https://youtu.be/WSjMuKh1Wpo
Timothy Kershner where is your proof that he's lying???You don't have any..you just want to be Hateful and stupid
I would like to see these people speak up to qualify his claim of holding hands.
YOU DO HAVE A CHOICE! --->Donald Trump can me a canadian citizen please have a sliver of the northwest angle? we can share the land with you please! 120 people are usa citizens there that cant get to canada they will have dual citizenship if you do this!!! this will make us all legal immigrants it will solve everything! Its a flaw in the map that benjamin franklin made and didnt finish the map before he passed away do this before canada closes and usa moves in and leaves you or even worse family investigations for more deporting !!! we are all family noone should be deported!!! Theres no time to waste do it before everything is destroyed please!!!? WE NEED EACHOTHER!!!# I Dont want to have to leave!!! I dont deserve it nor anybody else i dont want to stay here with usa citizens in a tent! We deserve more than that all of us!!! Please iam begging you!!! I dont want usa citizens in poverty like me here its horrible!!! 😭😭😭😭😭😭Please?! I cant even send a 100 dollars to a philipino girl in the phillipines for food or ill get charged for fraud. https://youtu.be/WGKU8awk7VgThis Land Is Your Landyoutube.com
Trumpees must be Dump as Rock. It seems to the World they the lowest Level of the USA Society.  They need more Education to think clear , most are Racists KKK Members , NAZIS Unbelivable such Idiots want make together with a childish excentric egoistic insane Moron of a President of Putins grace America great again  😂🤣😂🤣 Never ever. Greetings from the free World with a free Press and Moral and Ethics and Humanity Values,  Social Responsibility for People BLACK WITHE BROWN GREEN YELLOW PURPLE OR GREY  HOPE YOU GOT TRUMPEE Folks
Idiot45 only your low minded Supporters the Rednecks Racists ans Nazis of USA want this Idiotic Wall.  This is the Truth childish low minded Bone Spurse President of Putins grace  Shutup You f** ck7ng FOOL
Very strange to many of us Constitutional Liberal Democrats. We have watched our Country get attacked over the last 30 years, escalating worse each time. Each time they warned us they would strike again. Each time they planned, practiced, and did it again. Does the Leftist condone this now??? If they think this threat is not real, why are you upset about bringing our Troops home. Fact: Leon Panetta' warned us our Electric Grids are in fact at risk and if hit could cripple our Nation, including our food supply. Does the Leftist doubt we WILL get hit again. Secure our Borders.  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1980380702266756&id=1452341315070700
Not Apartheid Zionist Wall for colonization. Thanks. Take that Shite back across the pond from whence it came.
what do you think when it comes to Donald Trump for one don’t trust him and why he constantly lies all of the time and you can’t believe him and also he’s Evil the snake 🐍 in the grass just waiting to bite you with his venom. ‘This president lies daily’: Critics demand networks fact-check Trump’s live immigration speech. I think it’s time for a newer President and get rid of the trash meaning Donald Trump and he isn’t worthy to be the President or not worthy enough to be in the Whitehouse no longer. Trump said Friday that some previous presidents "have told me that we should have done it."  The four living ex-presidents do not back Trump up on that claim, you see that’s another lie on top of another lie
The Democrats are a joke!! Hold strong, no more illegals
Build the wall ,stop the Drugs from pouring in save the children  !!!!
I would like to see these people speak up to qualify his claim of holding hands.
They end up at gitmo, #Demoncrats
For Demorats it doesn’t matter if it is good for America.  Their hate for Trump is greater than their love for America!  Evil and Sad!!!
There are no more Democrats they are imbeciles  Their only goal is to secure their own benefits.  And To go against you cause you’re name is  Donald J Trump Don’t mind them Boss!! We got your back All America has your back The real Constitutionalists have your back And we are right her and there with you We are everywhere And they ( our enemies) are scrambling and running like chickens without heads !! YOU KEEP BEING WHO YOU ARE
Build the wall then focus on draining the swamp starts with ousting islam from our government
Build the wall or keep it shut down!  Start going after the 30 million illegals already here instead.  Door to door if you have to. Stop letting the numbers grow and do something about all of it. Enforce the law! If they wont do it our way , then lets spend billions enforcing the existing law and sweep the country for all illegals.
Having Mexico pay for it was your promise you spin doctoring pathological liar
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall! -- Liar!!
Americans want a president not a lying douchebag. Bring back Obama!
Which part of:  "Donald Trump is a lying piece of garbage" were you too stupid to comprehend?  https://youtu.be/ud0f3eJTo54
Americans want a president not a lying douchebag. Bring back Obama!
Joe Anderson  if you don't like our president move start packing
John Robert FU
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall! -- Liar!!
BUILD THAT STEEL WALL & THROW ALL DEMOCRATS OVER IT! 🤣
The wall is a waste of tax payer money. They can't keep drugs out of prisons yet you think a wall is going to stop the flow of drugs into the country or immigrants? Also you'd have to steal people's property to eminent domain.
We don't need a border wall.  We don’t need to create artificial crises. We have enough real ones. Let us end this shutdown and bring the American people together around an agenda that will improve life for all of our people.
Build that wall Mr President!!! Screw what the CRAZY LIBTARDS want!! Who cares about the shut down? Libtards!! We all know that they dont matter. They are crazy, sick individuals. Obuma shut down the Government to force the shitty Obuma Care on the American people.  BUILD THAT WALL!!!
There should be a laugh track for every time trump lies during his Oval Office speech.
Someone left a bag of idiots open.
I'm not a Democrat why do you always blame democrats. Fact is in still waiting on property clean up from Epa in Texas. And I defended you for 35 yrs of my damn life. Here's facts Trump you said Mexico would pay for the damn wall. Want more promises wrote out you made that I believe you never intended to keep. I could write them. I'm one went bankrupt. Most of the people are coming from Guatemala do I need to say that's not Mexico. I want cleaned up property so that I can make money. Not just buy a damn piece of property with some inheritance money to breed and sell horses, dogs, etc and food. You need to take responsibility for saying Mexico would pay. I always say stand tall , keep ur head up etc. When do I get my property cleaned up?  When does my daughter and grandkids get moved out? You need to answer those questions. Things take money don't they ? It's funny seeing all these damn people rich just like Clinton in here and yet look at bills son of mixed races. So, many make me out right sick. I should come first. And again FOX sucks. Homefree Fox and my own mortgage company in the past could give free houses away to in poisoned property. EPA has a duty to clean my property up. I don't want to shop to buy homemade goods from other people. Will you pay me 300,000 for my property the way it is right now. If so, I would like to sell. Otherwise I need it cleaned up to sell. It's a need more important than in my eyes ur damn wall right now. I'm sure you can order it done. Then you might get some wall or might not. I'm going to say again I supported you defending you 35 yrs of my life and I don't see you ever intended to get Mexico to pay. My nieces and nephew in Mexico motherless need help to get over here to United States. It takes lots of money or at some point to get out of an orphanage they will need to be scratch backs or wet backs,  wall climbers. What if Congress gives you 150 feet. My front yard is 300 ft. Better work on Mexico to pay right I know you want to keep your promises. Right
Seems to me it's a political stunt. Democrats can't seem to come to terms that your doing a great job for our country. They thought it wouldn't happen. You proved them wrong, and it's killing them.
John Robert FU
I hope Donald trump you fast remove all the war because nobody want to die
Build the wall/fence. Just protect the border!!!!
Isn’t Funny how a part of our society can hate people who Bully other people !! But then turn on are President And Bully him 24/7 I guess that would make you Lying hypocrite that’s a Bully. Right Chuck,Nancy you to are most likely at a party celebrating telling the biggest LIE of your criminal career. The smart people know better. God Bless America and are President...
Build the wall and start  spearing and displaying the heads of the heinous criminals caught being here and killing our citizens
Mr. Donald Trump ok you're making it very very clear you hate all poor people ok I got three words for ya buddy burn burn burn baby burn but remember you caused and created this pal
AMERICA DOES NOT WANT THE EFFING WALL!! I'm listening to you addressing the nation right now and you have convoluted the facts so grossly ... my God, you are an imbecile!  Spreading fear with your lies!!!  If you want the wall so badly, you pay for it and then you can recoup the money from Mexico!  To Trump followers, you have to be brain dead to believe this man.
Build the wall! Just put... Another brick in the wall
Build the wall at least it can help
So one of the Demons talking points is that only 30% of illegal immigration comes across the border. Lets assume that is a fact, shouldn't we still stop 30% of illegal immigration by building the wall won't that allow more assets to go to the over staying visa's problem. But what do I know I am a Deplorable Trump Supporter
Seems to me it's a political stunt. Democrats can't seem to come to terms that your doing a great job for our country. They thought it wouldn't happen. You proved them wrong, and it's killing them.
Take the SNAP program from Migrants and seasonal farm workers.  Take away the free rides!    Start investigation on the Democratic’s. You know some of them are dirty!  Your doing a great job!!!!
Please just build the wall and have our great  military men and women build it and place our National Guard there and at the Canadian border also.  Schumer and Pelosi are anti American and should be charged with treason against our great nation.  Open borders means our borders get bum rushed by anyone and everyone looking for a free pass.  Then sign their stupid bill...
Before we get too indignant over the Saudi's beheading of a journalist we must remember that these people are merely several centuries behind us on their cultural and ethical journey. Our own noble sixteenth-century English forebears burned over 300 Protestants at the stake, an equally hideous form of execution, And they burned William Tynndale in 1535 for translating the Bible into English. Another translator, John Wycliffe escaped by dying a natural death before his scheduled bar - b - cue. But they exhumed his body and burned it anyway, just to be sure. Civilized, Christian behavior?
Ohh Kevin you are such an idiot. There is no help for you. You will just die stupid.
Democrats should come to their senses and work with the President. American people are sick and tired with the crooked politicians. Americans want security, honesty and hard work to MAGA......
Expose the dirt on these politicians!!!! They will be singing a different tune then!!! BUILD THE WALL!!! GOD will prevail!!!
You guys all make very good points. Let's keep up the good work and support our president. If we need to, that's even march on the capitol. The lazy ass Democrats and socialist liberal assholes are out working us as far as really making a stand. We need to March we need to protest we need to shut the government all the way down if we have to. All the Democrats care about is trying to drag President Trump through the mud make him. The Mueller probe is a joke they don't have s*** on him they're just trying to drag it out as long as possible to try and make as many people leave the Trump Camp as possible. They are a bunch of lying thieving c********** who don't give a damn about anyone or anything but their own evil deceitful agenda.
Keep your head up President Trump! You’re the best president ever and we all know that. Who cares if those dam Dems smoked you tonight with their speeches. I don’t care if they made you look like a bumbling idiot in front Of Americans because I still love you and I know you’ll make America great again! I’m your biggest fan!
Time to turn OFF the tv - your lying, pathetic ass is not welcome in my home!
Democrats, u wanted the job, polled for them, now build the wall get back to your jobs, we hired u for, build the wall deal with Trump later, I bet you'll see less drugs enter and kill millions of Americans. All the allocated money's for hospital rehab, and drug strikes with policing, stop the drugs at the borders weather with walls, cops and patrol of all borders, stop refugees coming here in a already busting at Seam's country
So one of the Demons talking points is that only 30% of illegal immigration comes across the border. Lets assume that is a fact, shouldn't we still stop 30% of illegal immigration by building the wall won't that allow more assets to go to the over staying visa's problem. But what do I know I am a Deplorable Trump Supporter
Democrats, u wanted the job, polled for them, now build the wall get back to your jobs, we hired u for, build the wall deal with Trump later, I bet you'll see less drugs enter and kill millions of Americans. All the allocated money's for hospital rehab, and drug strikes with policing, stop the drugs at the borders weather with walls, cops and patrol of all borders, stop refugees coming here in a already busting at Seam's country
Time to turn OFF the tv - your lying, pathetic ass is not welcome in my home!
NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO  DEAL.
Julia Markos-Roth sweetie, did you really drink the Kool-Aid that Trump won the popular vote?  LOL, oh you poor thing.  He LOST the popular vote.  Fact.
You must have missed the part about all of the cheating that goes on every election where non-citizens and even the deceased vote Democrat. I'm not a Republican either btw.
Julia Markos-Roth Yeah, I'm not that gullible.
NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO DEAL. NO WALL NO  DEAL.
Put a wall across Canada too!! Pot is legal up there and they might bring it into the USA!!!!! They might send snow storms!!! Nuke them before it happens!!! You need to secure the nation!!! Resurrect true nationalism!!! America first then the world!!!!
Ya. Why don’t Democrat’s want to stop Christian Drug Dealers from pouring over our southern border? You git em Dear Leader!
You are a grazy old pig, and I Will scoot you White toupe off you ugly head🖕
Build the wall better than paying for illegals
President Trump 20172025 The Despicable democrats  will never  agree to protect Americans,  they have been ordered by their puppet masters  to obstruct you, daily,  If only some of the  3+ thousand indictments against the swamp  had been served, by now I believe  Americans would be  much safer,  I hope you demand that  first 10 billion for the wall  and border security  is  allocated  not just "promised" Then a balanced budget clause  and eliminate the  discretionary spending clause  must be approved , Do the  Despicable democrats  want a balanced budget, and smaller debt or do they want a massive debt making America's children and grandchildren  slaves to paying off the debt????  Also no more union dues  deducted  from the  government employees paycheck  force unions to use the  post office and send bills  out,   And there must be an easier way  to fire incompetent worthless government employees especially the redundant employees  and positions,  Hundreds of millions of Americans  support the wall and border security  Over 93%  so the Despicable democrats  can't play the "nobody wants the wall"  bullshit  anymore,  same with the world will end  if the shutdown  happens  No one  has noticed any change  in  life ,   Remember  seniors on Medicare who receive the average or near on social security must receive  100%coverage with no deductions from their social security check  they are depending on you,   Thank You God's speed and God bless America and your family   Keep in  mind the Despicable democrat menadez  threatened to go to court if you use the act of congress 1976  to build the wall,,   Imagine that menadez  is supposed to  go back to court on felony  charges  soon isn't  he???
F the Democrats! Build the Wall. Pelosi and her gang are looking for a fight, they can have one. Sick of the liberals BS.
Julia Markos-Roth Yeah, I'm not that gullible.
F the Democrats! Build the Wall. Pelosi and her gang are looking for a fight, they can have one. Sick of the liberals BS.
Do something to save the planet you idiot
Janice Lee Saban lmfao you sure are bright one 🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌
Micheal Marceaux  brighter than you obviously 🙄
President Trump 20172025 The Despicable democrats  will never  agree to protect Americans,  they have been ordered by their puppet masters  to obstruct you, daily,  If only some of the  3+ thousand indictments against the swamp  had been served, by now I believe  Americans would be  much safer,  I hope you demand that  first 10 billion for the wall  and border security  is  allocated  not just "promised" Then a balanced budget clause  and eliminate the  discretionary spending clause  must be approved , Do the  Despicable democrats  want a balanced budget, and smaller debt or do they want a massive debt making America's children and grandchildren  slaves to paying off the debt????  Also no more union dues  deducted  from the  government employees paycheck  force unions to use the  post office and send bills  out,   And there must be an easier way  to fire incompetent worthless government employees especially the redundant employees  and positions,  Hundreds of millions of Americans  support the wall and border security  Over 93%  so the Despicable democrats  can't play the "nobody wants the wall"  bullshit  anymore,  same with the world will end  if the shutdown  happens  No one  has noticed any change  in  life ,   Remember  seniors on Medicare who receive the average or near on social security must receive  100%coverage with no deductions from their social security check  they are depending on you,   Thank You God's speed and God bless America and your family   Keep in  mind the Despicable democrat menadez  threatened to go to court if you use the act of congress 1976  to build the wall,,   Imagine that menadez  is supposed to  go back to court on felony  charges  soon isn't  he???
It is important to Democrats to protect our borders, but that isn’t what your building a wall is all about. You have already broken your campaign promise by asking us to pay for it! A wall is useless! You are useless! Tonight as you make your address, sane America will be either tuning out, laughing at you, and yelling at their TV screens. You can’t win this. You are what you have always been, a waste of air and space. You are a LOSER!!!!
History shows Trump is a fucking liar.... According to him Mexico was going to build this wall.... Now American families are starving and tsa is very very weak in our airports where the real terrorist enter the country..... Pos
The Democrat apparatchiks won't even encourage Ruth Baeder Ginsburg to take care of her health. They are a cult. I wonder if when you visit them they'll even let you see your parents? In all eternity, Mrs. Ginsburg is going to live once on the earth, but in the name of Satan they want to exhaust every last ounce of energy for the greater good of Satan out of that poor nice lady.  I bet they would even get a body double for her, if they thought that they could get away with it. Look at Uranium One Mueller investigating people for the very thing he involved himself in. A body double for aging Supreme Court justices is not so far fetched. The Democrat party is going to be destroyed for 100 years, and by that time, we will have figured a way to make the world a good place. Democrat proof.  ~ Dark Cloud Society of Light   Then spake Solomon, YAHOVAH said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. I Kings 8:12
Build the wall/barrier. Will add more jobs + all the money for material, labor, etc  put back into our economy.
Why don't you pay for if you want a fucking wall so bad asshole.
They only care about getting illegals for their voting block!  THEY WILL DO ANYTHING AND EVERYTHING TO GET YOU IN PRISON, AND WE WILL DO EVERYTHING TO KEEP THE BEST HEAD OF STATE IN POWER!  They think they can intimidate us and you!  The harder they push, the more we will push back!
Let's just tear down the gates these hypocritical bigot Democrats have their houses  in! WE DON'T GET OUR WALL, THEY DON'T GET THEIRS EITHER! NO WALL! NO PEACE!
I figure any American would want security. If anyone wants to come to this country than good let them in. However, do it the right way through a border to be screened. No telling how many people are coming through that are criminals. I feel anyone should be able to come to this country, but why would you want people just coming in waves that have the potential to bring more crime to your city.
Micheal Marceaux  brighter than you obviously 🙄
the threat is the Latinos inside, possibly they have a V for vendetta do they not!? they are Indians are theynot and they have rage do they not and wish to kill do they not!
Well satalight wall what ever tactic % that can murder. And go back to Mexico undocumented millions of imagrint 100 tho.s murder
I figure any American would want security. If anyone wants to come to this country than good let them in. However, do it the right way through a border to be screened. No telling how many people are coming through that are criminals. I feel anyone should be able to come to this country, but why would you want people just coming in waves that have the potential to bring more crime to your city.
Build the wall
No one is arguing against better border control, you nitwit. If you can’t understand that existing technology and more, better trained agents is the only logical answer, then you are as stupid as you are selfish and evil.
David Lloyd King found the snowflake!
Build the wall
We need Border Security, BUILD THE WALL, let’s keep the illegals out of our country, BUILD THE WALL, God Bless President Trump, MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGIAN🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes do it with technology and drones. A wall is useless. The majority of illegals over stay their visas and 90 percent of drugs come in through legal ports of entry by boat or plane so a wall will do nothing to secure our borders. It will significantly cause more damage though. Why would we want to spend trillions to get a false sense of security. That's as dumb as it can get.
Be strong ASHOLES DONT MATTER..I NEED TO SAY I DIDNT NO WHAT I THROUGH ABT TILL U PROVED IT TO ME.sir. u are doin ur jib well.but plz release food stamps im old cannot. . ..buy food.
BUILD THE WALL. Pelosi and Schumer don’t care if the AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE DYING. You don’t see them talking to the family’s that lost their love ones. THEY DON’T CARE ITS NOT THEIR FAMILY!!! Talk about fake news they are FAKE PEOPLE
Stand strong Mr President. Thankyou. Do not give up we need the wall and to rid our country of illegals .
David Lloyd King found the snowflake!
The US has 325 million people and about 30.000 get killed by guns every year. Europe has 741 million people and only 1100 get killed by guns every year. (And according to you they have big problems with immigrants and violence) Think about that for a second……….
Build the wall!  Don’t back down!  And no DACA!
Fire all them fuckers who dont support the president. Simple fix.
Open the government ! You big fat LIAR!
While everyone seems to be on the topic about the wall a bunch of people that I notice are hating on the idea so I am calling you out to answer this tell me do you lock you're doors when you go out? If so why? To keep unwanted intruders out of you're house? If so it is no different then keeping illegal immigrants out of the country. That need to come here legally if you all don't think we need a wall then you don't need locks on your house plain and simple.   Go on tell me i'm wrong I am waiting other then that I will be supporting the president of the united states that "we the people" elected after all we had to put up with Obama for 8 years you Liberals  can put up with Donald J. Trump for another 4 once he gets re elected in 2020.
Dems are human trash
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
They want to destroy you even if it means destroying America
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Obama stated that could keep your doctor in a complex piece of Legislation & OUTRAGE ensued from The Uneducated White Trump Voter. Silence from these same people on the continuous outright LIES & PROPAGANDA concerning Immigration & FAKE Border Crisis.   https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2019/01/08/politics/trump-border-wall-walk-up/index.html
Build the wall
Build the damn Wall
Build the wall now
Y'all Dumb Asf If You're Supporting This Wall I Bet Your Dunbasses Didn't Know That illegal Mexicans Like Myself Came On A Plane 🤦🤦 I Swear You People Are Really Dumb
Jotaro Kujo So go home already.... you're disrespecting the very country that let you sneak in and mooch off our wealth.
Build the wall now
To all those being conned... You will soon see that you elected a traitor to the United States of America. And we will forgive you for your stupidity but history Will Remember You as  UNAmerican As It Gets. You sold out your country for a lousy temporary tax break and your blind fears and bigotry.
We want the damn wall. U go for it Mr President . I'm  tired of this b.s. illegals r just coming to get the benefits & to do crimes. Deport them  all
As an AMERICAN CITIZEN , BUILD THE WALL, SECURE OUR BORDERS , DEPORT ILLEGAL ALIENS!!! I love my country but we won’t have a country if we don’t defend it!!!
Trump is a LIAR - holding 🇺🇸 ransom!  #TrumpGovernmentShutdown 🤔  Trump Airlines SHUTDOWN! Trump Beverages SHUTDOWN! Trump Board Game SHUTDOWN! Trump Casino SHUTDOWN! Trump Magazine SHUTDOWN! Trump Mortgage SHUTDOWN! Trump Steaks SHUTDOWN! Trump Travel SHUTDOWN! Trump Communications SHUTDOWN! Trump Tower Tampa SHUTDOWN! Trump University SHUTDOWN! Trump Vodka SHUTDOWN! Trump Foundation SHUTDOWN!  No one could have predicted the  #TrumpGovernmentShutdown
MR. PRESIDENT, PLEASE ANSWER THIS 1 QUESTION TONIGHT:----------->>>> WHAT IS THE UNSPOKEN MESSAGE FROM THE DEMOCRATS TO THE ILLEGAL INVADERS??? <<<<-------------- STEP RIGHT IN + VOTE FOR US!!!! WE DO NOT CARE IF YOU DESTROY OUR COUNTRY!!!??? GOP Lindsey Graham Fox News Judge Jeanine Pirro Lou Dobbs Lara Trump Donald Trump Jr. Daniel Scavino Jr.
Fucking lying no good for nothing shitface little man Fuckyou draft dodger you ain't a man your a coward
Jotaro Kujo So go home already.... you're disrespecting the very country that let you sneak in and mooch off our wealth.
THE LEFT IS OVER THE EDGE THEY HAVE ELECTED LIBERAL LOONS THEY HAVE FILLED OUR LIVES WITH LIES & HATE THEY DO NOT CARE ABOUT AMERICANS THEY ONLY WANT A ONE WORLD ORDER THEY ARE AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS THE COST! TOO MUCH CITIZEN MONEY TO SUPPORT ILLEGALS TOO MANY DEAD CITIZENS TOO MANY RAPED CITIZENS TOO MANY BRUTALIZED CITIZENS TIME TO END THE DEMOCRAT PARTY WE CANNOT SURVIVE AS A NATION OF HATE  DEMOCRATS…THE PARTY OF HATE AND EVIL!
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
Build the wall now!
Build the wall!
Build The Wall!!!!!
Build the wall
Go back to school and university and go claim your number back. Your level of stupidity is abnormal Dunderhead Trump
Had a deal, idiot! Even your VP said so. Then. like 2-yr-old, changed your mind throwing Pence under the bus you buffoon!
Build the wall. Don’t give in.
Build that wall
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
Peter Schommers take your head out of that dark place that's between your legs!
Build that wall
Peter Schommers take your head out of that dark place that's between your legs!
And yet they keep folding...
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
You egotistical bully. A wall will not stop the influx of drugs from Mexico. Dealers have tunnels under the border that accommodate trucks and even trains. The few that have been discovered prove it. Every mile of new wall you build will bring more tunnels. Your wall cannot not secure the border. More and more people realize that with every lie you tell.
DON'T BACK DOWN MR. PRESIDENT!  WE'VE GOT YOUR BACK!  SICK OF IGNORANT LYING DEMOCRATS AND LIBERALS!  ALL OF CONGRESS AND SENATE NEED TO BE DRUG TESTED!  🇺🇸GOD BLESS OUR PRESIDENT AND VICE PRESIDENT!🇺🇸
Build the wall Mr. president.  Do not give in, we are behind you.  They are nasty and corrupt and they are showing their true views.  Impose term limits,  freeze their pay.  #FundTheWallNow #buildthewall #termlimitsnow they do not want you to succeed. They don't care about Americans
And yet they keep folding...
Build the WALL
see? they think it's funny.  The young ones will live through some really terrible times in the future when they reap what they sow.
Build the WALL
DT, stop the DemonRAT pussyfooting and build that wall NOW.  We all know how hard your trying to get through to these Commie shitheads and it ain't workin', no fault of yours, so BUILD BUILD BUILD !!
No wall means no money in trumps pockets... He was offered 25 billion to leave the dreamers alone and this idiot said NO now whos the dumb ass
see? they think it's funny.  The young ones will live through some really terrible times in the future when they reap what they sow.
WE WANT OUR WALL. MY FAMILY HAS BEEN VICTIMIZED BY ILLEGALS FOUR TIMES! ONE DEATH, ONE KIDNAPPING AND RAPE, TWO CAR ACCIDENTS. HOW MUCH MORE DO WE HAVE TO SUFFER BEFORE CROOKED POLITICIANS DO THEIR JOB, AND PROTECT CITIZENS?
Terry Battle and tear it down when the US regains its sanity and morals!
WE WANT OUR WALL. MY FAMILY HAS BEEN VICTIMIZED BY ILLEGALS FOUR TIMES! ONE DEATH, ONE KIDNAPPING AND RAPE, TWO CAR ACCIDENTS. HOW MUCH MORE DO WE HAVE TO SUFFER BEFORE CROOKED POLITICIANS DO THEIR JOB, AND PROTECT CITIZENS?
Terry Battle and tear it down when the US regains its sanity and morals!
Build The Wall!!
We Americans Want And Need The Wall For Our Own Security  We Can Not And Will Not Risk Our Famlies And Loved Ones Th3 Chance Of Disease Crime Theft Murder Of Inocence Citizens  Paying For All Of These Illegals That Do Not Work And Think That They Can Just Come And Recieve Welfare No No We Work Too Hard To Suport Lazy People Who Want Everything For  Nothing When Our Veterans Put Their Life On The Line To Keep Us Free From An Invasion Of Illegals They Are Still Suffering And We Need To Support Them Build The Wall So High They Can't Get Over It So Low They Can't Get Under It And So Long They Can't Get Around It
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
mr. Trump you need to stand there at the border with your own gun and your cronies and try to stop trying to stop all the Hispanics to come to United States you got to remember history the Nina and the Pinta who were the first people here on this country and this continent it was the natives natives Americans the Apaches the Indians the Incas and all the other Indians that were raised and born here in United States we are not the only go aliens the ones that came here from the Pinta and the Santa Maria when they landed and found America remember you guys were from England you guys are the foreigners not the Mexicans and not the Indians so if you want to put a border put a border on your ass amen God Bless America the land of the natives and the Hispanics so take that to the bank
Paul Gonzales your just as ignorant as a black man crying about slavery. But I guess you think our civil war was about that majority? So forget about taxation without representation. Oh and forget about plains Indians that tried to live peacefully with the white men. One such group was the Sioux tribe. It was the largest and most powerful group in the west. They signed treaties with the government giving up ninety percent of their land. The Santee agreed to live in a small area. In exchange, the United States agreed to make yearly payments to the tribe. This made it possible for the Indians to buy food and other things from white traders.
You see, your only looking for a hand out. This no longer pertains to you.
Robert Decker well I kind of agree with you in one way or another but if you remember history who were the first people here in the United States before people from England landed and discovered America in about Civil War even black people fought against each other from the north to the South people are still killing each other doesn't matter if you're black white yellow green purple or rainbow color people still are killing each other so we either got to get along with each other we are the ones that are killing each other the engines knew nothing about alcohol until the Americans traded them alcohol for their beads and Furs and blankets and their women got to remember we're all from the same father the same mother think about it we all came from Adam and Eve God made Adam first took a rib from Adam and made Eve so there was a first really people in the world their children are descendants of us so we each got to either get along or stay away from each other God bless you all take care of the United States because it belongs to everybody not just bigots it's not our world as gods made in seven days and seven nights he can destroy it and nothing flat the snap of a finger week of a die guns don't kill people people kill people so let's get along God bless you all
Robert Decker I'm sorry the only time I've ever asked for a handout is what I went to a food bank when I didn't have enough money I paid 900 almost $1,000 Way live and I only get 1265 so I don't go asking for handouts don't need to God provides if you believe
Build the wall!!
Robert Decker I'm sorry the only time I've ever asked for a handout is what I went to a food bank when I didn't have enough money I paid 900 almost $1,000 Way live and I only get 1265 so I don't go asking for handouts don't need to God provides if you believe
Build the wall.
Robert Decker well I kind of agree with you in one way or another but if you remember history who were the first people here in the United States before people from England landed and discovered America in about Civil War even black people fought against each other from the north to the South people are still killing each other doesn't matter if you're black white yellow green purple or rainbow color people still are killing each other so we either got to get along with each other we are the ones that are killing each other the engines knew nothing about alcohol until the Americans traded them alcohol for their beads and Furs and blankets and their women got to remember we're all from the same father the same mother think about it we all came from Adam and Eve God made Adam first took a rib from Adam and made Eve so there was a first really people in the world their children are descendants of us so we each got to either get along or stay away from each other God bless you all take care of the United States because it belongs to everybody not just bigots it's not our world as gods made in seven days and seven nights he can destroy it and nothing flat the snap of a finger week of a die guns don't kill people people kill people so let's get along God bless you all
Build the wall.
You mean like the Repugnants stopped everything Obama tried to get done? Yeah, we know! Mfkr!
Build The Wall!
Build The Wall!
Just like your existence, that was a waste of time. Just some hay for your jackass supporters
A growing number of Americans blame Trump for shutdown: Reuters-Ipsos poll THAT'S BECAUSE T  RUMP IS A COMPLETE IDIOT AND HAS NOT DEVELOPED BEYOND THE AGE OF 6
Democrats are an Enemy to America
BUILD THAT WALL
It’s not a funny thing
BUILD THAT WALL
It’s not a funny thing
So......if Americans want border security why don't they bring all the US troops home who are out threatening border security of other countries in  the world, use the money they spend supporting insurgencies and corruption to guard the US border with Mexico?  Trumpy doesn't seem to be too worried about all the drugs and illegals who are entering the US through the 340 Port of Entries though.
Build the wall!!!!!!!
Build the wall.
Brian Cudmore well since your so smart come up with that great plan and present it
Build the wall.
Build wall along the Mason Dixon Line.
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build The Wall.
Build the wall
Trump is the kind of guy who sets houses on fire and later appears at the scene as a fireman
Build wall along the Mason Dixon Line.
Trump is the kind of guy who sets houses on fire and later appears at the scene as a fireman
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Build the Wall
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Janet Lee you are so full of hate.
Rebecca Thomsen Koskey yes ma'am thank you for pointing that out! I absolutely hate when my country is raped and pillaged and destroyed by a traitor. And I'm sorry for you that you are not. But you see, we all are not conned and we are not easily bought for a temporary tax break and a handful of empty promises. I've known who Donald Trump is since 1980. You're soon going to find out who you put in the White House. Your denial of it does not make it any less true.
Rebecca Thomsen Koskey aren't you even curious to read the article? A little too much Truth for you huh? Scary words like the Supreme Court and judges and lawyers and facts. Yes, facts. You know those things that your Lord and Master is allergic to? Hold on to your hat honey and make sure that your Depends undergarments are fastened securely from here on out. Because it's about to hit the fan royally.
BUILD THE WALL!!
Rebecca Thomsen Koskey aren't you even curious to read the article? A little too much Truth for you huh? Scary words like the Supreme Court and judges and lawyers and facts. Yes, facts. You know those things that your Lord and Master is allergic to? Hold on to your hat honey and make sure that your Depends undergarments are fastened securely from here on out. Because it's about to hit the fan royally.
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
Rebecca Thomsen Koskey yes ma'am thank you for pointing that out! I absolutely hate when my country is raped and pillaged and destroyed by a traitor. And I'm sorry for you that you are not. But you see, we all are not conned and we are not easily bought for a temporary tax break and a handful of empty promises. I've known who Donald Trump is since 1980. You're soon going to find out who you put in the White House. Your denial of it does not make it any less true.
We dont need open borders....we dont need to care for more ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS....many americans are in need....first.......democrats dont seems to care about this.....to many ILLEGALS HERE NOW.....100%behind our president
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
They would destroy this country before letting you keeping a promise.  AMERICAN CITIZENS WANT A WALL!!! NOT A STEEL WALK BUT BIG BAD CONCRETE WALL WITH TURRETS AND LOTS OF MACHINE GUNS.  BUILD THE WALL!!!
You promised that Mexico was going to pay for the wall, how are you fulfilling that promise? You're an idiot.
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall.
Build the Wall!!!
Trump kill usa dolar😨😨😨😨
Build the wall!
In a few years, a small group of happy campers will be left in a room waving their little MAGA flags, wearing their red hats. Among them an orange Clown who went through all structures of the government and all foreign relations as a wrecking ball, demolishing every value of the American spirit. Most left now without a job, a destroyed industry but a shining big wall which has thousands of little tunnels beneath it. THE END
We dont need open borders....we dont need to care for more ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS....many americans are in need....first.......democrats dont seems to care about this.....to many ILLEGALS HERE NOW.....100%behind our president
You state me this kind of rambling in babbling but if you think that Hillary Clinton should have been president then you are a brain-dead fucking moron with the brain capacity of a fucking flea
BUILD THE WALL  ONE WAY OR ANOTHER.
BUILD THE WALL......
Build the wall.
You’re delusional, dude
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
another dumbass
Build the wall!
Build the Wall now!
In a few years, a small group of happy campers will be left in a room waving their little MAGA flags, wearing their red hats. Among them an orange Clown who went through all structures of the government and all foreign relations as a wrecking ball, demolishing every value of the American spirit. Most left now without a job, a destroyed industry but a shining big wall which has thousands of little tunnels beneath it. THE END
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall,,,, MAGA
Democrats are Traitors to America!
Build that wall
Drop dead tRUMP
Build the wall!
Build the wall  .
Build The Wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall now!
Build the wall
Lying trash !
Hey 🐒here have a 🍌
Build The Wall
Hey 🐒here have a 🍌
Let me be clear...I'm all for securing our border...Technology can do it cheaper, more efficiently and with less environmental impact. Spend my tax dollars on technology! NOT on a STUPID WALL! READ IT DAMMIT...  https://medium.com/@vickyalvearshecter/what-happened-when-a-trump-supporter-challenged-me-about-the-wall-e54e86a5edd1?fbclid=IwAR2uX4bHjQVYyc6Bt2OSAU6_lj1Ht9IMrNIP3vRGMRj6chb9FsrciXaFCZAWhat Happened When A Trump Supporter Challenged Me About the Wallmedium.com
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
Lying trash !
Build the wall!!
Build the Wall..
BUILD THE WALL
How about poverty, you jackass?
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall with or without them.
build that wall
Federal workers on Furlough.....Do not give in.....Stand Strong Donald J. Trump Vets for Trump Why would you support someone not paying you.....hmmm.....That is because you are a true American and also served your country. Civilians have no concept of what freedom cost and want to whine about you or I not getting paid when in reality ,WE WILLINGLY go without pay because it is the right thing for the people and America first. We get our money back paid, they also do not know there are Emergency Relief funds available if you get bound up and need to get money, also when offered the job you sign a contract knowing you will work without pay if this happens. Americans want the freedoms United States provides as long as someone else is willing to provide them at no cost to them. They fear Gov. shutdown must be affecting their lives in some way because Democrats are telling them it is. Well it is, they are being led astray for open boarders, which is against our own countries laws to support. Another it is us We the people who care for the illegals. Our money , we earn for OUR Family is taken from us to care for them. The more that come into the country the more it cost and Democrats want more to come over 500,000. On average $18.00 a day per illegal in the country. In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments. Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.Millions of dollars a day and more every day and Democrats say send them on,  our American Citizens will pay for more. Thank US the Democrat with your vote... Republicans did not want you. They wanted to put the American People FIRST. How RUDE...
build that wall
Linda Sonn lol he don't need money. He gets no pay to put up with idoits. Your really some kind of Stupid!
Build the wall with or without them.
Build the wall  MAGA
Thank You POTUS for putting Americans over illegals. Nancy & Chuck are in total denial & bashed you but never ever address the crime, murders, drugs, enormous expense our open border creates.
NOT ONE PENNY OF MY TAX DOLLARS FOR THAT STUPID WASTE OF A WALL. GET Mexico to pay for it like u said. LIAR.
Build the wall
build the wall
Build the Wall 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the Wall.
BUILD THE WALL !!!
Linda Sonn lol he don't need money. He gets no pay to put up with idoits. Your really some kind of Stupid!
LOL, a moron and his lemmings
Build the wall 🇺🇸
Build the wall!
Lying Trump...LOCK HIM UP!
Build the Wall
Stoping you bitch duh 🙄🥴
BUILD THE WALL !!!
build the wall
Build the WALL
Liar liar pants on fire!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!!!
RESIGN YOU DAMN GROPER !!!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Stoping you bitch duh 🙄🥴
He is an idiot
Build the Wall
Build the Wall!!!
Build the wall
Stopping your bitch ass!
Build the wall 🇺🇸
Build the WALL
Build the  wall
Build the wall
Build the wall please!
build that wall
Its already a wall there
Build the wall🇺🇸🙏
Build the wall
Build the wAll
Build that wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the  wall
Build the wall
build the wall.
Build this wall
Your PROMISE was that Mexico would pay for it. Building a wall that WE must fund IS breaking your promise!  😡 “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Build the wall!
Build The Wall 🇺🇸
build the wall
Build the WALL...
Build the wall
Trump hatred syndrome
Build the wall
Trump hatred syndrome
U gone burn hell
Tonya Robinson no you are lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrpppp!!!! Here 🐒have a 🍌
Micheal Marceaux give it to our your mother cave man
Tonya Robinson bow to your 🐉 Reptilian masters
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Dems are criminals
Build the wall
Build the wall
I hate democrats
build the wall
Tonya Robinson bow to your 🐉 Reptilian masters
NO WALL!!! NOT TRUMP!!! Trump is a mental unfit LIAR!
DONALD DUMB THE BIG IDIOT
Lmao no that would be you . You lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrpppp!!! 🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌 🐒boy
Micheal Marceaux thats fit in ur mom ass
Micheal Marceaux say hello to ur mom dumb
NO WALL!!! NOT TRUMP!!! Trump is a mental unfit LIAR!
Build the Wall !!
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL,
Build the wall.
Build that wall
DONALD DUMB THE BIGGEST CLOWN
Build the wall!!
Micheal Marceaux say hello to ur mom dumb
Build the wall
Build the damn wall
Build the wall!  Build the wall!
Lying Traitor.
AS IN THE 2016 ELECTION...THE POLLS ARE OFF!!!!                                                             Americans want a secured southern border with a physical steel wall. President Trump you are the man to get this done, you have the unique combination of skills, compassion, courage, and understanding to make America Great Again. We the People are with you and the Democrats are not, they have become something unrecognizable. Only the inside the beltway demons don't like the term "wall". We need a physical wall and technological barrier and increased border agents across the entire 2000 miles of our southern border. This is a national emergency and the polls are very likely incorrectly reporting the numbers of Americans that want the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
Build that wall
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall! 🇺🇸👍💕
Build that wall
Build the wall
TRUMP is a liar and is hurting many more Americans than he is keeping Mexicans out what's wrong with this guy he must be mad. IMPEACH TRUMP NOW IMPEACH TRUMP NOW IMPEACH TRUMP NOW
Build the wall.
Dumb ass wanna be leader
Build the wall already
Build the wall!!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
Build the Wall MAGA
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall already
Build the wall
Build the fucking wall
Build THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!  👍
Build The Wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
You dumb bitch
Build the wall
Build the wall PLEASE!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Build the WALL
End the welfare state
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Bitch No We Don’t YOU Do .😒
His ass can gone head Fr
Princess Phyllís Istg his ass can stay in tht side of the boarder😂😂👌🏾
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL PLEASE
BUILD THE WALL
Illegal aliens
Build that Wall
Lock the border down.
Build the wall don't give in .
Istfg
Build the wall!!!!!!
Build the wall
DEMS ARE IMMORAL.  #BUILDTHEWALL
Build the wall!
They just want to destroy America
Build the wall!
Build the wall America
build the wall we need the wall now!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall don't give in .
The woman is trash.
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!
Dont Back Down Trump! #MAGA
Build the wall
Build The Wall!
You idiot, walls don't work
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build that wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall, mr president
Build the Wall
Brian Kolfage.com, has a website for Funding the WAll, we the people will fund it and make the Dems look like fools
Build the wall!  🇺🇸
Build the wall
Build that wall
Bumbling fool!!
Build the Wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the Wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall with the Army.
Build the Wall!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall!!
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall !!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Die motherfucker
Build the wall
Build that wall MAGA
build the wall
Build the Wall  !!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!  🚷
Build the wall!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Die motherfucker
Build the wall
Build that WALL
Lesa McKellip Go give hin Money Moron
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall...
Build the Wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Lesa McKellip Go give hin Money Moron
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the Wall
Sorry ass motherfucker 😂😂😂💀
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Trump is biggest communist of them all!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL ASAP
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build that wall
Build the wall
No leave it SHUT DOWN AND SHUT DOWN OUR BORDER WITH MEXICO NOW! PELOSI AND SCHUMER ARE KNOWN LIARS! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! STOP THE DEMOCRATIC SOCIALISTS LIARS FROM tearing OUR COUNTRY DOWN! THEY HAVE BEEN COMMITTING THESE DISGUSTING policies election AFTER ELECTION!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Go get em Trump !!!!!!
Build the Wall!
BUILD THE WALL ASAP
Build that wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!!!!
Pussy asshole.
The Donald
Build the wall!
It’s a National Emergency 🚨
Build the wall
Build this wall!
Build the Wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall now
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
Build the wall & destroy all the tunnels.
Build the wall
Please build the damn wall!
Build the wall
Jebus you're an awful, awful, awful man.
Build this wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the Wall!!!
Build the wall
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall.
Jebus you're an awful, awful, awful man.
Build The Wall!
Build the wall now
Build the wall.....
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build this wall and build it now!
build the wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the WALL
Build the wall!!!
Build the Wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!!!!!
Build the wall.
Build the WALL
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!!!!!!
Build the Wall
Build the wall!
Build the WALL!
Build the wall.
Build the WALL!
Build that Wall
Build the wall !!!!
BUILD THE WALL  !!!!
Build the wall please
build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!!!!!
Build the Wall!!!!
Liberal scum bags.
Build the Wall!
Build the WALL!
Build the wall!!!
no moron. We want you impeached
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall...!
Democrats want communism
build that wall
No we don’t bitch
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
F*** Trump and that Wall ✊🇲🇽👑
Build the wall!!
LYING NAZI SCUM BAG!
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
Ass Clown 🤡 Trump
Build The Wall
Dumb motherfucker
Build the wall! MAGA!
Build the wall anyway!
Build the wall.
Build the wall!
Build the wall
LYING NAZI SCUM BAG!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Shut up you orange ass hat
build the wall!
Build the WALL
You are such a dumbass.   Pathetic.
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
Build the WALL
Build The Wall
Build the wall
BUILD  THE  WALL!
Build a wall around Trump.
Build the wall
Build the wall!
BUILD The Wall !
Build the Wall!
BUILD The Wall !
He's such a pompous lying asshole
YES OBIE WAS.. GONE NOW. RELAX.  TRUMP2020

Jill Travassos https://www.facebook.com/NowThisPolitics/videos/277336532946157/
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall !!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall/PLEASE
Build the wall!
Build the wall👊👊👍
Build the WALL
Jill Travassos https://www.facebook.com/NowThisPolitics/videos/277336532946157/
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Do your aides actually read the comments?
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Build the WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build The Wall !!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!
STFU MORON !!!!!!!!!!
Build The Wall 💯💯🤩
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Build the wall!
build the wall
Build That Wall
Build the wall !🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the wall!
Build the wall.  Don't give in.
Build the wall!!!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL.
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Damn the Democrats
Build the wall!!
Build The Wall
He is an ass hole@@!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!
Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...
Build the Wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Damn the Democrats
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall now
Build that wall
Build that wall
Good President
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the WALL
build a bg fat beautiful wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build that wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL.SEND NASTY NANCY TO MEXICO....
Build the wall!!
BUILD the wall first so its cant comeback
Build the wall!!!
build a bg fat beautiful wall
Build the WALL!
Fucking trump!u fucking said Mexico will pay for wall ,that's the promises u did!
American;s want U gone, FuckFace!
Donald Trump is a Moron
Build the wall
Build the wall! Get it done 🇺🇲🇺🇲🇺🇲
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸
https://www.callmycongress.com/callmycongress.com
Build the Wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall..
Democrats have mental issues
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the Wall!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
https://www.callmycongress.com/callmycongress.com
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!
The only ones who want to build a wall are the people who have a evil demonic and hateful lives, hearts and mind! All those who have been to wars who had participated in killing others in other countries,who are blood guilty from all the wars the US has cause thru out the years. So they live in fear of their own demonic Karma
Build the wall...
Democrats are cockroaches.
President Trump, it is our hope that you will not budge one inch with regard to "Building the Wall".  We all know you cannot negotiate with Democrats, as 'it is their way or the highway'.  We MUST HAVE A WALL to keep ILLEGAL DRUG DEALERS, TERRORISTS, AND ASSORTED PREGNANT IMMIGRANTS, WHO THINK THAT IF THEY ARE ABLE TO ENTER THIS COUNTRY VIA PREGNANCY, OR DRAGGING THEIR YOUNG CHILDREN FROM GUATEMALA TO MEXICO, UNDER THE GUISE OF BEING GOOD PARENTS, REVEALS THE FACT THAT THE DEMOCRATS DON"T CARE ONE WHIT ABOUT OUR NATIONAL SECURITY.  WE, THE AMERICAN PEOPLE WANT OUR COUNTRY SECURE, AND THE ONLY WAY TO ENSURE THIS IS TO BUILD A WALL THAT THEY CANNOT SCALE.  A BORDER CROSSING FENCE WILL NOT WORK FOR PEOPLE WHO ARE DESPERATE TO LEAVE THEIR IMPOVERISHED COUNTRIES (WHY DON'T THE DEMOCRATS
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
Build it they will leave!!!
Build the wall
Build it they will leave!!!
Rick Scott their faces already did from botox
your rigth they are ugly
Build the wall!!
please kill yourself
Don the Draft Dodger: Idiot!
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
You are disgusting
DEMOCRATS USELESS
Build the wall!!!
your rigth they are ugly
Build the wall!!!
Build that wall
Richard Weatherspoon go ahead...and true Americans will tear it down.
DEMOCRATS USELESS
BUILD THE WALL !!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall and stand tall.
Build the wall!!!!!!!!
Build the WALL!!!
Build the Wall
Richard Weatherspoon go ahead...and true Americans will tear it down.
There is no border emergency.  There is only a megalomaniac sexual predator in the White House.
You're such a jackass. Stop embarassing yourself and resign.
I hope the impeachment process works. You don’t care about the citizens or you would end the shut down. You said you would block funding for California wild fires... how is that caring about the safety of your country? Come February you’ll be starving over 38 million Americans, predominantly children, how is that caring about the safety of your citizens? You’re willing to allow millions of low income families to become homeless. How is that caring about anyone’s safety besides your own bullheadedness? You won’t be homeless, you will continue to eat, you will continue getting paid while all your workers continue to be furloughed or work for no pay. You don’t know struggle. You’ve been a rich kid your whole life. That’s why you’re so okay with letting others suffer if it gets you your way. You won’t go hungry and neither will your children. You won’t risk homeless because you have no money due to HUD running out of funds or no paycheck for an extended period of time.  You’re a disgrace and I fully support your impeachment!
BUILD THE WALL......... WHEN YOU DON'T BECOME A CITIZEN  YOU CAN'T HAVE ANY PUDDING HOW CAN YOU HAVE ANY PUDDING IF YOU DON'T EAT YOUR MEAT.?
Illegal border crossings are at a 40 year low, more than 60% of all undocumented immigrants are here because they overstated a valid visa, and most of the illegal drugs come through monitored points of entry. There is no need for your vanity project!
the drugs don,t just come in at the entry way. drug cartels go through the deserta mountains. guess yo never hiked anywhere. they use  glass to shine when they spot someone to let them know change course. some places you can,t hike anymore cartels will kille you you don,t hear this on fake news. Get real We Need The Border. Dec23 Chucky said he wanted to stop all negoations till peloski took over. so its chucky shutdown Its Not Stupid To Shutdown The Gov. Have Sone Comon Sense. There Scared There Cash Cow Will Dry Out Plain And Simple. Bless This Country. Trump Keep Strong Don,t Back Down
Where are the pesos?  Your decision to shut down the government is hurting 800,000 Americans - and their families.  This is IMMORAL.  Your decision is IMMORAL.  I watched you state you would be happy to shut down the government. I watched you clearly state you would own and be accountable for the shutdown.  I watched this on live TV - no “fake news” spin.  You are clearly trying to bully - and using 800,000 Americans and their families as pawns, as bargaining chips.  Why?  ... because you need to “look strong”?  .... because you need to look like “a winner”?  You asked Pelosi if she would agree to a wall in 30 days if you opened the government. She said no and you will keep the government shut down.  You are clearly holding 800,000 Americans and their families hostage.  THIS IS IMMORAL.  You are putting your need to look strong to your minority base and extreme right media personalities ahead of the negative impacts to our fellow citizens.  No real leader places their personal need ahead of the American people.  CAN YOU ACT LIKE A REAL LEADER BY PUTTING 800,000 AMERICANS AND THEIR FAMILIES AHEAD OF YOUR PETTY PERSONAL PSYCHOLOGICAL NEEDS?
CRIMINAL'S ARE WANTING TO DESTROY OUR COUNTRY, OUR PEOPLE.  DEALING DEADLY DRUG'S TO ANYONE.  OUR LIVE'S ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  OUR CHILDREN ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  WE MUST HAVE THAT WALL AND CONTROLL WHO ENTER'S.  DO NOT BELIEVE WHAT DEMOCRAT'S LIES THAT THEY FEED TO THE PUBLIC. WE WANT THAT WALL.
Build the Wall
CRIMINAL'S ARE WANTING TO DESTROY OUR COUNTRY, OUR PEOPLE.  DEALING DEADLY DRUG'S TO ANYONE.  OUR LIVE'S ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  OUR CHILDREN ARE OF NO VALUE TO THEM.  WE MUST HAVE THAT WALL AND CONTROLL WHO ENTER'S.  DO NOT BELIEVE WHAT DEMOCRAT'S LIES THAT THEY FEED TO THE PUBLIC. WE WANT THAT WALL.
YOU AREN'T FULFILLING YOUR PROMISE!! YOU SAID MEXICO WOULD PAY. NOW YOU WANT AMERICAN MONEY TO PAY.  YOU ARE A LIAR!!
Katie Curran I guess your not paying attention. Ford motors is now not going to build trucks or truck parts in Mexico. They are moving those jobs to the USA. It's a multiple billion dollar deal. Yep they are paying for the wall
Mike Stoumbaugh you must not understand how paying works. Our tax money is going to build the wall. If there is more American business we should use that money to lower my taxes.
Where are the pesos?  Your decision to shut down the government is hurting 800,000 Americans - and their families.  This is IMMORAL.  Your decision is IMMORAL.  I watched you state you would be happy to shut down the government. I watched you clearly state you would own and be accountable for the shutdown.  I watched this on live TV - no “fake news” spin.  You are clearly trying to bully - and using 800,000 Americans and their families as pawns, as bargaining chips.  Why?  ... because you need to “look strong”?  .... because you need to look like “a winner”?  You asked Pelosi if she would agree to a wall in 30 days if you opened the government. She said no and you will keep the government shut down.  You are clearly holding 800,000 Americans and their families hostage.  THIS IS IMMORAL.  You are putting your need to look strong to your minority base and extreme right media personalities ahead of the negative impacts to our fellow citizens.  No real leader places their personal need ahead of the American people.  CAN YOU ACT LIKE A REAL LEADER BY PUTTING 800,000 AMERICANS AND THEIR FAMILIES AHEAD OF YOUR PETTY PERSONAL PSYCHOLOGICAL NEEDS?
build the WALL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
THE DEMOCRATS DON'T CARE ABOUT OWER COUNTRY OR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE THEY WANT THE OPEN BORDERS DRUGS AND THE MURDERING," BOTTOM LINE THEY JUST DON'T CARE VEARY SAD.
Build that wall ,and put land mines around it also ,your country will soon look like england and France because liberals were to politically correct and wanted to let in the scum .look at these other nations they will never recover from this .
ABOLISH CONGRESS!! LET PRESIDENT TRUMP DO HIS JOB. SATANS IN CONGRESS IN FULL MOTION TO DESTROY THIS COUNTRY....
NOT ONE TIME WILL THE DEMRATS AGREE WITH YOU !  PELOSI AND SCHUMER ARE OUR TRAITORS..PRESIDENT TRUMP, GO AHEAD WITH THE WALL..ALL OF US PEOPLE PAYING TAXES , THESE SCUMBS, WE WOULD HAVE TO PAY FOR..THEY ARE A MIXTURE OF MURDERS AND THEIVES
THE WALL CAN BE PUT ON HOLD..,.NOT THE ONLY IMPORTANT ISSUE....GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN...FUCKED UP....DEMENTED PRESIDENT OBSESSED WITH THE WALL..,.
WE WILL HAVE A WALL....CHALLENGE THESE NOW PROSPEROUS MONOPOLIES TO PLEDGE $1MM EACH HAVE THEIR NAME SCROLLED ONTO THE WALL....SHUT UP THE MEXICO WAS SUPPOSED TO PAY FOR IT IDIOTS AND EXPLAIN IN ABC'S HOW THE NEW NAFTA WILL RESULT IN BILLIONS AND SHOULD  BE ALLOCATED IN SOME PART TO TO OUR GREAT WALL.....EMERGENCY STATUS AFTER YOU HAVE TRIED LONG ENOUGH TO OPEN DEAF EARS FOR SECURITY OF OUR COUNTRY.  GOD WILL BLESS YOU WITH MORE APPOINTMENT IN 2020.  WE LOVE YOU BECAUSE YOU PUT AMERICA FIRST ABOVE ALL ELSE.  ALWAYS AND FOREVER TRUMP~~~ALI IN CO XOXOXOXOX
Mike Stoumbaugh you must not understand how paying works. Our tax money is going to build the wall. If there is more American business we should use that money to lower my taxes.
WE WILL HAVE A WALL....CHALLENGE THESE NOW PROSPEROUS MONOPOLIES TO PLEDGE $1MM EACH HAVE THEIR NAME SCROLLED ONTO THE WALL....SHUT UP THE MEXICO WAS SUPPOSED TO PAY FOR IT IDIOTS AND EXPLAIN IN ABC'S HOW THE NEW NAFTA WILL RESULT IN BILLIONS AND SHOULD  BE ALLOCATED IN SOME PART TO TO OUR GREAT WALL.....EMERGENCY STATUS AFTER YOU HAVE TRIED LONG ENOUGH TO OPEN DEAF EARS FOR SECURITY OF OUR COUNTRY.  GOD WILL BLESS YOU WITH MORE APPOINTMENT IN 2020.  WE LOVE YOU BECAUSE YOU PUT AMERICA FIRST ABOVE ALL ELSE.  ALWAYS AND FOREVER TRUMP~~~ALI IN CO XOXOXOXOX
WHEN YOU TOOK THE OATH OF OFFICE DUMB-ASS...YOU PROMISED THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR YOUR STUPID BORDER WALL. WHY ARE YOU NOW DEMANDING FUNDS FROM CONGRESS,, JUST BECAUSE YOU ARE A FUCKING SORE LOSER?? Manage
Eyon Deen what an idiot and crybaby
Janet Williams  HO YOU DUMBASS FUCKING tiny dicked trump?
DID  YOU VOTE FOR HIM?? HOW ABOUT SIT ON HIS FUCKING TINY DICK??
THE WALL CAN BE PUT ON HOLD..,.NOT THE ONLY IMPORTANT ISSUE....GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN...FUCKED UP....DEMENTED PRESIDENT OBSESSED WITH THE WALL..,.
A NATIONAL EMERGENCY WILL BE DECLARED TONIGHT AND MONEY WILL BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE WALL TO SECURE ONCE AND FOR ALL OUR SOUTHERN SICK BORDER. MEXICO 3RD WORLD COUNTRY HAS NOT HELPED US ONE BIT TO SECURE OUR SOUTHERN BORDER. THEY ARE THE PROBLEM. IF THEY WANT TO BECOME AMERICANS, BE VETTED AT OUR PORTS OF ENTRY. NO MORE SNEAKING IN ILLEGALLY AS CRIMINALS.
They don't like you. My daughter is a liberal & I can't talk with her about reasonable politics & law for more than 2 minutes before she goes ballistic - citing all the money that's been stolen from Americans, and how the big corps. are taking over the world, etc.  She can't see that letting all these illegals in will harm us - she's sees pie-in-the-sky.
Those That Keep Bashing Trump Funny How You Can Believe In Lies About trump. When the Truth About Clinton And Obama Are Out You Don,t Believe. Learn To Tell What Is A Lie and what Is The truth. trump Till 2024. Trumps Doing What He is Suppose To Do Thank god For That.
All the Democrats want is to destroy everything this country stands for. It started with statues and now it's the real Patriots. We are locked and loaded Mr President and ready to shoot and a moments notice. We Are Sick and Tired of The Liberal Snow Flakes. It is time for people to go.
We want you gone TRAITOR. Move to Russia. Where you belong. Putin will give his best BOY(you) a shiny Hero of Russia medal.
The ACLU has broken down and fact-checked Trump, read it all here https://www.aclu.org/blog/immigrants-rights/look-trumps-biggest-border-lies
Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer are criminal traitors. They are complicit in every murder committed by an illegal alien. They have blood on their hands and they should stand trial for their crimes.
DID  YOU VOTE FOR HIM?? HOW ABOUT SIT ON HIS FUCKING TINY DICK??
Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer are criminal traitors. They are complicit in every murder committed by an illegal alien. They have blood on their hands and they should stand trial for their crimes.
Peter Schommers lol and what do you have for coming with something as dumb as you just said
Derrick Lacey it´s a true story Derrick, ask your mom 😘
The ACLU has broken down and fact-checked Trump, read it all here https://www.aclu.org/blog/immigrants-rights/look-trumps-biggest-border-lies
Derrick Lacey it´s a true story Derrick, ask your mom 😘
Trump is very poor con man.
TROLL ALERT!!!
Peter Schommers lol and what do you have for coming with something as dumb as you just said
Its not so much that the democrap don't want the wall as they say it won't work it's more along the lines that they know it will work and they hate to admit they were Wrong!
Resign, you're an idiot.  Or as Rex says, "A f@cking Moron"
Build the wall.
Build the wall!
https://www.facebook.com/DonaldTrump/# is a moron
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
TROLL ALERT!!!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
Build the damn wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Donald Trump is a Moron
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD  THE WALL
Build the wall
When will you get it through you thick skull? We want an intelligent and comprehensive plan for border security. All you ever give us is your stupid wall!
KEVIN. WHEN WILLYOU GET IT THRU YOUR THICK SKULL. AMERICA WANTS THE WALL SON. MOVE ALONG. IT'S COMING. GET COMFY!    GET BACK TO YOUR  TROLLING. THE PRESIDENT WILL BE EDUCATING YOU SOON! ;_)
Jill Travassos This "President" is not qualified to educate ANYONE! America does NOT want a stupid wall! We want intelligent border protection. And while we're at it, we would also like an intelligent President! And for God's sake, only a complete a$$ calls ANYONE who is not their own child "son"!
shut the goverment down for six months......what ever i takes
Build the Wall.
Build the wall
Dude. You’re an idiot
You promised a wall paid for by Mexico! Not the taxpayers. So you are not fulfilling your promise! Liar!
Build the wall!!! Secure the Republic
The only thing more transparent in the white house and its windows is president trump’s himongous head. Imagine all the birds shitting on him???? After all those tweets ...  bong bing bong bong your self you fucking orange !!!
Dont be so childish, it’s not the Democrats fault you are a duchebag
Jill Travassos This "President" is not qualified to educate ANYONE! America does NOT want a stupid wall! We want intelligent border protection. And while we're at it, we would also like an intelligent President! And for God's sake, only a complete a$$ calls ANYONE who is not their own child "son"!
Dont be so childish, it’s not the Democrats fault you are a duchebag
STFU You are so disgusting in every sense 🤮. #TreasonIsTheReason #PutinsPuppet #LockHIMup Stupid people believe a wall will keep the drugs out...newsflash...they use tunnels 🤦🏼‍♀️. Give me funding for technology not a useless wall
A wall will help,, and your an idiot,, Not keeping america safe is treason.. and it's people like you that will get us all killed..  its not just a wall,,  go back to bed..
The only thing more transparent in the white house and its windows is president trump’s himongous head. Imagine all the birds shitting on him???? After all those tweets ...  bong bing bong bong your self you fucking orange !!!
They just want to obstruct and try to make you look bad but they are the ones who look like complete idiots to not want to secure our borders and our country is just insane which they are
5 BILLION DOLLARS OF OUR MONEY GOES TO MEXICO, SENT BY ILLEGALS, JUST WHAT WOULD HAPPEN IF THAT MONEY WAS SPENT IN AMERICA??? BUILD THE WALL.....
https://www.aclu.org/blog/immigrants-rights/look-trumps-biggest-border-lies  Lying liar says what??
Hold the line Mr. President we need a border wall. These Democrats voted for it before you could see this is all politics. They do not care about the American citizen all they care about is illegal immigrants
Why didn't you declare an emergency one year ago? The stats were exactly the same then as now. You are a pathological liar.
A wall will help,, and your an idiot,, Not keeping america safe is treason.. and it's people like you that will get us all killed..  its not just a wall,,  go back to bed..
Stop feeding the public lies to get your stupid wall... pathetic.
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Americans want you to fk off. Fk your wall and fk the dems too.
Trump's a billionare. why tf cant he pay for his own damn wall. how u gonna be a multi billion dollar name like trump and u cant even pay for this wall cheap ass penny pinching, pocket stealing, nickle and diming ass mother fucker
Trump is a bum ass bitch.
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍
Why didn't you declare an emergency one year ago? The stats were exactly the same then as now. You are a pathological liar.
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍👍
Bringing the troups home for christmas is just a distraction from all things that come tumbling down on you Donny as they are coming closer to grab you by the balls !!
Trump is a bum ass bitch.
Thank you President TRUMP,  hopefully these two will slither under their rock, they are both Evil, and look like they are  demonic, they would rather see U.S fail, then do,the right thing
Cripes, people. READ. FACT CHECK. This "stable genius" is a serial liar. https://www.factcheck.org/2019/01/factchecking-trumps-immigration-address/
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall
Democrats = Demon damn it I had enough of you and the lizzard people you serve.
Liar  Americans do NOT want a wall. They want their kids to be safe in schools. They want to make enough $ to provide for their loved ones. This wall is a distraction because you are Individual #1 You and your your children are suspect. People are waking up
Cadet Bone Spurs, who is likely barely literate (certainly from a written and, likely, reading point of view), took to the TV air waves tonight in a speech dripping with malice, xenophobia, and fear-mongering.  This incompetent's lack of morals and empathy would have made him an ideal candidate as an Auschwitz SS member. Archival photos would likely have shown him going home after a "hard day at the office" (murdering people?...which his policies have already done and are doing!) with a big smile on his face as he played with little Donnie, Eric, and Ivanka...training them in his devious, uncaring techniques. This man is barely human. This wilfully-ignorant and stupid individual is a disgusting waste of flabby human skin.  His PINHEADS continuing to support him at this late date speaks volumes about them, doesn't it?
You probably like playing with balls 🤣
Cadet Bone Spurs, who is likely barely literate (certainly from a written and, likely, reading point of view), took to the TV air waves tonight in a speech dripping with malice, xenophobia, and fear-mongering.  This incompetent's lack of morals and empathy would have made him an ideal candidate as an Auschwitz SS member. Archival photos would likely have shown him going home after a "hard day at the office" (murdering people?...which his policies have already done and are doing!) with a big smile on his face as he played with little Donnie, Eric, and Ivanka...training them in his devious, uncaring techniques. This man is barely human. This wilfully-ignorant and stupid individual is a disgusting waste of flabby human skin.  His PINHEADS continuing to support him at this late date speaks volumes about them, doesn't it?
Michael Martens pointing ur stupid pen in the wrong way. Stupid is in your mirror if u think u.s. should feed the world. Like most libs I'm sure u are  for wealth distribution(taking money from folks who earned it and giving it to folks that have done nothing for this country. What a joke.  Maga
You are not even able to spell . How do you expect me to take you seriously
Liar  Americans do NOT want a wall. They want their kids to be safe in schools. They want to make enough $ to provide for their loved ones. This wall is a distraction because you are Individual #1 You and your your children are suspect. People are waking up
You are not even able to spell . How do you expect me to take you seriously
Michael Martens pointing ur stupid pen in the wrong way. Stupid is in your mirror if u think u.s. should feed the world. Like most libs I'm sure u are  for wealth distribution(taking money from folks who earned it and giving it to folks that have done nothing for this country. What a joke.  Maga
The only promises you need to keep are TO YOURSELF.  So KEEP THEM TO YOURSELF,  Donny Douchebag.
Just tell them you built a new invisible force field.  Your dumb ass supporters will believe anything you say.
Build the wall.keep your promises president trump democrats are traitors of oath
Security is very important! then build that wall 35 feet high at both borders since most terrorist threats come from Canada #MAGA if not high and on both borders, then do not build it. Also let your supporters help build or donate like the Statue of Liberty
The fact that this idiot shares Fox News articles as facts should tell you everything you need to know about him.
Yes, Americans and democrats in congress want border security, higher technology, more personnel at the border to process immigrants. "Your" wall will not hinder those trafficking heroin.  It is smuggled in CARS AND OTHER VEHICLES THAT COME THROUGH LEGAL PORTS OF ENTRY, or through a network of sophisticated underground tunnels.   "Your" wall will do nothing to stop the flow of heroin, traffickers do NOT walk on foot with their cargo across the border, you idiot.  And only idiots will believe you on this.  Your address was full of mistruths, most know that.
Donald trump is an asshole
If it hasn't happened by now it's not going to happen...
Donald trump is an asshole
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
OMG..I'm drunk.  Should never have played Border Wall Bingo or taken a shot each time #fatnixon lied.  11 minutes of lies and fear mongering.  If you really care about US citizens what about the ones killed by a US citizen, domestic terrorist at Parkland High School?  The majority of illegal immigrants arrive by plane and overstay their Visas, they don't cross our southern border. The wall doesn't fix that   And according to the DEA - 90% of illegal drugs cross at established border crossings  Your wall doesn't fix that.  #itmfa  #borderwallbingo  #trumplies  #mexicowillpay  #wallfail
If you trying to destroy the border of other country,how could you save border of country?! Let others then you will be calm.
America is at a HUGE RISK of terrorism because of the #TrumpShutdown . We do not need a wall-we already HAVE ► 654 miles of border fencing. The Rio Grande is along the border-you can't fence that. Most of the property is owned by individuals STILL fighting Obama era eminent domain claims to keep their land from being seized. THERE IS NO PLAN for a wall. Trump/GOP can fund the government, keep us safe, and put Americans back to work while they figure out what they even want to do!! Trump says it's concrete, then it's steel slats, etc. You need PLANS before you ask for billions of dollars, ffs!  MORE FACTS-----  ►Most undocumented immigrants don’t “sneak” across the border.  The majority of immigrants in the USA without authorization first entered the country legally, and then overstayed their visas. The Center for Migration Studies said in a 2017 report that crossing the border is not the way “the large majority of persons now becoming undocumented.” It reported that two-thirds of undocumented immigrants entered the U.S. legally and then simply overstayed their visas. If you legitimately are concerned about the issue of undocumented immigrants, as opposed to just exacerbating and exploiting fearmongering for political gain, then this is where you would focus — not the border.  ►Drugs entering the USA across the southern border are most often hidden in legal shipments.  Trump has suggested that the flow of heroin into the United States would be stanched by his border wall. He’s right that 90 percent of heroin enters through the southern border. However, according to the Drug Enforcement Agency, “illicit drugs are smuggled into the United States in concealed compartments within passenger vehicles or commingled with legitimate goods on tractor trailers.”  In other words, a wall wouldn’t stop most heroin from entering the country. And arguably, resources spent on the wall would divert from other enforcement mechanisms, such as more officers and technology at ports of entry to scan vehicles for drugs.    It’s also noteworthy that in ramping up prosecution of migrants trying to enter the United States, the Trump administration actually reduced prosecution of drug traffickers. Last June saw the fewest such prosecutions in two decades.    ►Illegal border crossings are down. Significantly.  In 2000, 1.6 million people were apprehended trying to cross the southern border into the United States. In 2001, 1.3 million were apprehended. In 2018? Less than 400,000. That’s not just a decline. It’s a significant decline.  ►The counties along the southern border are among the safest in the United States.  According to data from the Wilson Center, as summarized by The Washington Post, “The crime rates in U.S. border counties are lower than the average for similarly sized inland counties, with two exceptions out of 23 total.”  ►The White House is lying about terrorists crossing the southern border.  In an interview on Fox News this weekend, White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders insisted that “nearly 4,000 known or suspected terrorists come into our country illegally, and we know that our most vulnerable point of entry is at our southern border.” Sanders' careful wording suggests she knew she was more than bending the truth. Fox News anchor Chris Wallace fact-checked Sanders: “Do you know where those 4,000 people come, where they are captured? Airports.”  “The state department says there hasn’t been any terrorists found coming across the southern border,” Wallace stated. But Sanders kept pressing the lie, because Trump’s anti-immigrant agenda relies on fact-less fearmongering.  ►Migrant caravans aren’t “sneaking” across the border, either.  If you care about facts, it’s important to distinguish between illegal border crossings and migrants lawfully presenting themselves at southern ports of entry in order to apply for asylum. The simple fact is that large groups of very visible migrants, such as the main so-called migrant caravan of people fleeing violence in Central America, are obviously not trying to “sneak” across the U.S. border. They’re coming to the border to apply for asylum, which was a completely transparent and lawful process until Trump started changing the rules.    ►Conservative political figures and think tanks think Trump’s wall is pointless.  What apparently began as a memory device to help the undisciplined Trump remember what to thunder about during campaign appearances has turned into a central bone the president won’t let go of. But there’s a reason Trump couldn’t get funding for his wall during the past two years of his presidency when his own party completely controlled both houses of Congress: They didn’t want it. The New York Times reports that leading anti-immigration activists are concerned Trump’s focus on the “relatively ineffectual” wall is distracting from other strategies they would like prioritized.  ►There are already 654 miles of border fencing.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.
Democrats protect the illegal alien while murdering the unborn!
BUILD A WALL FROM WHAT ????? America's debt is the largest sovereign debt in the world for a single country. The debt is greater than what America produces in a whole year. This high debt-to-gross domestic product ratio tells investors that the country will for the first time have problems repaying the loans. That's a new and worrying occurrence for the United States.
The invasion is okay though when you hire illegal immigrants to work for you. Resign you fat, orange con.
More important than you Mr. President for the anti Americans democrats morons is to show their frustration and disgusting disrespect to our country and to you because they are a bunch of idiots airheads
Create a huge, giant crater along the border 💣 Oops  Mass Deportation Now!  Close our borders completely and permanently.   Immigration laws need to be enforced on every level.   Get them out of our jails, our prisons, our courts, our schools and our country.   They should be stopped at the border by any means necessary.   Enough already.   GET IT DONE.
Angela Harris I agree,  and I see it all the time with our schools
You blowhard. You flat out said no when 25 billion was offered because you pandered to your swamp. You never negotiated anything. You effing blew it.
i got a question. Mr. President Donald Thrump has been called a Mother  Fucker. ...But  has the Presidento of Mexico every been called that..the people fled here for safety so if you are going to cuss somebody wouldn't be the Presidento of Mexico..Would she the congress woman call him that cuss word..  There was a woman elected in mexico shot down because of trying to help her country.  what would happened to,this lady that called Mr President of America that cuss word to the Mexico Presidento.  Is she a good example to the children..teaching disrespect to political figures of very high rank..
We don’t want shiiiiitt we want to get paid we want you to stop thinking you are head of a dictatorship and understand this is a democracy we want you to respect immigrants and understand you and your wife are children of immigrant we all are immigrants some more willing than others but unless you are an Indian we are all here uninvited
What a low life. what all rules & laws  for your peasants and not for you? a blue wave is coming in 2020, then we're gonna lock you up! crooked dirty Donny. make America great again and resign.
All of you that think a wall will stop illegal immigration have minimal understanding of the issue. Over 90% of all undocumented/illegal immigrants came here with valid visas and never left when they expired. Please explain to me how a wall will stop that? Also if the wall is to stop illegal immigration, why isnt one being placed along the northern border? More people enter that way than they do from the south.
Build the wall deport ALL illegals just load them all up and dump them where they came from. And take their kids with them
Fooling your 33% of idiots
Build a wall mr president and we will throw you over that mutherfucker!
You lying son of a bitch.
Create a huge, giant crater along the border 💣 Oops  Mass Deportation Now!  Close our borders completely and permanently.   Immigration laws need to be enforced on every level.   Get them out of our jails, our prisons, our courts, our schools and our country.   They should be stopped at the border by any means necessary.   Enough already.   GET IT DONE.
You lying son of a bitch.
Build the wall. most American citizens stand behind you and support you and the security of us all Mr. President, you want a wall ,? Make a law to vote in elections only with an ID  Democrats are corrupt and liars, they disparage citizens' lives. Democrats do not care about citizens' lives, only the votes of voters The Democrats underestimate the citizens' intelligence
impeach the motherfucker
They fucking submitted a god damn proposal to reopen the government and give you border security. You’re holding Americans hostage you fuckwit
40 ft wall >$5 billion....40 ft ladder at Home Depot <$500....Donnie Dumbass
LIAR! No one but your kkkult believes you!!!  https://trib.al/T8vJzGD
60 percent dont want a wall and 70 percent now want you impeached.  You  are unqualified disgrace of a  presidents  who created a man-made disaster—by your distorted facts and fixation on a wall… 2 Children died because of your crises
What’s more important to the Democrats is supporting the illegals that are killing our innocent citizens!!!! Bunch of traders!!!! They need to go behind the wall!!!!
TRAITOR
Ban guns.
Quit lying.
Build the wall. most American citizens stand behind you and support you and the security of us all Mr. President, you want a wall ,? Make a law to vote in elections only with an ID  Democrats are corrupt and liars, they disparage citizens' lives. Democrats do not care about citizens' lives, only the votes of voters The Democrats underestimate the citizens' intelligence
Quit lying.
Motherfucker.
Ban guns.
Shut up fraud
Lying liar
Idiot.
You are a jackass.
You suck.
You said Mexico was going to pay for it you lying 🍊 piece of 💩 son of a bitch mother fucker.
LYING IDIOT! RESIGN!!
They. Demo Demons
Motherfucker.
They. Demo Demons
Trumptards
Bonny Wallace Bradstreet I can write full sentences. 😅
Don't take it to heart. It's not your fault. It's Trump's
LYING IDIOT! RESIGN!!
Treason!
Fool
Liar in Chief
Moron.
Idiot
Idiot!
Don't take it to heart. It's not your fault. It's Trump's
Idiot!
If you think a wall will secure the border you are gigantic dumbass.
Nick Moyte you are brain Dead if you think it wont
Nick Moyte well take all doors anyw windows out of your house and let them come and go from your house and you feed them then.
Idiot
Nick Moyte well take all doors anyw windows out of your house and let them come and go from your house and you feed them then.
Nick Moyte you are brain Dead if you think it wont
If you think a wall will secure the border you are gigantic dumbass.
Moron.
Twit
Twit
Any one who is serious and educated regarding border security knows the wall is a vanity boondoggle. You are a pathological liar.
Any one who is serious and educated regarding border security knows the wall is a vanity boondoggle. You are a pathological liar.
Liar in Chief
Fool
Treason!
Loser
Loser
Bonny Wallace Bradstreet I can write full sentences. 😅
MD K Landry , is that the only word u know? education  did u wrong....hahaha
MD K Landry , is that the only word u know? education  did u wrong....hahaha
Trumptards
You said Mexico was going to pay for it you lying 🍊 piece of 💩 son of a bitch mother fucker.
You suck.
You are a jackass.
Idiot.
Lying liar
Shut up fraud
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
So far all promises from November 2016 kept: 1. wall build within one year.......2. destroyed ISIS within the first 3 month ........3. Got rid of Obamacare within one year ! ....AND drove the national debt to a new record high of 22 TRILLION $ ..... Good job :) :) :) :) :) :)muhahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
TRAITOR
What’s more important to the Democrats is supporting the illegals that are killing our innocent citizens!!!! Bunch of traders!!!! They need to go behind the wall!!!!
Demonic moron.......you have become the head of a home grown terrorist organization....the GOP. You are holding the American people hostage to a vanity project......you are not a King.....
Demonic moron.......you have become the head of a home grown terrorist organization....the GOP. You are holding the American people hostage to a vanity project......you are not a King.....
60 percent dont want a wall and 70 percent now want you impeached.  You  are unqualified disgrace of a  presidents  who created a man-made disaster—by your distorted facts and fixation on a wall… 2 Children died because of your crises
LIAR! No one but your kkkult believes you!!!  https://trib.al/T8vJzGD
40 ft wall >$5 billion....40 ft ladder at Home Depot <$500....Donnie Dumbass
They fucking submitted a god damn proposal to reopen the government and give you border security. You’re holding Americans hostage you fuckwit
impeach the motherfucker
Build a wall mr president and we will throw you over that mutherfucker!
Fooling your 33% of idiots
Build the wall deport ALL illegals just load them all up and dump them where they came from. And take their kids with them
All of you that think a wall will stop illegal immigration have minimal understanding of the issue. Over 90% of all undocumented/illegal immigrants came here with valid visas and never left when they expired. Please explain to me how a wall will stop that? Also if the wall is to stop illegal immigration, why isnt one being placed along the northern border? More people enter that way than they do from the south.
What a low life. what all rules & laws  for your peasants and not for you? a blue wave is coming in 2020, then we're gonna lock you up! crooked dirty Donny. make America great again and resign.
We don’t want shiiiiitt we want to get paid we want you to stop thinking you are head of a dictatorship and understand this is a democracy we want you to respect immigrants and understand you and your wife are children of immigrant we all are immigrants some more willing than others but unless you are an Indian we are all here uninvited
i got a question. Mr. President Donald Thrump has been called a Mother  Fucker. ...But  has the Presidento of Mexico every been called that..the people fled here for safety so if you are going to cuss somebody wouldn't be the Presidento of Mexico..Would she the congress woman call him that cuss word..  There was a woman elected in mexico shot down because of trying to help her country.  what would happened to,this lady that called Mr President of America that cuss word to the Mexico Presidento.  Is she a good example to the children..teaching disrespect to political figures of very high rank..
You blowhard. You flat out said no when 25 billion was offered because you pandered to your swamp. You never negotiated anything. You effing blew it.
More important than you Mr. President for the anti Americans democrats morons is to show their frustration and disgusting disrespect to our country and to you because they are a bunch of idiots airheads
NO! WE WANT TO SEE YOU IN PRISON, AT THE VERY LEAST! YOU ARE THE NATIONAL CRISIS, YOU MORON!
NO! WE WANT TO SEE YOU IN PRISON, AT THE VERY LEAST! YOU ARE THE NATIONAL CRISIS, YOU MORON!
The invasion is okay though when you hire illegal immigrants to work for you. Resign you fat, orange con.
BUILD A WALL FROM WHAT ????? America's debt is the largest sovereign debt in the world for a single country. The debt is greater than what America produces in a whole year. This high debt-to-gross domestic product ratio tells investors that the country will for the first time have problems repaying the loans. That's a new and worrying occurrence for the United States.
Democrats protect the illegal alien while murdering the unborn!
America is at a HUGE RISK of terrorism because of the #TrumpShutdown . We do not need a wall-we already HAVE ► 654 miles of border fencing. The Rio Grande is along the border-you can't fence that. Most of the property is owned by individuals STILL fighting Obama era eminent domain claims to keep their land from being seized. THERE IS NO PLAN for a wall. Trump/GOP can fund the government, keep us safe, and put Americans back to work while they figure out what they even want to do!! Trump says it's concrete, then it's steel slats, etc. You need PLANS before you ask for billions of dollars, ffs!  MORE FACTS-----  ►Most undocumented immigrants don’t “sneak” across the border.  The majority of immigrants in the USA without authorization first entered the country legally, and then overstayed their visas. The Center for Migration Studies said in a 2017 report that crossing the border is not the way “the large majority of persons now becoming undocumented.” It reported that two-thirds of undocumented immigrants entered the U.S. legally and then simply overstayed their visas. If you legitimately are concerned about the issue of undocumented immigrants, as opposed to just exacerbating and exploiting fearmongering for political gain, then this is where you would focus — not the border.  ►Drugs entering the USA across the southern border are most often hidden in legal shipments.  Trump has suggested that the flow of heroin into the United States would be stanched by his border wall. He’s right that 90 percent of heroin enters through the southern border. However, according to the Drug Enforcement Agency, “illicit drugs are smuggled into the United States in concealed compartments within passenger vehicles or commingled with legitimate goods on tractor trailers.”  In other words, a wall wouldn’t stop most heroin from entering the country. And arguably, resources spent on the wall would divert from other enforcement mechanisms, such as more officers and technology at ports of entry to scan vehicles for drugs.    It’s also noteworthy that in ramping up prosecution of migrants trying to enter the United States, the Trump administration actually reduced prosecution of drug traffickers. Last June saw the fewest such prosecutions in two decades.    ►Illegal border crossings are down. Significantly.  In 2000, 1.6 million people were apprehended trying to cross the southern border into the United States. In 2001, 1.3 million were apprehended. In 2018? Less than 400,000. That’s not just a decline. It’s a significant decline.  ►The counties along the southern border are among the safest in the United States.  According to data from the Wilson Center, as summarized by The Washington Post, “The crime rates in U.S. border counties are lower than the average for similarly sized inland counties, with two exceptions out of 23 total.”  ►The White House is lying about terrorists crossing the southern border.  In an interview on Fox News this weekend, White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders insisted that “nearly 4,000 known or suspected terrorists come into our country illegally, and we know that our most vulnerable point of entry is at our southern border.” Sanders' careful wording suggests she knew she was more than bending the truth. Fox News anchor Chris Wallace fact-checked Sanders: “Do you know where those 4,000 people come, where they are captured? Airports.”  “The state department says there hasn’t been any terrorists found coming across the southern border,” Wallace stated. But Sanders kept pressing the lie, because Trump’s anti-immigrant agenda relies on fact-less fearmongering.  ►Migrant caravans aren’t “sneaking” across the border, either.  If you care about facts, it’s important to distinguish between illegal border crossings and migrants lawfully presenting themselves at southern ports of entry in order to apply for asylum. The simple fact is that large groups of very visible migrants, such as the main so-called migrant caravan of people fleeing violence in Central America, are obviously not trying to “sneak” across the U.S. border. They’re coming to the border to apply for asylum, which was a completely transparent and lawful process until Trump started changing the rules.    ►Conservative political figures and think tanks think Trump’s wall is pointless.  What apparently began as a memory device to help the undisciplined Trump remember what to thunder about during campaign appearances has turned into a central bone the president won’t let go of. But there’s a reason Trump couldn’t get funding for his wall during the past two years of his presidency when his own party completely controlled both houses of Congress: They didn’t want it. The New York Times reports that leading anti-immigration activists are concerned Trump’s focus on the “relatively ineffectual” wall is distracting from other strategies they would like prioritized.  ►There are already 654 miles of border fencing.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.  The U.S.-Mexico border is 1,933 miles long. Of that, 34 percent already has a wall or a fence — in particular, parts along the areas of the border that are most easily accessed by people traveling by car or on foot. That’s right, there’s already a wall along 654 miles of the U.S. border. What’s the rest? Huge mountains and rivers and vast stretches of land that are privately owned, which the United States would have to seize through eminent domain if Trump got his way. Mind you, those areas aren’t completely open — they’re actively patrolled using sensors and drones and other technology, the sorts of things experts say actually work.
If you trying to destroy the border of other country,how could you save border of country?! Let others then you will be calm.
OMG..I'm drunk.  Should never have played Border Wall Bingo or taken a shot each time #fatnixon lied.  11 minutes of lies and fear mongering.  If you really care about US citizens what about the ones killed by a US citizen, domestic terrorist at Parkland High School?  The majority of illegal immigrants arrive by plane and overstay their Visas, they don't cross our southern border. The wall doesn't fix that   And according to the DEA - 90% of illegal drugs cross at established border crossings  Your wall doesn't fix that.  #itmfa  #borderwallbingo  #trumplies  #mexicowillpay  #wallfail
Angela Harris I agree,  and I see it all the time with our schools
You can get arrested for hunting and fishing without a license, why are the illegals allowed to work and stay in America without being cleared. And schools that are run by tax payer money should have to verify that the parents of enrolling children are here legally. You would be shocked how many children are entering our schools.
You can get arrested for hunting and fishing without a license, why are the illegals allowed to work and stay in America without being cleared. And schools that are run by tax payer money should have to verify that the parents of enrolling children are here legally. You would be shocked how many children are entering our schools.
Narcissistic personality disorder — one of several types of personality disorders — is a mental condition in which people have an inflated sense of their own importance, a deep need for excessive attention and admiration, troubled relationships, and a lack of empathy for others. But behind this mask of extreme confidence lies a fragile self-esteem that's vulnerable to the slightest criticism.
Yes, Americans and democrats in congress want border security, higher technology, more personnel at the border to process immigrants. "Your" wall will not hinder those trafficking heroin.  It is smuggled in CARS AND OTHER VEHICLES THAT COME THROUGH LEGAL PORTS OF ENTRY, or through a network of sophisticated underground tunnels.   "Your" wall will do nothing to stop the flow of heroin, traffickers do NOT walk on foot with their cargo across the border, you idiot.  And only idiots will believe you on this.  Your address was full of mistruths, most know that.
The fact that this idiot shares Fox News articles as facts should tell you everything you need to know about him.
Security is very important! then build that wall 35 feet high at both borders since most terrorist threats come from Canada #MAGA if not high and on both borders, then do not build it. Also let your supporters help build or donate like the Statue of Liberty
Build the wall.keep your promises president trump democrats are traitors of oath
Just tell them you built a new invisible force field.  Your dumb ass supporters will believe anything you say.
The only promises you need to keep are TO YOURSELF.  So KEEP THEM TO YOURSELF,  Donny Douchebag.
If it hasn't happened by now it's not going to happen...
💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚
💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚 💣  💣 IMPEACH THE ORANGE CLOWN  🐵 🔚
You Americans that support trump are so stupid. You are being duped. Open your eyes. Your republic is being undermined by this self serving clown
You Americans that support trump are so stupid. You are being duped. Open your eyes. Your republic is being undermined by this self serving clown
You are a liar and a moron NOWALL
You are a liar and a moron NOWALL
Democrats = Demon damn it I had enough of you and the lizzard people you serve.
Stand your ground , don't back down Mr. President. They can all say a big THANK YOU to the evil DEMOCRATS for the continued shutdown!!!!!!!!
Stand your ground , don't back down Mr. President. They can all say a big THANK YOU to the evil DEMOCRATS for the continued shutdown!!!!!!!!
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall
It costs the US like $750/day to house those under 18 and now they number over 10,000 a month since November jumping border. Then theres another 40,000 adults a month since November costing not much less. This all about New California Governor Newsom wants all of California to be a Sanctuary State and have Illegals be given free health care and California House leader Pelosi wants holes in the fence. Its simple. It’s their con job. Even Angus King doesn’t get how or why Pelosi is calling a barrier “immoral”. It’s there Pelosi loses the public opinion poll. Pelosi is keeping gov closed. Nothing has reached the President’s desk to even sign or not. Hello ! And include Democratic California Rep. Eric Swalwell as today he says too a steel fence is “immoral “. So a California House leader Pelosi and a California Congressman Swalwell is in a sceme with California Governor Newsom to keep border unsecured and are willing to keep government closed to achieve their goal. Got it ! Trump making money for more detention beds yet these people know they’ll only be detained for 20 days then released. That’s a no brainer.
It costs the US like $750/day to house those under 18 and now they number over 10,000 a month since November jumping border. Then theres another 40,000 adults a month since November costing not much less. This all about New California Governor Newsom wants all of California to be a Sanctuary State and have Illegals be given free health care and California House leader Pelosi wants holes in the fence. Its simple. It’s their con job. Even Angus King doesn’t get how or why Pelosi is calling a barrier “immoral”. It’s there Pelosi loses the public opinion poll. Pelosi is keeping gov closed. Nothing has reached the President’s desk to even sign or not. Hello ! And include Democratic California Rep. Eric Swalwell as today he says too a steel fence is “immoral “. So a California House leader Pelosi and a California Congressman Swalwell is in a sceme with California Governor Newsom to keep border unsecured and are willing to keep government closed to achieve their goal. Got it ! Trump making money for more detention beds yet these people know they’ll only be detained for 20 days then released. That’s a no brainer.
Cripes, people. READ. FACT CHECK. This "stable genius" is a serial liar. https://www.factcheck.org/2019/01/factchecking-trumps-immigration-address/
Thank you President TRUMP,  hopefully these two will slither under their rock, they are both Evil, and look like they are  demonic, they would rather see U.S fail, then do,the right thing
You probably like playing with balls 🤣
Bringing the troups home for christmas is just a distraction from all things that come tumbling down on you Donny as they are coming closer to grab you by the balls !!
Trump's a billionare. why tf cant he pay for his own damn wall. how u gonna be a multi billion dollar name like trump and u cant even pay for this wall cheap ass penny pinching, pocket stealing, nickle and diming ass mother fucker
When Trump says the southern border situation is a national emergency, what he really has in mind is a Trump emergency. He's the boy who cried wolf. He would send our war fighters to the border to start building a wall so Ann Coulter will be nice to him again.  "The basic factory setting on the perception of Trump is: gigantic douchebag. This is a man who manufactured fake Time magazine covers featuring himself with the headline, "Donald Trump: The 'Apprentice' is a television smash!" so that he could put framed copies of it on the walls of his clubs.  His business is convincing people with lowbrow taste to give him their money." http://www.anncoulter.com/columns/2018-12-19.html
When Trump says the southern border situation is a national emergency, what he really has in mind is a Trump emergency. He's the boy who cried wolf. He would send our war fighters to the border to start building a wall so Ann Coulter will be nice to him again.  "The basic factory setting on the perception of Trump is: gigantic douchebag. This is a man who manufactured fake Time magazine covers featuring himself with the headline, "Donald Trump: The 'Apprentice' is a television smash!" so that he could put framed copies of it on the walls of his clubs.  His business is convincing people with lowbrow taste to give him their money." http://www.anncoulter.com/columns/2018-12-19.html
Americans want you to fk off. Fk your wall and fk the dems too.
Seems to me that what is important to you is to attack the Democrats.  The Democrats are trying to work with you on border security just not a wall.  And shutting down the government, hurting people is downright cruel.  You are a very mean man.  Please resign or you will be removed.
Seems to me that what is important to you is to attack the Democrats.  The Democrats are trying to work with you on border security just not a wall.  And shutting down the government, hurting people is downright cruel.  You are a very mean man.  Please resign or you will be removed.
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Donald TRUMP: "I am proud to shut down the wall for border security....so I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it".....HE SAID TO THE DEMOCRATS.  IT'S ALL ON YOU FAT ASS. WHERE ARE THE PESOS? Call Mexico .
Stop feeding the public lies to get your stupid wall... pathetic.
Hold the line Mr. President we need a border wall. These Democrats voted for it before you could see this is all politics. They do not care about the American citizen all they care about is illegal immigrants
We should seek, to Expulse the congress members, in the way. All it takes is a concurrence of two-thirds, to expel a congress member from congress. Start with Chuck, then the two muslins, who did not swear in on a holy bible. Can we leave the wing nut socialism girl, she is really cute and very funny.
We should seek, to Expulse the congress members, in the way. All it takes is a concurrence of two-thirds, to expel a congress member from congress. Start with Chuck, then the two muslins, who did not swear in on a holy bible. Can we leave the wing nut socialism girl, she is really cute and very funny.
https://www.aclu.org/blog/immigrants-rights/look-trumps-biggest-border-lies  Lying liar says what??
5 BILLION DOLLARS OF OUR MONEY GOES TO MEXICO, SENT BY ILLEGALS, JUST WHAT WOULD HAPPEN IF THAT MONEY WAS SPENT IN AMERICA??? BUILD THE WALL.....
You also promised Mexico would pay for the wall. Many illegals are coming in from planes or boats and overstaying their visas. So, yeah about that wall again?
You also promised Mexico would pay for the wall. Many illegals are coming in from planes or boats and overstaying their visas. So, yeah about that wall again?
Another reason now is the time for term limits, House & Senate... They are wagging the dog here with America, liers all of them... # don't trust them at all !!! https://www.facebook.com/FoxNewsVoices/videos/333680307244845/
Another reason now is the time for term limits, House & Senate... They are wagging the dog here with America, liers all of them... # don't trust them at all !!! https://www.facebook.com/FoxNewsVoices/videos/333680307244845/
They just want to obstruct and try to make you look bad but they are the ones who look like complete idiots to not want to secure our borders and our country is just insane which they are
Dow is where it was one year ago, deficit is approaching ONE TRILLION DOLLARS, National debt is 22 TRILLION, Ford is laying off 20.000 workers, gas is up to 3 Dollars and interest rates go up rapidly. Lower and middle class people don´t have one penny more in their pocket, but rich people got tax cuts !!! Great work of the orange CLOWN !!
Dow is where it was one year ago, deficit is approaching ONE TRILLION DOLLARS, National debt is 22 TRILLION, Ford is laying off 20.000 workers, gas is up to 3 Dollars and interest rates go up rapidly. Lower and middle class people don´t have one penny more in their pocket, but rich people got tax cuts !!! Great work of the orange CLOWN !!
STFU You are so disgusting in every sense 🤮. #TreasonIsTheReason #PutinsPuppet #LockHIMup Stupid people believe a wall will keep the drugs out...newsflash...they use tunnels 🤦🏼‍♀️. Give me funding for technology not a useless wall
Your not even gonna be president long enough to finish the wall thats why they wont give up the money you fucking idiot
Your not even gonna be president long enough to finish the wall thats why they wont give up the money you fucking idiot
Build the wall!!! Secure the Republic
Trump will get on Nationwide television and do what he does best Lie his Ass off...Trump is a habitual liar..and his whole staff are Liars The Whitehouse is full of Lying Mother Fuckers ..and Crooks!!!
Trump will get on Nationwide television and do what he does best Lie his Ass off...Trump is a habitual liar..and his whole staff are Liars The Whitehouse is full of Lying Mother Fuckers ..and Crooks!!!
You promised a wall paid for by Mexico! Not the taxpayers. So you are not fulfilling your promise! Liar!
Dude. You’re an idiot
Build the wall
Build the Wall.
KEVIN. WHEN WILLYOU GET IT THRU YOUR THICK SKULL. AMERICA WANTS THE WALL SON. MOVE ALONG. IT'S COMING. GET COMFY!    GET BACK TO YOUR  TROLLING. THE PRESIDENT WILL BE EDUCATING YOU SOON! ;_)
When will you get it through you thick skull? We want an intelligent and comprehensive plan for border security. All you ever give us is your stupid wall!
shut the goverment down for six months......what ever i takes
Build the wall
Donald Trump is a Moron
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the damn wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
BUILD  THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall!!!
https://www.facebook.com/DonaldTrump/# is a moron
Build the wall!
Build the wall.
Resign, you're an idiot.  Or as Rex says, "A f@cking Moron"
Its not so much that the democrap don't want the wall as they say it won't work it's more along the lines that they know it will work and they hate to admit they were Wrong!
Trump is very poor con man.
B R E A K I N G  N  E W S :::: Trump has two parts of brain, "left" and "right". In the left side, there´s nothing right. In the right side, there´s nothing left !  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)
B R E A K I N G  N  E W S :::: Trump has two parts of brain, "left" and "right". In the left side, there´s nothing right. In the right side, there´s nothing left !  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)
Democrats say the border is not the main problem.  People overstaying their visas are.  DEMOCRATS won't let ICE apprehend these illegal visa overstayers.
Democrats say the border is not the main problem.  People overstaying their visas are.  DEMOCRATS won't let ICE apprehend these illegal visa overstayers.
We want you gone TRAITOR. Move to Russia. Where you belong. Putin will give his best BOY(you) a shiny Hero of Russia medal.
All the Democrats want is to destroy everything this country stands for. It started with statues and now it's the real Patriots. We are locked and loaded Mr President and ready to shoot and a moments notice. We Are Sick and Tired of The Liberal Snow Flakes. It is time for people to go.
BUILD THE WALL...STOP PAYING THE MORONS BLOCKING IT...MAYBE THEN THEY WILL REMEMBER WHO THEY ARE SUPPOST TO BE WORKING FOR...THE AMERICAN PEOPLE.
BUILD THE WALL...STOP PAYING THE MORONS BLOCKING IT...MAYBE THEN THEY WILL REMEMBER WHO THEY ARE SUPPOST TO BE WORKING FOR...THE AMERICAN PEOPLE.
Those That Keep Bashing Trump Funny How You Can Believe In Lies About trump. When the Truth About Clinton And Obama Are Out You Don,t Believe. Learn To Tell What Is A Lie and what Is The truth. trump Till 2024. Trumps Doing What He is Suppose To Do Thank god For That.
They don't like you. My daughter is a liberal & I can't talk with her about reasonable politics & law for more than 2 minutes before she goes ballistic - citing all the money that's been stolen from Americans, and how the big corps. are taking over the world, etc.  She can't see that letting all these illegals in will harm us - she's sees pie-in-the-sky.
A NATIONAL EMERGENCY WILL BE DECLARED TONIGHT AND MONEY WILL BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE WALL TO SECURE ONCE AND FOR ALL OUR SOUTHERN SICK BORDER. MEXICO 3RD WORLD COUNTRY HAS NOT HELPED US ONE BIT TO SECURE OUR SOUTHERN BORDER. THEY ARE THE PROBLEM. IF THEY WANT TO BECOME AMERICANS, BE VETTED AT OUR PORTS OF ENTRY. NO MORE SNEAKING IN ILLEGALLY AS CRIMINALS.
Janet Williams  HO YOU DUMBASS FUCKING tiny dicked trump?
Eyon Deen what an idiot and crybaby
WHEN YOU TOOK THE OATH OF OFFICE DUMB-ASS...YOU PROMISED THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR YOUR STUPID BORDER WALL. WHY ARE YOU NOW DEMANDING FUNDS FROM CONGRESS,, JUST BECAUSE YOU ARE A FUCKING SORE LOSER?? Manage
NOT ONE TIME WILL THE DEMRATS AGREE WITH YOU !  PELOSI AND SCHUMER ARE OUR TRAITORS..PRESIDENT TRUMP, GO AHEAD WITH THE WALL..ALL OF US PEOPLE PAYING TAXES , THESE SCUMBS, WE WOULD HAVE TO PAY FOR..THEY ARE A MIXTURE OF MURDERS AND THEIVES
ABOLISH CONGRESS!! LET PRESIDENT TRUMP DO HIS JOB. SATANS IN CONGRESS IN FULL MOTION TO DESTROY THIS COUNTRY....
Build that wall ,and put land mines around it also ,your country will soon look like england and France because liberals were to politically correct and wanted to let in the scum .look at these other nations they will never recover from this .
SHUT THE WHOLE GOVT DOWN IF YOU HAVE TO.  DO NOT CAVE IN TO THAT EVIL WITCH, BUT ONLY KEEP THE AMERICAN PEOPLE FIRST AS YOU HAVE ALWAYS DONE. GOD BLESS YOU.
SHUT THE WHOLE GOVT DOWN IF YOU HAVE TO.  DO NOT CAVE IN TO THAT EVIL WITCH, BUT ONLY KEEP THE AMERICAN PEOPLE FIRST AS YOU HAVE ALWAYS DONE. GOD BLESS YOU.
THE DEMOCRATS DON'T CARE ABOUT OWER COUNTRY OR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE THEY WANT THE OPEN BORDERS DRUGS AND THE MURDERING," BOTTOM LINE THEY JUST DON'T CARE VEARY SAD.
build the WALL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Build the wall!!! My family respects and supports you. The democrats are honestly the most evil politician's ever. They are a joke. Its scary that people vote for them. We love you Donald Trump.  Everyone out in my neck of the woods supports you as well. Stay strong and Build the wall!!! Please dont negotiate with them
Build the wall!!! My family respects and supports you. The democrats are honestly the most evil politician's ever. They are a joke. Its scary that people vote for them. We love you Donald Trump.  Everyone out in my neck of the woods supports you as well. Stay strong and Build the wall!!! Please dont negotiate with them
Katie Curran I guess your not paying attention. Ford motors is now not going to build trucks or truck parts in Mexico. They are moving those jobs to the USA. It's a multiple billion dollar deal. Yep they are paying for the wall
YOU AREN'T FULFILLING YOUR PROMISE!! YOU SAID MEXICO WOULD PAY. NOW YOU WANT AMERICAN MONEY TO PAY.  YOU ARE A LIAR!!
the drugs don,t just come in at the entry way. drug cartels go through the deserta mountains. guess yo never hiked anywhere. they use  glass to shine when they spot someone to let them know change course. some places you can,t hike anymore cartels will kille you you don,t hear this on fake news. Get real We Need The Border. Dec23 Chucky said he wanted to stop all negoations till peloski took over. so its chucky shutdown Its Not Stupid To Shutdown The Gov. Have Sone Comon Sense. There Scared There Cash Cow Will Dry Out Plain And Simple. Bless This Country. Trump Keep Strong Don,t Back Down
Illegal border crossings are at a 40 year low, more than 60% of all undocumented immigrants are here because they overstated a valid visa, and most of the illegal drugs come through monitored points of entry. There is no need for your vanity project!
ALL AMERICANS STAND UP AND FIGHT WITH OUR PRESIDENT VOTE FOR OUR PRESIDENT DONALD J. TRUMP 2020 TO DEFEAT THESE SO CALL DEMOCRATS ONCE AND FOR ALL LETS GET TOGETHER AND TAKE THESE DEMOCRATS DOWN.THEY ARE STUPID AND IDIOTS THEY NEED TO GET REAM OUT.
ALL AMERICANS STAND UP AND FIGHT WITH OUR PRESIDENT VOTE FOR OUR PRESIDENT DONALD J. TRUMP 2020 TO DEFEAT THESE SO CALL DEMOCRATS ONCE AND FOR ALL LETS GET TOGETHER AND TAKE THESE DEMOCRATS DOWN.THEY ARE STUPID AND IDIOTS THEY NEED TO GET REAM OUT.
BUILD THE WALL......... WHEN YOU DON'T BECOME A CITIZEN  YOU CAN'T HAVE ANY PUDDING HOW CAN YOU HAVE ANY PUDDING IF YOU DON'T EAT YOUR MEAT.?
I hope the impeachment process works. You don’t care about the citizens or you would end the shut down. You said you would block funding for California wild fires... how is that caring about the safety of your country? Come February you’ll be starving over 38 million Americans, predominantly children, how is that caring about the safety of your citizens? You’re willing to allow millions of low income families to become homeless. How is that caring about anyone’s safety besides your own bullheadedness? You won’t be homeless, you will continue to eat, you will continue getting paid while all your workers continue to be furloughed or work for no pay. You don’t know struggle. You’ve been a rich kid your whole life. That’s why you’re so okay with letting others suffer if it gets you your way. You won’t go hungry and neither will your children. You won’t risk homeless because you have no money due to HUD running out of funds or no paycheck for an extended period of time.  You’re a disgrace and I fully support your impeachment!
The majority of Americans hate you and would rather see you gone, that's what the latest poll's suggest...You're the worst president ever. You support the terrorist STATE of ISRAEL and the terrorist kingdom of Saudi Arabia
The majority of Americans hate you and would rather see you gone, that's what the latest poll's suggest...You're the worst president ever. You support the terrorist STATE of ISRAEL and the terrorist kingdom of Saudi Arabia
You're such a jackass. Stop embarassing yourself and resign.
There is no border emergency.  There is only a megalomaniac sexual predator in the White House.
Build the WALL!!!
Build the wall!!!!!!!!
Build the wall and stand tall.
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL !!!!!
Build that wall
You are disgusting
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build it period.
Build it period.
Don the Draft Dodger: Idiot!
please kill yourself
Rick Scott their faces already did from botox
pelosi and shummer lay down and have a stroke
pelosi and shummer lay down and have a stroke
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!
President Trump, it is our hope that you will not budge one inch with regard to "Building the Wall".  We all know you cannot negotiate with Democrats, as 'it is their way or the highway'.  We MUST HAVE A WALL to keep ILLEGAL DRUG DEALERS, TERRORISTS, AND ASSORTED PREGNANT IMMIGRANTS, WHO THINK THAT IF THEY ARE ABLE TO ENTER THIS COUNTRY VIA PREGNANCY, OR DRAGGING THEIR YOUNG CHILDREN FROM GUATEMALA TO MEXICO, UNDER THE GUISE OF BEING GOOD PARENTS, REVEALS THE FACT THAT THE DEMOCRATS DON"T CARE ONE WHIT ABOUT OUR NATIONAL SECURITY.  WE, THE AMERICAN PEOPLE WANT OUR COUNTRY SECURE, AND THE ONLY WAY TO ENSURE THIS IS TO BUILD A WALL THAT THEY CANNOT SCALE.  A BORDER CROSSING FENCE WILL NOT WORK FOR PEOPLE WHO ARE DESPERATE TO LEAVE THEIR IMPOVERISHED COUNTRIES (WHY DON'T THE DEMOCRATS
Democrats are cockroaches.
Build the wall...
The only ones who want to build a wall are the people who have a evil demonic and hateful lives, hearts and mind! All those who have been to wars who had participated in killing others in other countries,who are blood guilty from all the wars the US has cause thru out the years. So they live in fear of their own demonic Karma
Build the wall!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
Build the Wall!!!
The democrats are sick fucks
The democrats are sick fucks
BUILD THE WALL!!
Democrats have mental issues
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall..
Build the wall!!
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸
Build the wall!
Build the wall! Get it done 🇺🇲🇺🇲🇺🇲
Build the wall
Donald Trump is a Moron
American;s want U gone, FuckFace!
Fucking trump!u fucking said Mexico will pay for wall ,that's the promises u did!
Build and deport!
Build and deport!
Build the WALL!
BUILD the wall first so its cant comeback
Build the wall!!
BUILD THE WALL.SEND NASTY NANCY TO MEXICO....
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build that wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
Build the WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Good President
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build the wall now
Build the wall.
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall
Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...
BUILD THE WALL!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
He is an ass hole@@!
Build The Wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL.
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!!
Build the wall.  Don't give in.
Build the wall !!!!!!!!
Build the wall !!!!!!!!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall !🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build That Wall
Your an idiot
Your an idiot
build the wall
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build The Wall 💯💯🤩
STFU MORON !!!!!!!!!!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build The Wall !!!!!
Build the wall.
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Do your aides actually read the comments?
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall👊👊👍
Build the wall!
Build the wall/PLEASE
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall !!
Build the wall

YES OBIE WAS.. GONE NOW. RELAX.  TRUMP2020
He's such a pompous lying asshole
Build the wall
Build a wall around Trump.
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
BUILD  THE  WALL!
Build the wall
Build The Wall
Build the WALL
Build the Wall
Build the Wall
You are the Super President.
You are the Super President.
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
You are such a dumbass.   Pathetic.
Build the WALL
build the wall!
Shut up you orange ass hat
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall.
Build the wall anyway!
Build the wall! MAGA!
Dumb motherfucker
Build The Wall
Ass Clown 🤡 Trump
Build the Wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!!
F*** Trump and that Wall ✊🇲🇽👑
BUILD THE WALL!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
No we don’t bitch
build that wall
Democrats want communism
Build the Wall...!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
no moron. We want you impeached
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!!!
Build the WALL!
Build the Wall!
Liberal scum bags.
Build the Wall!!!!
build the wall.
Build the wall please
BUILD THE WALL  !!!!
Build the wall !!!!
Build that Wall
Build the WALL!
Build the wall.
Build the WALL!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall.
Build the WALL
Not according to NAN.  the bitch
Not according to NAN.  the bitch
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!!!!!
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!!!
Build the WALL
Build the wall!!!
build the wall
Build this wall and build it now!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall.....
Build the wall now
Build The Wall!
build the wall
build the wall
build the wall
build the wall
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the wall
Build the Wall!!!
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Please build the damn wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall & destroy all the tunnels.
Build the Wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall now
Build the wall!
Build the wall
It’s a National Emergency 🚨
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
The Donald
Pussy asshole.
Build the wall!!!!
BUILD THE WALL
Build that wall
Go get em Trump !!!!!!
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
No leave it SHUT DOWN AND SHUT DOWN OUR BORDER WITH MEXICO NOW! PELOSI AND SCHUMER ARE KNOWN LIARS! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! STOP THE DEMOCRATIC SOCIALISTS LIARS FROM tearing OUR COUNTRY DOWN! THEY HAVE BEEN COMMITTING THESE DISGUSTING policies election AFTER ELECTION!
Build the wall
Build the wall !!
Build the wall !!
Build that wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Trump is biggest communist of them all!
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Sorry ass motherfucker 😂😂😂💀
Build the Wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall...
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!!
Build that WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!  🚷
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall  !!!!!!
build the wall
Build that wall MAGA
Build the wall!!
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall !!
Build the wall
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the Wall
Orange orangutan is all you are😘
Orange orangutan is all you are😘
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall with the Army.
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall!
Build the Wall!
Build the wall!!!
Build the Wall
Bumbling fool!!
Build the wall!  🇺🇸
Build the wall
Build the wall
Brian Kolfage.com, has a website for Funding the WAll, we the people will fund it and make the Dems look like fools
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
Build the wall, mr president
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
STUPID MOTHERFUCKING IDIOT
STUPID MOTHERFUCKING IDIOT
Build the wall
Build the wall!
You idiot, walls don't work
Build The Wall!
Build the wall
Dont Back Down Trump! #MAGA
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall
The woman is trash.
build the wall we need the wall now!!!!
Build the wall America
Build the wall!
They just want to destroy America
Build the wall!
DEMS ARE IMMORAL.  #BUILDTHEWALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL RIGHT NOW
BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL  BUILD THE WALL RIGHT NOW
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Lock the border down.
Gofuckyourself
Gofuckyourself
Build that Wall
Illegal aliens
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL PLEASE
Istfg
Princess Phyllís Istg his ass can stay in tht side of the boarder😂😂👌🏾
His ass can gone head Fr
Princess Phyllís stfu 😂😂😂🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Princess Phyllís stfu 😂😂😂🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣🤣
Bitch No We Don’t YOU Do .😒
End the welfare state
Build the WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall PLEASE!
Build the wall
You dumb bitch
Build The Wall
Build the wall!  👍
Build the wall
Build THE WALL
NO MORE ILLEGAL ENTRY!!! BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL!!! BUILD THAT WALL!!!
NO MORE ILLEGAL ENTRY!!! BUILD THAT WALL! BUILD THAT WALL!!! BUILD THAT WALL!!!
Build the fucking wall
Build  that  wall
Build  that  wall
Build the WALL
Build the WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall!
BUILD THAT WALL
Build the Wall MAGA
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL
Dumb ass wanna be leader
Build the wall.
TRUMP is a liar and is hurting many more Americans than he is keeping Mexicans out what's wrong with this guy he must be mad. IMPEACH TRUMP NOW IMPEACH TRUMP NOW IMPEACH TRUMP NOW
Build the wall
Build that wall
Build the wall! 🇺🇸👍💕
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
Build that wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall 🇱🇷
Build the wall 🇱🇷
Build the wall
AS IN THE 2016 ELECTION...THE POLLS ARE OFF!!!!                                                             Americans want a secured southern border with a physical steel wall. President Trump you are the man to get this done, you have the unique combination of skills, compassion, courage, and understanding to make America Great Again. We the People are with you and the Democrats are not, they have become something unrecognizable. Only the inside the beltway demons don't like the term "wall". We need a physical wall and technological barrier and increased border agents across the entire 2000 miles of our southern border. This is a national emergency and the polls are very likely incorrectly reporting the numbers of Americans that want the wall.
Lying Traitor.
Build the wall!  Build the wall!
Build the damn wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
DONALD DUMB THE BIGGEST CLOWN
Build that wall
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL,
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
Build the wall.
Build the Wall !!
Micheal Marceaux thats fit in ur mom ass
Lmao no that would be you . You lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrpppp!!! 🐒oooo oooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌 🐒boy
DONALD DUMB THE BIG IDIOT
build the wall
I hate democrats
Build the wall
Build the wall
Dems are criminals
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL BUILD THE WALL
Micheal Marceaux give it to our your mother cave man
Tonya Robinson no you are lil durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrpppp!!!! Here 🐒have a 🍌
U gone burn hell
Build the WALL...
build the wall
Build The Wall 🇺🇸
Build the wall!
Your PROMISE was that Mexico would pay for it. Building a wall that WE must fund IS breaking your promise!  😡 “He is shutting down the government to break his signature campaign promise. His signature campaign promise was that the taxpayers weren’t going to have to pay for it.” House Armed Services Committee Chairman Rep. Adam Smith said on “This Week.”
Build this wall
build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
Build the Wall
Build that wall
Build the wAll
Build the wall
Build the wall🇺🇸🙏
Its already a wall there
build that wall
Build the wall please!
Build the WALL
Build the wall 🇺🇸
#45 you are one very sick bastard!!! Please resign!!!!
#45 you are one very sick bastard!!! Please resign!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Stopping your bitch ass!
Build the wall
Build the Wall!!!
Build the Wall
He is an idiot
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
RESIGN YOU DAMN GROPER !!!
Build the wall!!!!
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL
Liar liar pants on fire!
Build the WALL
build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the Wall
Lying Trump...LOCK HIM UP!
Build the wall!
Build  the wall
Build  the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Shut up dickhead
Shut up dickhead
Build the wall 🇺🇸
LOL, a moron and his lemmings
Build the Wall.
Build the Wall 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
build the wall
Build the wall
NOT ONE PENNY OF MY TAX DOLLARS FOR THAT STUPID WASTE OF A WALL. GET Mexico to pay for it like u said. LIAR.
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Thank You POTUS for putting Americans over illegals. Nancy & Chuck are in total denial & bashed you but never ever address the crime, murders, drugs, enormous expense our open border creates.
Build the wall  MAGA
There has never been a MORE DISGUSTING PERSON IN AMERICA  THEN THE TRAMP.  YOU HATE AMERICA BECAUSE YOU ARE NOT ALLOWED TO BARROW MONEY FROM AMERICAN BANKS. YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN TO COURT BECAUSE YOU DON'T PAY PEOPLE THAT WORK FOR YOU. PLUS SOOOO MUCH MORE. I'LL BE DANCING IN THE STREETS WHEN YOU AND YOUR CRIME FAMILY ARE IN ORANGE PRISON SUITS. POS
There has never been a MORE DISGUSTING PERSON IN AMERICA  THEN THE TRAMP.  YOU HATE AMERICA BECAUSE YOU ARE NOT ALLOWED TO BARROW MONEY FROM AMERICAN BANKS. YOU HAVE BEEN TAKEN TO COURT BECAUSE YOU DON'T PAY PEOPLE THAT WORK FOR YOU. PLUS SOOOO MUCH MORE. I'LL BE DANCING IN THE STREETS WHEN YOU AND YOUR CRIME FAMILY ARE IN ORANGE PRISON SUITS. POS
BUILD THE WALL!!
How about poverty, you jackass?
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the Wall..
Build the wall!!
Let me be clear...I'm all for securing our border...Technology can do it cheaper, more efficiently and with less environmental impact. Spend my tax dollars on technology! NOT on a STUPID WALL! READ IT DAMMIT...  https://medium.com/@vickyalvearshecter/what-happened-when-a-trump-supporter-challenged-me-about-the-wall-e54e86a5edd1?fbclid=IwAR2uX4bHjQVYyc6Bt2OSAU6_lj1Ht9IMrNIP3vRGMRj6chb9FsrciXaFCZAWhat Happened When A Trump Supporter Challenged Me About the Wallmedium.com
Build the wall  .
Build the wall!
Drop dead tRUMP
Build that wall
Democrats are Traitors to America!
Build the wall,,,, MAGA
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall!
another dumbass
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
You’re delusional, dude
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL......
BUILD THE WALL  ONE WAY OR ANOTHER.
You state me this kind of rambling in babbling but if you think that Hillary Clinton should have been president then you are a brain-dead fucking moron with the brain capacity of a fucking flea
Build the wall!
Trump kill usa dolar😨😨😨😨
Build the Wall!!!
Build the wall.
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall.
you're a joke and an embarassment
you're a joke and an embarassment
You promised that Mexico was going to pay for the wall, how are you fulfilling that promise? You're an idiot.
They would destroy this country before letting you keeping a promise.  AMERICAN CITIZENS WANT A WALL!!! NOT A STEEL WALK BUT BIG BAD CONCRETE WALL WITH TURRETS AND LOTS OF MACHINE GUNS.  BUILD THE WALL!!!
Hope you get cancer
Hope you get cancer
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!
Janet Lee you are so full of hate.
TRUMP IS A LIAR AND TRAITOR TO THE USA. PROOF POSITIVE WILL BE GIVEN SOONER THAN LATER TO HIS DISMAY....   https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.htmlSupreme Court rules against mystery corporation from ‘Country A’ fighting subpoena in Mueller investigationwashingtonpost.com
TRUMP IS A LIAR AND TRAITOR TO THE USA. PROOF POSITIVE WILL BE GIVEN SOONER THAN LATER TO HIS DISMAY....   https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.htmlSupreme Court rules against mystery corporation from ‘Country A’ fighting subpoena in Mueller investigationwashingtonpost.com
BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the Wall
Build that wall
Build that wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Build The Wall.
Build the wall!!!!
Build the wall!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!!
Build the wall!!
Build the Wall
Build the Wall
Build the Wall.
Build the Wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Brian Cudmore well since your so smart come up with that great plan and present it
So......if Americans want border security why don't they bring all the US troops home who are out threatening border security of other countries in  the world, use the money they spend supporting insurgencies and corruption to guard the US border with Mexico?  Trumpy doesn't seem to be too worried about all the drugs and illegals who are entering the US through the 340 Port of Entries though.
Build the wall!!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!
BUILD THE WALL!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
A growing number of Americans blame Trump for shutdown: Reuters-Ipsos poll THAT'S BECAUSE T  RUMP IS A COMPLETE IDIOT AND HAS NOT DEVELOPED BEYOND THE AGE OF 6
Just like your existence, that was a waste of time. Just some hay for your jackass supporters
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build us some protection Dems
Build us some protection Dems
Democrats are an Enemy to America
TIME TO BUILD THE DAMN WALL AND TELL PELOSI TO WALK ILLEGALLY ACROSS THE SOUTHERN BORDER INTO MEXICO AND SEE HOW THEY WELCOME HER.
TIME TO BUILD THE DAMN WALL AND TELL PELOSI TO WALK ILLEGALLY ACROSS THE SOUTHERN BORDER INTO MEXICO AND SEE HOW THEY WELCOME HER.
BUILD THE WALL.
BUILD THE WALL.
You mean like the Repugnants stopped everything Obama tried to get done? Yeah, we know! Mfkr!
Build the wall
Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL
BUILD THE WALL
The border is secure you moron
The border is secure you moron
build the wall
build the wall
Build that wall
Build that wall
BUILD THE WALL🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL🇺🇸
Build the Wall!
Build the Wall!
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build it, MAGA.
Build it, MAGA.
Build the Wall
Build the Wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
You see, your only looking for a hand out. This no longer pertains to you.
Paul Gonzales your just as ignorant as a black man crying about slavery. But I guess you think our civil war was about that majority? So forget about taxation without representation. Oh and forget about plains Indians that tried to live peacefully with the white men. One such group was the Sioux tribe. It was the largest and most powerful group in the west. They signed treaties with the government giving up ninety percent of their land. The Santee agreed to live in a small area. In exchange, the United States agreed to make yearly payments to the tribe. This made it possible for the Indians to buy food and other things from white traders.
mr. Trump you need to stand there at the border with your own gun and your cronies and try to stop trying to stop all the Hispanics to come to United States you got to remember history the Nina and the Pinta who were the first people here on this country and this continent it was the natives natives Americans the Apaches the Indians the Incas and all the other Indians that were raised and born here in United States we are not the only go aliens the ones that came here from the Pinta and the Santa Maria when they landed and found America remember you guys were from England you guys are the foreigners not the Mexicans and not the Indians so if you want to put a border put a border on your ass amen God Bless America the land of the natives and the Hispanics so take that to the bank
Build the wall.....MAGA
Build the wall.....MAGA
Build the damn wall
Build the damn wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Dumb ass wanna be leader
Dumb ass wanna be leader
Build the wall
Build the wall
We Americans Want And Need The Wall For Our Own Security  We Can Not And Will Not Risk Our Famlies And Loved Ones Th3 Chance Of Disease Crime Theft Murder Of Inocence Citizens  Paying For All Of These Illegals That Do Not Work And Think That They Can Just Come And Recieve Welfare No No We Work Too Hard To Suport Lazy People Who Want Everything For  Nothing When Our Veterans Put Their Life On The Line To Keep Us Free From An Invasion Of Illegals They Are Still Suffering And We Need To Support Them Build The Wall So High They Can't Get Over It So Low They Can't Get Under It And So Long They Can't Get Around It
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build The Wall!!
Build the wall stop the Illegals
Build the wall stop the Illegals
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the wall
Build the wall
They will stop at nothing to defeat Trump
They will stop at nothing to defeat Trump
Build the wall!!!!!
Build the wall!!!!!
No wall means no money in trumps pockets... He was offered 25 billion to leave the dreamers alone and this idiot said NO now whos the dumb ass
DT, stop the DemonRAT pussyfooting and build that wall NOW.  We all know how hard your trying to get through to these Commie shitheads and it ain't workin', no fault of yours, so BUILD BUILD BUILD !!
they don’t care if they destroy this country
they don’t care if they destroy this country
Build the wall Mr. president.  Do not give in, we are behind you.  They are nasty and corrupt and they are showing their true views.  Impose term limits,  freeze their pay.  #FundTheWallNow #buildthewall #termlimitsnow they do not want you to succeed. They don't care about Americans
We want the border wall.  Government officials are paid way too much anyway.   Those liberals didn't mind Muslim Obama sending over 1.6 billion dollars to Iran to terrorize AMERICA.   WE AMERICANS WANT THE WALL.  SOMEONE LET OBAMA GET AWAY WITH MURDER WITH BILL AND HILLARY AND YOU WILL NOT SUPPORT OUR GREAT PRESIDENT TRUMP.  KEEP THE GOVERNMENT CLOSED.  SHOW THESE PEOPLE WHO YOU ARE MY PRESIDENT TRUMP.  STAND FOR AMERICA,  PLEASE.   STAND BEHIND US.  WE WANT A SAFE AMERICA.   GET ILLEGALS OUT OF OUR COUNTRY PRESIDENT.   WE HAVE NEEDED A PRESIDENT LIKE TRUMP FOR YEARS.  ANYTHING,  I CAN DO FOR YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP,  I WILL WORK FREE.   YOU REALLY CARE ABOUT OUR COUNTRY.   PLEASE, PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.  KEEP GOVERNMENT CLOSED TO GET THEIR ATTENTION.   THEY JUST WANT THEIR OWN WAY INSTEAD OF THE SAFE WAY.  MR. PRESIDENT,  YOU SACRIFICE YOUR PAY FROM US DAILY TO IMPROVE AMERICA.   I THINK CONGRESS AND SENATE TAKE NO PAY.  IT SHOULD BE A PRIVILEGE FOR ANYONE TO SERVE IN A SEAT FREE.  ALL, I EVER SEE IS THEM TAKING UNNECESSARY NAPS.  GO TO BED AT NIGHT.  SENATE AND CONGRESS ONLY WORK 102 DAYS OUT OF 365 DAYS BECAUSE THEY STAY ON VACATION OR HOLIDAY PAY.  WE BACK YOU MR. PRESIDENT.  BUILD THE WALL.  STOP PAYING CONGRESS AND SENATE A PAYCHECK FOR SITTING ON THEIR LAZY TAIL.  GO MR. PRESIDENT!!!!!!😁😁😁😁😁❤💚❤💚❤💚❤💚
We want the border wall.  Government officials are paid way too much anyway.   Those liberals didn't mind Muslim Obama sending over 1.6 billion dollars to Iran to terrorize AMERICA.   WE AMERICANS WANT THE WALL.  SOMEONE LET OBAMA GET AWAY WITH MURDER WITH BILL AND HILLARY AND YOU WILL NOT SUPPORT OUR GREAT PRESIDENT TRUMP.  KEEP THE GOVERNMENT CLOSED.  SHOW THESE PEOPLE WHO YOU ARE MY PRESIDENT TRUMP.  STAND FOR AMERICA,  PLEASE.   STAND BEHIND US.  WE WANT A SAFE AMERICA.   GET ILLEGALS OUT OF OUR COUNTRY PRESIDENT.   WE HAVE NEEDED A PRESIDENT LIKE TRUMP FOR YEARS.  ANYTHING,  I CAN DO FOR YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP,  I WILL WORK FREE.   YOU REALLY CARE ABOUT OUR COUNTRY.   PLEASE, PLEASE BUILD THE WALL.  KEEP GOVERNMENT CLOSED TO GET THEIR ATTENTION.   THEY JUST WANT THEIR OWN WAY INSTEAD OF THE SAFE WAY.  MR. PRESIDENT,  YOU SACRIFICE YOUR PAY FROM US DAILY TO IMPROVE AMERICA.   I THINK CONGRESS AND SENATE TAKE NO PAY.  IT SHOULD BE A PRIVILEGE FOR ANYONE TO SERVE IN A SEAT FREE.  ALL, I EVER SEE IS THEM TAKING UNNECESSARY NAPS.  GO TO BED AT NIGHT.  SENATE AND CONGRESS ONLY WORK 102 DAYS OUT OF 365 DAYS BECAUSE THEY STAY ON VACATION OR HOLIDAY PAY.  WE BACK YOU MR. PRESIDENT.  BUILD THE WALL.  STOP PAYING CONGRESS AND SENATE A PAYCHECK FOR SITTING ON THEIR LAZY TAIL.  GO MR. PRESIDENT!!!!!!😁😁😁😁😁❤💚❤💚❤💚❤💚
DON'T BACK DOWN MR. PRESIDENT!  WE'VE GOT YOUR BACK!  SICK OF IGNORANT LYING DEMOCRATS AND LIBERALS!  ALL OF CONGRESS AND SENATE NEED TO BE DRUG TESTED!  🇺🇸GOD BLESS OUR PRESIDENT AND VICE PRESIDENT!🇺🇸
Build the wall
Build the wall
You egotistical bully. A wall will not stop the influx of drugs from Mexico. Dealers have tunnels under the border that accommodate trucks and even trains. The few that have been discovered prove it. Every mile of new wall you build will bring more tunnels. Your wall cannot not secure the border. More and more people realize that with every lie you tell.
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
People in Europa are watching the big Clownshow from a distance and are laughing their butt off  muhahahahahaha There is zero respect amongst all world leaders for Trump, the orange Ape.
People in Europa are watching the big Clownshow from a distance and are laughing their butt off  muhahahahahaha There is zero respect amongst all world leaders for Trump, the orange Ape.
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Had a deal, idiot! Even your VP said so. Then. like 2-yr-old, changed your mind throwing Pence under the bus you buffoon!
Go back to school and university and go claim your number back. Your level of stupidity is abnormal Dunderhead Trump
BUILD The Wall !!!
BUILD The Wall !!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall. Don’t give in.
Build The Wall!!!!!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall now!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the Wall!
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall.
Build the wall !
Build the wall !
Build the WALL❗️
Build the WALL❗️
Build the wall.
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall!!!
Build the wall.
Build the wall.
Build the wall
Build the wall
THE LEFT IS OVER THE EDGE THEY HAVE ELECTED LIBERAL LOONS THEY HAVE FILLED OUR LIVES WITH LIES & HATE THEY DO NOT CARE ABOUT AMERICANS THEY ONLY WANT A ONE WORLD ORDER THEY ARE AIDING AND ABETTING ILLEGALS THE COST! TOO MUCH CITIZEN MONEY TO SUPPORT ILLEGALS TOO MANY DEAD CITIZENS TOO MANY RAPED CITIZENS TOO MANY BRUTALIZED CITIZENS TIME TO END THE DEMOCRAT PARTY WE CANNOT SURVIVE AS A NATION OF HATE  DEMOCRATS…THE PARTY OF HATE AND EVIL!
Build the wall
Fucking lying no good for nothing shitface little man Fuckyou draft dodger you ain't a man your a coward
BUILD THE WALL MAGA ALL THE WAY!!!!
BUILD THE WALL MAGA ALL THE WAY!!!!
MR. PRESIDENT, PLEASE ANSWER THIS 1 QUESTION TONIGHT:----------->>>> WHAT IS THE UNSPOKEN MESSAGE FROM THE DEMOCRATS TO THE ILLEGAL INVADERS??? <<<<-------------- STEP RIGHT IN + VOTE FOR US!!!! WE DO NOT CARE IF YOU DESTROY OUR COUNTRY!!!??? GOP Lindsey Graham Fox News Judge Jeanine Pirro Lou Dobbs Lara Trump Donald Trump Jr. Daniel Scavino Jr.
Trump is a LIAR - holding 🇺🇸 ransom!  #TrumpGovernmentShutdown 🤔  Trump Airlines SHUTDOWN! Trump Beverages SHUTDOWN! Trump Board Game SHUTDOWN! Trump Casino SHUTDOWN! Trump Magazine SHUTDOWN! Trump Mortgage SHUTDOWN! Trump Steaks SHUTDOWN! Trump Travel SHUTDOWN! Trump Communications SHUTDOWN! Trump Tower Tampa SHUTDOWN! Trump University SHUTDOWN! Trump Vodka SHUTDOWN! Trump Foundation SHUTDOWN!  No one could have predicted the  #TrumpGovernmentShutdown
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
As an AMERICAN CITIZEN , BUILD THE WALL, SECURE OUR BORDERS , DEPORT ILLEGAL ALIENS!!! I love my country but we won’t have a country if we don’t defend it!!!
We want the damn wall. U go for it Mr President . I'm  tired of this b.s. illegals r just coming to get the benefits & to do crimes. Deport them  all
To all those being conned... You will soon see that you elected a traitor to the United States of America. And we will forgive you for your stupidity but history Will Remember You as  UNAmerican As It Gets. You sold out your country for a lousy temporary tax break and your blind fears and bigotry.
Y'all Dumb Asf If You're Supporting This Wall I Bet Your Dunbasses Didn't Know That illegal Mexicans Like Myself Came On A Plane 🤦🤦 I Swear You People Are Really Dumb
Build the wall and stop the madness
Build the wall and stop the madness
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Obama stated that could keep your doctor in a complex piece of Legislation & OUTRAGE ensued from The Uneducated White Trump Voter. Silence from these same people on the continuous outright LIES & PROPAGANDA concerning Immigration & FAKE Border Crisis.   https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2019/01/08/politics/trump-border-wall-walk-up/index.html
Hey Donny, You keep talking about a witch-hunt. If there is a witch hunt, there must be a witch, don´t you agree? Now which witch are we talking about? Not only do you look like a witch, you also have an orange  wig. So YOU MUST BE THE WITCH DONNY !
Hey Donny, You keep talking about a witch-hunt. If there is a witch hunt, there must be a witch, don´t you agree? Now which witch are we talking about? Not only do you look like a witch, you also have an orange  wig. So YOU MUST BE THE WITCH DONNY !
Build the wall
Build the wall
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the damn Wall
They want to destroy you even if it means destroying America
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Build the wall
While everyone seems to be on the topic about the wall a bunch of people that I notice are hating on the idea so I am calling you out to answer this tell me do you lock you're doors when you go out? If so why? To keep unwanted intruders out of you're house? If so it is no different then keeping illegal immigrants out of the country. That need to come here legally if you all don't think we need a wall then you don't need locks on your house plain and simple.   Go on tell me i'm wrong I am waiting other then that I will be supporting the president of the united states that "we the people" elected after all we had to put up with Obama for 8 years you Liberals  can put up with Donald J. Trump for another 4 once he gets re elected in 2020.
Build the wall don't  give in Mr President
Build the wall don't  give in Mr President
Resign, you fat fucking criminal.
Resign, you fat fucking criminal.
Open the government ! You big fat LIAR!
BUILD THE WALL!!
BUILD THE WALL!!
Fire all them fuckers who dont support the president. Simple fix.
Build the Wall
Build the Wall
Build the wall!  Don’t back down!  And no DACA!
The US has 325 million people and about 30.000 get killed by guns every year. Europe has 741 million people and only 1100 get killed by guns every year. (And according to you they have big problems with immigrants and violence) Think about that for a second……….
Dems are human trash
Stand strong Mr President. Thankyou. Do not give up we need the wall and to rid our country of illegals .
BUILD THE WALL. Pelosi and Schumer don’t care if the AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE DYING. You don’t see them talking to the family’s that lost their love ones. THEY DON’T CARE ITS NOT THEIR FAMILY!!! Talk about fake news they are FAKE PEOPLE
Be strong ASHOLES DONT MATTER..I NEED TO SAY I DIDNT NO WHAT I THROUGH ABT TILL U PROVED IT TO ME.sir. u are doin ur jib well.but plz release food stamps im old cannot. . ..buy food.
Yes do it with technology and drones. A wall is useless. The majority of illegals over stay their visas and 90 percent of drugs come in through legal ports of entry by boat or plane so a wall will do nothing to secure our borders. It will significantly cause more damage though. Why would we want to spend trillions to get a false sense of security. That's as dumb as it can get.
We support our POTUS!  Stand firm President Trump!  Build the wall.  The dimowits care only for illegal invaders and obstruction.  The American people stand with President Trump.
We support our POTUS!  Stand firm President Trump!  Build the wall.  The dimowits care only for illegal invaders and obstruction.  The American people stand with President Trump.
BUILD THE WALL !!!!!
BUILD THE WALL !!!!!
Build the wall🇺🇸
Build the wall🇺🇸
We need Border Security, BUILD THE WALL, let’s keep the illegals out of our country, BUILD THE WALL, God Bless President Trump, MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGIAN🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
No one is arguing against better border control, you nitwit. If you can’t understand that existing technology and more, better trained agents is the only logical answer, then you are as stupid as you are selfish and evil.
CALL OUT OUR MILITARY FOR national CRISIS! STOP THIS ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT CRIMINALS WHO ARE COMING HERE KILLING OUR AMERICAN PEOPLE! WE WANT BORDER WALL AND WE WANT IT NOW! THEY HAVE PLAYED GAMES WITH OUR LIVES AND OUR CHILDREN'S LIVES! THIS HAS TO BE DONE! EVERY SINGLE DEMOCRAT IN CONGRESS AND REPUBLICAN MADE THESE STUPID LAW'S ABOUT ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS AND THEY ARE THE CAUSE OF THIS CRAP! THEY ARE THE GUILTY ONE'S THAT HAVE DRAGGED THIS ON FOR YEAR'S AND NOW INSTEAD OF 3 MILLION ILLEGALS WE HAVE 30 MILLION AND MORE CROSSING EVERY DAY! IT'S TIME TO STOP THE LIARS WHO HAVE LIED TO THE AMERICAN VOTERS AND HAVE STOLEN OUR TAXES YEAR AFTER YEAR IN EVERY SINGLE ELECTION! DON'T BELIEVE ANY ONE IN THE DEMOCRATIC PARTY OR ESTABLISHMENT REPUBLICANS!
CALL OUT OUR MILITARY FOR national CRISIS! STOP THIS ILLEGAL IMMIGRANT CRIMINALS WHO ARE COMING HERE KILLING OUR AMERICAN PEOPLE! WE WANT BORDER WALL AND WE WANT IT NOW! THEY HAVE PLAYED GAMES WITH OUR LIVES AND OUR CHILDREN'S LIVES! THIS HAS TO BE DONE! EVERY SINGLE DEMOCRAT IN CONGRESS AND REPUBLICAN MADE THESE STUPID LAW'S ABOUT ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS AND THEY ARE THE CAUSE OF THIS CRAP! THEY ARE THE GUILTY ONE'S THAT HAVE DRAGGED THIS ON FOR YEAR'S AND NOW INSTEAD OF 3 MILLION ILLEGALS WE HAVE 30 MILLION AND MORE CROSSING EVERY DAY! IT'S TIME TO STOP THE LIARS WHO HAVE LIED TO THE AMERICAN VOTERS AND HAVE STOLEN OUR TAXES YEAR AFTER YEAR IN EVERY SINGLE ELECTION! DON'T BELIEVE ANY ONE IN THE DEMOCRATIC PARTY OR ESTABLISHMENT REPUBLICANS!
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Asshole, you promised the Mexicans would pay for the wall. Start a GoFundMe and let your ignorant supporters pay for it. Fuking lying traitor.
Asshole, you promised the Mexicans would pay for the wall. Start a GoFundMe and let your ignorant supporters pay for it. Fuking lying traitor.
Build the WALL
Build the WALL
Build the wall!
Build the wall!
Well satalight wall what ever tactic % that can murder. And go back to Mexico undocumented millions of imagrint 100 tho.s murder
Build this wall literally a wall please.
Build this wall literally a wall please.
How are we funding this dumb wall? Oh right, you have no clue, money has always just gotten handed to you, so you think it grows on trees.
How are we funding this dumb wall? Oh right, you have no clue, money has always just gotten handed to you, so you think it grows on trees.
the threat is the Latinos inside, possibly they have a V for vendetta do they not!? they are Indians are theynot and they have rage do they not and wish to kill do they not!
Let's just tear down the gates these hypocritical bigot Democrats have their houses  in! WE DON'T GET OUR WALL, THEY DON'T GET THEIRS EITHER! NO WALL! NO PEACE!
They only care about getting illegals for their voting block!  THEY WILL DO ANYTHING AND EVERYTHING TO GET YOU IN PRISON, AND WE WILL DO EVERYTHING TO KEEP THE BEST HEAD OF STATE IN POWER!  They think they can intimidate us and you!  The harder they push, the more we will push back!
Why don't you pay for if you want a fucking wall so bad asshole.
Build the wall/barrier. Will add more jobs + all the money for material, labor, etc  put back into our economy.
The Democrat apparatchiks won't even encourage Ruth Baeder Ginsburg to take care of her health. They are a cult. I wonder if when you visit them they'll even let you see your parents? In all eternity, Mrs. Ginsburg is going to live once on the earth, but in the name of Satan they want to exhaust every last ounce of energy for the greater good of Satan out of that poor nice lady.  I bet they would even get a body double for her, if they thought that they could get away with it. Look at Uranium One Mueller investigating people for the very thing he involved himself in. A body double for aging Supreme Court justices is not so far fetched. The Democrat party is going to be destroyed for 100 years, and by that time, we will have figured a way to make the world a good place. Democrat proof.  ~ Dark Cloud Society of Light   Then spake Solomon, YAHOVAH said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. I Kings 8:12
President Trump has repeatedly overstated the severity of illegal immigration at the southern border in order to convince Congress to approve more than $5 billion in funding for a border wall. Government data shows that arrests are down at the border compared with the Obama administration as most illegal immigration occurs when people overstay their temporary visas. During fiscal 2017, the Department of Homeland Security found that the number of immigrants that overstayed their visas was more than double those apprehended at the border during the same time frame.
President Trump has repeatedly overstated the severity of illegal immigration at the southern border in order to convince Congress to approve more than $5 billion in funding for a border wall. Government data shows that arrests are down at the border compared with the Obama administration as most illegal immigration occurs when people overstay their temporary visas. During fiscal 2017, the Department of Homeland Security found that the number of immigrants that overstayed their visas was more than double those apprehended at the border during the same time frame.
History shows Trump is a fucking liar.... According to him Mexico was going to build this wall.... Now American families are starving and tsa is very very weak in our airports where the real terrorist enter the country..... Pos
It is important to Democrats to protect our borders, but that isn’t what your building a wall is all about. You have already broken your campaign promise by asking us to pay for it! A wall is useless! You are useless! Tonight as you make your address, sane America will be either tuning out, laughing at you, and yelling at their TV screens. You can’t win this. You are what you have always been, a waste of air and space. You are a LOSER!!!!
Janice Lee Saban lmfao you sure are bright one 🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌
Do something to save the planet you idiot
Build the wall better than paying for illegals
You are a grazy old pig, and I Will scoot you White toupe off you ugly head🖕
Ya. Why don’t Democrat’s want to stop Christian Drug Dealers from pouring over our southern border? You git em Dear Leader!
You promise Mexico will pay for the wall what with that you idiot
You promise Mexico will pay for the wall what with that you idiot
Put a wall across Canada too!! Pot is legal up there and they might bring it into the USA!!!!! They might send snow storms!!! Nuke them before it happens!!! You need to secure the nation!!! Resurrect true nationalism!!! America first then the world!!!!
To destroy USA, the fastest way is to let drugs flows into the borders. Let the drugs flow in.  Like the opium war of China.  It totally destroyed China.  Read the opium war history.  And see how right POTUS is.
To destroy USA, the fastest way is to let drugs flows into the borders. Let the drugs flow in.  Like the opium war of China.  It totally destroyed China.  Read the opium war history.  And see how right POTUS is.
You must have missed the part about all of the cheating that goes on every election where non-citizens and even the deceased vote Democrat. I'm not a Republican either btw.
Julia Markos-Roth sweetie, did you really drink the Kool-Aid that Trump won the popular vote?  LOL, oh you poor thing.  He LOST the popular vote.  Fact.
It's a loud, foul-mouthed minority who support Trump, for sure.
It's a loud, foul-mouthed minority who support Trump, for sure.
Julia Markos-Roth He only won the election because of the electoral college.  He LOST the popular vote! Translation, it was not the will of the majority of Americans for him to be president.
Julia Markos-Roth He only won the election because of the electoral college.  He LOST the popular vote! Translation, it was not the will of the majority of Americans for him to be president.
Small flock? He won the election so it's not so small. Lol have to remember, he was voted in by the majority of Americans even though the other candidate cheats by using illegals to vote and such.
Small flock? He won the election so it's not so small. Lol have to remember, he was voted in by the majority of Americans even though the other candidate cheats by using illegals to vote and such.
You LIE Mr. President.  Only your small flock of sheep want a wall.
You LIE Mr. President.  Only your small flock of sheep want a wall.
Keep your head up President Trump! You’re the best president ever and we all know that. Who cares if those dam Dems smoked you tonight with their speeches. I don’t care if they made you look like a bumbling idiot in front Of Americans because I still love you and I know you’ll make America great again! I’m your biggest fan!
You guys all make very good points. Let's keep up the good work and support our president. If we need to, that's even march on the capitol. The lazy ass Democrats and socialist liberal assholes are out working us as far as really making a stand. We need to March we need to protest we need to shut the government all the way down if we have to. All the Democrats care about is trying to drag President Trump through the mud make him. The Mueller probe is a joke they don't have s*** on him they're just trying to drag it out as long as possible to try and make as many people leave the Trump Camp as possible. They are a bunch of lying thieving c********** who don't give a damn about anyone or anything but their own evil deceitful agenda.
Expose the dirt on these politicians!!!! They will be singing a different tune then!!! BUILD THE WALL!!! GOD will prevail!!!
Democrats should come to their senses and work with the President. American people are sick and tired with the crooked politicians. Americans want security, honesty and hard work to MAGA......
Ohh Kevin you are such an idiot. There is no help for you. You will just die stupid.
Before we get too indignant over the Saudi's beheading of a journalist we must remember that these people are merely several centuries behind us on their cultural and ethical journey. Our own noble sixteenth-century English forebears burned over 300 Protestants at the stake, an equally hideous form of execution, And they burned William Tynndale in 1535 for translating the Bible into English. Another translator, John Wycliffe escaped by dying a natural death before his scheduled bar - b - cue. But they exhumed his body and burned it anyway, just to be sure. Civilized, Christian behavior?
Please just build the wall and have our great  military men and women build it and place our National Guard there and at the Canadian border also.  Schumer and Pelosi are anti American and should be charged with treason against our great nation.  Open borders means our borders get bum rushed by anyone and everyone looking for a free pass.  Then sign their stupid bill...
Take the SNAP program from Migrants and seasonal farm workers.  Take away the free rides!    Start investigation on the Democratic’s. You know some of them are dirty!  Your doing a great job!!!!
Build the wall at least it can help
Please protect our nation and build the wall, do what the professionals have requested to secure our counties borders.  Our family has been the victim of an illegal, if this person hadn't been in our country we would not have been victimized by this illegal.
Please protect our nation and build the wall, do what the professionals have requested to secure our counties borders.  Our family has been the victim of an illegal, if this person hadn't been in our country we would not have been victimized by this illegal.
Build the wall! Just put... Another brick in the wall
AMERICA DOES NOT WANT THE EFFING WALL!! I'm listening to you addressing the nation right now and you have convoluted the facts so grossly ... my God, you are an imbecile!  Spreading fear with your lies!!!  If you want the wall so badly, you pay for it and then you can recoup the money from Mexico!  To Trump followers, you have to be brain dead to believe this man.
Mr. Donald Trump ok you're making it very very clear you hate all poor people ok I got three words for ya buddy burn burn burn baby burn but remember you caused and created this pal
Build the wall and start  spearing and displaying the heads of the heinous criminals caught being here and killing our citizens
Isn’t Funny how a part of our society can hate people who Bully other people !! But then turn on are President And Bully him 24/7 I guess that would make you Lying hypocrite that’s a Bully. Right Chuck,Nancy you to are most likely at a party celebrating telling the biggest LIE of your criminal career. The smart people know better. God Bless America and are President...
Build the wall/fence. Just protect the border!!!!
I hope Donald trump you fast remove all the war because nobody want to die
Build the wall and fix immigration problem once and for all.
Build the wall and fix immigration problem once and for all.
I'm not a Democrat why do you always blame democrats. Fact is in still waiting on property clean up from Epa in Texas. And I defended you for 35 yrs of my damn life. Here's facts Trump you said Mexico would pay for the damn wall. Want more promises wrote out you made that I believe you never intended to keep. I could write them. I'm one went bankrupt. Most of the people are coming from Guatemala do I need to say that's not Mexico. I want cleaned up property so that I can make money. Not just buy a damn piece of property with some inheritance money to breed and sell horses, dogs, etc and food. You need to take responsibility for saying Mexico would pay. I always say stand tall , keep ur head up etc. When do I get my property cleaned up?  When does my daughter and grandkids get moved out? You need to answer those questions. Things take money don't they ? It's funny seeing all these damn people rich just like Clinton in here and yet look at bills son of mixed races. So, many make me out right sick. I should come first. And again FOX sucks. Homefree Fox and my own mortgage company in the past could give free houses away to in poisoned property. EPA has a duty to clean my property up. I don't want to shop to buy homemade goods from other people. Will you pay me 300,000 for my property the way it is right now. If so, I would like to sell. Otherwise I need it cleaned up to sell. It's a need more important than in my eyes ur damn wall right now. I'm sure you can order it done. Then you might get some wall or might not. I'm going to say again I supported you defending you 35 yrs of my life and I don't see you ever intended to get Mexico to pay. My nieces and nephew in Mexico motherless need help to get over here to United States. It takes lots of money or at some point to get out of an orphanage they will need to be scratch backs or wet backs,  wall climbers. What if Congress gives you 150 feet. My front yard is 300 ft. Better work on Mexico to pay right I know you want to keep your promises. Right
Someone left a bag of idiots open.
There should be a laugh track for every time trump lies during his Oval Office speech.
Build that wall Mr President!!! Screw what the CRAZY LIBTARDS want!! Who cares about the shut down? Libtards!! We all know that they dont matter. They are crazy, sick individuals. Obuma shut down the Government to force the shitty Obuma Care on the American people.  BUILD THAT WALL!!!
We don't need a border wall.  We don’t need to create artificial crises. We have enough real ones. Let us end this shutdown and bring the American people together around an agenda that will improve life for all of our people.
The wall is a waste of tax payer money. They can't keep drugs out of prisons yet you think a wall is going to stop the flow of drugs into the country or immigrants? Also you'd have to steal people's property to eminent domain.
BUILD THAT STEEL WALL & THROW ALL DEMOCRATS OVER IT! 🤣
John Robert Why should I leave? He's the one the sucks.
John Robert Why should I leave? He's the one the sucks.
Joe Anderson  if you don't like our president move start packing
You're a lying and idiotic embarrassment.
You're a lying and idiotic embarrassment.
Yes! The Americans want border security! Yes we want people to enter America legally.  Millions of illegals are not even paying taxes. They have no bank accounts.  No healthcare. Our country cannot continue to spend billions every year for the border problems —we need to be concerned about getting out of debt and not owing others.
Yes! The Americans want border security! Yes we want people to enter America legally.  Millions of illegals are not even paying taxes. They have no bank accounts.  No healthcare. Our country cannot continue to spend billions every year for the border problems —we need to be concerned about getting out of debt and not owing others.
Having Mexico pay for it was your promise you spin doctoring pathological liar
Build the wall or keep it shut down!  Start going after the 30 million illegals already here instead.  Door to door if you have to. Stop letting the numbers grow and do something about all of it. Enforce the law! If they wont do it our way , then lets spend billions enforcing the existing law and sweep the country for all illegals.
Build the wall then focus on draining the swamp starts with ousting islam from our government
There are no more Democrats they are imbeciles  Their only goal is to secure their own benefits.  And To go against you cause you’re name is  Donald J Trump Don’t mind them Boss!! We got your back All America has your back The real Constitutionalists have your back And we are right her and there with you We are everywhere And they ( our enemies) are scrambling and running like chickens without heads !! YOU KEEP BEING WHO YOU ARE
For Demorats it doesn’t matter if it is good for America.  Their hate for Trump is greater than their love for America!  Evil and Sad!!!
They end up at gitmo, #Demoncrats
I really don't understand how the whole world likes President Donald Trump and some Americans are busy playing politics saying trash about him.  The whole of Africa wishes someone like trump would govern them.  America is blessed and privileged to be governed by President Donald Trump. I would be Proud to call Him my President in front of the whole world.
I really don't understand how the whole world likes President Donald Trump and some Americans are busy playing politics saying trash about him.  The whole of Africa wishes someone like trump would govern them.  America is blessed and privileged to be governed by President Donald Trump. I would be Proud to call Him my President in front of the whole world.
Which part of:  "Donald Trump is a lying piece of garbage" were you too stupid to comprehend?  https://youtu.be/ud0f3eJTo54
Build the wall ,stop the Drugs from pouring in save the children  !!!!
The Democrats are a joke!! Hold strong, no more illegals
what do you think when it comes to Donald Trump for one don’t trust him and why he constantly lies all of the time and you can’t believe him and also he’s Evil the snake 🐍 in the grass just waiting to bite you with his venom. ‘This president lies daily’: Critics demand networks fact-check Trump’s live immigration speech. I think it’s time for a newer President and get rid of the trash meaning Donald Trump and he isn’t worthy to be the President or not worthy enough to be in the Whitehouse no longer. Trump said Friday that some previous presidents "have told me that we should have done it."  The four living ex-presidents do not back Trump up on that claim, you see that’s another lie on top of another lie
Not Apartheid Zionist Wall for colonization. Thanks. Take that Shite back across the pond from whence it came.
Very strange to many of us Constitutional Liberal Democrats. We have watched our Country get attacked over the last 30 years, escalating worse each time. Each time they warned us they would strike again. Each time they planned, practiced, and did it again. Does the Leftist condone this now??? If they think this threat is not real, why are you upset about bringing our Troops home. Fact: Leon Panetta' warned us our Electric Grids are in fact at risk and if hit could cripple our Nation, including our food supply. Does the Leftist doubt we WILL get hit again. Secure our Borders.  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=1980380702266756&id=1452341315070700
Idiot45 only your low minded Supporters the Rednecks Racists ans Nazis of USA want this Idiotic Wall.  This is the Truth childish low minded Bone Spurse President of Putins grace  Shutup You f** ck7ng FOOL
Trumpees must be Dump as Rock. It seems to the World they the lowest Level of the USA Society.  They need more Education to think clear , most are Racists KKK Members , NAZIS Unbelivable such Idiots want make together with a childish excentric egoistic insane Moron of a President of Putins grace America great again  😂🤣😂🤣 Never ever. Greetings from the free World with a free Press and Moral and Ethics and Humanity Values,  Social Responsibility for People BLACK WITHE BROWN GREEN YELLOW PURPLE OR GREY  HOPE YOU GOT TRUMPEE Folks
Timothy Kershner where is your proof that he's lying???You don't have any..you just want to be Hateful and stupid
"I have held the hands of those weeping mothers..."  You lying piece of crap!!!
"I have held the hands of those weeping mothers..."  You lying piece of crap!!!
Please hurry up Armageddon lol I cant wait till these brain dead dumbacrats or dealt with by the very things they asked for .I will be lmao. The Third Temple is coming . Babylon and this new Sodom and Gomorrah will perish ha ha ha ha haaaa!!!!
Sir , it doesn’t matter to them , it’s you they despise, nothing you can do to change that. Just move on to the next agenda , hire more border guards and patrol it heavier , hate to say it but there will be no wall of barrier to protect us .  Voting-for  you again ! To another victory We know who is to blame for lack of security for votes
More importantly! The kind of news not told by CNN and these other globalist,  no more borders, deep-state-controlled media!: Donald Trump - Red Dawn is Here  and America better Prepare!  https://youtu.be/Cj52fYsOVF8
seeing your fat ass die in prison
2/3 of Americans don't want the wall, so quit lying you orange dildo.
I'm so glad Trump pulled this stupid ass stunt, he has no chance at all in 2020 now, his base is between 20 and 25 percent of legal voters laughable idiots, all of them and they will lose.
I still say that if we cut all aid to illegals,  no more birthright citizenship, or chain migration they will not want to come.
Remember President Trump , the Dems are the party of slavery , Jim Crowe , KKK , Neo Nazi , Black Lives Matter , Black Panthers , Antifia , Santuary states , And Cities , Now they want open borders, illegals to vote and drive without citizen ship , and our Benefits, plus no rule of law , what the hell going on here Wake up America shame on the Dems Trump Strong 💪
Media has been putting a narrative completely negative towards you about this but what else is new ! They suck and you Rock !! Keep fighting the American citizens fight
What’s important? Truth ! Facts!  https://www.pbs.org/newshour/politics/trump-says-theres-a-crisis-at-the-border-heres-what-the-data-says
You aren't getting a wall motherfucker
Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer have tax payer paid for 24 hour Security Protection as do all politicans yet she does not want average Americans protected and refuses to vote for the wall to protect America. HYPOCRITE
Bonnie And Clyde the lying DemonRat, Liberal, Socialist  are talking on TV.  Can't believe how well them two cons can lie.  They want their milliions to still be coming in in 2020.  They will kill this country. Their helping to kill people by letting illegals and terrorists and worse if possible in the country.
Bonnie And Clyde the lying DemonRat, Liberal, Socialist  are talking on TV.  Can't believe how well them two cons can lie.  They want their milliions to still be coming in in 2020.  They will kill this country. Their helping to kill people by letting illegals and terrorists and worse if possible in the country.
Finish the Trump Wall protect Americans anything else is just stupid .
The caravan was real. The chaos at the border is real. The 4000 murders the last two years by illegals is real. The 90% of the drugs flowing through the border is real. The fact that elected officials sworn duty is to protect the nation is real. Democrats are a disgrace.
Americans also wanted you to do something about our children being killed in our schools. Did you do anything about that?  No of course not. Big money donations from the NRA stopped that . Didn't it???? You pathetic hypocrite 👹💩
Build the North Wall first. That’s where the real terrorists enter the country.
"And without faith it is impossible to please Him, for whoever would draw near to God must believe that He exists and that He rewards those who seek Him." Hebrews 11:6
LMBO you have kept NO promises you say you have but you have not...FACT CHECK IT   Most Americans are blaming you for the shutdown and in2020 that will be very good news..Keep it up moron because more and more people are hating you..
Except the chump has no clue how to work together. Hrs nothing but a goddamned bully and liar
BUILD THE WALL OUR LIVES AND FUTURE DEPEND ON IT.
Build the wall! Without shutting down the government you hypocrite! You said your for the people...
I hope he goes around them all and builds this wall.............this is a national emergency, we can't afford to take everyone in. These illegals will bankrupt  our country. Our benefits are for us, not for them!
MAGA - Morons Are Governing America and Many Are Getting Arrested as well as many more are resigning the dumptanic while they still have some integrity, morals, values, principles, and respect for our country of which this regime has none. Border security is needed, but not a archaic vanity wall that is not needed and serves no purpose other than the moronic liar in the WH and his sycophant minions and Jim Jones cult45ers.
#BuildTheWall #NeverBackDown  The Democrats love illegals more than Americans.  Traitors!!!
#BuildTheWall #NeverBackDown  The Democrats love illegals more than Americans.  Traitors!!!
I say let them have shithole Cali and shithole ny and build walls around those too.
if  illegals are not a threat and we need to let then in along with refugees and all others then why in the hell do we need security at the airports. No one is a threat
if  illegals are not a threat and we need to let then in along with refugees and all others then why in the hell do we need security at the airports. No one is a threat
BUILD THE WALL AND STOP THE INFLUX OF ILLEGAL FOREIGNERS FROM AROUND THE WORLD!!
Jackass. More than half the country doesn’t want your stupid wall
Build the wall and if pelosi and Schumer don’t like it they can move to Guatemala
But without illegals, who could the Democrats use for extra voters?
Anyone want to play the Trump drinking game today? The words are: criminals MS-13 Wall Obama Collusion HRC Steel Slats Billions and Billions Terrorists The wall has already been built Mexico will pay for it See through steel Very dangerous southern border Drugs
Stopping a traitor and an incompetent fool is what they are doing.  You don’t get a border wall because you made a campaign promise. Your party works on a bill and gets it passed through Congress. Jackass. Why do I have to tell you that?
Stopping a traitor and an incompetent fool is what they are doing.  You don’t get a border wall because you made a campaign promise. Your party works on a bill and gets it passed through Congress. Jackass. Why do I have to tell you that?
Prepping the public for Trumps lies, lies, lies, yeah...https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?utm_term=.cef9ae46d43c
Prepping the public for Trumps lies, lies, lies, yeah...https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2019/01/08/your-fact-checking-cheat-sheet-trumps-immigration-address/?utm_term=.cef9ae46d43c
More americans are shot in mass shooting by white christian republicans than anyone coming here from south of the border. We need a wall around them
Is that true or did you hear it on FOX NEWS and from most STUPID LIAR ever, Donald Duck Dumb TRUMP ?? https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=10212453211837070&set=p.10212453211837070&type=3&theater
Boarder became stronger than it had ever been under Obama, anywhere that needs a fence has a fence lol. Poor fella, Trump looked so deflated and pissy during his pathetic oval office rant.  If our Russian hooker piss loving POTUS actually cared about illegal immigration he'd stop hiring them at his failing golf courses and address Visa overstays. But nope, not a peep about how illegal immigration actually occurs lol. Thank Allah that a patriot like Mueller continues to destroy the Trump daycare
I think I am going to answer your question, Mr. President. The Wall issue is not only political but also it is a DO or DIE situation for the Democrats, Sir. They know very well if they allow you to get the $5.7 billion to build the Wall, they will have no chance what so ever to win in 2020. They do not care about 800,000 Federal Employees not having their salaries; they do not care about whether a bunch of Terrorists and Criminals entering our Country; they do not care about the cost of feeding the illegal aliens who are already in our Country, they do not care about the criminal activities and killing innocent citizens, Sir the List is too long to mention. I am sure that We The People and the Federal Employees are aware of this situation; if anyone blames you he/she is totally out their minds! Mr. President, if you give up and go along with these Evil People in the Democratic Party, I do not think that you can win the Election in 2020, Sir! Therefore, you must hang in there, Sir.  If I may make another suggestion, Mr. President, if you could convince Turkish President Erdogan and The Israeli PM Nathanyahu for a sit-Down with you and convince them to reestablish their Friendship; Your problems in the Middle-East would be solved! Kurds can pull back to Northern Iraq to their autonomous republic and eventually have the Independent Republic their own, Turks will have to pull out Syria! They may have10 miles a bumper zone between Syria and their Country! Israel and Saudis in the South and the Turks in the North, with couple thousand American Troops stationed in Incirlik Air Base and Naval support Base in Iskenderun. I do not think anyone in the middle of this SET-UP will create any PROBLEMS! This is MY OPINION, some people may not agree with it!
I think I am going to answer your question, Mr. President. The Wall issue is not only political but also it is a DO or DIE situation for the Democrats, Sir. They know very well if they allow you to get the $5.7 billion to build the Wall, they will have no chance what so ever to win in 2020. They do not care about 800,000 Federal Employees not having their salaries; they do not care about whether a bunch of Terrorists and Criminals entering our Country; they do not care about the cost of feeding the illegal aliens who are already in our Country, they do not care about the criminal activities and killing innocent citizens, Sir the List is too long to mention. I am sure that We The People and the Federal Employees are aware of this situation; if anyone blames you he/she is totally out their minds! Mr. President, if you give up and go along with these Evil People in the Democratic Party, I do not think that you can win the Election in 2020, Sir! Therefore, you must hang in there, Sir.  If I may make another suggestion, Mr. President, if you could convince Turkish President Erdogan and The Israeli PM Nathanyahu for a sit-Down with you and convince them to reestablish their Friendship; Your problems in the Middle-East would be solved! Kurds can pull back to Northern Iraq to their autonomous republic and eventually have the Independent Republic their own, Turks will have to pull out Syria! They may have10 miles a bumper zone between Syria and their Country! Israel and Saudis in the South and the Turks in the North, with couple thousand American Troops stationed in Incirlik Air Base and Naval support Base in Iskenderun. I do not think anyone in the middle of this SET-UP will create any PROBLEMS! This is MY OPINION, some people may not agree with it!
Americans want WHITE america. They want to make America WHITE again. BITCH ASSES
Americans want WHITE america. They want to make America WHITE again. BITCH ASSES
It is not only trying to stop you  from fulfilling one of your promises........the democrats and rhino Republicans can not admit they FAILED the past 20 years from keeping out 115,000,000 illegals inside our border and they do not want to stop the flood of more that they have lured to our border.
It is not only trying to stop you  from fulfilling one of your promises........the democrats and rhino Republicans can not admit they FAILED the past 20 years from keeping out 115,000,000 illegals inside our border and they do not want to stop the flood of more that they have lured to our border.
Look dipshit. The wall is a stupid idea and waste of money. You made a stupid promise.
Look dipshit. The wall is a stupid idea and waste of money. You made a stupid promise.
Build the Wall! Hillary for Prison !
Give them hell President Trump!
Kiskhan Kweon You would have to be wilfully ignorant, or just a complete moron to not know that Trump is the most corrupt president in our nation's history.
MAGA!!!!!! They are going to say it openly, sooner or later, in the US.  The best policy for China is to liberate the North Korea. A free North Korean republic where the decimated 25 million 'half-animals' are born again as human beings  along the path of liberty, dignity and fair market! This will galvanize 1.4 bil. Chinese people. And also this will dismantle the moonJaeIn regime which is taking advatage of the false dilemma 'War vs. Peace'. Moonjaein, xijinping, and kimjongun are faithful servants and asslickers of satan
MAGA!!!!!! They are going to say it openly, sooner or later, in the US.  The best policy for China is to liberate the North Korea. A free North Korean republic where the decimated 25 million 'half-animals' are born again as human beings  along the path of liberty, dignity and fair market! This will galvanize 1.4 bil. Chinese people. And also this will dismantle the moonJaeIn regime which is taking advatage of the false dilemma 'War vs. Peace'. Moonjaein, xijinping, and kimjongun are faithful servants and asslickers of satan
Part 2 of the article I started: Terrrorists Know the U.S. Border Is Not Secure  A Costa Rican immigration service official whose jurisdiction includes the Golfito camp disclosed that at least several other U.S.-bound suspected terrorists also were pulled from this camp since Qoordheen’s March 2017 arrest, likewise based on significant derogatory U.S. counterterrorism intelligence. The Costa Rican official declined to provide specifics of the intelligence beyond that it involved terrorism, offering only that: “Most are good, but some are bad.”  The American public was never told that Qoordheen and other suspected terrorists were pulled off U.S.-bound migrant routes in distant Costa Rica and Panama because such information is usually classified or not disclosable, in line with standard practice to protect ongoing investigations and operations.  That necessary opacity, unfortunately, seems to have given life to denialism about President Trump’s claims that terrorists are among migrants from countries of terror concern, like the Middle East. The skeptics have demanded proof then cited Trump perfidy when protected intelligence wasn’t provided. Trump’s assertions were thus ridiculed and dismissed as unsupported fear-mongering.  But the rejectionists, many of whom obviously do not know that a central homeland security practice is threat preemption, are wrong. Down here, on the southern-most leg of migrant routes to the American border, it is they who invite ridicule and eye rolls.  American, Panamanian, and Costa Rican law enforcement and intelligence officials are engaged in actual programs here to hunt, investigate, and deport real terrorist suspects who are, in fact, discovered among the thousands of migrants from the Middle East, Horn of Africa, and South Asia funneling through this section of Latin America—as President Trump said and as I saw and heard on the ground.  Migrants from Bangladesh and Sri Lanka processing through Costa Ricans customs at Paso Canoas on the Panama border. They are working at it here because sheer geography pushes tens of thousands of U.S.-bound migrants from all over the world who pass from South America landing zones through these two countries as they push north. Panama and Costa Rica are chokepoints on the migrant trail where “extra-continental” travelers, as they are sometimes called at the American embassies, can become known in the greatest concentrations.  Terror Migrants Pulled From U.S. Border Routes Some acknowledgements of terror travel through these countries—and of the American efforts to mitigate it—are in public evidence, even if the underlying reporting remains confidential.  A December 19 Immigration and Customs Enforcement statement, for instance, announced the deportation of U.S.-convicted Brazil-based smuggler Sharafat Ali Khan after time served for transporting at least 100 aliens from Pakistan, Afghanistan, and Bangladesh through South and Central America to the United States. The statement offered this nugget, with the usual lack of elaboration: “Several of the individuals smuggled by Khan’s organization had suspected ties to terrorist organizations.”  The new statement seems to comport with earlier reporting by The Washington Times that one of these individuals was an Afghan involved in a plot to attack in the United States or Canada and had family ties to members of the Taliban.
Shut yo fat, old ,wrinkly, bald ass up .Casket waiting for you!
Build the wall i stand for trump
What will help is an immigration system like Canada and validation of immigration status. Visitor and employment visa’s are straightforward. Employers who hire illegals need big fines. They should use employment agencies to take immigrants who qualify.   Trump could also accept the recommendation to put more judges and immigration lawyers at the point of entry.  This would reduce the the misery of 60 per day and reduce the desperation of the thousands of poor huddled masses we used to welcome.
Stoping an ignorant moron like you sir, that’s what’s important
schumer and pelosi are pieces of crap. I hope there is a hell.
Im with trump but you said Mexico would pay and now alot of people american people will be fucked come Friday and that's bullshit...don't we have enough people struggling paycheck to paycheck and now you made alot of people unable to pay bills come Friday.
Maureen Ryan Two years you people have been chasing the Russians. So, tell me, WHAT did the Russians do to influence your vote? Did you see something that we missed?  Tell us, what EXACTLY are you looking for? The FBI can't find it, the CIA can't either, Pelosi can't say what it is, neither can MSM. What are you looking for? Please tell.
Let's see how many lies can be told in 8 minutes! Everyone should FACT CHECK this idiot when he's done. Oh and Manadort conspiring with the Russians....imagine that as idiots campaign chair ...again imagine that!!!  Maybe idiot should build a wall around himself...oh wait the WALLS r closing in on him.
Interesting poll. Americans are certainly concerned about all manner of things. So...no explanation why "government" is at the top of the list and rising, while "immigration" is below that and falling? Oh, 16% of (mostly Republican) Americans think immigration is a problem, what a dramatic result! I've got an explanation. Fox News lied. Like you do, every time you open your mouth.  You know, it's almost like it's more important to us that we don't have a bunch of indolent, lying shitbags in Washington than that we build a worthless monument to xenophobia and paranoia. Go secure yourself.
Build the wall, but pay the Coast Guard!
Then get it built your the president, to hell with those clowns.
You can only fix something like illegal immigration if you take control of it. Building a wall is one step towards to just that. The tunnels underground and the planes that fly over the wall can be on the next security agenda.
You can only fix something like illegal immigration if you take control of it. Building a wall is one step towards to just that. The tunnels underground and the planes that fly over the wall can be on the next security agenda.
You said Mexico would pay for it, so go get the money from them you clown
I would just like to say the Democrats don't give a rats ass about the citizens of the U.S. Why do they keep calling it Trump's wall???? THIS IS THE AMERICAN CITIZEN'S WALL!!!!! WHAT IS IT THEY DON'T UNDERSTAND ABOUT THAT??? This is why we elected President Trump to do. The American people have spoken...BUILD THE AMERICAN CITIZEN WALL!!!!!
Give everyone in the federal government except Congress their paychecks and build the damn wall
Donald j. Trump realDonaldTrump Mr. President, after watching Nancy and Chuck's circus following your address to the nation, I would just like to say I am one of the federal workers going without a paycheck ( btw the only objection I have to the shutdown) I say do what you have to do to ensure the safety and security of our nation's border!!! Do not fold to these idiots trying to destroy America from within! Just FYI, I will need a paying job and would make one hell of an equipment operator on "OUR BORDER SECURITY PROJECT"!!! Although I am an "essential" employee, so is a paycheck therefore I am immediately available for employment that involves a check!!! #buildthewall                                            Respectfully,                                  One Pissed off American
Donald j. Trump realDonaldTrump Mr. President, after watching Nancy and Chuck's circus following your address to the nation, I would just like to say I am one of the federal workers going without a paycheck ( btw the only objection I have to the shutdown) I say do what you have to do to ensure the safety and security of our nation's border!!! Do not fold to these idiots trying to destroy America from within! Just FYI, I will need a paying job and would make one hell of an equipment operator on "OUR BORDER SECURITY PROJECT"!!! Although I am an "essential" employee, so is a paycheck therefore I am immediately available for employment that involves a check!!! #buildthewall                                            Respectfully,                                  One Pissed off American
BUILD THE WALL DO NOT BOW DOWN TO THE DEMOCRAPS.
Your promise was taxpayers would not pay for a wall, that Mexico will pay for it!!! Looks like you lied!!!! You want a wall so bad why don’t you pay for it??? Start a go fund me account for all your supporters that want this wall built and let them pay for it and you match them!!!  Why don’t you invite all the federal employees to your hotel to stay and feed them until the shut down ends!!! I don’t feel sorry for the ones who stand for you, they are getting what they deserve by voting for you.
There is no crisis at the border. you Are fueling hate. Your paranoid.
Pelosi should be bent over and spanked and Schumer should be bitched slapped! Talk about lying bullshit these two Stir It Up!
We should have had more secure borders 30 yrs ago or more. The illegals  and drug runners and murderers would not be so rampant in our country.  Democrats DO NOT CARE ABOUT THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!!!!! THEY  ARE ONLY CONCERNED WITH STOPPING TRUMP NO MATTER WHAT. We may have to suffer a bit more, but we need him to stay strong for what this country needs for all of us to survive. This is AMERICA! Not Mexico, not Guatemala,  not Saudi Arabia.........etc. THIS IS OUR COUNTRY.  THE AMERICAN WAYS. TAKE YOUR WAYS BACK TO YOUR COUNTRY. NOT OURS!!!
Over 40 years of B S Lying stories from both sides .And it's Trumps fault ,I don't think .Any one that doesn't know this yet isn't paying attention or just plan stupid ,Build that Fucking wall that should of been built over 40 years ago .End Of Story !! Hate Trump ,what a joke.and the joke is on the American people and your so called Politicians are laughing their asses off ,Wake Up America !!
Build the WALL. We have let this go on for way too long. I am so tired of paying for the health care of illegals that it just makes me sick.  Make America Great Again. If the damocrats won't deal . SSHIP THEM OUT WITH THE REST OF THE ILLEGALS that are here with all felony records that got when they crossed OUR border illegally!!!
Build the WALL. We have let this go on for way too long. I am so tired of paying for the health care of illegals that it just makes me sick.  Make America Great Again. If the damocrats won't deal . SSHIP THEM OUT WITH THE REST OF THE ILLEGALS that are here with all felony records that got when they crossed OUR border illegally!!!
The wall is already there, so it's obviously not doing much good considering you're still bitching and moaning about illegal immigration. How about you come up with a better idea to combat illegal immigration?!? You complain about the security concerns for the country not taking into consideration that tsa agents are doing a very shitty job at American airports because they're not getting paid. YOU are making us vulnerable to terrorists!!
Your promises are worthless, just like you Trump.
Build a wall, after the wall is build then what? All illegal aren’t able to get in any more, You think your still safe? Not! God made haven and earth he never put walls in haven and he never put wall on earth! You were born with out a wall, right? You came through your mother’s camel. She didn’t put a wall for you to be born out right? Think about that. If you put a wall to everything you don’t want in then you have a big problem. I’m not saying illegal to come in to the USA. Without papers. Is there a wall in hell? Nope! You choose haven or hell?
Build the wall! It’s the morally correct thing to do because it will save lives.
We live on the border. Its scary at best! The country has no idea of the drugs and criminals and drug runners pouring over the border. BUILD THE WALL. We support the shut down.
Build the wall, toss those who oppose it over it and let’s see how well it works!
They want power and greed..at our expense. I'm so sick of congress.
Americans want better pay and less cost of living . Good health insurance and less medication idiot
President Trump. Have a group of people make a list of all the crimes committed to American’s from illegals. Plus all the illegals that are working and getting paid money who are not paying taxes. I would bet that number to be in the billions. These facts will show congress that we need a wall.
69% don't think your temper tantrum Wall is necessary at this moment. 59% OPPOSE  it altogether. Grow up you inept, paid grades educated, coward. Bone spurs kept your chickenass out of military service but they don't seem to hurt your fatass playing golf.
Build the wall! How many of you have fences around your yard and would prefer someone to knock on your front door before walking around your backyard, fences protect you and your family the border is the same thing we're not against immigrants just illegal immigration!
Americans do not want to pay for border security.  Just your uneducated trumptards.
I wish congress would get off our president Trumps back and let our President do his job and keep his campaign promise and make our country safe or has congress and the American people 4-got 911. We the Americans  pay our taxes, pay our own bills p ay for our own homes work for supporting our family.  What does the Illegal immigrants pay for ?
Democrats want more Illegals so they get more votes
Build the damn wall before we end up with another 600,000 in this country.  30 million illegals is ENOUGH.
Build the damn wall before we end up with another 600,000 in this country.  30 million illegals is ENOUGH.
Them Democrats need a pay cut all useless!! Build the wall ! You are the president
I want immigrants to come here legally we have drugs and crime overflowing from the border build the wall
Wow what a fucking coward .... rump is in the sewer where he is most comfortable spewing crap 💩
Its not fair that we pay taxes for illegals and the fact that they have bought up 75% of dallas where is all this money coming from whentheyco.e from nothing why do we have to pay for them ??? Also how do illegals file taxes with no legal documents?? I have a diverse family and i am for every one but this is not right nor fair to us BUILD THE WALL!!
Build the wall, borrow the money from Mexico, then don't pay it back.
Schumer and Pelosi 2  slimey snakes that look guilty...
Forget the Wall.. Just take away the reward.  Enforced laws make it illegal to hire Illegals.. Laws with teeth and severe penalties.  Simple.
No. They don’t.   "Because the people of this country don't want criminals and people that have lots of problems and drugs pouring into our country. So I will take the mantle. I will be the one to shut it down. I'm not going to blame you for it," Trump continued, seemingly oblivious to the fact that he was taking ownership of a potentially costly and unpopular breakdown in federal government operations.
We sure do! 100% behind you Mr. PRESIDENT do not let Dems kill America! Fight Fight Fight you are RIGHT!!!
I say that Trump you should demand the justice department to file criminal charges against local leaders, and state government leaders who knowingly violate: U.S. Code › Title 8 › Chapter 12 › Subchapter II › Part VIII › § 1324                                                                                             (iii)   knowing or in reckless disregard of the fact that an alien has come to, entered, or remains in the United States in violation of law, conceals, harbors, or shields from detection, or attempts to conceal, harbor, or shield from detection, such alien in any place, including any building or any means of transportation;                                       Sanctuary cities????
Hey do you stupid trump supporters ever feel it in the ass?
Donald your doing great. Build that wall and tell the Democrats to go to hell. They are worthless deal killers. We love God Country and proud your our president
Yes Build the Wall, our security is at risk, I’m convinced that Dems care more about illegals than the citizens they are sworn to protect 😡 Ask yourself why they want all this chaos at the border??? Who’s getting kickbacks from all the drugs that come across #followthemoney
Illegals are bringing disease like HIV and TB and sticking us with the bill
Donald, with all your billions, why don’t you build a 50 foot steel wall around yourself and stay there. We need to protect ourselves from you. You are crazy, corrupt and dangerous !!!
Chuck and Nancy want to build a wall with the bodies of American Citizens. They have a good start. Their illegal aliens slaughter Americans daily. Among other hideousness crimes.
Anyone that can’t see this is political is a pure idiot !!!
My Prez, do what i elected you to do! Hell with stupid idiots with fences around their yards!
No we don't want another wall Trump, we need better trade and jobs...we need cheap illegal immigrants to do our dirty work
Yes, border security is a must and special for a republic. If not the hyenas, zebras, and the wild dogs will enter the republic and take cover under democracy as every hooliganism is done under democracy.
Dear president  Trump,I am  so  sorry  for  the  way  you  are  being  treated .  I thank  God  for  putting  you  in  the  White  house  I hope  you  succeed  in all you  plan if it's   in  God's  will. God's  will and his plan must come first. If you  let the Lord  lead you  then the devil has no power . WE will  be  praying  for  you .
You promised mexico would pay for it.Lies are all you bring to the table.Worst president in the history of our country.
We  do  not  need  a  fucking  wall!    We  need  a  better  president!
Lora Hill Well one reason is all the mainstream media will show is some women and kids trying to come in. Not the thousands of drug runners who terrorize anyone who gets in your way. Or the one officer who covers 1000 square miles. Are the families whose lives are threatened by the cartels.
James McCaskill I know and it makes me so mad that everyone has an opinion but never experience the effects
Lora Hill you're right the closer you get to the border the worse it gets. But if you listen to mainstream media or the Democrats nothing wrong with our borders.
Oh my god some one needs to give me a call because I live down south and illegals kill our animals and breaking in to houses while children are sleeping to steal; there are barrels set out with high flags with Augua to stop them from damaging our property
Stopping you is always #1 for the Democrats. You could say you were giving all of your wealth to everyone below the poverty line and they would do everything to stop you.
Here's a thought on how to help fund the wall/fence/barrier and indirectly make Mexico pay for it. Levy a $20 tax on every money order being sent from individuals in the US to individuals in Mexico. Millions leave our country every day in the form of money orders sent from here to there. Many illegal immigrants work here, live on very little so they can send thousands back home with the plan of retiring there. That is money that benefits Mexico's economy instead of ours.
NO-ONE in their right mind, would want Open borders. 8-)   The ONLY ones who want open borders, are Illegals, criminals, and the ones who would profit from foreigners entering America Illegally. :(
NO-ONE in their right mind, would want Open borders. 8-)   The ONLY ones who want open borders, are Illegals, criminals, and the ones who would profit from foreigners entering America Illegally. :(
Democratic Party are all a bunch of hypocrites! Please build the wall and drain the swamp! You are doing a wonderful job as our president! Thank you and God Bless you and our nation🇺🇸🙏
Ask pelosi why do you have a wall around your house. I’m so sick of these brain dead Dems. You are the ones I’d like to impeach. DO YOUR DAM JOBS!
Stand your ground Mr. President.  Build that wall! It's time that America does for the American people.. stop all foreign aid, induce term limits theres too many corrupt people in congress. We need to do away with big pharma ( the ones lining the Democrats crooked little pockets and turning them against their own country), Nancy and Chuck also need to be held accountable for putting America at risk by causing delays to national security.
Yes. Keep us safe from them and all the disease they bring with them. I cant afford to get sick thanks to Obummer care. <><
They suck President Trump! Thank God ur President. America still has a chance
Democrats are not afraid the wall won't work. They are afraid the wall will work! #TRUMP2020 #MAGA
Please HELP to STOP CORRUPTION in Romania! Thieves and convicted people in the Government! NO ETHICS! Political system over Justice.  Communism undercover! Thank you and GOD bless us!
Build the walls and then put bombs along it.
The companies that used to be in America and move to Mexico make them pay for the fucking wall like Chrysler GM Hersey must I go on . I hope President Trump gets this message those companies went to Mexico for cheaper labor and then fucked the American people out of jobs. Never again will I buy a American product that was Built in Mexico.
Why don't the president STOP the free ride for the illegal immigrants that are in America illegally?? Stop the free ride!!!
As long as it KEEPS ILLEGALS OUT OF THIS COUNTRY works for me! BUILD it right in the first place so we won't have to keep doing it! You'd THINK, with AS MANY Congressmen/women that are MILLIONAIRES, that they would HELP to make our country safer, but they're so tight fisted and require so much more of us citizens. They want this country to fail so they can make it a socialist country!
Mr.President  You have to shut down obamas state of emergencies. And take down these crooks. The time is now. Before the next bunch of crazys steal their way into our government.  Look its time to fight these crooks. File state of emergency and tell America what these crooks have been doing. And their plan to bring America down. Please I see the time. And Americans at least some have no ideal. But you know the truth and if you wait . These people will keep it up until America is gone. The power is yours to save America from foreign powers and these sick sick evil people. GOD is real and to save America is to break the back of this state and government crooks. You can tell yourself these people will back off. They will not. And if they tell you this they are evil liars . You know the truth. Now save this NATION before its destroyed and can't be fixed. You are the Man. And our prayer and hopes are in you . Because GOD allowed you this time.  Remember this maybe the only chance we as true Americans get. Thank you. And may GOD guide you with power to destroy evil. I Believe. So do what's right.
Our country is in massive debt. Letting in more and more illegals will continue to make OUR debt, healthcare cost, job loss, and lots of other problems increase. Who's going to pay for it? Increase taxes? There's going to be a point where the government asks to much of its citizens and it will cripple all Americans into relying on a government that can't afford it. The problem is wasteful spending by our government. I know a lot of people think the wall is wasteful spending but I ask you, compare it to the next 10 years of taking care of new citizens who can't take care of themselves? Majority of the people crossing the border illegally are not skilled and are looking for our government to take care of them. If it continues it will be our largest economic downfall in history... And we are doing it to ourselves. One party wants this, why? Simple, future votes... Anyone coming across the boarder currently has the chance of becoming a citizen and will vote for the party helping them... That will silent your vote as current citizen.... Something to think about.
Shut down the boarder period. The lost trade would be Mexico's share of the build and for those US businesses that lose revenue on the can claim from the pot of money not being paid to illegals and noncitizens.
Shut up already you blowhard. So sick of your lying face I could puke. Worst president of my lifetime, hands down.
Most of amerika want you to go back to Russia
Send ALL the illegals to Ca. and let them deal with the problem. See how long that last.
Build the wall get on with fire all the demo rats we don't need them anyway
Build that wall Trumpy. Promises made promises kept!
Build that wall!!! Suck it up and get over it ,you crybaby Dems! You don’t care about the people ( the US citizens or the immigrants) you just hate Trump because he stands for the people not his own agenda. 😡
Democrats just want cheap labor and votes .phony bastards
Build it on Mexico side
You tell it like it is Mr President, democrats saying you are just mad for not getting your way and the facts you spoke was not real, tell them at next meeting lets go back to 9/11, illegal immigrants took America and caused it to stand still that day, remind them how many innocent Americans lost their lives that day. Is that what they want to happen again. Or the Boston Marathon where illegal immigrants caused many injuries and death. I could go on and keep stating facts. Democrats need to wake up to reality, we do have a crisis.
You tell it like it is Mr President, democrats saying you are just mad for not getting your way and the facts you spoke was not real, tell them at next meeting lets go back to 9/11, illegal immigrants took America and caused it to stand still that day, remind them how many innocent Americans lost their lives that day. Is that what they want to happen again. Or the Boston Marathon where illegal immigrants caused many injuries and death. I could go on and keep stating facts. Democrats need to wake up to reality, we do have a crisis.
Lock them up for treason!  They are not for securing our border but willing to spend tons of money for illegals??
Yeah, border security, not a pointless fucking wall
The Democrats are only refusing because of who is asking. That is it. They did not act like that when Obama was President. He should have been thrown in Prison along with Hillary...but they did nothing. But yet, they keep going after President Donald J. Trump. It doesn't matter what it is, they will keep working against our President and every member in the Federal government that is doing that needs to be kicked out of Office. We want our elected Officials to what we elected them to do, and that is to secure our borders and keep our country safe. We write their pay checks...it's time they do their job..or get out!
Oh dear , but didn’t they(terrorists )fly in an attack New York ..... you should not be letting government employees shoulder the burden of the shut down , its not their crisis and when senators are about to receive a pay increase...... the world is watching an sniggering at this circus !!!
2020 no more bullshit go Trump . Don’t stop now
The DEA doesn't want the wall because it won't help. Drugs come in primarily through normal points of entry, or by boat, plane. Illegal immigrants, on the scale that affect american jobs, come in via overstays. It's pure bullshit. We don't need this wall. Illegal immigration across the southern border has been trending down and is now net NEGATIVE. The idea that the wall will improve the US Job market is nonsense. What is at stake here is bigger than $5bn in the federal budget. It is about making decisions RATIONLLY and on the basis of facts and analysis of them. https://foreignpolicy.com/2017/08/29/trump-says-border-wall-will-stop-drugs-heres-what-a-dea-intel-report-says/
Build the wall or bring back the scalp trade
They hate anything about you, it’s crazy. Just keep it. I’m  sorry for the people that aren’t getting paid but this is the only way that we’re ever going to have a secure country, if we don’t do this now there’s going to be Mayhem!! Alll  is you’re trying to do is secure this country why would anybody be against this, it makes no idea unless there something political behind it then it makes perfect sense!!!! Drain that SWAMP!!!!!!!
I agree we need border security and the walls will do the perfect trick to keep illegals out, if they want to come to our country they can do so LEGALLY (: and btw Donald J. Trump your doing a amazing job
I agree we need border security and the walls will do the perfect trick to keep illegals out, if they want to come to our country they can do so LEGALLY (: and btw Donald J. Trump your doing a amazing job
I’m neither party but if you think a wall is going to stop drugs from coming in here and the murder rate is going drop you are crazy and believe me I’m all about protecting our country been there done that. If you want to convince me about boarder protecting put in mine fields, gun towers with air support from Apache helicopters. It will be 100 times effective a lot cheaper and guess what... it will produce jobs especially for our veterans! Once you see love ones getting their heads blown off better yet blown to pieces I bet you stop trying to cross! VIOLENCE is the ANSWER 💯🇺🇸💯a wall what a joke! Where you thing the drugs and real terrorist are coming from! It’s sure not south of the boarder! They fly in from ALL over the world and let their VISA run out! Americans are stupid and I can’t believe you let some rich politician scare y’all like a bunch of babies! I don’t live in fear 💯
Build the wall! Deport those evil invaders!
Build the wall! Deport those evil invaders!
When the wall is finally built throw Pelosi and Schumer over it.
Build the fucking wall and cage yourself.
33% of people (aka your base) are the only ones that want it. You’re a complete dumbass.  I voted for you because I’m independent and you said you would drain the swamp and you weren’t a politician. You are a traitor to the US and tax cheat that uses the oval to line your pockets while you spread lies to your base because they are too uneducated to call you out on your BS. You should be ashamed of yourself.
Impeach the dumbass orange man
Keep it shut down, Mr President. We know you are fighting alone up there. But WE THE PEOPLE have your back. To Hell with those gutless republicans who refused to use the "nuclear option". Damn all of them.
Bwhahaha 😂 you promised Mexico would pay for it you dumb-f! 😂 remember? “Who’s gonna pay for it?!?!” At your klan gathering. 😂
In fact, illegal immigration costs taxpayers a staggering $134.9 billion a year while contributing only $19 billion in state, federal, and local taxes. At the federal level, medical costs make up the lion’s share of government expenditures on illegal immigrants, while education is the largest single expense that illegal immigration imposes on state and local governments.  Sadly, an overloaded welfare state is not the only negative side-effect of our broken immigration system. Communities across America are also being devastated by the violent crime and drug trafficking that result from our failure to control the border — an issue Donald Trump has addressed repeatedly and emphatically ever since he first announced his candidacy for president.
Even if you somehow get your stupid wall you still wouldn't be keeping your so called promise. Remember, YOU PROMISED MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT. Now you want American tax payers to pay for it.
Every poll taken shows that the majority of Americans don't want your expensive, unnecessary, stupid vanity wall which you want only so that you can brag to your uneducated base that you kept your promise. Even if you got the wall,  you.lied over and over again that Mexico would.pay for it. Trumped up fake crisis by a lying,  cheating, unqualified jerk of a president desperate to save his.own corrupt hide! Reopen the government and stop lying (if that is even possible!)
What an ass Mexico was supposed to pay that was the promise
Would be an interesting experiment to put a wall around CA and see what kind of secure life they would end up with bearing in mind their mindset on allowing the illegals to stay in the US.  They want them, now live with them all confined to CA, but then again, you would have to keep them all within that wall.  I wonder just how long it would take before the people told the governor "Your Fired".
the border is secure. you are unfit for office. RESIGN.
Go Trump. People seem to forget that the Clintons and the Obama government did nothing to sort out the border problems, so thousands of illegal immigrants under their rein poured into America and have robbed America of jobs, taxes and people's lives! Trump is trying to solve a problem caused by years of bad government but now you DemonRATS blame him! Guess you forgot The DemocRATS closed down the government too when they were in power. Apply legally to come into America and not illegally! Keep up the good work and don't let these snowflakes into power ever again. MAGA
What a twat you are. The only reason you want to build that wall is to have your name on it The Trump wall. Like the The Trump tower. You selfish twat. Nothing is normal coming out from your little ugly piggy mouth 🤮
You must not have seen the videos of the fat woman with children walking across the very high 4' off the ground piece of wire and walking right in. Clueless
Dennis Coughlan I don't get it, if I want to keep you out of my yard and I build a big ass wall with Barb wire on top with cameras , with sensors on the ground, your saying it won't stop you? It will stop   95% of it for sure
Susan Davison, I know right. The truth isnt something these trumpanzees want to hear.
Dennis Coughlan sssssshhhhhh
How are democrats stopping you from building a wall you said Mexico would pay for? Is it because you lied and are now trying to stick American tax payers with the $25 billion dollar wall. Your stupid wall idea only covers a small percentage of the country and does absolutely nothing to stop the 40% of immigrants that fly in. Your $25 billion dollar wall will do nothing to stop illegal immigration. Why dont you just be honest and admit you know how to embezel and extort a ton of money from this wall project.
BUILD THE WALL!  American security and safety over political garbage!
We need to stop allowing illegal aliens to come here and have babies to get them social security numbers! If you don’t have SS# neither should your child.
BUILT THE WALL!! PROTECT OUR COUNTRY FROM ILLEGALS
BUILT THE WALL!! PROTECT OUR COUNTRY FROM ILLEGALS
We need to secure the border, get rid of sanctuary cities, and really fix our country.
It'll be great when the wall is finished them we can really fix our problems and not have to worry about illegals coming over
secure our borders, build the wall .. those idiots are filled with hatred and divide, they want the border, they need the border, just want to fight ..shame on them for being so mindless
secure our borders, build the wall .. those idiots are filled with hatred and divide, they want the border, they need the border, just want to fight ..shame on them for being so mindless
Terrorists aren’t coming through Mexico.  We do have people coming down from Canada, 95% by air or tunnels.   The wall at the Southern border makes little sense except to make it difficult for vehicles.  I live in NYC.  People climb 80 story buildings here so a 10 or 20 ft concrete wall would stop nothing.  Also right now more Americans are moving to Mexico than coming here.  You can live well in many areas for very little money.
Terrorists aren’t coming through Mexico.  We do have people coming down from Canada, 95% by air or tunnels.   The wall at the Southern border makes little sense except to make it difficult for vehicles.  I live in NYC.  People climb 80 story buildings here so a 10 or 20 ft concrete wall would stop nothing.  Also right now more Americans are moving to Mexico than coming here.  You can live well in many areas for very little money.
why do you think we need a wall,, they don't just come through the airports ya know..  tell it congress..
Right now we need security at our airports where we are actually stopping thousands on our terror list. Agents aren’t being paid.  You sir are a fraud.   Do us a favor and crawl back into your reality tv hole    You make a piss poor human.
You are a disgrace to the American people
We need to be protected from your worthless ass, you fucktard.
Both sides have played the border wall card. Its just different now because... ya know... the POTUS is a dickhead.
They're a bunch of pathetic weirdos scumbags
Please don't forget to pray that God be merciful to us, for allowing our country to get this way.  For anyone who has the mind to do it, let's get on our knees and ask God's forgiveness for turning our backs on him.  We're the ones who have elected silly and evil people to our lawmaking offices.  Now we have to pray for rescue from them, that is, from the evil one who motivates them.  God bless.
The wicked witch of the west and her puppet chuckles don’t give a damn about Americans. If it has trumps name on it they’re against it. Throw your DAMNocratic temper tantrum in another country. And NOBODY on Congress should be getting a paycheck till the DAMNocrats man up
The wicked witch of the west and her puppet chuckles don’t give a damn about Americans. If it has trumps name on it they’re against it. Throw your DAMNocratic temper tantrum in another country. And NOBODY on Congress should be getting a paycheck till the DAMNocrats man up
Build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall build the wall
Soon as food stamps run out the Democrats will be crying for border security to
Your promise has been broken you fucktard. You said Mexicans were going to pay for that wall. Now the very people that voted for you are now not getting a paycheck, quit working, and now not protecting our country. So full of yourself but a great salesman you are.
Your a FUCKING JOKE, CANT WAIT FOR BREAKING NEWS TO BE TRUMP HAS BEEN KILLED
Build the wall, deport all illegals, no benefits of any kind for illegals/"refugees" Tel them the American Frere Ride is over.
If you build the wall my generation will tare it down. The wall is almost as dumb as Trump saying there has been a border issue in the US for thousands of years... How can anyone support this lying, ignorant wanna be dictator.
The majority don't want a wall. There is no security crisis at our southern border. You're shutdown is hurting families and the economy. You're keeping children in cages and allowing them to be physically and sexually abused. NO WALL! This is not Germany.
I believe in legal immigration but not illegal immigration.  If this continue this country will become a cesspool.  We have enough crime from our own citizens. We don’t need criminals from other countries
Stop being a pussy and make those faggets build the wall
Screw the leftist losers!!!
Let us so-called redneck's run the border.  Just say the. Word.    We got you Donald
Let us so-called redneck's run the border.  Just say the. Word.    We got you Donald
Wow, the garbage that is going on right now is absurd.  We've heard many Presidents say that border security is imperative yet it is still a problem today.  Why, because it's never been addressed like Donald J. Trump is addressing it.  Change is HARD, we cannot continue to allow floods of people to come here, for 1 many are ill and our healthcare systems are already taxed, 2 many/most don't speak English and if their children go to school the teachers have to accommodate/bring in additional bi-lingual teachers (another expense on our tax dollars)...I need to shut up.  Open borders aren't fair to those that want/need to come here legally and to allow them will only bring the U.S. down to a marginal/minimal way of life.  Not fair to anyone.
Hopefully they'll come to their sences
Please don’t activate the fucking obama care
Democrats are like little children. Using any excuse to not admit when Trump or the Republicans are right. Even though they wanted these items before Trump came along. They would rather sacrifice more American souls.
Democrats are like little children. Using any excuse to not admit when Trump or the Republicans are right. Even though they wanted these items before Trump came along. They would rather sacrifice more American souls.
Instead of spending all this money on the wall why don't we use some to fix it up a little bit, but  also use some to strengthen our immigration laws, and also fix our welfare system. Instead of helping the lazy jerks that sit at all all day why not give them a reason to work instead of just giving them food stamps, section 8 and public housing. Why don't we reserve those things for the actual working middle class people who other wise can not afford to live and support their families even though they are working 40+ hours a week!
Build the wall and then deport all criminals.
Republicans are such sheep.  Are you all too dumb to actually see what this guy is doing.   Distraction Distraction Distraction.  Wake up people.   There is no crisis at the southern border.  The crisis is taking place in the Pumpkin man’s head.
you gotta make a consequence fit the argument : Shut down just the entitlement programs that illegals come here for at the hands of un-willing tax payers, then re-open the rest...you’ll never lose this way.
If a politician is not for a sucure border they must be profiting from this somehow somewhere SOMEONE. Lets see human trafficking, drugs, or more than we know . So this makes me think if your not for a secure border you must be involved in illegals . yes?
If a politician is not for a sucure border they must be profiting from this somehow somewhere SOMEONE. Lets see human trafficking, drugs, or more than we know . So this makes me think if your not for a secure border you must be involved in illegals . yes?
Build the wall, it is sad they try calling illegal immigrants, migrants, no they are illegal immigrants
smart border security, not a dumb ass wall.
They dgaf about the American people, stop anything with trumps name on it at all cost, at any measure.  Lie, scream, distort, propagandize.  They dgaf... do what needs to be done at any cost.  Dont give them an opportunity or heads up on anything, that gives them time to twist and lie thier asses off.  We support you mr president, we voted for you to do, not play politics with these moronic crackheads...
Only terrorists and stupid people are against the wall.  TRUMP 2020!
Thank god he’s off the air. What a fucking liar. Remove him by any means possible to preserve the constitution.
Build the wall & lock them all up!!!
Anyone else think that perhaps the real reason the left doesn’t want this is possibly the old divide and conquer thing, possibly created by NWO to make this country fail?  The wall makes total sense, at least financially. But the left doesn’t want to pay for it. But they’ll pay subsidies for a sanctuary city. Two words. Illegal ( meaning not legal) alien ( meaning not of this nation) . By that definition, which is a very basic one, how can the left condone the immigration problem?  The wall needs to be in place!
They are not after you. It's a dumb idea you narcissistic idiot.  What's more important is putting that money back into the nation not in a flaming barrier that provides nothing back.
We do.  The Democrats need to get their heads out of their tails and fund the wall.
We want border security and we are tired of taking hardworking taxpayers money being used to take care of these people what the people nor and raised in this country I mean it's crazy how many people I know that both parents work overtime and they still have no health insurance I just don't get it sometimes I think democrats have dumbed this country down so much that maybe another country will just nuke us democrats won't shut up till there's nothing left
Resign and save the country a ton of money and lots of agony.
Resign and save the country a ton of money and lots of agony.
The vermin would sell out their country to get more votes.
How about Congress take their pay, ALL OF IT, away to pay those who are not getting paid if they are so 'concerned' for the American people?! How about that?  MAYBE then they will get off their high horse ass n heads out of their asses get this shut down over with!!!
Shut down is fine! We hope for a New Party! No more corrupt Democrat Party! Please install not only Border Walls but An American People Freedom Party! What’s in America is for America until people out there learn to come into our country legally!
Build the wall.  If walls don't work then the next DNC and RNC will not put a wall around the arena area they are at.  Lets all hold our breath.  They will be putting up walls...just wait.   What a bunch of elected idiots.
Build the wall. Somebody that knows how, start a GoFundMe.
Democrats are just obstructionists that need to be hung for treason...
Build wall. Shut down border. Deport ever single SOB that’s here illegal. Be making trillions because not feeding scum. MAGAFOREVER!!!!!!!
Then hire more border control security and use the funds to pay them not build a pointless wall, you twat.
Stop belittling Blacks and Latinos like a lot of us aren’t professionals or educated and only do menial jobs. Not true! Remember, we had a President, Obama. We’re not in the slavery days! Remember those days when y’all beat, hung and raped us at a whim, for nothing as usual, just cruel. Stop crying and acting like y’all are so innocent and helpless with your mass murders and serial killers and rapists.
Walls keep prisoners in jail wall can keep asshole out
Build a wall and legalize recreational pot. That’s how you win in 2020. MAGA
Whatever rump, you started this asshole. It's all on you. You said you would take the blame, but of course you folded, you ass!
Bomb Mexico NOW before they attack !!!
BUILD THE WALL!!! Sir you have a phone and a pen just like Obama did!
I'm in Mexico right now. Every h ilme here has a wall around it, a fence around it and razor wire all along the rop. So if the Mexican families need this ro be safe, then why should we ler MS13 run freely into the U.S.? The democrats say only 6 terrorists caught at the norder. Guess what it only takes ONE TERRORIST to cause a mass casualty!!!
Trash speech from a trash president
Susann Lund democrats are not stupid,just immoral.......
Gary Fiktus stupid
Murdering babies globally>protecting the U.S.A.
We will not build Donald Trump's fucking white supremacist wall.
The biggest threat to security is him. By shutting down the government he has caused the TSA to become weaker which means threats can come via  airports. Food stamps which people depend on are not getting them which will result in a increase of crime because people get desperate. federal workers are not being payed not knowing what or if they will get paid. If you support trump you have no compassion or foresight to see who your ignorance is effecting. You do realize your country is in trillions of dollars of debt and he wants to spend what you don't have. His grandmother was an illegal immigrant the same thing you say was said to his own family members.
bastard shrestha showing 2 times payal,abhilasha shreshth  in joe biden likes,comment, n namrata shrestha father showing me,tat u are with another 2 namrata bastard ,to me u are making servant to use me,tat i should share for tat all,sooooooooooooooooooo u boring, u are soooo boring man, knoxx very romantic, hob soooo flexible smart good,your choice,your tribe useless boring, greedycheap,health disturbance poison lady, u will see one day, tat u will loss,becoz u are very very proudy lier man,those man lie with cultured girl,they will definitely loss,material istic u win,but inside u are poor.
Don’t give in to those parasites.
he is the most stupid mother fucker ever why this punk is fucking with all american people money irs and tax season has nothing to do at all with ur fucking wall bitch mexican people dont jump walls that was back in the days mexicans cross the border walking also in cars even traveling u so the most disgusting human being in the whole world u shutdown irs for ur ego bullshit we got nothing to do with ur damn wall done deal we work and we pay taxes year by year
Your promise was to have Mexico pay for your stupid wall not us Americans Fucktard! Don't sweep that HUGE detail under the rug about your so called promise
Will you PLEASE STOP JERKING Around and just CLOSE The F&&ing BORDER!!!!!!
Canals need water, right?
Jason Jones  a canal in a drought desert area????
Turn that border into a canal! Dig it deep enough that the sides become a natural wall. Then the US and Mexico get trade growth from the canal being used, and we get a deterrent to illegal border crossings!
Why do illegals think it is the American taxpayers responsibility to make their dreams come true.  We should take the hundred and50 billion $ a year we spend on illegals and put it into our infrastructure our teachers and everything else that is already here
Build that wall and take the pay of Congress as well as the little guys
Yeah he promised Mexico would pay for the wall the lieing SOB.
they are so full of hate for you that they see nothing good in what you are trying to achieve for the Americans.   I for one do not favor illegal aliens taking over our country.   If they want to join in the legal fashion then fine but otherwise get your scrawny ass out of here!!!!
Build the wall, steel barrier!
BUILD THE WALL, FENCE, AND WHATEVER ELSE WE NEED!
BUILD THE WALL, FENCE, AND WHATEVER ELSE WE NEED!
I still believe we need to build a tall wall. How about we also build a deportation system next to the wall. Human slingshot or catapult comes to mind. One every mile, so the border patrol and ICE can immediately deport them back. Brutal and should be very effective. Extra points for Cactus landing fields. For every 10 illegals deported, lets launch a democrat politician over the wall too. Kind of like greasing the rails or something.
I still believe we need to build a tall wall. How about we also build a deportation system next to the wall. Human slingshot or catapult comes to mind. One every mile, so the border patrol and ICE can immediately deport them back. Brutal and should be very effective. Extra points for Cactus landing fields. For every 10 illegals deported, lets launch a democrat politician over the wall too. Kind of like greasing the rails or something.
They’re stopping you from showing your tax returns!? SOB’s P.S. “Or else I’ll shut it down” is not “working together”.
F*cking appalling!!! Words do not express the hope I have that these assholes feel the worst pain imaginable as they burn in hell for eternity.   Thank you Mr. President Trump and all who support the defense and security of this country.
The dumbocrats are the ones to blame for government workers not getting paid. Pull your heads out of your ass and give this man our president the money he needs to protect our country by building that wall. What's its gonna take?!?!? Your mother, sister, daughter, son, father...the list goes on of people that we love that we can lose or be harmed by these people you're protecting and accepting into our country. Not to mention the expense that we have to undergo when they come in.
Get back to work. You're not accomplishing anything except hurting your own people.  ...idiot
Build  the  wall.    Control  who  enters  our  country.
Build the wall- secure our borders
Build the wall- secure our borders
Buy commercials giving arrest stats, educate voters on dangers. Dems don’t care, only want illegals to vote
The Democrats are being ASSHOLES. The American people want the wall, but they won't give an inch. Just to make Trump look bad. I hope there's a landslide victory for Trump in 2020.
Build the wall and at the same time focus on true reform.  It shouldn't take a person years and thousands of dollars to legally immigrate.    Make it easier to immigrate while at the same time eliminate ANY access to welfare benefits which should be for citizens only.  Build the Wall,  Thank you for finally being the President who will do what is right to protect the border and put principle, values above the needs of a political party.
They want to stop you, but please keep doing what the American people voted you into office to do!!! Many people pray for you daily and for the protection you need from the maniacs on the 'other side'.....
Trump rocks! Nancy and Schumer are idiots.
You are a national disgrace and a global embarrassment.  You are also a fraud and a pathological liar.  Do go to jail soon. 👋🇺🇸 #MAGA
Call a national emergency and bypass the idiots.
Nancy Pelosi has a wall around her house, yet she doesn’t want a wall to protect the American people. Chuck Schumer locks the doors to his home and office, but doesn’t want a wall and Ports of Entry to protect the American people. The Democrats not only want to give billions to other countries, but they want to give $12 Billion MORE this year, which they seemed to find the funds for, yet they refuse to allocate less than half that amount to protect the American people. The Democrats voted for a wall and tougher border security for President Obama, but refuse to support border security under President Trump. Schumer is mad because he claims President Trump hasn’t given him any words on how the money is spent, but was perfectly fine with passing Obamacare without reading the Bill. Democrats hate President Trump, and they hate everyone who voted for him. And they are willing to make all of us pay for that.
Lost another irrational fb yesterday over this issue.  She called the President the “liar in chief” and accused me of having a “hateful heart” when I said that an illegal Dominican drug lord who lives in my hometown in RI, and has been arrested multiple times, should be deported.  🙄  Unfriended her! Why are people lacking common sense?  The wall isn’t going to solve all the problems if states (like RI and MA) refuse to send illegals that are arrested to ICE for deportation.
Yeah but a working government will suffice
Shut it down.  Government spending is out of control.  I’d rather spend money on a wall then to support illegal immigrants pouring into our country
They already made illegal x on they birth certificates now all they gotta do is cross the border it's a set up Build that wall by any means..
Build the the wall Trump keep us safe,piss on That Bitch Pelosi!!!
You just need to start blasting out little videos where all these dems have said they are for border security.  Call them out on their hypocrisy.  I bet they fold instantly.
The RATS couldn't care LESS about us LEGAL citizens - their goals are:   1) Getting more ILLEGALS into the country so they can get more votes  2) Stopping ANYTHING you want to do
The RATS couldn't care LESS about us LEGAL citizens - their goals are:   1) Getting more ILLEGALS into the country so they can get more votes  2) Stopping ANYTHING you want to do
Democrats don’t care how many people are killed by illegals. They don’t want him to fix this country...
Democrats have pure evil hate for Trump and America. Their choice is greed and power. Americans are becoming more aware. Less freebies to illegals will build the wall period.
We need this wall built...enough of illegal immigrants entering this country for how many years now?
Is it time for dumbass to start lying and blaming yet?
2022243121 This is the # to contact your representative ... demand funding for border security now!!! SHARE SHARE SHARE
Americans do want border security! What we don’t want is those 2 morons in charge holding up the funds. There acting like  pissed off jealous children.  Enough !!!
Don't give up Mr. President! Perhaps you should send Chuck and Nancy to one of the more active areas along the border for a while and then see if they feel the same way. We need this wall.
Open Borders an easy way to attack America with bio-agents . CDC have identified anthrax as one of a few biological agents capable of causing death and disease in sufficient numbers to cripple a developed region or urban setting.
Stopping you.. Democrats are evil ! Stay strong in this trump !
A clean bipartisan bill was before you, ask Lil’ bitch McConnell where it is.
Trump please don’t do this. We know you rich as hell but WE NOT. Everybody don’t have millions billions and trillions you shutting the govt down messing w ppl money is ridiculous those Mexicans going to find a way to do wadever they gonna do regardless of a WALL! A wall trump ?! A damn wall bro ? 5billion dollar wall ughhhhhhhhhh you really pissing the Americans off
The promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it.   But now it’s not?   You’re a liar.
The promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it.   But now it’s not?   You’re a liar.
Democratic did not say we was going to pull up the wall you said come on trunk stop playing without money I got a building to manage be honest I rather deal with the Bush family you're the worst president I ever had in my life
So at this points the loves + likes = 14,086  laughs are 274.  Hmmmm
Stopping you, because Democrats are idiots
Make it where only US citizens can vote and the Democrats won’t give a rats tail about immigration.
Karen Ann Bradshaw aren't taxes withheld from gross pay?
I want the border secure.  I live in Texas and I can’t tell you several times  I hired someone with a Social Security number that turned  out to be fake when I filed it with Social Security. I never knowingly hired anyone who was illegal. That means that I paid someone $20 an hour for 40 hours a week and they did not pay any income taxes because they lied.   If you’re an illegal alien you cannot pay income tax because you do not have a Social Security number. Think about that Americans.
Just put the military on the job put small bases every 40 miles
Democrats don’t care if anyone one dies. They love violence and crave corruption.  They steel all our money and give it to illegals and keep the rest for themselves.
Do what you have to do. Build the wall! They are arrogant assholes who waste billions of dollars on ridiculous crap every year! They don't care about anything but their own agenda not the people of this country. Build the wall 🇺🇸 Thank you for caring about us 💜
To the democrats every illegal is a family looking for a better life, to the republicans it's a gang banger whose been deported 3 times before, or an ISIS terrorist in disguise. Truth is its both, good people and bad people. But we cannot help the good people until stop the bad people with a wall and make everyone go through at least as much security as at an airport.
Build that wall. It doesn't matter where the money comes from. We do not need or respect the democratic party. They have proved to be worthless.
IMPEACH TRUMP!!! TRUMP FOR PRISON!!! REPORT FAKE NAMES AND PROFILES!!! Eradicate the trolls!!!
Your job as president is to boost our ecconmy a wall would put us in a recession. Meanwhile China is trying declare war on us while your trying to separate us from our neighbors downsouth with the border wall money you can spend on our military defense to keep us safe from an imment attack from the Chinese government instead of making America a luxurious country which would be spoiled by mistreatment on one another as Americans.
Maybe get mexico to pay for it and stop being a crybaby bitch?After all,that was the promise,was it not?
It was a stupid, narcissistic promise with no basis in fact.
Feds want paid you fucking blonde turd
I hope you will be able to clean DC.. Hoping you have all the evidence to make them all go to jail!!
Build the wall and enforce the laws!
Build the wall that's all what matter.
Dem-rats are worried that TRUMP will be the one that builds the wall! They want it...but they don't want his name attached to it. What a great achievement for the president to pull this off. History baby!
You said Mexico was going to pay for wall not taxpayers they got tunnels people are stupid Trump a idiot president liar
You said Mexico was going to pay for wall not taxpayers they got tunnels people are stupid Trump a idiot president liar
Well USA is being plundered, and the fatality of legal persons is a devastating issue! As if WE Vets, and American born for generations...have no rights!  On a footnote, its very personal when one of your blood is drugged, raped in a horrible beating..violent enough to remove memory, physical  assault on entire body, robbed, left in a ditch like in a Biblical chapter. Barely lived, never the same. 4,000 in '16, '17 never talked again.  They had to be buried. 4,000 Americans unaccounted for, and not suspected of being indigent! The pirates are here by the tens of thousands of all nationalities and causes.
Just do it.  Sick of all this political positioning, wasted time and money.  GET IT DONE!  It's time to stand and protect our country and citizens.
Just find the 50 Billion dollars they were suppose to already have allocated then use that. Maybe Schumer and Pelosi pocketed some to build walls around their property. Investigate how they both became rich on their salary. Start taking money back from all of them for misuse of funds. I am sure they will help fund the wall then.
Schumer & Pelosi lying... as usual...misrepresenting the entire issue!!! Their deceits are being seen...their once sheep are starting to turn in to wolves hungry for retribution to being lied to and deceived for so long by these globalists socialist commies!   My response: Mr. President...DO NOT END THE SHUTDOWN UNTIL YOU GET THAT WALL!!! They all SAID they supported it when it got them votes...hold these liars to their words now!
BUILD THAT WALL.  If the Democrats want to push you, they better wake up out of their dream. You've got the rest of us standing behind you.
Nancy and Chuck are rebellious, anti-American, pathetic excuses for 'Leaders' when they refuse to 'offer solutions' to this situation...OH Thats' right, they can't think on their own and are not creative enough to come up with anything....did I mention brainless. I hate how they are anti American and we pay them! They are to serve and protect, not abuse and accuse, and its immoral to support Illegal activities and Illegal people. Thir JOB is to serve and protect Americans!! Treasonous!
Build the wall. Don't let them win or America will lose.
Build the wall, keep our borders secure!
Build that wall!  Fix those horrible immigration laws!
I thought you said Mexico was paying for the wall? Stop holding hard working Americans hostage for your personal gain...treasonous bastard! And, when did you idiots get conned into believing we needed a wall? Pathetic followers.
Ashamed of this immoral Congress!  They are ignoring the core value of the Constitution to serve and protect the citizens by valuing illegal immigrants over the welfare and safety over its own citizens
Build the wall, give Daca kids a path to citizenship, establish a program for all current illegals to obtain citizenship by paying a fee, requirement to take a constitution class and English classes, and a path to make them tax paying and off government free programs within a time period or deport them!
Yes we want borders secured..Democrats need to vote for this..or get voted out of office.!
Let's see what the ratio of smart/morons are in this country. Let's hope we can outvote the morons who want FREE STUFF and are clueless as to WHO PAYS FOR IT. Those who want SOCIALISM don't want the wall.  Those who want SOVEREIGNTY (a free country) WANT THE WALL.  All you people who want socialism why don't you just pack your bags, get the hell out and leave the rest of us patriots alone. You socialists ARE A DISGRACE TO OUR COUNTRY AND EVERYTHING IT STANDS FOR. Now... GET OUT!!! Go find a country that share YOUR values!!!!
The democrats and most of the republicans want America destroyed. They want this country to be communist.
this brain dead jackass is blowing gas over his address while americans are suffering
we have to now worry about canada boarders too that fool up there is letting everyone in too. travel ban on America safety first. how soon those celb snowflakes forget 911.
Piss on Shitmer(Schumer). Keep it shut down. We support you Mr. President!!!
build the wall !!!!!!!!! I'm so sick of hearing people say that there is no crisis on our borders. there sure as hell is. if you don't think so then take some of the people coming over and let them live in your house.
Stupid wall idea! Open the government you big ass child
Try forming an actual sentence before you call someone stupid.
except for his base which are ust as stupid as he is
yes yes yes still think  middle of night load a cargo plane full of money and land it in the desert  have contractors thier  give them it tax free to bulid the wall..  better then what Obaxxx did  and they didnt say anything PROBEN SOLVED
Take the Dems out to the trash and get these Muslims out of govt office
Thank you President Trump. The answer is obvious and many sound-minded citizens know the answer. GOD HELP those who can only insult and obstruct. Here's a bible verse: see if it resonates with anyone and can show a minute ability to abstain from vulgarity. I probably don't want your opinion anyway. Jesus said, "Satan has come to only steal, kill, and destroy." You don't have to be a genius to see that one side is BUILDING and the other just intends to DESTROY and do everything harmful. My peace comes from knowing that GOD knows. Drunken, idiotic words and behavior do not escape him. The people have done nothing but harm our government MUST repent and turn from their wicked ways instead of taking a BIG FAT PAYCHECK for doing harm. Many don't like that their tax payer-money is going to drunken fools who hate God and people. So, dear President, TAKE HEART, because no vulgar language will stop our prayers or make God LESS than GOD. Every person is a "vapor, a mist." Jesus said you don't know if you one more hour on earth. Take His wise words, obstructionists, and REPENT. He will forgive and replace your heart of stone with one that is soft toward him and others. It's a better deal than what the Dems. have going. TAKE IT.
It doesn’t matter what you want for our country the Democrats will not agree with you.  You have done more for us in a long time. The democrats are so stupid and only care about themselves and not what is best for our country.   #prayforourpeesident
You are JUST A LIAR!! You’ve never kept a promise in your life. Why? You can careless for anyone of us!
Don't use my tax money to build no damn wall. You said in your campaign that Mexico was going to pay for the wall now your saying the wall will pay for itself through a trade deal. I don't care of you are a Republican or a Democrat This man has shut down the government and people are unable to pay mortgages and provide food for their children and you have the nerve to talk about all the killings of women and children. During your campaign you didn't give a rats ass about women or children. Jesus fight this battle because it is yours I'm just disgusted and sick to my stupid because he has the never to talk am humanity
Damn mainstream media ...sick of them lieing.....and screw Schumer and Pelosi ....lieing bitches
Y'all are some idiot's. You telling him to fund the wall with your money🤦🏽‍♀️🤦🤦🏻‍♀️. Just so you all know God is not the illustrator of confusion. This man is confused. I guess it will hit y'all when you can't take care of your families.
Y'all are some idiot's. You telling him to fund the wall with your money🤦🏽‍♀️🤦🤦🏻‍♀️. Just so you all know God is not the illustrator of confusion. This man is confused. I guess it will hit y'all when you can't take care of your families.
You have already broken your "promise." Mexico will not pay for this wall, fence, or barrier. And now you think it's A-OK to saddle Americans with this foolish thing. It will not be a wall in tribute to you, you egocentric idiot.
Oh Mr.President they rather see you fail then coming together and helping our Country.If you fixed everything and made it great again.They wouldnt know what to do with themselves....IDIOTS!!
Everyone should start flooding all Democrats in Washington to BUILD THE WALL.  Calls, emails, faxes whatever!
Trump is a dumb ass. He clawing for what $5 billion dollars for a wall. A bipartisan bill was presented to him last year with $25 billion for the wall. This in exchange for DACA. Trump rejected it. Trump is an idiot savant. Even if I had voted for this jerk I would feel the same way.
Just to be clear I do not want you spending my tax dollars and a stupid fucking wall. Thank god the Democrats are there to block you. I hope they have the conviction and courage to stand their ground in the face of you and your half-wit base.
Just to be clear I do not want you spending my tax dollars and a stupid fucking wall. Thank god the Democrats are there to block you. I hope they have the conviction and courage to stand their ground in the face of you and your half-wit base.
Build the wall mr president  God bless America and piss on the dam democrats
Build the wall mr president  God bless America and piss on the dam democrats
Linda Lynch you know that isn't the only issue. If an American commits murder, they are prosecuted and laws are put in place. Your point is silly.
LaVerne M PhillipsLast year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
Linda Lynch build that wall!!!!!!
Last year in the U.S. over 12,000 people were shot and killed by American citizens and Trump fights tooth and nail to prevent any common sense gun control. About a half dozen people are killed by undocumented aliens and Trump demands that we spend billions of dollars building a wall. I guess he doesn't think that it matters if your child is killed by a fellow American....I guess he thinks you will only mourn for them if they are killed by an undocumented person.
We all want security but the wall isn't going to fix anything. This isn't the Ming Dynasty. We don't have hordes of Mongols pillaging our towns. It didn't work then or now.
The Democrats don’t care about the American people they care about their pockets and that’s all that’s it they don’t care whether we live or die you Mr. President care and that concerns them get in there and get the job done we got a boost these Democrats out of office
We need the wall in Somalia please come and build
BUILD THE DAMN WALL! It's OUR money, OUR country and OUR wall!
Declare a national emergency president.. we stand firm with you. We know that anyone with common sense knows we need a secure border. The Democrats are the ones causing the shutdown.  They just gave millions  to Europe for abortions but zero for safety for Americans safety.  All country's need secure borders ,just as we need protection and safety in our own homes  we need the wall   Build the WALL.
Americans want their fucking paychecks clown
Border! Term limits for these idiots.
You have conflated “border security” with a wall that won’t work, you incompetent buffoon. Resign and play some golf before your prison sentence.
What's most important to Americans is stopping you from screwing us out of our tax dollars to build your stupid f'king wall so you can repay your debt to Russia by way of "US Steel" provided by Evras North America, whose parent company is Evras and 31% owned by Russian billionaire, Trump family friend and close Putin ally, Roman Abromavich. No doubt, also, your motivation to place tariffs on steel from outside North America.  YOU SUCK!
Yes we need borarder security. I have no problem with imgrants comming into America. If they get background checks and come in the correcy way. Legaly!!!. Become a Us citizen and that means in all ways Honor our nation and our flag learn to speak english. Work and pay taxes like I do.obey the laws of our Great Land. They adapt to our nation not us,to there ways. Yes serve in our militaryif of age to do so.
U SAID U MAKE MEXICO PAY FOR THAT WALL U LIAR. PAY FOR THAT WALL U RICH FUCKER.
Stopping trump all together they hate him they can't keep their promises not their word and the hate him cause he can what bunch if dumb ass flakes
Build the Wall!!!!!!  Don't cave into them!  Stand your ground - make it happen!
Build it then close the border till Mexico pays up!
Border security yes...your asshole wall to please the Trumpkin Bumpkins, Looney Limbaugh, Transvestite Coulter, Hack Hannity, Loopy Levin, Crackpot Carlson, Ichabod Ingraham, and the rest of the Fox Fake News CLOWNS...:No way Stumpy!
You promised mexico not the American people would pay for this wall ... jump in front of a train dumbass
You promised mexico not the American people would pay for this wall ... jump in front of a train dumbass
build that wall, the hell with snowflakes, it's not the money, the amount is relatively less than a drop in the bucket, it's because they do not want TRUMP to succeed, they are forgetting about WE THE PEOPLE, they don't give a fk, they only care about control and power!!!! WE don't count
build that wall, the hell with snowflakes, it's not the money, the amount is relatively less than a drop in the bucket, it's because they do not want TRUMP to succeed, they are forgetting about WE THE PEOPLE, they don't give a fk, they only care about control and power!!!! WE don't count
Steve Pecenka you were the one being a condescending little prick talking about my intelligence. I reversed it and merely explained why I do the symbols lol .
Micheal Marceaux LOL-Sure Mike. Having to use emojis to express your deep thoughts is a sure sign of intellect.I'll bet you're every bit as smart as the orange buffoon in the oval office. You know, the idiot who claims every word, every stupid action, is the biggest, the best, in the history of the world. Only a lying, insecure, narcissistic stable genius  feels the need to constantly proclaim what a genius he is. So yes, you're pretty intelligent using the tRumpie yardstick.
Steve Pecenka Its my way of cursing you out without getting banned . So yeah I am pretty intelligent lol. Its fun and therapeutic at the same time . We all know yall got 🐒monkey brains I give out 🍌
Oh, ouch, what a cutting reply, Mikey! Just what I'd expect from a highly intelligent tRumpie, though!
Steve Pecenka put a sock in it you lil durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrpppp!!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌 lil 🐒
Steve Pecenka put a sock in it you lil durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrpppp!!!!! 🐒🐒🐒🐒ooo ooo ahhh ahhh here have a 🍌 lil 🐒
You got the first part right, Cheeto. Stopping your incompetent, traitorous ass from hurting this country any further should be priority number one!
You don’t have to build a wall to secure the borders you fucking dumb prick!
Too many clowns responding.  Hello dumbasses, we have thousands entering ILLEGALLY.
Your promise is about as good as your marriage vows. What happened to Mexico will pay for the wall, I promise. Your an ASSHAT.
All you Trump supporter believe everything that Assclown tall you if you all was so freaking bloody Smart you would Fact check everything
More then 6000 murders and  1 million unique crimes committed by illegal immigrants since 2008..  is a national emergency. Hopefully you have people putting these statistics together so you can show them to the nation during your address.
More then 6000 murders and  1 million unique crimes committed by illegal immigrants since 2008..  is a national emergency. Hopefully you have people putting these statistics together so you can show them to the nation during your address.
You should get Chucky and Nancy to accompany you on your border trip, and maybe get a first-hand idea about what is needed, from the people working the front lines every single day. Last set of interviews I heard, every border official said the wall would help IMMENSELY. Of course, I might be foolishly optimistic that these two clowns would pay any attention to people that are actually working the problem. I can dream, right?
They want to stop You My President. You and Your Administration has outed them and they are feeling how naked they really are. I stand with You! Your not alone. Stand Strong! Pelosi & Schumer look like fools. They like their time in front of a camera. They talk the talk but can’t walk the walk. I can’t wait till they are all on the debate stage. The Garbage they spew and blame others for what they themselves are guilty of.
Eric E. Murdaa umm yes we do ...(actual american)
Actual American here. WE DO NOT WANT THE WALL.   There’s thousands of things that 5 billion could be better spend on then a half ass wall.   Also, why are there so many Non-Americans saying “Best President Ever?”...... Trumps vocal fan base is a bunch of fake accounts. Trump’s cabinet is guilty.   Real Americans value human life. This isn’t Russia
Build the wall it only can help
I suggest someone raid Pelosi's vineyards.. You'd find lots of undocumented immigrants there
Build the wall protect america
Build the wall Stay shutdown until they fully fund the wall
We want border safety. Build the wall!!! Democrats you really know how to make yourselves look stupid!!!!! 😠 😠
we have 20 to 30 million illegals in OUR country now. How many will be enough for you 100 million? The Democrats will be happy when the USA has collapsed and they can start their Marxist country.
I have also written several nasty letters to my very liberal senators regarding thier support of Israel.
Yes, just like I was against Obama's high level of deportations and his use of drones.
Kimberley Gray  so if this was Obama asking for funding for a wall, would you still be against it?
SIT DOWN DON, YOU FAT MOTHERFUCKER!!!Play Video
Thank you President TRUMP,  hopefully these two will slither under their rock, they are both Evil, and look like they are  demonic, they would rather see U.S fail, then do,the right thing
Of course Americans want a Border Wall.  Are we blinded by the "Proven" fact of what is going on?  Do we want the continuous invasion of thousands of migrants forcing their way illegally into our country, throwing rocks and carrying their flag as a tribe of warriors ?  What's next, a fleet with guns?  We are beyond reason enough to build a wall.  We are disgusted  with different strains of diseases, gangs, riots and rude people with the audacity of making demands in "our" country.  I despise the attitude of illegals who disrespect our President and interfere in American citizens democracy and voting system. I am tired of being abused with the responsibility placed upon us to care for these phony asylum seekers, while we have our own unfortunate needy citizens who more than deserve their share of help.  Yes we want a wall.  Keep us a safe, clean and beautiful society.  We love you President Trump ❣️
Of course Americans want a Border Wall.  Are we blinded by the "Proven" fact of what is going on?  Do we want the continuous invasion of thousands of migrants forcing their way illegally into our country, throwing rocks and carrying their flag as a tribe of warriors ?  What's next, a fleet with guns?  We are beyond reason enough to build a wall.  We are disgusted  with different strains of diseases, gangs, riots and rude people with the audacity of making demands in "our" country.  I despise the attitude of illegals who disrespect our President and interfere in American citizens democracy and voting system. I am tired of being abused with the responsibility placed upon us to care for these phony asylum seekers, while we have our own unfortunate needy citizens who more than deserve their share of help.  Yes we want a wall.  Keep us a safe, clean and beautiful society.  We love you President Trump ❣️
Build the fucking Wall Mr Trump!!!!
You're a god damned fool, Donald.
You're a god damned fool, Donald.
Dems don’t care they just want to bitch and tell lies keep up t great work mr president and ty
Blows my mind that anyone would be against border security! This has nothing to do with asylum, everyone will still be able to apply - only they'll have to do it legally instead of after sneaking into our country. The media is so full of false narratives and there are so many who can't think for themselves! And the whole "I thought Mexico was going to pay for it" they (Mexico)  just realized that if there's a wall, all those that should be kept out will be stuck in their country! They don't want the bad seeds either!!
Blows my mind that anyone would be against border security! This has nothing to do with asylum, everyone will still be able to apply - only they'll have to do it legally instead of after sneaking into our country. The media is so full of false narratives and there are so many who can't think for themselves! And the whole "I thought Mexico was going to pay for it" they (Mexico)  just realized that if there's a wall, all those that should be kept out will be stuck in their country! They don't want the bad seeds either!!
F u
Fat ass stated a few illegal immigrants that murdered American citizens but fail to mention the numerous domestic terrorism killings by a thousand fold....mostly white. Lying motherf.cker.
The democrats are  disgraceful and hypocrites. They all wanted the wall, they got money ey for a wall that was never built, 46 billion to be exact where did that money go? Is that why they are multi millionaires on a 174 k a year job? People need to open their eyes about the democrats. They care nothing for the people. Their hatred is fueled by Satan because God is love . Support the democrats and you’re supporting Satan
If everyone else put this country first and quit obstructing, we’d all be doing a whole lot better. People that are so jealous of the rich keep shooting themselves in the feet trying to raise taxes on their own employers. Put your extended hand back in your own pockets, go to work, and pay for what you want! Fake News and Fake Humanitarianism is the enemy of this country!
You are the President of the Nation of Republicans and Democrats in the USA.  Please do not discuss "Democrats' problems" tonight in your speech to the nation.  Please address the need to secure America from drugs, criminals, disease, etc. coming across the Southern border costing Americans much more than $5.6B through building the Wall.  Classifying "Democrats" as the problem only adds fuel to this never- ending fire.  So many support the construction of this Wall, so please emphasize the positive aspects and eliminate the negative (including name calling, etc.)  You will win only by taking the high road on this issue.  Best wishes!
You are the President of the Nation of Republicans and Democrats in the USA.  Please do not discuss "Democrats' problems" tonight in your speech to the nation.  Please address the need to secure America from drugs, criminals, disease, etc. coming across the Southern border costing Americans much more than $5.6B through building the Wall.  Classifying "Democrats" as the problem only adds fuel to this never- ending fire.  So many support the construction of this Wall, so please emphasize the positive aspects and eliminate the negative (including name calling, etc.)  You will win only by taking the high road on this issue.  Best wishes!
Those turds care more about Mexicans than United States Citizens.....pretty sad.
Those turds care more about Mexicans than United States Citizens.....pretty sad.
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for it. If Mexico isn't paying for it then we're done with this conversation about the stupid wall. It's time that you fund the government so that American government employees can pay their bills.
Your promise was that Mexico would pay for it. If Mexico isn't paying for it then we're done with this conversation about the stupid wall. It's time that you fund the government so that American government employees can pay their bills.
Oh yeah more white men have killed people in this country than undocumented citizens. I dont care if you want a wall or not but find a different reason as to why you want it.
Oh yeah more white men have killed people in this country than undocumented citizens. I dont care if you want a wall or not but find a different reason as to why you want it.
Why can't we Send those who have to do Court ordered community Service work or who are incarcerated and in the overcrowed prisions that taxpayers are paying for to clean up the trash in the National parks.  They get paid 3 square meals a day, a bed, a roof over their head, libraries, gyms, tvs and game rooms...  There is No reason they shouldn't be put immediatly on a guarded clean up detail.  They can re pay with Civil Service duties. Put the tracker ankle bracelets & wrist bands on  them while being watched with armed guards and put them in tgere to do clean up work.  However ... It's a shame people cant take a trash bag in on their own or are so lazy and not more considerate to pick up after themselves to begin with.
Let the man do his damn job the American people voted this man in and he kept every promise he made! Build the wall keep out the heroin influx, illegal people we know nothing about, murders, etc.
build wall with armed guards to shoot
I’m so sick of the disrespect & disregard for our country. When 2 members of the people’s house stand in front of our nation and spew hate using buzzwords like hostage, temper tantrums, fear...... we have a huge problem. I challenge Pelosi & Schumer to spend ONE week, night & day at our southern border with our border agents & tell that same story. In fact, that should be mandatory to their election of office. And why in God’s name, do we the American people allow a newly elected congresswoman to disrespect our president and the office she holds??? We are circling the drain as a nation. Sad sad sad 😢
I’m so sick of the disrespect & disregard for our country. When 2 members of the people’s house stand in front of our nation and spew hate using buzzwords like hostage, temper tantrums, fear...... we have a huge problem. I challenge Pelosi & Schumer to spend ONE week, night & day at our southern border with our border agents & tell that same story. In fact, that should be mandatory to their election of office. And why in God’s name, do we the American people allow a newly elected congresswoman to disrespect our president and the office she holds??? We are circling the drain as a nation. Sad sad sad 😢
Build the wall. Don't wait on the Democrats. Bill every adult $150, even illegal immigrants working here. Then reimburse legal citizens the $150 after we are in a National State of Emergency.
Oh go on build the wall, it'll keep all you Trump-loving idiots in 😂🐐
Dont  give  in  to  their  bullshit.  My  lights  are  on,  trash  was  picked  up,  water  still  running.  Keep  it  shut  down  till  congress  funds  the  wall.
trump is a fear monger!  trump must be impeach immediately, so that America can recover from trump's destructive actions!
Why is Chuck Schumer always with evil Pelosi ??! Both evil
Afforable healthcare is more important you narcissist!
Afforable healthcare is more important you narcissist!
Hey! You actually said something with some truth in it!!! Americans do want border security! That's what Democrats are standing up for! They want methods that are more likely to be effective than your huge wall. They are willing to continue talks about border security - which don't have to include a government shutdown. They had agreed to a funding package that included money for wall repair and some building, where applicable, but you refused to budge unless they totally capitulated to your demands for funding your wall. Way to show you care about our people - not!  Democrats are quite willing to work on improving border security. They also want legal immigration, rather than illegal immigration. But calling anyone coming to our borders "illegals" is not right. They are only "Illegals" if they try to avoid the vetting process. There is a lot of work needed to improve the immigration situation, but your stubborn insistence upon doing it only your way will get nowhere fast.
I want the wall .  You know why? So many of us latinos come over here to escape the craziness of our home countries. Why do we want that same craziness infiltrating America? You gotta be a special kind of stupid or you must really hate America with a passion and want it to fall.
Ignore Pelosi and the nittwitts.... BUILD THE WALL!  We see how she stands for the red, white and blue by her actions against our veterans just this past week.  She’s trash....worthless. Can’t stand her.
Build the wall declare a National emergancy
Does anyone ever check out the stats on the likes, angry, funny, sad etc.... on these posts. Maybe all the liberals should get a clue. Americans do want the wall and immigration reform. We simply cannot sustain this country with this many immigrants pouring in and costing american's all sorts of funds. We have our own citizens living on the streets, children going to bed hungry, and drugs. Don't need more coming here for us to deal with. DO IT LEGALLY!
Americans should be happy. In canada our dumbass leader has turned the country into a jesus homeless shelter. We're taking everyone in and paying them to come here. Its astounding how it's even happening.
Ok we are down with border security ..............but.........your wall is fucking dumb.
Next send all ‘refugees’ back to their home where they can elect and give Pelosi citizenship in their country to be President and steal their tax dollars.
That was really ignorant Marilyn Weiner..  Why do we need sanctuary cities for illegals if we're all supposed to be so safe.??  This is our country not theirs..  I have rights also..
Micheal Marceaux. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT. SEEKING ASYLUM IS A LEGAL RIGHT.
Micheal Marceaux last ho illegal. Fake docs
Marilyn Weingartner Legal vs illegal big difference .
If DONALD TRUMP THINKS IMMIGRANTS ARE SO DANGEROUS, WHY DOES HE KEEP MARRYING THEM?
Build the Wall, it should have been built a long time ago!!!
Build the Wall, it should have been built a long time ago!!!
Being a trump supporter must be a lot like being an abused woman in an abusive relationship, no matter how many times you get punched in the face all the I'm sorry's and I love you's make it ok, it must be a psychological reaction to not being able to let go of it, trump supporters feel committed at this point because you all voted for him, fought for him, argued for him, and now you see what a failure he is being president, being a human being, being a descent person and caring when he doesn't, yeah trump supporters, YOU ARE the beaten woman in the relationship, and trump is is the abuser who says sorry it will never happen again!! and you just stay with him again and again and again...
Chump your such a liar.   https://news.gallup.com/poll/235775/americans-oppose-border-walls-favor-dealing-daca.aspx
No, Americans don’t. Just idiots who buy your bullshit
Fulfill your promise that Mexico will pay for your stupid wall!
Your Promise was for Mexico to pay for the Wall, your a liar.
just listen 2 silly Nancy , now that other idiot , don't know his name , just a idiot , wot a tool , stand firm Donnie , good move against the EU yesterday thanks !
It's so easy for those who don't live on the border to not want a wall, to say we dont need it. They dont live on the border they dont have to deal with drug smugglers, rapists or human traffickers breaking into their homes. If you dont want a wall a DARE YOU to move to the border and leave your doors open!!! I guarantee you'll be singing a different tune in just a short few days. You dont care for american citizens safety then you're not an american!!!  Daddy president put the crying tantrum toddlers in a corner and now they're pissed of about it. Libtards Sucked on Obamas tits for too long and got coddled!!!
Screw these filthy Democrats ... cancer of this country, the filthy pigs!!!
Build the wall! Get rid of those who say no! Wish it worked that way anyway 🤷‍♀️
With all the monies that have been giving to the Bushes, Clintons, Obummer all these years for border security and I'm not talking about 5b we're talking about 100's of billions, why are we having this problem? Answer...it's used to do what they said it was going to be used for, but they give it to companies  they have intrest in and get kick backs from it, ( you know like give the contracts to family members) It's away to keep these billions of dollars going. Now they know that there is someone who will use every penny to fix this problem. And no need for all these bilions every year. That and a loss of illigal votes
Drugs seized at THE PORT not BORDER. #NoWall   End #TrumpShutDown   https://6abc.com/$17-million-worth-of-fentanyl-seized-at-port-of-philadelphia/3690305/
Democrats say drugs are all being stopped at the border crossing.  Just shows how dumb they really are.
Donald Trump Jr is tied to El Chapo's Mexican drug cartel. These photos prove it. The same Latvian banker Don Jr is in photos with also was behind a massive Russian money laundering scheme as well. Because, of course he was.   https://thesternfacts.com/trump-jr-now-tied-to-mexican-drug-cartels-money-laundering-scheme-5906b8d4ce5d
We overstand you don't have to be Smart to talk to your Ignorant Cult members. They'd rather have $5 Billion for a irrelevant Wall that Mexico was supposed to pay for, than $3 Billion for Health care. I wish 45 the "Pied Piper for Imbeciles" would cut Food Stamps and Welfare so the 60% of his cult members that receive them would starve to death.
I want the wall. I want Polos I out of office along with her side kick. All the democrats who won't work with you Mr. President . their only agenda is to destroy you. You need to start playing hard ball and clean the swamp out. Please
I want the wall. I want Polos I out of office along with her side kick. All the democrats who won't work with you Mr. President . their only agenda is to destroy you. You need to start playing hard ball and clean the swamp out. Please
I can tell you. You would blame Trump! Probably because the wall wasn't built fast enough!
Seems to me the people who don't want border security are the same people who should be on the other side of the wall. I see your dumb smiling faces. Let me ask you... what if your mother, sister, brother..etc was raped or killed by an illegal? Or for that matter overdosed on one of the many drugs coming from Mexico. Where would you stand then?
Hawaii Harbors Illegal immigrants!!!!!!  Then Hawaii asks the Federal money, that they separately need because of the Unions who hold Citizens of Hawaii hostage: State Workers Union, Stevadores Union, police Union, hotel workers union, stage workers and film workers union, who all make more than the Teachers Union.  Everyone wants to work for a Union for retirement.  And Union Heads want power.  Prices go up.  Hawaii residents have to pay the ship yard workers union in San Diego and again in Hawaii before they can go to the store for toilet paper.  So Hawaii’s Government asks the Federal government for money, “because Hawaii is using its precious space for The Marines, Navy, Army and Airforce.”  Who suffers, the Tourists, Hawaii residents, and Hawaii’s Public School System is the worst.
In my lifetime I have never seen members of the Democrat party act this trashy and void of class. This is shameful, and we need to bring back some integrity and diginty to our goverment. What is going on? Whatever it is, let's work it out for the sake of our country.
In my lifetime I have never seen members of the Democrat party act this trashy and void of class. This is shameful, and we need to bring back some integrity and diginty to our goverment. What is going on? Whatever it is, let's work it out for the sake of our country.
Pelosi and shummer are as big a threat as illegals crossing our boarders because they are domestic threats they need to be behind walls and bars. Drain the swamp
Now Hawaii can make money off of Hawaiian grown marijuana and maybe we can open some new prisons.  Democrats have not given us, United States Citizens, Financial Security, so they are now offering Socialism.  I’m not following their parade
You deranged mofo  Its no reason to shutdown the government
We want border security and our tax dollars to stop paying for all these illegals who come here plop their babies out and expect us to pay for them, they were born while their parents committed a crime, they should be considered illegal as well. We are the ones forced to feed, educate and give til our own go without.
This country is going to hell in a hand basket. People claim they don't see color, we're all one race or that "all lives matter" those are the same people that are all in for this wall. Do you know the type of stuff people have to do to smuggle drugs in this country? Every race steals, kills, and lies. Do I hate Trump? No, but I don't care for his vulgarity either. It's not his fault that people are falling for the okeydoke though. People should have a mind of their own. I'm neither Democrat or Republican, I'm a human being that has empathy and compassion for those who are suffering. A Mexican man (who was legal born and bred) told me the conditions living in Mexico, and they're barbaric. Of course people want to come to America, the supposed land of the free and home of the brave, the same way people wanted to escape from England and ended up here. How do we know that the Native Americans didn't have a law about illegals entering in their country?
Campaign promise is circumstantial to factual problem: Social and Financial due to illegal immigration and illegal harboring of illegal aliens.
Build the wall!!!!! We need to secure our border. #maga
we have to get rid of these democrats...and at this point I don't care how it's done....
Build the wall 👍🙏 keep pushing it. Or declare natural disaster and build anyway. Wonder how much cartel $ they getting to fight this 😉👍
Exactly! What Is important to the Dems?? Aside from stomping around over every little thing you say and do, the asshats look completely freaking bananas and might I add, far removed from the reality that is the American People.
LIAR. No, law enforcement did NOT request 5.6B for a wall. NO, Dems did not ask for a wall and then change their minds when Trump was elected. NO, drugs do NOT flood over the border with illegals, and no wall will change that.
They all need to visit the border and walk along it for awhile - see the places where there is not much to keep the dangerous ones from just walking into the USA.  I think they're all too chicken to walk along the border - it's a dangerous place!
You are an idiot! You said that the woman who said, "Impeach the Mother f'r" was sooo horrible. Seriously dude???? You also said that on national television. So dont go and diss someone for exactly what you did. It is hypocritical. You would think that a so called POTUS wouldnt say that on national television either !! Have some respect for yourself.
Donald Trump is creating a political problem to win up coming election....... he just manufacture his own problem with lies , hate and deceit turning a brother against brother nations against nations manipulation they ignorant for political and selfish gain.....
Hold the LINE SIR! These Evil bad actors THEY DO NOT CARE ABOUT ANYONES LIFE...Just look at what Pelosis district is criminal drug infested street scum ...she lines her Bank account with foreign aid funds ...AUDIT  Sure Schumers is a well..SOROS PENGUIN PUPPET!
Mr President, I think you know the answer. Forgive those that are too stupid to recognize taking responsibility. They dont take responsibility, they toss it on others and try to shame them for it. THe American people are on your side!
Keep your promise and have Mexico pay for the wall you goddamned liar.
Keep your promise and have Mexico pay for the wall you goddamned liar.
The last 3 presidents started wars in other countries that created no benefit to the American people, and we paid for them.  Trump wants to actually do something for our country that would benefit the America people and half the country hates him for it. What a time to be alive in politics.
I bet a ton of money with my bookie that trump will lie 53 times in 8minutes. I need the money since the government is shut down. Come on trump don’t let me down you lying bag of 💩🤞
Obstructionist PIGS, give the American people what they want . . . BUILD THE WALL!
Democrats stop being difficult...you are all a bunch of traders to America and Federal Government.  Shame on you.  I believe we the people are going need the vote to shut you down.  If you Democrat’s continue to leave our borders unlawfully open....all the terrible tragedies will hit in your families.  Don’t you love your own families?  Stop being stubborn like children.  Help your loved ones and America.  You Democrats are hiding information you don’t want leaked out to America or your families.
No fascist USA, no police state, no hate. You sir embody everything that is wrong with this country. You are a con, a fake. You care only about yourself, you are constantly backpedaling. You are a disgrace to this country and the people. Abraham Lincoln, Teddy Roosevelt, F.D.R, Kennedy, those were great presidents that helped this country. That care about enough. You sir, are the biggest charlatan, ever.
No fascist USA, no police state, no hate. You sir embody everything that is wrong with this country. You are a con, a fake. You care only about yourself, you are constantly backpedaling. You are a disgrace to this country and the people. Abraham Lincoln, Teddy Roosevelt, F.D.R, Kennedy, those were great presidents that helped this country. That care about enough. You sir, are the biggest charlatan, ever.
We want the wall  Build the wall. Then tear down pelosi's wall around her house
We want the wall  Build the wall. Then tear down pelosi's wall around her house
This American looks forward to the day that justice prevails and your orange ass is in an orange jumpsuit.
All the foolishness about a crisis that does not exist is to divert about the indictments that will include Chump and Chump Jr. Little Donny half scoop met with Russian agents during campaign. Collusion and obstruction is a real thing. You idiots can believe all the lies if you want. Chump knows his goose is cooked. REAL Americans will take back our country. All you traitors can stick with Chump .
Arizona native here, and I am SICK of watching our communities turn into Mexico.  CLOSE THE BORDER! BUILD THE FUCKIN WALL!!!!
Build the wall. Keep pushing forward. USA!!
Do not believe one word of what N. P. and C. S. say.  . If you open the government, They will tell you to take a flying leap.    Stick to your guns.  Why don’t they acknowledge that you are asking for 5.7 billion to build a Wall but it is costing 150 billion a year to support the illegals.   Even without counting the crime, drugs, diseases, terrorist, etc, that is coming across our southern border.    It’s a “No Brainer”  for a reasonable thinking person. Why are they putting illegals needs over American citizens needs..  They took an Oath to uphold the Constitution of The United States of Americat but they seem to be violating that sacred Oath By not protecting and taking care of American citizens over illegals.
Build it over Congress approval, nothing will turn people against you more than if they cannot pay their bills , put food on their table , pay their rent... no matter how loyal they are ..because it is human nature and survival THEY'LL turn on you.... it's not that they will just blame the Democrats they will start to blame you.
Buddie americans dont want a stupid wall, they want livable wages, free health care, affordable education, etc . Thats what Americans want.
Your a damned lier! Take responsibility for your actions
Many from the GOP as well, you troglodyte.
You could have the cure for cancer or the solution to world peace and the Democrats will still try and stop you !
Build the Wall! Declare National Emergency!
Build it and move the liberals to Mexico
You are scum A small hand small dick Scum slum lord
Dear Mr president. If you Arrest and imprison Americans who knowingly hire Illegals you wont have a border problem. You cant put a wall around an open honey pot and expect to keep the ants out. Likewise make Drugs legal and treat Addicts. (no money = no smuggle) End welfare for Illegals and arrest Commie state politicians who hand our tax money to Illegals. So tell me what is wrong with my plan?.
Dear Mr president. If you Arrest and imprison Americans who knowingly hire Illegals you wont have a border problem. You cant put a wall around an open honey pot and expect to keep the ants out. Likewise make Drugs legal and treat Addicts. (no money = no smuggle) End welfare for Illegals and arrest Commie state politicians who hand our tax money to Illegals. So tell me what is wrong with my plan?.
You don't even realize it dummies bc your heads are so far up Trump's ass , but he's going to put this country in a recession. #TheGreatDepression2019.  #FuckTrump. #DontArgueWithMe
Uh Mexico said they would not pay for the wall you dumb sack of crap.
Uh Mexico said they would not pay for the wall you dumb sack of crap.
Instead of shutting down government benefits, let's shut down illegal alien benefits!
Has anyone thought of cutting the incentives for them to come here illegally? Asking for a friend.
JIM.  THE PRESIDENT HAS THE AUTHORITY TO PROTECT AMERICA AND CAN BUILD A WALL SON. GET COMFY ;)
38 is not even near enough to half the voting public you idiot !  To claim America anything you must have at least 50 percent of the voting public supporting you and you do not !  Your a lair !  4,000 terrorist turns into 12 suspected and only 6 at the southern border , the drugs come in cars and thru the 60 tunnels we have found , your wall is stupidity and nothing more !  That's why 62 percent of us know it and are opposing you !  And over 50 percent are calling for your impeachment so yes America wants you gone , not a wall , four walls around you called a jail cell !
Disgraceful that Democrats have no compassion for the killings of innocent Americans by Illegals. reaction
I thought Mexico  was paying for the wall,  so when are you going to clean up the large inner cities,  rapes, murders, drugs, suicides, Americans Terrorists, Catholics children being molested,  and this is coming from Americans.....
Build the WALL! We the people want it now!
https://www.forbes.com/sites/stuartanderson/2018/06/25/there-is-no-crisis-at-the-border-and-dhs-stats-prove-it/?fbclid=IwAR328oMyTHSr48CMGSpyHe76PTY0lPWU16AzuxBER1JpsYrlq54hWMas_Bg#4d20e31112aa  Sure, we want border security.. what we don't want (+60% of the country) is to piss away billions of OUR tax dollars on your INCOMPLETE FENCE because of this imaginary crisis you invented.
Stopping you from perpetrating fraud with your bogus wall which you support with untruthful claims and statistics. You are a pathological liar.
Lost my daughter Thursday night from drugs. Build the wall to keep out Illegals, drugs and human trafficking.
Build the walll...dont cave to lunatics
I think every city should have check points for illegal immigrants along with the wall ...If democrats want to hinder the wall being built then start by showing the American people just how many illegal immigrants are already here
You are destroying America Trump
Do you people who are egging him on to build the wall, understand what you will lose if that money is directed there? You're all ignorant dimwits! Please understand the consequences of putting up 5 Billion Dollars for this ridiculous wall. Who do you think he's going to get to build it? Will he create a business of his own? So HE can profit. Or will he give it to one of his mates who will pay Trump a percentage, personally, just to gain the job? There's way more to this than what Trump is saying Factual Stats show immigration at the southern border is at its lowest. How can you just accept everything he says? He is a lying, criminal conman!
Democrats don’t want a wall because they love border crashers more than they love AMERICANS.  Democrats are evil. Protect illegal children while approve murdering legal American babies. 100% evil.
They are brainwashed by evilness Freeze freebies to ilegals. They will plea Pelosi n schummer for wall.
Democrats are biggest idiotic threat to America
The only thing on the minds of the democrats is to get rid of the President and they will do anything and will not stop because they are afraid of him
Protect the nation —- build the wall and do all other measures to protect our country.  Spend our tax money on USA CITIZENS.
Yes Mr President our country need our walls to prevent tragedies to our children and women and against every America citizens. This has started by obama changing our immigration laws to allow immigrants to enter our country illegally and able to stay and get free everything. And over congress which didn’t stop him. Just like everything he has done for them and not for the citizens. And because they themselves said they was for security and protection at our border and have a wall to keep out immigrate but to deport those here as well. So have they. Not as much as they should have. Plus it is what democrats want to do for our border but refuse to just because of who is our President.
We stand with you POTUS!!! Build the wall and expose these liars and evil deep state to the world!!  Lets do it!!
Getting your batshit crazy ass out of the White House. Criminal incompetent fool.
There is one way and one way only to get them back for all the hell they put this President through..
They know when you cut their voters from running the border......they are finished. You are just one step away from making the Communist Democrat party a prehistoric fossil. They will dry up like water on a hot 120 degree day when the flow stops. They know it!!
Stopping you from lying to the American public Stupid!!!  https://youtu.be/-yfIxBjOw3o
Gambling sites are taking odds as to how many times this fucker is going to lie to the American people tonight.. I say every other word will be LIES since he's a PATHOLOGICAL LIAR
Lets build that mother fucker.... Ill lay the first fucking brick
It funny how Shumer calls it a tantrum .. It takes two and I feel like Shumer and pelosi are acting like bullies and babies. They act like Trump alone can stop the shutdown..What's wrong with them giving the money and putting people back to work.. They act like Americans are stupid... Pay for the wall and get people back to work OR you going to act like babies and act like it's only up to Trump.. When the truth is You two could stop the shutdown and put people back to work today.. Voters need to remember this and Vote you out of office
America wants border security. AFTER YOU LEAVE YOU IDIOT !!
Shut the hell up, what about the KKK or the people right here in America, you are a disgrace using the wrong people for this wall!!!!!
The dumocrats are like selfish children, no I take tat back,  it's worse. They're committing treason against the U.S.
Getting your ass handed to you by Pelosi and Schumer!
Getting your ass handed to you by Pelosi and Schumer!
Build that wall and build it the way you want it . Screw them Dems and Libs .
Build it and they won't come....Build that wall build it tall.
Americans have been BEGGING to seal that border since at least 1986 and both parties have FAILED.  Why do we even pay these people?? They completely destroy everything they get their filthy hands on and then try and.convince us they're doing us a big favor.  And democrats are the worst of them two evils by far. Their insane "sanctuary" policies are KILLING Americans and bleeding us dry financially.  Build the freaking wall and seal the border already.  Chuck and Nancy need to get the hell out of the way and let Americans get to work and get it done..
Build the wall and use the stroke of ink pen. It would of been nice if the Democrats would work together. They refuse to help
First evidence shows that the caravan moving north was initiated by social media spread by republicans to give Trump another reason for fear mongering before the midterm elections.
Build the wall and secure our borders 😊👍🏻
Build the wall, NO amnesty, STOP allowing them to enter,why do we need to provide 52K beds and medical treatment, these foreign invaders are bankrupting America. STOP ALL welfare to illegal aliens and refugees and make it retroactive, get them out.
We have literally been promised a border wall by spineless politicians for the last 30 years, and we're tired of being lied to by the government we fund. Get it done once and for all.
This fight with con man Don isn't about border security. It's about the symbolism of a wall as a metaphor for demonizing nonwhite immigrants and immigrants from [expletive] countries. It's about the final statement in the narrative to protect America from changing demographics.  "Make America Great Again" was never about great. It was about white.  No imminent threat from undocumented immigrants exists. Illegal immigration has been falling for the last two decades, and it was at its lowest in 2017. Half of illegal immigrants don't cross illegally but rather overstay a visa that was secured legally. Those who say illegal immigrants pose a threat to police and American citizens — just another exaggeration. Studies have shown that undocumented immigrants commit crimes at a rate that is 85 percent less than native-born individuals.  #TRUMPSHUTDOWN!!!
Dow is where it was one year ago, deficit is approaching ONE TRILLION DOLLARS, National debt is 22 TRILLION, Ford is laying off 20.000 workers, gas is up to 3 Dollars and interest rates go up rapidly. Lower and middle class people don´t have one penny more in their pocket, but rich people got tax cuts !!! Great work of the orange CLOWN !!
Dont back up an dont back down..full steam ahead Trump .if they stay in your way become a John deere mower an mow them duckers down..
Yes, he needs our prayer. Prayer works and God will make a show of all this evilness. We are in the fiery furnace and God sent Donald Trump to protect us. Thank You, Lord, for giving us a President who truly cares about our nation and its people. Protect him and may everything he puts his hand to prosper. Even now, the Democrats stand fast in their wickedness. All liars go to Hell. They need to rethink what they are doing. When this is all said and done, God will triumph and we are his people so we will share in the glory. In the mighty Name of Jesus Christ, I submit this evil unto thee, my God. May Your glory and honor shine so bright. The blind cannot see and evil has only evil to protect it.
B R E A K I N G  N  E W S :::: Trump has two parts of brain, "left" and "right". In the left side, there´s nothing right. In the right side, there´s nothing left !  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)  :)
Democrats want to take you down at all cost. They are Pure EVIL !  Take your billions and buy a huge Island and take all us Republicans there to live ;)  Donald J. Trump
hey ted cruz is offering a solution. please look at it. build the wall using other money and F the democrats. they are showing the rest of the country how useless they really are!
It's truly sad that the democrats hate Trump so much that they risk all of our American citizens safety. To hate one person so much and put so many in danger while they live behind their gated walls! And to top it off to want open borders for illegals to come into our country and get benefits that American citizens can't even get! Power hungry democrats want that almighty vote and the only way to get it is to keep the border open and have illegals vote for them!
Impeaching and locking you up, motherfucker!!
It would appear, don, that only half of America is behind you The other half seem to think you're a moron
This foreign Institution has been doing Financial business with Donald Trump and the Russians. This is the tie. This is the proof. This is the Big Kahuna. But you guys just keep on getting distracted by the stupid wall but make no mistake, he knows all about this and he has been fighting this tooth and nail since September. He called in all 10 DC circuit judges to weigh in on this and one of them recuse themselves. And guess which one it was yep one of his former nominees and former legal advisor. This is the money Trail and the money Trail never fucking lies. This is huge. Huge.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
They want to destroy America! and you got in there way. BUILD THAT WALL🇺🇸 TRUMP 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Demonrats are straight from hell 👺👹 ... stand your ground against pure evil!!!
Your promise was: Mexico is going to pay for a Wall! The problem is 🤔 From the beginning your reasons for a wall were as useless as you have been👎👎👎👎No Wall! Dump trump!
They deport illegal criminals and they keep coming back.   You can sure tell who's side the  democrats are on.      Wake up America!
You should throw these traitorous Democrats in jail!
Democrats are damn fools and are the enemy of the USA!!!!
Tyrone Brummeyer to long.
There is no need for a multi billion dollar border wall. There is no need to force the separation of all families at the border.  There is no need to deny unfortunate refugees the opportunity to apply for asylum.  Illegal border crossings are at a 46 year low.  The situation at our southern border is not as dire as Trump's hysterical tweets suggest. Illegal immigration is not an existential crisis. We are in no danger of losing our country.   The Trump Administration has intentionally adopted a policy of cruelty towards immigrants, and they rationalize their policies by relying on unsubstantiated claims that they pose a threat.  Day after day Trump and his allies resort to fearmongering, scapegoating, and demonizing.  Folks at the southern border have been maligned as rapists, murderers, drug dealers, gang members, and criminals who have been infiltrated by terrorists, and are threatening to spread infectious diseases, while they steal jobs from hard working Americans and simultaneously sponge off the social welfare system because they are so lazy.    Scant evidence has been offered to back these claims up, but when your goal is simply to dehumanize people you can't let hard data get in the way.     Early estimates had put the cost of Trump's wet dream border wall at $25 billion, and that's before any unforeseen cost overruns.    The whole thing strikes me as a terrible waste of resources that is sure to excite reactionaries, but does nothing to solve the underlying issues that compel people to immigrate to the US via any available means.    If the US spends billions on a wall, what have we got when it's done?  Just a wall.  That's it.    It won't improve conditions in the regions in the world where people are suffering.  It won't stop the people living in those regions from attempting to enter the US.  It won't reverse the demographic changes underway in America that have so many entitled Caucasians decrying how minorities are destroying the fabric of society.  Why should we persecute people for losing the birthplace lottery?   Why should anything as universal as wanting better opportunities for yourself and your family be considered criminal?  Instead of building walls to divide us, I would prefer inviting those less fortunate to share in the promise America can offer.
Border security is of the utmost importance to our nation. What many people don't understand is that legal immigration is one thing ,but illegal immigration is quite another. We need security on our southern border ,and we need it now! Our President, is trying to protect and defend our country from foreign invaders and should be applauded not admonished for it.
Children are our future. And children go to school and are being educated by teachers. How can a country progress, when teachers need second and third jobs to make their living ??? The average teacher in the US earns not even half of that a teacher earns in Europe !! Trump gives a shitt about education, because the dumber the people, the more voters he gets. Think about it...while the rich earn more and more and more............
Children are our future. And children go to school and are being educated by teachers. How can a country progress, when teachers need second and third jobs to make their living ??? The average teacher in the US earns not even half of that a teacher earns in Europe !! Trump gives a shitt about education, because the dumber the people, the more voters he gets. Think about it...while the rich earn more and more and more............
15 of the 19 terrorist responsible for 9/11 were SAUDIS !!! Just a theorie......Saudis planned the destruction of the twin towers, so the US had a reason to ask them for help to fight against Taliban and Al Queda....for that they needed a lot of weapons from the US. Good deal for both ....thinking ...
Build the wall!! Then Lock her up or vice versa
These are not just Demirats your dealing with. They are Anti-American monsters that are dead set on destroying America! Let's END THEM!
Unless YOU'RE DUMB, DEAF AND BLIND, WE ALL know damn well the last TWO YEARS REPUBLICANS and Trump held ALL the power! WHY didn't they get this done? BECAUSE YOU CAN'T FUND A DAMN SLOGAN! The Republicans knew it, Trump knew it, and even his campaign knew it was just a slogan "to keep the attention of The Stupid Party". Donald Trumps OWN WORDS! What an abuse of power and a waste of money to all the networks. But hey...it's not Trumps $ so who gives a damn...right?
Yes...Let me be clear...I'm all for securing our border...Technology can do it cheaper, more efficiently and with less environmental impact. Spend my tax dollars on technology! NOT on a STUPID WALL!  https://www.realcleardefense.com/articles/2018/03/19/high_tech_surveillance_critical_for_effective_border_control_113214.html
IMPEACHING THAT MOTHERFUCKER!!! #NOWALL #IMPEACH #TreasonBellsRinging
Ezekiel 22:30   New Living Translation "I looked for someone who might rebuild the wall of righteousness that guards the land. I searched for someone to stand in the gap in the wall so I wouldn't have to destroy the land, but I found no one
Ezekiel 22:30   New Living Translation "I looked for someone who might rebuild the wall of righteousness that guards the land. I searched for someone to stand in the gap in the wall so I wouldn't have to destroy the land, but I found no one
It is as simple as this if we only enhance border security by putting additional troops at the border our troops will get criticism for shooting the drug dealers that are coming across illegally. What other option would they have since they are not coming in one by one but in droves. A wall will keep them out and ultimately safer than enhanced border security.Mexico has already offered them asylum and many took it but many did not. They have killed many of our border agents by throwing rocks and our president has issued the okay for our agents to defend themselves so be careful what you wish for. This is an invasion orchestrated by our very own Democrats in our govt. Our president is not going to blink, the stakes are too high.
Lier lier pants on fire!!! Americans with common sense do not want to blow 5plus billion on a wall. Trump is looking to line his pockets and the pockets of his pals. That’s the only reason why he wants a wall. You said Mexico was going to pay for the wall. Make them pay for the wall like you promised and open our government back up. America is not one if your crappy or failed hotels.
How long Is a stupid political class going to allow illegals to come in and drain our treasury and kill our people?????  This is being done to America on purpose folks!!!!!  BY THE STUPID RATS!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP I WILL NOT STAND FOR IT ANY LONGER! Mr.President Trump call "State Of Emergency" and "Build That Wall" now and lock all of these commies up.
BUILD THE WALL ,tell the democrats to go to hell
Stupid dems living behind walls daily.... lol
Yes but not a fucking wall that Americans are being told they have to pay for! What happened to the Mexicans who you said were going to pay for it? Friggn loser!
THIS AMERICAN wants the damn government back to work, and then you idiots can play your damn games. You're putting the whole country at risk with the TRUMPSHUTDOWN!  Meanwhile more terrorists have come in from Canada, but I don't hear you talking about building a NORTHERN WALL!!
BUILD THAT WALL no matter how you get it. Tax the hell out of all those places they send money to mexico and it will be paid for. also NO NEW illegals on welfare/food stamps or free healthcare.that alone will save money on the wall.
FB is censoring this:  Build the wall.  If it can stop 1 rape tree, stop 1 child from getting raped or trafficked, stop 1 murder, stop 1 terrorist from entering and spreading extremism like a disease, or stop 1 load of heroin from entering our county and destroying 1 life, etc. It's worth the price of the wall.  YOU CAN'T PUT PRICE TAGS ON PEOPLES LIVES CITIZEN OR NOT!
Donald Trump is the most inept, corrupt and unscrupulous embarrassment the US has seen.  History will judge him as a traitor.
Look, you lying narcissistic moron. Enough of your lies, Mr Dennison. Tread Carefully tonight.
We need the wall and we need politicians who do not support their OWN COUNTRIES CITIZENS but instead support illegal immigrants and foreign countries  before America to be relieved of their jobs!!
If it were just hard working people who want to be American citizens coming across that would be great. We don't let everyone come in our country by plane so why let drugs and gangs walk across the border. Build the wall to save our children from drugs!!!
If it were just hard working people who want to be American citizens coming across that would be great. We don't let everyone come in our country by plane so why let drugs and gangs walk across the border. Build the wall to save our children from drugs!!!
Build the damn wall!  I am sick and tired of my taxes supporting other countries and illegals .
Maybe all this wall obsessing makes Trump tired. He certainly seemed low-energy during his Oval Office address. “He makes Jeb Bush look like a combination of Mighty Mouse and Bruce Springsteen,” a friend of mine said after the president finished his nine-minute speech to the American people.  For every viewer whose response to the talk was “Wow, we should do something about immigration!” there must have been a hundred whose first reaction was “Why does this man keep sniffing?” Deviated septum? Nasal polyps? Trump’s breathing has actually sounded strange for a long time, but most of us have chosen to ignore it rather than engage in a national conversation about the president’s nose.  If you watched the address — and really, you could have, it was only about as long as it takes to microwave popcorn — you saw a 72-year-old guy squinting at the teleprompter and making rather alarming breathing sounds while reading a speech about how we need a wall to protect women who are “sexually assaulted on the dangerous trek up through Mexico.”  This is not a man who should wrap his arguments around the idea of protecting women from sexual assault. But also, gee, he sounded like Uncle Fred who you haven’t seen for a while and suddenly he shows up for Thanksgiving with weird colored hair and vacant eyes and he’s talking into his mashed potatoes. Gail Collins, NYT 🤣😂
You scared of innocent women and children coming to get you, Spanky? Lying, coward, fear-mongering motherfucker! No wall for you, Donny boy.
Oh stop... Dez Ippolito!!..white men r very few..but they DON'T get by with NOTHING..illegals have been proven to break OUR laws... hurt ..rape..kill..that's how u show..u want in our country??....Hopefully UR legal..if not go home..stop trying to make trouble here in America blaming white men..if u do a per centage..in prisons b4 opening ur discrimination mouth...it's Mexicans and blacks..so u stop ur discrimination against whites just to get ur way!!.this is OUR.. AMERICA.. We don't want invasions..stay in ur own country ..fight to keep ur country safe.. as we do in USA..💕🇺🇸.
Via technology ... not a medieval wall ... your promise was Mexico would pay for it, ya dumb fu@k.
Great address to the nation, President. Trump, regarding the national security crisis we are facing at our southern border and the ABSOLUTE need for an up-to-date barrier for the SAFETY and SECURITY of the AMERICAN PEOPLE!🇺🇸  Chuck and Nancy (Dumb and Dumber) looked like a couple of IDIOTS trying desperately to explain why the American people don't need the best safety and security possible at our southern border!!!!
TRUMP you had two years of complete control and your GOP didn't get it done on the wall. Its your shutdown your fault get Mexico to pay for the stupid wall.
Sorry Mr President, but that is a stupid question!  Stopping you is much more important to democrats. They don’t care about the people who will die, every day, at the hands of illegal aliens, or the drugs and disease they bring with them. They have completely abandoned the protection of American citizens and their rights. It’s called TDS!
I want border security but a stupid wall is a really dumb waste of money.
Build the Wall  No Amnesty  Don't let the swamp tangle you up in court on the state of emergency.
Melody Nehls  Really, cultist, because I don’t lie repeatedly to the American people.  Hey Melody, don’t get your pussy-grabbin’ panties in a bunch, all I am doing is just sharing FOX NEWS, your news gods, and how they fact checked the Liar in Chief.  Ask me no questions, I’ll tell you no lies! 😉
You are full of Bullsh*t, you Orange Mobster: https://www.facebook.com/1632011487/posts/10215718598271259/
His followers are as delusional as he is. This idiot could shoot their mother and they would still think he's God.
A wall doesn’t secure our border!!!  It steals land via eminent domain from Americans. It kills animals. And it won’t stop people or drugs!!
Trump.....................hunanitys.   Hope.  Against.  devil
Protect our country Mr. President!! Stop the *rats from trying to ruin our county. Can't spell *democrats without rats. Please secure the country and continue strengthening job numbers and the enconmy. Don't listen to all the bots they have manifested on Twitter and the hatters that would reject the cure for cancer if it came from you!
They are not interested in one thing or the other, they are concerned about their own skin. In other words, they will try to get you in the pan in every possible way. Even with the worst tricks and feints. Be assured. The snot lives and keeps trying to kill you. Flatten them before they do.
so many brain washed trump spporters who    believe his lies instead of facts just dont the kool-aid
how the hell did they  come in   for 9 11 it wasnt crossing the borders cubans came in by boats they come in by tunnels semis crossing canada borders  get the fricken truth meth is made in usa murders and rapist are here and the biggest con are the presdient his family and goons he is a  fricken traitor to our country
Diane Glauber Gee, that hurt...what ever point you were trying to make.  You haven’t the faintest idea what I do. Btw, don’t care.
Kim Miller great talk! You really made a “point” there.
Walt Stapf bitch.
Walt Stapf you’re off base. Again.
Sure are a bunch of whiny bitches here. Guess what, the democrats wanted border security too...until Trump wanted it. You democrats are a special kind of stupid.
The two obstructionists Pelosi and Schumer represent the two largest Sanctuary States in the Country. Where do you think illegals flock to the minute they sneak in? How the hell can anybody in their right mind vote for these two criminals. Elections are definitely corrupt and fixed. Especially in those two States.
All I can say is I hope there is no Thunderstorm and Lightening tonight while Trump is standing there telling all those lies...he will get struck down and burned to a Crisp!! Lies will always come back to haunt you!
Unless Mexico is paying for the wall you're  not fulfilling anything so stop patting yourself on the back.  You are a big fat liar.
i want border security  b  cus of isis  taking advantage of the fact the border is wide open  and the politicians are STUPID
Just build it.  Democrats have been getting away with literal murder to just flat out ignoring laws such as who can and can't vote, gun rights, free speech, and everything else.  Just make everything an executive order.  Fucken fire everybody.  Completely restore the 1st and 2nd amendment.  If there are riots, shoot them they're fucken traitors anyway.
Just build it.  Democrats have been getting away with literal murder to just flat out ignoring laws such as who can and can't vote, gun rights, free speech, and everything else.  Just make everything an executive order.  Fucken fire everybody.  Completely restore the 1st and 2nd amendment.  If there are riots, shoot them they're fucken traitors anyway.
They know Mr President. They know we want border security. A wall, technology, more boots on the ground.... all of it! We know that they don’t care what the American people want. It isn’t about us at all. It’s about them. Their special interests, their foreign aid, their gun confiscation, their tax hikes... the lists goes on and on. Don’t budge Mr President. We all know who owns this shut down. Let them shoot themselves in the foot. They’re comical.
It's all about "your Promise"  We know You demented Adderall snorting lunatic.
Keep it shut down-citizens ahead of ILLEGAL immigrants.
Being responsible stewards of the budget, you fucking moron.
Here’s the thing say he does declare a national emergency and uses the money set back people will still bitch. They’ll say it’s not an emergency. Say it gets the government open again. People will still bitch. The money is there to be used. This is a win-win. We get the wall and dems dont have to contribute. But I garauntee they’ll try to stop him from using the money and people will still side with them.
Pelosi had spoken for 8 hours about Daca. If these people are so important to her she should be willing to make a deal for them-right thing to do. Now is the time. Everyone knows our immigration system needs to be fixed so we don't have more Daca people. A wall will help secure border, reducing drugs and gangs flowing into this country. Liberals helped organize this caravan, now claim it's not so bad?  We don't want to care for anymore illegals when we have too many citizens that need help.
When Trump says the southern border situation is a national emergency, what he really has in mind is a Trump emergency. He's the boy who cried wolf. He would send our war fighters to the border to start building a wall so Ann Coulter will be nice to him again.  "The basic factory setting on the perception of Trump is: gigantic douchebag. This is a man who manufactured fake Time magazine covers featuring himself with the headline, "Donald Trump: The 'Apprentice' is a television smash!" so that he could put framed copies of it on the walls of his clubs.  His business is convincing people with lowbrow taste to give him their money." http://www.anncoulter.com/columns/2018-12-19.html
Your promise was for Mexico to pay for it.  I think that's what the big stink is about.
There is no border emergency you liar.
There is no border emergency you liar.
You are trying to keep criminals out and the geat unwashed lefties bitch, piss and moan. Turkey kept people fleeing a WAR out with a wall funded by the E.U and no  one bats an eye. Go figure. 100% behind you Sir.
The Democrats are nothing more than evil obstructionists and America haters!  The wall is absolutely necessary and not an option!  Build the Wall!
The Democrats and the vast MAJORITY of Americans want Border Security...more Border Patrol Agents and Drones...but NO USELESS WALL!
The Democrats and the vast MAJORITY of Americans want Border Security...more Border Patrol Agents and Drones...but NO USELESS WALL!
Democracy should be for all not just a Chosen Few
Dems don't care.  Hate the President more than they love America. Political lying thieves.
AMERICANS WANT A WALL. DEMOCRATS STINK. AND STUBBORN .
Build the wall, no matter what it takes.
Neither democrats just hate Americans and like killing and destroying American families!
Build the wall. 159 immigrants rescued from a drug cartel. A wall willl hopefully prevent this.
Unique among presidents, Trump has divided loyalties. He has entangled his business interests with his official duties, creating the impression, if not the reality, that his own financial interest — not his duty as president — guides his thoughts and actions.  The Founding Fathers, savvy students of history and human nature, were highly attuned to the risks of public corruption — actual or perceived — and inserted language into the Articles of Confederation and later into the Constitution to guard against such human frailties. They wanted to make sure that anyone who held a public office would serve only one master: the American people.  A farewell to kings For the Founders, public corruption wasn’t just a theoretical danger. They viewed it as the primary threat to their independence. Living in a small, fledgling country, the Americans feared that the European powers would seize control of the American democracy by flattering and bribing our officials.  The kings and princes of Europe were masters of the art. The British king had corrupted Parliament by providing titles and sinecures, a major contributor to the split between the colonies and Britain. The true history of the 1670 Treaty of Dover had just been published, which revealed that King Louis XIV of France had bribed Charles II of England with a secret pension, a beautiful and beloved French mistress, and a promise of protection. In exchange, Charles had agreed to convert to Catholicism and to join Louis in his costly and fruitless war against the Dutch, his former ally.             https://www.marketwatch.com/story/the-founding-fathers-would-have-impeached-trump-in-a-new-york-minute-2018-08-10
Just saw the President’s address and the Demon-rats response.  I stand by Trump 100%.  I would like to know was there a puppeteer with his hand stuck up Pelosi’s butt to make her look animated?  Where her eyes scotch-taped open?  Are all Democrats morons? Remember it wasn’t so long ago that they wanted the wall and all of a sudden it’s “immoral?” No one talks about all the  huge corporations who want illegals in this country because they are cheap labor.  Did anyone notice that Pelosi and Schumer never mentioned anything about the American workers and backbone of this country being descimated. Nor did they talk about all the drugs, crime and killings by illegals or the overwhelming burden on our healthcare system Just to name a few issues.  I
Build the wall and electrify it.  If they took care of business in the 1980’s we wouldn’t have 20 million illegal alien moochers that pay no federal and state income taxes and their employers dodge some taxes too.
Even your own party does NOT WANT your stupid wall! This is why the Senate passed a CR last year with 100% voting yes! This is also why they never passed it the past two years when the gop corporation controlled all three branches of the government.  End your tantrum now.
They don’t care about Americans, they care about power! Y’all need to impeach the judge who gave the 21 day release judgement. Just saying that is just stupid!  Our courts are overrun and they just want to keep letting people in! This is not immigration it an invasion that has been ignored for to long! Thanks for my rant! 🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL!  WHATEVER IT TAKES AND DONT LET ANYONE EVER TAKE IT DOWN!
BUILD THE WALL!  WHATEVER IT TAKES AND DONT LET ANYONE EVER TAKE IT DOWN!
Demorats just cannot get over that Hillary lost, and will do anything to gain power and stop the president from protecting the US from invasion by illegals.  They even stooped so low as to send bombs to themselves to gain sympathy.
Anyone else find it concerning the President is pushing an opinion piece here?
Don’t forget a wall on Canada... proven place of entrance and then plop a roof on everything...
Democrat lawyers have been trying to trash the Constitution by misinterpreting the 14th Amendment to expand citizen rights to illegal aliens.  It a subversive lie.    Here’s what the Supreme Court actually said about ‘birthright’ citizenship by Daniel Horowitz • October 31, 2018     Rep. James F. Wilson, R-Iowa, the chairman of the House Judiciary Committee back in the 1860s who helped draft the 14th Amendment, spoke emphatically that it was “establishing no new right, declaring no new principle.” “It is not the object of this bill to establish new rights, but to protect and enforce those which belong to every citizen,” declared Wilson in 1866.  There’s no more authoritative exposition of the 14th Amendment than the first court case after its ratification, the 1872 Slaughterhouse cases. Justice Samuel Miller confirmed that “its main purpose was to establish the citizenship of the negro” and that “the phrase, ‘subject to its jurisdiction’ was intended to exclude from its operation children of ministers, consuls, and citizens or subjects of foreign States born within the United States” (emphasis added).  Writing for the court in Elk v. Wilkins (1884), Justice Horace Gray asserted that the phrase “subject to the jurisdiction” is “not merely subject in some respect or degree to the jurisdiction of the United States, but completely subject to their political jurisdiction and owing them direct and immediate allegiance” (emphasis added).  https://www.conservativereview.com/news/heres-what-the-supreme-court-actually-said-about-birthright-citizenship/
️  It is not Trump's Wall It is the People's Wall #FundTheWall #TRUMP2020 #America1ST 🎯💯🇺🇸️
Not only do we want border walls and security, it is a must. we should not have to build walls to keep Illegals and drugs but we do, it's a shame that they want to continue to break our laws, build that wall and keep them out, we stand with President Donald Trump 100%
You dont see Nancy and Chuck taking down the wall around their mansions and letting the illegals camp out with them. US needs a wall, for safety, Nancy and Chuck have one, why not the citizens of America. Nancy and Chuck keep their wall, ridiculous.
You dont see Nancy and Chuck taking down the wall around their mansions and letting the illegals camp out with them. US needs a wall, for safety, Nancy and Chuck have one, why not the citizens of America. Nancy and Chuck keep their wall, ridiculous.
Yes we do, then we can talk about giving residency to illegals.  Dems will throw all 20 million under the bus to stop trump
Yes we do, then we can talk about giving residency to illegals.  Dems will throw all 20 million under the bus to stop trump
Build the wall and the Democrats own the shutdown.  They won’t even talk! Have there grandkids go to the overcrowded schools from illegal aliens coming while we pay.😡
Build the wall and the Democrats own the shutdown.  They won’t even talk! Have there grandkids go to the overcrowded schools from illegal aliens coming while we pay.😡
I got the solution don’t build the wall and pass a law we’re every dems and liberals all has to adopt three that comes into the country  and be responsible for there medical care feeding them and housing .they want them in here so bad that is the least they could do .
I got the solution don’t build the wall and pass a law we’re every dems and liberals all has to adopt three that comes into the country  and be responsible for there medical care feeding them and housing .they want them in here so bad that is the least they could do .
Build the wall, secure our borders!
Build the wall, secure our borders!
I bet every Democrate locked the doors to there homes and vehicles.going to work,.but they wont lock our boarder allowing illegals to come steal our , everything. they all should be arrested for not protecting the people they represent.
I bet every Democrate locked the doors to there homes and vehicles.going to work,.but they wont lock our boarder allowing illegals to come steal our , everything. they all should be arrested for not protecting the people they represent.
This is all political and obstruction by the Democrats and we all know it. They will do anything to stop Trump and destroy our country. Just look at what they are celebrating in Congress now. Anti Semitic Muslims swearing in on Korans and defiling the halls of Congress.
Angel Huerta  how about you shut The F up
Angel Huerta  how about you shut The F up
How about you learn some English. 😏
The Democrats are  just like spoiled children they would rather see this country get over run with criminals drug dealers and terrorist then to help the American people .most are so jealous of trump beating Hillary they will do anything and everything to sabotage his presidency including ruining this country just so they can get what they want it' not about helping it's about control
The Democrats are  just like spoiled children they would rather see this country get over run with criminals drug dealers and terrorist then to help the American people .most are so jealous of trump beating Hillary they will do anything and everything to sabotage his presidency including ruining this country just so they can get what they want it' not about helping it's about control
Pull an Obama and get out your pen!
Trump, promise us , the TRUE American people, that you fight them fuckers til your last breath. TRUMP 2020 BABY !
Build the wall!  Protect our country!
Build the wall!  Protect our country!
The wall of won’t stop anything. The drugs will still come through, the people will still cross lol you’re a moron who doesn’t even realize that the illegals crossing has doubled but through Canada not Mexico lol why cross the river where u can buy a $300 dollar to Canada lol that wall is useless and pointless lol if you were gonna build a wall it would be trough Canada not Mexico
The wall of won’t stop anything. The drugs will still come through, the people will still cross lol you’re a moron who doesn’t even realize that the illegals crossing has doubled but through Canada not Mexico lol why cross the river where u can buy a $300 dollar to Canada lol that wall is useless and pointless lol if you were gonna build a wall it would be trough Canada not Mexico
Why not cut the illegal benefits off for three months and use that money to pay for the wall
Why not cut the illegal benefits off for three months and use that money to pay for the wall
Hell yeah we want border security.. illegals removed, and lower taxes.  More money in people's pockets and less worry of free loaders coming in illegally sucking us dry dollar by dollar.  Build it
Hell yeah we want border security.. illegals removed, and lower taxes.  More money in people's pockets and less worry of free loaders coming in illegally sucking us dry dollar by dollar.  Build it
This shouldn't even be questioned or debated. Our country should be secured and protected. Our homes and families should be safe from intrusions. But nooo, all the democrats want to do is whine like children. I'm just really fed-up and DONE with the idiots, who can only keep saying; Russia, Russia, Russia and call President Trump a liar, while in the same breath, they LIE about him... I'm really DONE with these people and their trolling theatrics! I don't care about the damn corrupt politics anymore... just BUILD THE DAMN WALL, Already! Screw these MORONS who are arguing about it and let them go cry-baby in a snowflake corner, somewhere.
This shouldn't even be questioned or debated. Our country should be secured and protected. Our homes and families should be safe from intrusions. But nooo, all the democrats want to do is whine like children. I'm just really fed-up and DONE with the idiots, who can only keep saying; Russia, Russia, Russia and call President Trump a liar, while in the same breath, they LIE about him... I'm really DONE with these people and their trolling theatrics! I don't care about the damn corrupt politics anymore... just BUILD THE DAMN WALL, Already! Screw these MORONS who are arguing about it and let them go cry-baby in a snowflake corner, somewhere.
very weak speech, the lines are pretty much drawn by now and minds are made up.the dems want crime and disorder in the country so they can save us.we keep electing those like cortez, romney, pelosi, warren and the muslim whore.good does not always win over evil.
very weak speech, the lines are pretty much drawn by now and minds are made up.the dems want crime and disorder in the country so they can save us.we keep electing those like cortez, romney, pelosi, warren and the muslim whore.good does not always win over evil.
The Democrats are garbage and need to be tossed in the fill
The Democrats are garbage and need to be tossed in the fill

Putting you in jail where traitors belong is what Democrats want to do. Democrats know you did not win the presidency, Putin stole it so that you could be his puppet ..you dumb moron!
Putting you in jail where traitors belong is what Democrats want to do. Democrats know you did not win the presidency, Putin stole it so that you could be his puppet ..you dumb moron!
They don’t want a secure border.Hurts their agenda.
They don’t want a secure border.Hurts their agenda.
Don’t cave. Hold your ground. Nancy and the democrats are totally exposed. We elected you for this. Make America awake again. Keep exposing the corruption. Build the wall, starve the cartels and end human/child trafficking for good. You are making America great again!!
Don’t cave. Hold your ground. Nancy and the democrats are totally exposed. We elected you for this. Make America awake again. Keep exposing the corruption. Build the wall, starve the cartels and end human/child trafficking for good. You are making America great again!!
Build The Wall for all our sake
Build The Wall for all our sake
We voted for you. Now my wife's not getting paid. Yet, Federal taxes are still coming out of my paycheck and the government is getting paid. You and Congress need to do your jobs. Government seems to forget who they work for. You all need to be fired.
We voted for you. Now my wife's not getting paid. Yet, Federal taxes are still coming out of my paycheck and the government is getting paid. You and Congress need to do your jobs. Government seems to forget who they work for. You all need to be fired.
Democrats don't give a rats ass what the american want. It's all about them and the New World Order.
Democrats don't give a rats ass what the american want. It's all about them and the New World Order.
ILLEGALS ARE COSTING US OVER 200 BILLION A YEAR. YOU ARE DAMN RIGHT WE WANT A WALL!
And all of you want the wall built- how? Taking away land from U.S. citizens that the wall would have to cross? Interfering with migrating animals? We have more problems with people coming in on airplanes than we do with southern border crossings.
And all of you want the wall built- how? Taking away land from U.S. citizens that the wall would have to cross? Interfering with migrating animals? We have more problems with people coming in on airplanes than we do with southern border crossings.
No, they don't want your wall, you stupid, disgusting, lying, POS moron!!  How many lies are you going to tell tonight?  Ya know, they're placing bets on it!! Did you know that?  And maybe you should read USA Today's 9 facts about the border before your delusional speech tonight!!
He’s on now. He’s fucking insane. Someone take care of this prick and remove him. Don’t listen to this asshole.HE IS A LIAR.
He’s on now. He’s fucking insane. Someone take care of this prick and remove him. Don’t listen to this asshole.HE IS A LIAR.
Melody Hutchison. Wont need to worry about your health problems if a illegal blows your ass up best be worried about that.
Melody Hutchison Really and what type of Pres do you think Obama was. Trump hasn't cut off benefits for those who need it. Medicare and Medicaid both received Raises and so did SS and SSI.
Why is it oue responsibility to pay you for your medical problems, cant work my back hurts,cant work hurt my neck, cant work my knees hurt, look people it is not the governments duty to provide medical and money to its citizens, it's your job as a citizen to get a job with insurance benefits
He's not ever going to change.  I'm not ever going to forgive his cowardice cutting off benefits for the people who really need it. I'm a 49 year old who has had back surgery and I'm going to have to have neck surgery soon. I can't ever hold a job cause I can't sit down or walk very much.  He's the worst president ever including all the republicans.
He's not ever going to change.  I'm not ever going to forgive his cowardice cutting off benefits for the people who really need it. I'm a 49 year old who has had back surgery and I'm going to have to have neck surgery soon. I can't ever hold a job cause I can't sit down or walk very much.  He's the worst president ever including all the republicans.
I have an idea. Let’s send Pelosi and Schumer to the southern border for even “1” visit, doubt they’ve even been there, and let them see first hand. They are so completely clueless!  Of course they still would not comprehend. Too f’Ing stupid!
I have an idea. Let’s send Pelosi and Schumer to the southern border for even “1” visit, doubt they’ve even been there, and let them see first hand. They are so completely clueless!  Of course they still would not comprehend. Too f’Ing stupid!
This Great President is the reason that we have a chance to take back our Country and save the world from the PLAGUE that is upon us!!#MAGA #WWG1WGA
This Great President is the reason that we have a chance to take back our Country and save the world from the PLAGUE that is upon us!!#MAGA #WWG1WGA
Build the wall I’m with you all the way
I am praying for you to win this one!!! We need to keep our country safe. Democrats can't get over the fact that you won the election!!! Democrats would destroy border safety to take you down! Sore losers!
I am praying for you to win this one!!! We need to keep our country safe. Democrats can't get over the fact that you won the election!!! Democrats would destroy border safety to take you down! Sore losers!
The real and only acceptable number for the amount of criminals / terrorist to cross the southern boarder and enter into our nation is "ZERO".   That right "0".   So whether it is 4000, 400, 40, 4 or 1 terrorist that illegally cross the southern boarder,  it is unacceptable.   If a southern boarder wall is required to get that number to "0" then so be it.  Hope you are not really mad at this sentence?   The many citizens who could possibly be hurt by this criminal(s) if permitted to freely cross the boarder will be extremely happy that they are safer!
The real and only acceptable number for the amount of criminals / terrorist to cross the southern boarder and enter into our nation is "ZERO".   That right "0".   So whether it is 4000, 400, 40, 4 or 1 terrorist that illegally cross the southern boarder,  it is unacceptable.   If a southern boarder wall is required to get that number to "0" then so be it.  Hope you are not really mad at this sentence?   The many citizens who could possibly be hurt by this criminal(s) if permitted to freely cross the boarder will be extremely happy that they are safer!
But but Mr. President the dems need all the illegals for Votes. If illegals Voted Republican u see how fast Nancy and Chucky boi would be down at the border laying the bricks down as we speak. #Buildthewall
Congress and the house should not be paid if they aren’t working for this country! Give them all a tool set and send them to build the wall no pay till they are done!
Congress and the house should not be paid if they aren’t working for this country! Give them all a tool set and send them to build the wall no pay till they are done!
Yes, we want border security, but I should not have to suffer!!  LET US GO BACK TO WORK!!
Yes, we want border security, but I should not have to suffer!!  LET US GO BACK TO WORK!!
Justin Dewey 74% of the voters want the wall.
Micheal Marceaux that's why I used the qualifier "most". I do realize there are some unfortunate souls out there in denial about the fact that the vast majority of undocumented immigrants entered the country legally, and then didn't leave when they were supposed to. I do realize there are some unfortunate folks so simple-minded they can't imagine ways to circumvent the 'security' of a wall. Don't worry Michael, I didn't forget about you, I said "most". ;-)
Who died and made you the expert? Just cause they spoon feeding you that bs .
All about the framing POTUS! Poll Americans and ask "Do you want a secure border?" Obviously the response will be overwhelmingly "Yes". Poll Americans and ask "Do you support the idea to build a border wall?" The response is going to be overwhelmingly "No", because most Americans know that's a stupid and inefficient strategy for securing our borders...
Anyone opposing a legal and controlled immigration is out for more voters. There is absolutely no other explanation! America is a country of immigrants? Yes. Either immigrants had to bring assets, have a job waiting, have a sponsor, or a needed profession. Other family members often came over years later, when dad had worked and built a nest for the family. On top there was no welfare system before 1935. I can only say San Antonio can not bear any more welfare recipients. Schools districts are going broke, crime is through the roof and homeless people everywhere. Take care of your own first, before saving the rest of the world!
Anyone opposing a legal and controlled immigration is out for more voters. There is absolutely no other explanation! America is a country of immigrants? Yes. Either immigrants had to bring assets, have a job waiting, have a sponsor, or a needed profession. Other family members often came over years later, when dad had worked and built a nest for the family. On top there was no welfare system before 1935. I can only say San Antonio can not bear any more welfare recipients. Schools districts are going broke, crime is through the roof and homeless people everywhere. Take care of your own first, before saving the rest of the world!
Slimiest president to this day A degenerate monster of a person I’d say human but he’s barely that
Slimiest president to this day A degenerate monster of a person I’d say human but he’s barely that
Build the wall.  Don’t give into Chuck U Schumer and Pelosi. If you open the government before you get funding for the wall, they’ll never do it.
Build the wall.  Don’t give into Chuck U Schumer and Pelosi. If you open the government before you get funding for the wall, they’ll never do it.
Build the Wall, I have a fence around my property to keep ppl out, lock my doors to keep ppl out. I cannot  comprehend the ignorance of ppl who think we should let ppl in our country illegally. If they want to come fine, but do it legally.
Build the Wall, I have a fence around my property to keep ppl out, lock my doors to keep ppl out. I cannot  comprehend the ignorance of ppl who think we should let ppl in our country illegally. If they want to come fine, but do it legally.
Build the wall and stop waiting on a lame congress.  This is national security!
Build the wall and stop waiting on a lame congress.  This is national security!
You are such an embarrassment and joke.  I’m sick of all your lies.  You’re the reason for all the poor government workers not being paid.  The USA will be so much better when you’re out of office.
You are such an embarrassment and joke.  I’m sick of all your lies.  You’re the reason for all the poor government workers not being paid.  The USA will be so much better when you’re out of office.
Denise Malloy Davis no, you need to move to Leningrad, comrade
Denise Malloy Davis no, you need to move to Leningrad, comrade
Nancy Edgeworth nah bitch I mean people like you and who you vote for.
You mean trumpturds I'm sure!
You mean trumpturds I'm sure!
Denise Malloy Davis trumpturd
Denise Malloy Davis your fake "patriotism" is sickening, asshole. Get back on your meds.
Kim Miller whatever you say libetard DEMONCrat.  Lol
Denise Malloy Davis omg...you’re still asleep.
Denise Malloy Davis omg...you’re still asleep.
Kim Miller omg..you're still asleep....
Denise Malloy Davis if you don’t see that fat orange con needs to hire his daughter in law to spew his bullshit, sorry for you.
Denise Malloy Davis if you don’t see that fat orange con needs to hire his daughter in law to spew his bullshit, sorry for you.
If people can't see by now that the news media are being TOLD what to say to the American public because they're run by the elites and the democrats don't have OUR best interests in mind I guess nothing will
Denise Malloy Davis so tough!  Oooooh!
Denise Malloy Davis so tough!  Oooooh!
DEMONcrats no longer have OUR interest...just their own and it's not good for our country...they ALL need to be removed from office at this point....
DEMONcrats no longer have OUR interest...just their own and it's not good for our country...they ALL need to be removed from office at this point....
Why don't you and other millionaires buy the wasteland properties along this border and do as you wish with your private property... A wall doesn't have to be on an exact line of property.  They built gas pipelines for miles and miles through citizens property.  You're telling me property can't be bought that runs close to the border in a zigzag line that has a private wall built on it's property???
Your an ignorant man, it doesn’t matter if you build a wall.  It will not stop American Born serial killers, drug dealers/users, rapist, murderers, bigots, child molesters, etc., etc., from being in this country.  As long as the demands stay in the USA the supply will keep coming
I'm really disappointed with our government in not wanting to protect our nation in choosing to not build the wall just because it is a "Trump thing" and they oppose all Trump decisions, good or not. Why would our government not want to make sure we are protected from foreign invaders, terrorist, drug cartels,  human traffickers, gun smuggling,  kidnapping, and from those who want to disobey the law? Why? Our government  needs to grow up and do what's right for America, instead of throwing tantrums because they didn't get their way in the elections. This is just my opinion. Others are free to feel differently, of course. ;) I am all for immigrants coming here for asylum, byw, but just doing it the legal and safe way. :) I agree with Pres. Trump, that we do need the wall.
I'm really disappointed with our government in not wanting to protect our nation in choosing to not build the wall just because it is a "Trump thing" and they oppose all Trump decisions, good or not. Why would our government not want to make sure we are protected from foreign invaders, terrorist, drug cartels,  human traffickers, gun smuggling,  kidnapping, and from those who want to disobey the law? Why? Our government  needs to grow up and do what's right for America, instead of throwing tantrums because they didn't get their way in the elections. This is just my opinion. Others are free to feel differently, of course. ;) I am all for immigrants coming here for asylum, byw, but just doing it the legal and safe way. :) I agree with Pres. Trump, that we do need the wall.
Maybe we can impeach all democrats and then maybe we might get something done besides all the bickering.
Maybe we can impeach all democrats and then maybe we might get something done besides all the bickering.
Build the wall!! Politics shouldn’t be the problem. America & its citizens are at risk!
Build the wall!! Politics shouldn’t be the problem. America & its citizens are at risk!
Obama will go down in history as “The Greatest President of all Time”.   Trump will go down in history as a clown. A failure. A traitor.   Great job dumbass.
Obviously it is to make you irrelevant,  but they are looking like ANTI-AMERICANS. They want Satan's one world government. We want God's word!
Obviously it is to make you irrelevant,  but they are looking like ANTI-AMERICANS. They want Satan's one world government. We want God's word!
Build wall stop giving illegals benefits and stop paying those help with shutdown and if they don't want wall let's them take care of illegals and take responsibility if an illegal breaks the law in any form
Build that wall. Stand your ground . They all wanted the wall but never did it. They just hate the fact that you will do it!
We need to build a wall to keep all the liberals out!!!!
We need to build a wall to keep all the liberals out!!!!
No more DACA, Build the damn wall! No more Amnesty! Build the Wall!
No more DACA, Build the damn wall! No more Amnesty! Build the Wall!
Impeaching you!  You are just so stupid it’s embarrassing
Impeaching you!  You are just so stupid it’s embarrassing
Push through congressional pay freezes and term limits, these monsters need to retire.
Push through congressional pay freezes and term limits, these monsters need to retire.
They want to stop you more than people in hell want ice water. Sad pathetic deranged democrats
They want to stop you more than people in hell want ice water. Sad pathetic deranged democrats
Build the wall and have another left hook to end their show
Build the wall and have another left hook to end their show
THIS is  what Nancy Pelosi just  said about Americans who agree with the President of the United States of America..((((This will be done on the backs of the middle class they profess to champion. All they care about are new ignorant voters.)))))   Their policies are a major disaster for the United States of America. If you have children and grandchildren, wake up so they can enjoy the freedom and self-determination we take for granted. If you don't it will disappear forever.
To stop at nothing to insure America falls to her knees. Even if it means the security of our nation. They are the scourge of this country, with an inherent evil, standing with a pitchfork. We support you Mr. President, America First! 🇺🇸
To stop at nothing to insure America falls to her knees. Even if it means the security of our nation. They are the scourge of this country, with an inherent evil, standing with a pitchfork. We support you Mr. President, America First! 🇺🇸
Build it. That's what got you voted in.
Build it. That's what got you voted in.
Nancy Pelosi is planning to lie up a storm tonight. She will tell you that drones and cameras can catch hundreds of running border attackers. Yes Pick them up and carry them back to Mexico. She will fool you by saying walls don't work but techknowledgy does work. LIE Tech can say OH look there it's too late. She will tell you that Mexico is supposed to send cash when Trump said: out with NAFTA and in with fair trade, makng Mexico give up money that way and 4 other ways.  Never Mexico sending cash. Mexico will pay and have no choice and it has already started with fair trade.  NANCY WILL LIE ON THAT. Nancy will lie on naming, all the way around.  2007 Schumer Dodd Hillary Pelosi democrats, all argued strongly for a wall - fence  - barrior. Wall naming belongs to those democrats. Donald just borrowed the word WALL from those democrats. Nancy will lie on who owns the shut down. Trump accepted responsibility and then immediately Schumer went to microphones and took that responsibility from Trump by announcing shut down "YOU GOT IT" shut down and then enforced shut down by ordering all his democrats to vote "NO" on keeping government open. AND SO IT IS the  Schumer SHUT DOWN the nancy pack of lies
Nancy Pelosi is planning to lie up a storm tonight. She will tell you that drones and cameras can catch hundreds of running border attackers. Yes Pick them up and carry them back to Mexico. She will fool you by saying walls don't work but techknowledgy does work. LIE Tech can say OH look there it's too late. She will tell you that Mexico is supposed to send cash when Trump said: out with NAFTA and in with fair trade, makng Mexico give up money that way and 4 other ways.  Never Mexico sending cash. Mexico will pay and have no choice and it has already started with fair trade.  NANCY WILL LIE ON THAT. Nancy will lie on naming, all the way around.  2007 Schumer Dodd Hillary Pelosi democrats, all argued strongly for a wall - fence  - barrior. Wall naming belongs to those democrats. Donald just borrowed the word WALL from those democrats. Nancy will lie on who owns the shut down. Trump accepted responsibility and then immediately Schumer went to microphones and took that responsibility from Trump by announcing shut down "YOU GOT IT" shut down and then enforced shut down by ordering all his democrats to vote "NO" on keeping government open. AND SO IT IS the  Schumer SHUT DOWN the nancy pack of lies
Yes, AMERICAN CITIZENS do want border security and are mad as hell that the damn Democrats don't. They want to work for illegals- so they should go live with them- ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THE WALL !!! #BUILDTHEWALL !!!
Yes, AMERICAN CITIZENS do want border security and are mad as hell that the damn Democrats don't. They want to work for illegals- so they should go live with them- ON THE OTHER SIDE OF THE WALL !!! #BUILDTHEWALL !!!
Build the wall or leave the government shut down until we get it .
Anyone who believes the lies  Chump constantly tells is as stupid as he is.
Anyone who believes the lies  Chump constantly tells is as stupid as he is.
Troll go to your democrat site and leave us alone. All you want is likes or people posting comments. PEOPLE STOP REPLYING TO THIS IDIOT. Kenneth IS A TROLL
Troll go to your democrat site and leave us alone. All you want is likes or people posting comments. PEOPLE STOP REPLYING TO THIS IDIOT. Kenneth IS A TROLL
Trump childish Clown President of USA of Putins grace soon you in Orange.  You are only a Moron . But Democratie is stronger HONESTY os stronger.  You insane Liar and Cheater
Give the American people the right to vote for the wall. I am tired of this bullshit. I want a wall to keep the illegal immigrants put and keep our people safe.
Give the American people the right to vote for the wall. I am tired of this bullshit. I want a wall to keep the illegal immigrants put and keep our people safe.
Build the wall or liberate South America like we did Kuwait bomb it they can pay us back in oil.
Build the wall or liberate South America like we did Kuwait bomb it they can pay us back in oil.
TreSa Sanfilippo You are IGNORANT AND SO UNINFORMED. GO BACK UNDER YOUR TREE AND WAIT FOR THE BAD ILLEGALS TO COME AFTER YOU. WE NEED THE WALL...
TreSa Sanfilippo you need to have your head examined
TreSa Sanfilippo you need to have your head examined
There is no crisis, you damn moron. What's more important? OUR country, not yours! You don't own us! You work for us! What's more important. Families wondering if they will still have a roof over their heads? Afford to pay for needed meds? All because of your damn wall. Special place in hell for you and your followers.Open up the government! We are getting well tired of your negativity, and damn tired of all your damn lies and fantasy world.
There is no crisis, you damn moron. What's more important? OUR country, not yours! You don't own us! You work for us! What's more important. Families wondering if they will still have a roof over their heads? Afford to pay for needed meds? All because of your damn wall. Special place in hell for you and your followers.Open up the government! We are getting well tired of your negativity, and damn tired of all your damn lies and fantasy world.
Build the wall build the wall build the wall 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Bringing the troups home for christmas is just a distraction from all things that come tumbling down on you Donny as they are coming closer to grab you by the balls !!
Bringing the troups home for christmas is just a distraction from all things that come tumbling down on you Donny as they are coming closer to grab you by the balls !!
Trump I love what your doing. Could you please make the white genocide in South African farm lands another priority on your list. Your humble peasant servant Zachariah!
Trump I love what your doing. Could you please make the white genocide in South African farm lands another priority on your list. Your humble peasant servant Zachariah!
No. I want you to ‘go away’. Permanently. Take your boneheaded redhatted fucking moron minions with you.
No. I want you to ‘go away’. Permanently. Take your boneheaded redhatted fucking moron minions with you.
The name T R U M P stands for grabing women by the Pusssy, tax evading, draft dodging, lying, fear mongering, manipulating, cheating, Prostitutes and mental illness !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
The name T R U M P stands for grabing women by the Pusssy, tax evading, draft dodging, lying, fear mongering, manipulating, cheating, Prostitutes and mental illness !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
At the UNITED NATIONS; all world leaders agree that Mr. Trump is one of the finest MORONS
At the UNITED NATIONS; all world leaders agree that Mr. Trump is one of the finest MORONS
In 1892 HUNDREDS of caravans came across the atlantic in boats. Among thousands of people was a German, who was thrown out of his country for draft dodging and other criminal actions........it was Trump´s grandfather. Unfortunaltely they didn´t throw him overboard.
In 1892 HUNDREDS of caravans came across the atlantic in boats. Among thousands of people was a German, who was thrown out of his country for draft dodging and other criminal actions........it was Trump´s grandfather. Unfortunaltely they didn´t throw him overboard.
Donald Trump lies from the Oval Office! Donald Trump is the Liar in Chief and promoter of fake news! Donald Trump is a Traitor to America and our values!
Donald Trump lies from the Oval Office! Donald Trump is the Liar in Chief and promoter of fake news! Donald Trump is a Traitor to America and our values!
So far, Trump has never talked about investing in education. The answer:  the dumber the people, the more voters he will get !
So far, Trump has never talked about investing in education. The answer:  the dumber the people, the more voters he will get !
No one is asking for open borders, and that includes democrats. Without a wall, you need drones, cameras and security personnel. With a wall, you still need drones, cameras and security personnel, plus the cost of the wall and maintenance for the wall. You're just adding cost to what you're already doing. And having a wall is not the same as locking your doors to your house. What it's equivalent to is having a fence to your house...which can still be climbed, and we still need security systems and police officers. Trump and his pathetically sensitive ego sees the wall as an afrodesiac for himself and his simple minded  supporters, when in reality it is a total waste of taxpayer dollars that could be better spent elsewhere.
No one is asking for open borders, and that includes democrats. Without a wall, you need drones, cameras and security personnel. With a wall, you still need drones, cameras and security personnel, plus the cost of the wall and maintenance for the wall. You're just adding cost to what you're already doing. And having a wall is not the same as locking your doors to your house. What it's equivalent to is having a fence to your house...which can still be climbed, and we still need security systems and police officers. Trump and his pathetically sensitive ego sees the wall as an afrodesiac for himself and his simple minded  supporters, when in reality it is a total waste of taxpayer dollars that could be better spent elsewhere.
So funny watching the Dems have tizzy fits that Trump is speaking to the People. They even came out and spoke of their fear that people might actually believe the President instead of them.  Panic runs amuck.  Heh.  I would like to see McConnell bring the existing bill to the floor for a vote and go around Pelosi since it has already passed the house. I would love that one passing and leaving her to pout over her loss....Do we have enough votes with the newbies in the Senate?
Democrats hate the USA and are trying to ruin it.  You are completely right.  Democrats are stupid and suicidal.
Democrats hate the USA and are trying to ruin it.  You are completely right.  Democrats are stupid and suicidal.
California and New York democrat leaders are offering free healthcare for all illegal aliens no longer at hospital emergency rooms brcsuse it is a financial strain and physicslly impossible but now thru private doctors. Who the hell are private doctors going to bill? With an americsn citizen they bill their insurance company but who gets the bill with free illegal alien care? The American medical system will become like Cuba or Venezuela - doctors will quit or retire early. Medical facilities will close.
Destroy any American and American history/traditions/Constitution by any means necessary!
Destroy any American and American history/traditions/Constitution by any means necessary!
Friends, Conservatives and countrymen: It's time to wise up and stop engaging with trolls, haters and bots. I know it's an a great temptation to want to respond, but it serves no purpose, other than to anger and frustrate you. You're not going to educate them or change their minds, no matter how many facts and how much truth you throw at them. They are baiting you and laughing about it. They want to engage you in "non-issues".  We all have better things to do than to spend our time engaging with Liberal lunatics. Feeding the trolls only serves to keep their comments rising to the top of all of these feeds. Resist the temptation. Stop engaging with them. It simply serves no purpose.   Don't reply, other than the “laugh emoji” on their comment.  Share this far, wide and often. #walkawayfromtrolls #LunaticLiberals #DontGiveASingleReply #MAGA #Trump2020
Friends, Conservatives and countrymen: It's time to wise up and stop engaging with trolls, haters and bots. I know it's an a great temptation to want to respond, but it serves no purpose, other than to anger and frustrate you. You're not going to educate them or change their minds, no matter how many facts and how much truth you throw at them. They are baiting you and laughing about it. They want to engage you in "non-issues".  We all have better things to do than to spend our time engaging with Liberal lunatics. Feeding the trolls only serves to keep their comments rising to the top of all of these feeds. Resist the temptation. Stop engaging with them. It simply serves no purpose.   Don't reply, other than the “laugh emoji” on their comment.  Share this far, wide and often. #walkawayfromtrolls #LunaticLiberals #DontGiveASingleReply #MAGA #Trump2020
Islamocrats hate America and Israel period
Islamocrats hate America and Israel period
Nancy  pelosi and CHUCK Schumer..GO AWAY..WE R WITH TRUMP..AND CHUCK ..Todd..meet the press...WHAT MAKES U THINK U KNOW IT ALL???..we stand by trump..build that wall ..who cares if its concrete or steel..demos  just fighting to fight and..it was trump that said Mexico will pay..soo..if they wont...than there's many many ways suggested to pay for it..demos..go away..and just grow up .
Nancy  pelosi and CHUCK Schumer..GO AWAY..WE R WITH TRUMP..AND CHUCK ..Todd..meet the press...WHAT MAKES U THINK U KNOW IT ALL???..we stand by trump..build that wall ..who cares if its concrete or steel..demos  just fighting to fight and..it was trump that said Mexico will pay..soo..if they wont...than there's many many ways suggested to pay for it..demos..go away..and just grow up .
Denise Walker  Democrats won California and New York because of illegal voting.
Denise Walker  Chuck and Nancy are in the fetal position right now. And they're going to have to stay that way. This is one they're going to lose.
Denise Walker  Chuck and Nancy are in the fetal position right now. And they're going to have to stay that way. This is one they're going to lose.
Mr President those Dumocruds could Care less about us Americans We Know the Only reason they want illegals coming is so they can get a government check, food, housing all on the back of the American worker!Democruds Know they Will Vote for the democruds! How can they Vote anyhow? Illegals come here they Take our jobs overcrowd our schools and force Us to learn their language! We are Sick Of illegals and their terrorism on our people our children Our Way Of Life!  You are the First President we have Ever Had That Cared about Americans! And Can’t be Bought!!!🤗🤗🤗you’ve Brought jobs back Lowered our taxes Made our Military Strong Again! I Stand With You and my fellow Americans that Want a Strong And Safe Nation! I just want to Say  Thank You Mr President! I Think your doing a Great Job! Stand your ground! I love you and your wonderful family! and I Will again Vote for you Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 Keep America Great!
Mr President those Dumocruds could Care less about us Americans We Know the Only reason they want illegals coming is so they can get a government check, food, housing all on the back of the American worker!Democruds Know they Will Vote for the democruds! How can they Vote anyhow? Illegals come here they Take our jobs overcrowd our schools and force Us to learn their language! We are Sick Of illegals and their terrorism on our people our children Our Way Of Life!  You are the First President we have Ever Had That Cared about Americans! And Can’t be Bought!!!🤗🤗🤗you’ve Brought jobs back Lowered our taxes Made our Military Strong Again! I Stand With You and my fellow Americans that Want a Strong And Safe Nation! I just want to Say  Thank You Mr President! I Think your doing a Great Job! Stand your ground! I love you and your wonderful family! and I Will again Vote for you Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 Keep America Great!
BUILD A WALL FROM WHAT ????? America's debt is the largest sovereign debt in the world for a single country. The debt is greater than what America produces in a whole year. This high debt-to-gross domestic product ratio tells investors that the country will for the first time have problems repaying the loans. That's a new and worrying occurrence for the United States.
BUILD A WALL FROM WHAT ????? America's debt is the largest sovereign debt in the world for a single country. The debt is greater than what America produces in a whole year. This high debt-to-gross domestic product ratio tells investors that the country will for the first time have problems repaying the loans. That's a new and worrying occurrence for the United States.
Why do some democrats call the wall immoral all of a sudden 🤔 yet abortion is moral 🤔
Why do some democrats call the wall immoral all of a sudden 🤔 yet abortion is moral 🤔
The Democrats don't give a rats about the American people, what we need or what we want. They DO however care more about illegal immigrants. They will stop at nothing to stonewall OUR President even if it cost thousands of Americans there lives
When will the North wall be built? Keep those dirty Canadians out too!
in our state of me. they voted in a severe liberalist who is going to break our back.   democrat,of course. stand your ground mr president
Being Democrat is a mental illness and we all saw the evidence tonight. DRAIN THE SWAMP AND PUT TERM LIMITS on the Senators and the House members.
Someone kill this fool trump already. Honestly learn your own fucking history. Ms13 was founded on the streets of L.A when honest migrants fleeing civil war are thrown in with Waring African American gangs. So what was America's solutions you sent them back to  El Salvador. A combination of extreme poverty and the effect's of a long and brutal civil war allowed this group to explode out of control.   Thankfully my parents chose Australia. But your problems have been around for a long time and it's not just Hispanic Americans that are the problem. African Americans have suffered time and time again nothing has gotten better, then we can jump to the real problem in America GUN'S! how many high school shootings have there been now fucking wake up to your self Mr president Karman is coming to bite you in the ass. It might not have been you that made all the problems but you haven't helped them either
As usual the Democrats /Liberals are stupid.
Another thought:  When and if the Democrats ever get full power, one government run national healthcare system, like Canada, is their biggest goal - listen, actually listen to these socialists.   We will be so busy trying to get a simple cancer test or doctors appointment- we Americans might just need to climb that wall and cross into Mexico just to see a doctor!!  😱
maybe if you didn't rip off all us hard working americans with your corporate tax cuts the Dems would have let you spend 5 billion on a wall, how many billions of dollars did you rip off from the goverment with your tax cuts? if you are so fucking rich build the wall yourself!
The Dem's Credo... Create Jobs by creating criminals, encourage lawlessness and disorder in our society. Think of all the jobs that thrive off of this negative part of society. Figures, lawyers are one of the biggest profiteers, with prisons, law enforcement, criminal justice and reform, healthcare, welfare, all the non-profits that support this system to grow... and the companies that are needed to support them. When a groups whole outlook on life is, let's just mess things up so we can profit by it, is messed up thinking. To say it politely. A lot of Republicans think this same way. Drain The Swamp!
You should shut down the Democrats paycheck they will change there minds
You should shut down the Democrats paycheck they will change there minds
I want the WALL to keep us safe from Harm.....What's wrong with that?....Answer.....NOTHING!!!!.....Build that WALL MR. PRESIDENT.....80% OF THE PEOPLE ARE ON YOUR SIDE....What should that tell the Dumb Democrats.?....They have WILLFUL BLINDNESS I THINK,  And they all Hate you......Which is very sad.....My Opinion
I want the WALL to keep us safe from Harm.....What's wrong with that?....Answer.....NOTHING!!!!.....Build that WALL MR. PRESIDENT.....80% OF THE PEOPLE ARE ON YOUR SIDE....What should that tell the Dumb Democrats.?....They have WILLFUL BLINDNESS I THINK,  And they all Hate you......Which is very sad.....My Opinion
We will be watching your address to the nation tonight I'm sure you will get more viewers than the dumb ass golden globes!
We will be watching your address to the nation tonight I'm sure you will get more viewers than the dumb ass golden globes!
Your doing an awsome job Mr. TRUMP. They looked like 2 fools. The lying bunch those 2 are
Your doing an awsome job Mr. TRUMP. They looked like 2 fools. The lying bunch those 2 are
BUILD THE WALL ...Mr.President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸But FIRST lets send all these dumb butt Democraps over there  since they are SO fond of them!  THEN BUILD THE WALL 💪
BUILD THE WALL ...Mr.President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸But FIRST lets send all these dumb butt Democraps over there  since they are SO fond of them!  THEN BUILD THE WALL 💪
Build it!! I don’t understand why people think the President is “mean” or “uncaring” if a wall is built.  He is actually being “nice” and “caring” by keeping us SAFE!  We are America, they are Mexico.  Two different countries.   Sad that it’s all about democrats and republicans.  It doesn’t matter what the topic is- it’s always a disagreement.  Can’t we all just agree that we’d like to be safe?  That they can come on over legally, through the right process?  Doesn’t seem that difficult to me.....
Build it!! I don’t understand why people think the President is “mean” or “uncaring” if a wall is built.  He is actually being “nice” and “caring” by keeping us SAFE!  We are America, they are Mexico.  Two different countries.   Sad that it’s all about democrats and republicans.  It doesn’t matter what the topic is- it’s always a disagreement.  Can’t we all just agree that we’d like to be safe?  That they can come on over legally, through the right process?  Doesn’t seem that difficult to me.....
The wall is be needed, if we keep letting all the illegals in why have laws to make people come in legally. Why have laws at all!  Our safety should always come first. Thanks for standing up for us.  Keep fighting! We Stand behind you!  Put America First!
The new trade deal with Mexico does pay for it. Not to mention they could allocate the funds ceased from drug cartels to get it started. Then the money from the 134 billion we pay out every year to deal with the illegal immigrants once they get in could be used because the wall will dramatically drop the number getting in.
Build the wall Mr. President..  And to Nancy Pelosi's and your party, You people are looking at papers not reality.. Our President is looking out for us Legal citizens that live in the USA.. Not for the criminals,,, like you.. There is something going on with you Liberal democrats,,  Do you think if you bring in more illegals than allow them to vote you'll be control??  Is that all that matters to you??  You and your own money?? well why don't you pay some of these people that are not getting paid right now.. How much is our government paying illegals,, while we go without.. One illegal on a rampage is to many.. Our people come first.. And You Nancy and your cohorts is what is draining our system and putting the American people in danger..  Or are you just like crooked Hillary if 2 or 3 or 4 people die from illegals and say,, (So What)  !!!  How many people do we know are in these sanctuary cities..  If it is so damn safe here out in the open for us who are legal americans,,  why do the illegals get to go run and hide???  Why is that??  In my own Country..  I feel like I don't get a say.. but illegals do!!  People fleeing from other countries, we take them in,, they get housing, money, food,, vehicles, Dr.s, schools, colleges,  and what does it cost them?? And NO they shouldn't get medicare, for god sake,, I paid in and get 11,000 a year on my own SSDI and you people think I should share it, like I never worked my ass off for it..  I would like to know what you people are illegally so caught up in that you would let the american people be murdered or hurt, or raped, or trafficked by illegals, illegal gangs, drug smugglers,, and your Hate for our President who more than half America loves,,, to keep your control,  or whatever you are doing,, hidden from the truth.. And No most drugs are not coming thru the gates  more reading material have you!!!.. Have you talked to Vice?  Have you talked to the men and women who work those lines?  Have you been on any of the stake outs Nancy?  You don't think the children are a threat ??  they are raised to steal and rob. and knife someone,, and it may be to just survive for them but if you think for one minute any of them come over here and are totally rehabbed as soon as they cross that border you are sadly mistaken and Very Naive, so that's why I think all that matters to your party is control and money..  Not the american people...  And all nationalities come thru there from countries everywhere..  Their not stupid, they know how to do it..  and how many of our kids get picked up from here in our country and are taken back across the border, never to be seen again.. They are coming and going out too with illegal money,, with our children for god sake.. I don't care if the President said Mexico would pay for it... Actually if the government stopped paying illegals here in america for a damn week, we would have the money.. You and your party need to own this for people not getting paid as much as anyone..  all your party ever does is play the blame game and point fingers.. god forbid someone doesn't agree with your party or the Liberals.. Economically India is getting ahead of us, as is other countries,, but lets just keep letting them come and let them live better than we americans do while they are all out there protesting our government yet running away from their own..  Guilt is not Inherited..  Whatever this country did or didn't do 100 years ago and further is NOT todays problem.. why do they come here if they don't like it,, when they just left a hell hole..  Because they can that's why !! And they get rewarded for it instead of just being happy they got out of the hell they just left..  It is not up to us to take care of the world, nor should we.. Don't Guilt me. Don't manipulate me Nancy Pelosi  This is NOT about the american people to you, it's about your money.. None of you so called hard working people have a clue,,  You pay into nothing but your stocks.. But you want to keep taxing us to help illegals to help more , help more, help more.. and to help you..  when are you Democrats and Liberals going to start helping the american people that are already here..  what about our own homeless??  they just keep getting stepped on and pushed out of the way.. You Lie to the american People,,  you are NOT helping the President and haven't since day one.. Help us Nancy,, Help the United states of america and our President keep us safe...  You owe the American people Nancy Pelosi,,  We have done enough.. And the President knows that..   God Bless President Trump and his family..  Oh yay,,  Didn't Obama shut down the government too??  and others..  But it didn't affect you or your cohorts did it??  We seen you were all on vacations,, and making plans for your next dirty move.
Build the wall Mr. President..  And to Nancy Pelosi's and your party, You people are looking at papers not reality.. Our President is looking out for us Legal citizens that live in the USA.. Not for the criminals,,, like you.. There is something going on with you Liberal democrats,,  Do you think if you bring in more illegals than allow them to vote you'll be control??  Is that all that matters to you??  You and your own money?? well why don't you pay some of these people that are not getting paid right now.. How much is our government paying illegals,, while we go without.. One illegal on a rampage is to many.. Our people come first.. And You Nancy and your cohorts is what is draining our system and putting the American people in danger..  Or are you just like crooked Hillary if 2 or 3 or 4 people die from illegals and say,, (So What)  !!!  How many people do we know are in these sanctuary cities..  If it is so damn safe here out in the open for us who are legal americans,,  why do the illegals get to go run and hide???  Why is that??  In my own Country..  I feel like I don't get a say.. but illegals do!!  People fleeing from other countries, we take them in,, they get housing, money, food,, vehicles, Dr.s, schools, colleges,  and what does it cost them?? And NO they shouldn't get medicare, for god sake,, I paid in and get 11,000 a year on my own SSDI and you people think I should share it, like I never worked my ass off for it..  I would like to know what you people are illegally so caught up in that you would let the american people be murdered or hurt, or raped, or trafficked by illegals, illegal gangs, drug smugglers,, and your Hate for our President who more than half America loves,,, to keep your control,  or whatever you are doing,, hidden from the truth.. And No most drugs are not coming thru the gates  more reading material have you!!!.. Have you talked to Vice?  Have you talked to the men and women who work those lines?  Have you been on any of the stake outs Nancy?  You don't think the children are a threat ??  they are raised to steal and rob. and knife someone,, and it may be to just survive for them but if you think for one minute any of them come over here and are totally rehabbed as soon as they cross that border you are sadly mistaken and Very Naive, so that's why I think all that matters to your party is control and money..  Not the american people...  And all nationalities come thru there from countries everywhere..  Their not stupid, they know how to do it..  and how many of our kids get picked up from here in our country and are taken back across the border, never to be seen again.. They are coming and going out too with illegal money,, with our children for god sake.. I don't care if the President said Mexico would pay for it... Actually if the government stopped paying illegals here in america for a damn week, we would have the money.. You and your party need to own this for people not getting paid as much as anyone..  all your party ever does is play the blame game and point fingers.. god forbid someone doesn't agree with your party or the Liberals.. Economically India is getting ahead of us, as is other countries,, but lets just keep letting them come and let them live better than we americans do while they are all out there protesting our government yet running away from their own..  Guilt is not Inherited..  Whatever this country did or didn't do 100 years ago and further is NOT todays problem.. why do they come here if they don't like it,, when they just left a hell hole..  Because they can that's why !! And they get rewarded for it instead of just being happy they got out of the hell they just left..  It is not up to us to take care of the world, nor should we.. Don't Guilt me. Don't manipulate me Nancy Pelosi  This is NOT about the american people to you, it's about your money.. None of you so called hard working people have a clue,,  You pay into nothing but your stocks.. But you want to keep taxing us to help illegals to help more , help more, help more.. and to help you..  when are you Democrats and Liberals going to start helping the american people that are already here..  what about our own homeless??  they just keep getting stepped on and pushed out of the way.. You Lie to the american People,,  you are NOT helping the President and haven't since day one.. Help us Nancy,, Help the United states of america and our President keep us safe...  You owe the American people Nancy Pelosi,,  We have done enough.. And the President knows that..   God Bless President Trump and his family..  Oh yay,,  Didn't Obama shut down the government too??  and others..  But it didn't affect you or your cohorts did it??  We seen you were all on vacations,, and making plans for your next dirty move.
How do you Republican Government workers feel about your President now?  You do know, he can care less about you or your families.  Its all about him getting his way.  Nothing else matters to him.  Go ahead defend him now.
BUILD THE WALL! STOP ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS!
Prosecute EVERY DEM WHO AIDS AND ABETS CRIMINALS COMING ACROSS OUR BORDERS!
Prosecute EVERY DEM WHO AIDS AND ABETS CRIMINALS COMING ACROSS OUR BORDERS!
80% of Americans support border security.  Democrats want votes from Illegal Aliens and supporters of Illegals Aliens. Fact counties on the US Southern border and in California changed to Democrat because of influx of Illegals and Supporters of Illegals.
You are "spot on"!  Donald J. Trump the President Donald J. Trump.All those who say :no to the wall" need to provide their addresses to undocumented, illegal people with their diseases, drugs and criminal history and let them take care of them. Those illegals will not be taken care of with our taxes. Not my address.This country is made up of immigrants who come through the proper channels, vetted first and welcomed the legal way. Stay firm with your stance to keeping America First and MAGA!
You are "spot on"!  Donald J. Trump the President Donald J. Trump.All those who say :no to the wall" need to provide their addresses to undocumented, illegal people with their diseases, drugs and criminal history and let them take care of them. Those illegals will not be taken care of with our taxes. Not my address.This country is made up of immigrants who come through the proper channels, vetted first and welcomed the legal way. Stay firm with your stance to keeping America First and MAGA!
Build the wall by any means necessary we need it keep the illegals out.
Nicole Jarrett  ... They will all get their back pay in full as soon as the Wall is funded. Even if they didn't work a day during the shut down. Neither will they be charged vacation or sick days. It always happens this way. Shut up and take the win. Funny ... did you complain when obama and Clinton shut it down for 16 and 21 days respectively? ... ** crickets ** ... thought so.
Nicole Jarrett  ... They will all get their back pay in full as soon as the Wall is funded. Even if they didn't work a day during the shut down. Neither will they be charged vacation or sick days. It always happens this way. Shut up and take the win. Funny ... did you complain when obama and Clinton shut it down for 16 and 21 days respectively? ... ** crickets ** ... thought so.
American's want their f*cking paychecks, Mr. President!
American's want their f*cking paychecks, Mr. President!
Build the wall!  Put the hammer down on city and state officials who enact fugitive safe places and obstruct ICE.  Charge them with treason
CROOKED trump spends $13 million on a private company to recruit 2 border security agents and now he wants $70 billion to build a wall!   He could not even handle $13 million wisely to increase border security, what do you think CROOKED trump will do with $70 billion????   This  MORON cannot be trusted!
CROOKED trump spends $13 million on a private company to recruit 2 border security agents and now he wants $70 billion to build a wall!   He could not even handle $13 million wisely to increase border security, what do you think CROOKED trump will do with $70 billion????   This  MORON cannot be trusted!
Build the wall build the wall build the wall
Build the wall build the wall build the wall
Build the wall , take congress paychecks away from them they will soon give it up and support the wall. We Americans real Americans want security , we want our beloved America back our freedoms, our way of life. We stand behind you, no one wants communism and socialism we want our free America. Illegals are not coming here for a better life they are coming her to take over and make our country the same destruction they left. If they loved their way of life they would stay in their own country and live their laws. They just want the power and to destroy ours.
Build the wall , take congress paychecks away from them they will soon give it up and support the wall. We Americans real Americans want security , we want our beloved America back our freedoms, our way of life. We stand behind you, no one wants communism and socialism we want our free America. Illegals are not coming here for a better life they are coming her to take over and make our country the same destruction they left. If they loved their way of life they would stay in their own country and live their laws. They just want the power and to destroy ours.
Build the wall! Keep Government Shutdown until Democrats give in!
Build the wall! Keep Government Shutdown until Democrats give in!
A lot of people are complaining because President Trump 'said Mexico will pay for the wall'.  There's more than one way to "pay".  Get that wall built & Mexico Will Pay by having to keep all those druggies, disease-ridden, lazy morons trying to get into the U.S. to leech off the taxpayers here.
A lot of people are complaining because President Trump 'said Mexico will pay for the wall'.  There's more than one way to "pay".  Get that wall built & Mexico Will Pay by having to keep all those druggies, disease-ridden, lazy morons trying to get into the U.S. to leech off the taxpayers here.
Tom Moslak What tree did you crawl out of?
Tom Moslak lmao you sir are a fucking joke . Sit your ass down you clown .
Exactly
There is No Emergency!! Trump’s Border Wall is Another Trump Scam! The Wall will not prevent people from tunneling under it or going around it. To pay for it, Trump will eliminate Social Security, Medicare & Medicaid!! Only the Brain Dead believe the Lies that this Scumbag is Spewing!!
There is No Emergency!! Trump’s Border Wall is Another Trump Scam! The Wall will not prevent people from tunneling under it or going around it. To pay for it, Trump will eliminate Social Security, Medicare & Medicaid!! Only the Brain Dead believe the Lies that this Scumbag is Spewing!!
What about all the middle eastern illegals pouring across the Canadian border? This is more of a problem than those coming in across Mexico’s border!!!!
Simple solution to building the wall. Allow all illegals in, provide them with a “Welcome aboard package” which includes the immediate right to vote along with  affordable housing but they must agree in writing to register as Republicans/Conservatives then see how quickly Pelosi, Schumer and the rest of the Resistance Party coughs up the $5 billion 🤔
Build that Wall declare a state of emergency
Build that Wall declare a state of emergency
Communists all need to be Impeached!!
Communists all need to be Impeached!!
It is important to the Democrats who hold office to do everything they can to stop and destroy everything the President tries to do. It is NOT important to them to serve the American people or to protect them. On the contrary. Everything they do is to destroy America. It is obvious by how they vote and what they say. They do not uphold The Constitution. They are traitors to America. Their followers are those who hate President Trump because they don't get their way. He does what is right. They are just evil doers.
It is important to the Democrats who hold office to do everything they can to stop and destroy everything the President tries to do. It is NOT important to them to serve the American people or to protect them. On the contrary. Everything they do is to destroy America. It is obvious by how they vote and what they say. They do not uphold The Constitution. They are traitors to America. Their followers are those who hate President Trump because they don't get their way. He does what is right. They are just evil doers.
Nancy Edgeworth you mean like hiliary and her husband did? Saying things like that only proves how stupid you really are if you believe it.
He can't run from prison!!
I love when he posts stuff. Because then all the dumbocrats come running to say how hes a liar and stupid and blah blah blah. But what they should do is actually look through the comments and look at the likes and see what it really shows. It shows that trump will enjoy another 4 years because they are vastly outnumbered. And the reason they should look at that and accept the reality coming their way is so they can just do the world a favor now and remove themselves from it immediately.
I love when he posts stuff. Because then all the dumbocrats come running to say how hes a liar and stupid and blah blah blah. But what they should do is actually look through the comments and look at the likes and see what it really shows. It shows that trump will enjoy another 4 years because they are vastly outnumbered. And the reason they should look at that and accept the reality coming their way is so they can just do the world a favor now and remove themselves from it immediately.
I guess not enough people have died from heroin or from illegals for Schumer and Pelosi. You know President Trump you have a heart and it showed tonight. You love the American people.
I guess not enough people have died from heroin or from illegals for Schumer and Pelosi. You know President Trump you have a heart and it showed tonight. You love the American people.
Just declare emergency and build the wall...
Josh Wilner...Liberals defined..."there is no unit of measure for that level of stupidity"....Albert Einstein
You're a gaslighting, delusional fool who lacks the capacity to lead. There is a reason Mattis, Kelly, Haley and Tillerson are gone. You don't know how to get along with others.   You fabricated a crisis that doesn't exist. The wall is a joke.   People overstaying their visas is a much bigger problem but since you're a liar and a fraud we don't have a plan to fix it.  Mexico isn't paying but Americans are because you're a dumb tool who has no real accomplishments other than being known as a POS, Cheater and fraud.
You're a gaslighting, delusional fool who lacks the capacity to lead. There is a reason Mattis, Kelly, Haley and Tillerson are gone. You don't know how to get along with others.   You fabricated a crisis that doesn't exist. The wall is a joke.   People overstaying their visas is a much bigger problem but since you're a liar and a fraud we don't have a plan to fix it.  Mexico isn't paying but Americans are because you're a dumb tool who has no real accomplishments other than being known as a POS, Cheater and fraud.
WE want a wall it's our family's affected by illegal not your's you all have a wall around your house
We always wanted safer borders. Most Americans didn’t realize what a wreck the wall was till Obama started letting them pour in to the US. Our Government doesn’t tell us a lot and I am glad Trump is the first President that cares about Americans and wants to fix this issue that has needed fixed since 1986. Finally have someone wanting to not pass the buck. And for Democrats to cry it’s immoral is laughable. Any Civilizations have had Walls. Many countries now have same walls or better. Look at Israel’s and it’s working look at their statistics.
The last 4 letters in American and republican are I can. The last 4 letters in democrats is rats.
I heard California,and New York said they will pay for all including illegals health care,🤔 On who’s money taxpayers.....hell no let the wealthy elites pay since they want them here ,like sanctuary cities,celebrities for cheep labor ,and wealthy elites,and business people to pay as little as possible for the cleanup of their mansion and democrats to get their votes to gain power .......STAND UNITED TOGETHER AND WE WILL WIN...... WWG1WGA ✝️👍🏻🇺🇸
I read this post about the bird feeders and while I totally agree with it I felt it's missing an analogy to support the wall. So let me add the proper anology and explain the need for the wall. (added to end of bird feeder story)  (copied and pasted)-----> I bought a bird feeder. I hung it on my back porch and filled it with seed. What a beauty of a bird feeder it was, as I filled it lovingly with seed. Within a week we had hundreds of birds taking advantage of the continuous flow of free and easily accessible food.  But then the birds started building nests in the boards of the patio, above the table, and next to the barbecue.   Then came the crap. It was everywhere: on the patio tile, the chairs, the table ... everywhere!  Then some of the birds turned mean. They would dive bomb me and try to peck me even though I had fed them out of my own pocket.  And others birds were boisterous and loud. They sat on the feeder and squawked and screamed at all hours of the day and night and demanded that I fill it when it got low on food.  After a while, I couldn't even sit on my own back porch anymore. So I took down the bird feeder and in three days the birds were gone. I cleaned up their mess and took down the many nests they had built all over the patio.  Soon, the back yard was like it used to be ..... quiet, serene.... and no one demanding their rights to a free meal.  Now let's see...... Our government gives out free food, subsidized housing, free medical care and free education, and allows anyone born here to be an automatic citizen.  Then the illegals came by the tens of thousands. Suddenly our taxes went up to pay for free services; small apartments are housing 5 families; you have to wait 6 hours to be seen by an emergency room doctor; Your child's second grade class is behind other schools because over half the class doesn't speak English.  Corn Flakes now come in a bilingual box; I have to 'press one ' to hear my bank talk to me in English, and people waving flags other than ”ours” are squawking and screaming in the streets, demanding more rights and free liberties.  Just my opinion, but maybe it's time for the government to take down the bird feeder.  If you agree, pass it on; if not, just continue cleaning up the crap!!  (Added analogy)  ......while it appeared all was back to normal I soon realized I had another issue on my hands. With the birds busy coming in droves to my feeders my attention was focused on them and not on the ants that were sneaking in unnoticed seemingly right beneath my feet. Taking advantage of the mess being left behind by the birds. Some of the ants had made permanent homes in and around my porch. While others simply came and went unnoticed taking what they wanted back to there own home.      When I got rid of the feeders everything seemed peaceful. But that was not to be the case. Wasn't long and without the distraction of the birds I began to see the ants. I went to the hardware store and got aunt traps to put up where I could see them coming from. They would fill up almost immediately but the rest of the ants would just re-route themselves and continue coming. They had found other resources to feed on inside my house and soon I had ants in my Crawlspace where I couldn't see them. But they would appear on my counters, in my trash can, in my cupboards. It was out of control. My daughter was petrified, she tiptoed around the house in fear. Me and my wife would try to comfort her and race to her screams. I tried to get them under control but no matter what I tried the ants just came and came.      Then one night my daughter woke us with a scream. It seemed a red ant colony had built a nest in my house as well. I had been annoyed with the other ants, I had even decided that spending a few bucks everyday to try and fight back was better than spending alot more hiring an exterminator. But these red aunt's were vicious. They were very aggressive and very mean. They had attacked my daughter while she was sleeping and had swarmed and bitten her all over her body.      I had had enough...I realized then that something had to be done. This was no longer just a nuisance, it was threatening my family's health and well being. I knew it was time to call an exterminator even if it would cause me to pull from my savings. It was my responsibility to make our home safe for my family.     The next day I called the exterminator. He explained to me he would need to first put up a barrier to stop the ants from coming in. That was the first step of a long process. He would use a special spray that would form a barrier the ants could not cross. He then would search in every dark space in my home to find the ants nests and exterminate them.      He then explained how much it would cost. I sat with my wife and discussed the proposal. We both agreed that it was going to be a burden financially at first. But that in time we would be able to rebuild our nest egg in savings. That in doing this we would save money in the long run by not having to put money out daily to battle the ant problem. We knew we would have to pay a little annually to have the exterminator maintain the barrier but it would be much less than the initial cost and something we could budget in and make doable. Ultimately we agreed that our daughters safety was paramount and chose to pay.     It's been a few years now and every once in a while we do still see an ant here or there. We have no idea where they get in, but when we find them we kill them and we call our exterminator and he imidiately comes to check on the situation and spray where needed.      My daughter runs and plays throughout the house now no longer worrying about about the ants. She sleeps peacefully at night. I wish I had called the exterminator sooner, my daughter should have never had to be hurt for me to come to that decision.
Democrats are only in office because of illegal immigrants voting for them
Build that wall, we need to be protected.
Build that wall, we need to be protected.
As he offers alternatives and negotiates, the dems shut it down. No compromise from those scum, they deserve no respect. Btw Nancy Pelosi should be asking for the wall in San Diego to be torn down.
https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
This situation needs to be controlled. Unfortunately previous Presidents & congress did nothing. We do not have an Ellis Island to process large quantities at one time. Our current detention center on southern border cannot handle. We have 12+ million illegals already living here illegally. Majority are on assistance of some type. We have 700,000 waiting for vetting in court system, which is not equipped for that amount either. Fix the systems. Put up the wall until the illegals here are dealt with. When do you stop the runaway train? Before it kills people or after?
This situation needs to be controlled. Unfortunately previous Presidents & congress did nothing. We do not have an Ellis Island to process large quantities at one time. Our current detention center on southern border cannot handle. We have 12+ million illegals already living here illegally. Majority are on assistance of some type. We have 700,000 waiting for vetting in court system, which is not equipped for that amount either. Fix the systems. Put up the wall until the illegals here are dealt with. When do you stop the runaway train? Before it kills people or after?
I don't understand what the issue with the wall is, it's a win win scenario… we create construction jobs while it's being built, dissuade illegal immigration and by doing so help raise the wages of normal American people, because ANY supply of people who are willing to work for less than the average American will bring the wages down… so what if produce has to get a bit more expensive if we don't have to deal with the other negatives that come with illegal immigration: crime, drugs, etc.
I think if you can’t get the Dems to budge on the wall you should bus all the illegals trying to enter Texas to California on a regular basis.   See how much they can put up with before they start back egging for the Southern border wall. They want them, they can take care of them. Texas wants the wall....
I did not vote for the current President, but I do see the need for building a wall.  Immigrants years ago came through Ellis Island and were “checked out” both medically and for any criminal record.  Why do people think we should just let anyone into the country and not check them out first.  We have enough crooks in our country as it is (especially in Washington DC).   I am sure drug cartels have paid out millions in bribe money to keep our borders open.
Border security, safety, for the U.S., the citizens is a must.  We have been promised a barrier for 3 decades, promised Comprehensive Immigration Reform only to see it die, ignored, dismantled before our eyes.  The economy can not tolerate the drain, expense of the vast population of illegals.  We do not have enough Border Patrol agents with the necessary tools to adequately to protect our Nation.  In 2017 63% of illegals were on Welfare.
Majority of Americans don't want anymore illegal immigration in United States at this moment we support our President Donald J Trump to build the wall and end illegal immigration in America American people don't want illegal immigrants anymore Democrats are the globalist against American workers
Majority of Americans don't want anymore illegal immigration in United States at this moment we support our President Donald J Trump to build the wall and end illegal immigration in America American people don't want illegal immigrants anymore Democrats are the globalist against American workers
Yes; we do want border security. The Dems who won’t support Donald Trump are all about hatred. They prove repeatedly they don’t care about US Citizen safety. They are protected with armed body guards daily,  homes with walls, and videos showing their support of a border wall during past administrations. They are lying hypocrites putting our country in greater risk each and every day. They are so afraid if they agree to fund the wall that Trump will be re-elected in 2020. They are willing to risk our lives with another 9/11 or worse!! We are talking about “illegal” immigrants here; “illegal” being the operative word! If some disastrous incident occurs, it’s all on you Democrat’s and your blatant political anger. You’ll never have a Democratic President in the future if you don’t protect this country, because we won’t forget who was really responsible for any terrorists acts!!!!
LOL All the Dems got is shutdown! They don't even talk about the American people that were killed, raped, and beaten by illegals. They don't even tell you about the walls around their own home or how they wanted the walls before Trump got in office. Dems need to get out of this country!
Build the wall and put Nancy Pelosi and Chuck Schumer on the other side.
Curtis Burke a lot of them actually do belong there.
Build the wall....and then please put the Democrats on the other side of it!
Build the wall....and then please put the Democrats on the other side of it!
Build the Wall!  Send the Democrats there to see it for themselves but probably won’t change their small minds. They like illegal aliens, drugs, child endangerment and human trafficking and future democratic voters. Stand strong President Trump and God Bless you and America. 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the wall or keep the government shut down stop pay for senate and house redirect those wages to pay federal workers.
We want more than that Mr. President, we want the swamp criminals in DC that have been selling our country out all these years to be prosecuted and incarcerated!
Yes we want border security and a wall. The people deserve to be safe and not over run with crime, diseases and people who cant add to America.
Yes we want border security and a wall. The people deserve to be safe and not over run with crime, diseases and people who cant add to America.
I definitely hate DemocRats/Liberals/Socialists. Got to do something about these idiots!
As the House of Representatives welcomes its first two Muslim congresswomen, Texas Republicans will vote on Thursday over whether to remove Tarrant County Republican party vice-chair Shahid Shafi from his seat because he identifies as a Muslim-American.  The vote comes after some members of the county party put forth a motion to remove Shafi, a Republican trauma surgeon and Southlake City councilman, from his position due to his Islamic beliefs.  Dorrie O’Brien, a precinct chair, expressed fear that Shafi would uphold Islamic law over the U.S. constitution and that he might be related “to Islamic terror groups.”  Bunch of racists
Dear President Trump,  To get the funds to build the wall cut all of the exorbent benefits that the Senate and Congress are given. Let them find their own insurance and pay what we the people have to. We scrimp and pay and can barley survive on what we make.  Let them give up their tax breaks, insurance, take a huge pay cut, this way they can actually see what the American people are dealing with. You sir, are already setting a grand example with taking no wage. We appreciate the fact that you have done this.  There are to many senators and congressmen and women who have made millions off of the American people.  Sir, it has been awhile since we have had a person in the Oval Office who actually loves our Country. The things that they are proposing to do will not help the border Patrol any. We need the wall.  Better yet, make the ones who are protesting the wall live in border towns without their walls and security. Make them live in the neighborhoods who are turned upside down from drugs and gangs. The Congress and Senate live in a fantasy land they need a real dose of reality.  Strip it all away, make them live as we the people live.Let them live with the reality of their idiotic bills and laws they make. Let them walk in the shoes of our law enforcement, soldiers, border patrol agents etc.shoes. Hit them where it hurts, like they do us.   President Trump,  My husband and I stand beside you and what your trying to do.  Keep up the good work.  Cheriee
Bad news for Liberals I found out through my sources that..... Nancy Pelosi is an illegal Immigrant
Americans want pot legilzed not a wall dumbass ... Listen to your people
Americans want pot legilzed not a wall dumbass ... Listen to your people
The Border Wall is a very Important part of the Security, Protection and Safety Of our Country and our Citizens and the Far Left Liberal Democrats were for it when Obama was in office but they are now against it because they Hate Trump!! What a bunch of Hypocrites these People are!!! They are all about themselves and Power hunger and don’t give a rip about the Security, Protection and Safety Of our Country!! They have made their millions and billions of dollars and some have become wealthy from and in America but they don’t want to give back and do what’s Good and Right for America!! We are seeing the true characters and who these Far Left Liberal Democrats are And how they are using America for their profits and catering to Illegals and outsiders!!! Unite and Prepare ourselves for Trump 2020 and Stand Up for Our Country and be Bold to Keep Our Country and our Values!!! Pray for Our President and All the People in His Administration And also for Our Country!!  Lina
I want to puke whenever I see these childish so called democratic leaders screwing up the country I fought for! Now Wisconsin doesn’t have a governer! That skinny little weasel screwed us all the first day in! We should all have to pass an SAT test before we can vote! Of course that is set up by teachers so forget that idea! Oh boy am I screwed!!
Mr. President, do not falter or sway (not that you would). You have been so good for our country.  This Democratic Party has ulterior motives... to keep our nation divided. There’s gotta be a way, a law, a loophole to start getting these treasonous people off capital hill and out of our government.  How can people who do not protect US citizens hold any political office?
Liberals are the enemy of the people! Get it done Mr President! Build that Wall!
Liberals are the enemy of the people! Get it done Mr President! Build that Wall!
The Dems have proved what they want, Socialism to take this Country down.  How disgusting for them not to be American enough to want to do what is best for it.  Just like NY Gov and Ca,  govs wanting to give illegals free medical, while we taxpayers foot the bill.  That's not even crazy, it's downright evil.
F Mexico. Don't want those peasants to pay. The American....true Americans will pay.
Time to remove Pelosi and Schumer
Soon u build the dam wall they gonna build damn tunnels to still come thru to the United States
They do not want to w9rk with Trump.  They never wanted a wall or more secure boarder.   SHAME ON OUR SENATE AND CONGRESS
Send all the immigrants to California. It will wake them up
Build the wall for our own safety .No more illegals murdering and raping innocent women and children .
Build the wall for our own safety .No more illegals murdering and raping innocent women and children .
All the Dems care about is politics. Lets get our wall built. Leave those losers in the dust.
All the Dems care about is politics. Lets get our wall built. Leave those losers in the dust.
Let the working people get their paychecks and the poor people get their food stamps! Stop Congress paychecks and the senate paychecks. But all of us that weren’t born with a silver spoon in our mouth might need to feed our children!
Yes, we need border security.  Thank you President Trump for fighting.  Stay strong!  We need a barrier & immigration reform.  🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 Democrats continue to show that they don’t really care about the American citizens- only illegal immigrants & their own power.
My last words your is the worst president ever United States of America you worse than bush I cannot depend on you no more never did New York City we all know you for the crap but I guess is what it is the worst president ever in the United States in America
Build the wall don't give in to those low life liberal thugs that put every thing and every illegal above America and our citzens. Stick to your base we elected you to drain the swamp.
They'll do anything to obstruct. Build the wall and tear down the Democratic Party. MAGA
@SpeakerPelosi The Democrats are not just calling the president a liar they are calling DHS Liars border agents Liars ice agents Liars American people Liars they won't even listen to these people all of these people should sue their employer fornot making their jobsafe timestrike
I don't know how you do this job for free to take care of a country where so many people bitch and complain!! I would've quit a long time ago and let them get screwed! You are AMAZING!
This is the Chuck Schumer Shutdown, Schumer is like a little spoiled brat! Chuck talks out of both sides of his mouth! Schumer, Obama, and Hillary all have said they want a wall but today if they would give money for a wall, it would be a win for the President! They don’t want the President to win bottom line! I want the wall!
Wish, we could have you in Europe. You're the best leader entire planet. Drain the swamp in Europe too, please POTUS 😍
They disagree with you Pelosi and her crew.  You are right in what you said.  Let them open their gatesst their homes  or let them go for a jog in New York or California by themselves with no security or even. Mlm their family.  Lets see how many illegals may hurt or kill them.  I as an Anerican born and raised here want a wall.  Put all our tax dollars to use in our country not given out freely to other countries.   Stay strong please.   Don't give in please.  I want my grandkids to live in a better America. And you are the one to do it.
And the United States needs a wall
I thinks it’s funny how people are bitching about this government shutdown when Obama did the exact same thing for freaking Obamacare.  At least a border would help keep criminals, drugs and illegal immigrants out our country.
President Trump: It’s time to order the arrest and deportation of undocumented DACA and illegal immigrants simultaneously and immediately in all sanctuary cities. So, Democrats will have no way but to give the border wall funds not only $5.6B but for  $25B in exchange of DACA temporary stay pending the passing of comprehensive immigration law. Americans are waiting for your iron fists and we will be supporting you to exercise your emergency power to utilize existing military defense funds if border walll funding bill failed at the Senate and thereby, strongly execute immediate arrest and deportation undertakings  for the protection, security and safety of the American families and children.
It’s pretty obvious to anyone who isn’t a complete idiot that they will do anything to keep you from doing things that you promised to do, because they all know as mostly “career” politicians, that you are only supposed to tell people what you think they want to hear, and never actually carry out anything that would actually HELP your consistency. And, you also should talk out both sides of your mouth and change your position on a given issue any time that the wind changes direction! And, like Obamacare, (said Speaker Pelosi) “You have to pass a bill first in order to see what’s in it!” And, like John Kerry, sometimes you can be “for something before you are against it.” They are all scum-sucking SWAMP CREATURES! Build The Wall!
Can you tell Nancy Pelosi our values are American lives.  Can you tell Schumer American lives are the most Nobel cause and worth every expense. And tell the Democrats to stop lying saying they  want border security The American people are not stupid because their actions do not match their words.
Congress will not listen anyway so we need to start looking into that problem as America is tired of the silly things going on.  Build the dam or wall and let President of the USA finish a job that should have been done 30 years ago.
Build the wall.. And id love to throw Polosi and Chucks ass over it! Democratic Party is a bunch of idiots.
"Illegal Immigrants" are not immigrants, they are invaders. Immigration is a legal process. A stand against the wall, is a stand against the Constitution they took an oath to support and defend:   U.S. Constitution - Article 4 Section 4 - The U.S. Constitution Section 4 - Republican Government. The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature cannot be convened) against domestic Violence.
The Republican Congress came up with a budget in December that passed the Senate 100-0. Trump agreed to it at first, but then backed away because Sean Hannity, Ann Coulter, and a few other right-wing media activists told him not to sign it because they didn't like that it did not address his wall - it had prior been suggested that border security and the wall be looked at with separate funding. When Trump backed out, he took responsibility for the shutdown. He even said so publically on television. So to deny that Trump is solely and utterly responsible for this is outright delusional and a perversion of the facts.
Maybe President Trump should just use all of the time on air playing the past Democrats views on the border and illegal immigrants.  Pelosi, Schumer, Obama, Clinton’s and Biden.  Then their air time would be trying to explain what has changed.
Stay the course, Mr. President!!  Protect our citizens and build the Wall!! The Dems only care about those who want to destroy the people of this great country!!  They have supported and built these walls in the past, so now they choose to politicize!!  We will be on the phone tomorrow to let Congress know that we support the Wall!!
Stay the course, Mr. President!!  Protect our citizens and build the Wall!! The Dems only care about those who want to destroy the people of this great country!!  They have supported and built these walls in the past, so now they choose to politicize!!  We will be on the phone tomorrow to let Congress know that we support the Wall!!
Build the Wall. Other countries have walls .. yet we don't. Pelosi and Schumer are scammers. And WE THE PEOPLE SUPPORT YOU MR.PRESIDENT <3 XOXO
Build the Wall. Other countries have walls .. yet we don't. Pelosi and Schumer are scammers. And WE THE PEOPLE SUPPORT YOU MR.PRESIDENT <3 XOXO
What i didnt understand of what the democrats are saying Pelosi and Schumer is ridiculous. The border needs to be secure. They are giving false facts. What's their answer to the killings by the illegal immigrants???? But Pelosi and Schumer don't care.
Split the country in half.  Democrats on one side Republicans on other.   Bet anything Dems will need our assistance. #changemymind
Build the wall and take pay away from the Dems while the govt is shut down
It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I suggest that if you aren't vigorously fighting other forms of wasteful spending as hard as you are this, you simply are speaking out for one reason. You hate Donald Trump.  So what is the harm if we over protect our border? What if it slows the flow of illegal drugs just enough to save a few lives. I know my family has lost a couple young men to drugs over the last couple years that maybe would still be here if it wasn't so easily accessible.   What if it keeps just a few murderers out of our country. Isn't it worth it? Haven't we wasted money on worse things than this?  Are you so petty that you would oppose this out of spite while not opposing the other billions we waste or the $50 billion a year we just give away to other countries?  It's $5 billion out of $40 trillion of one year's budget.  I bet most of you never fought so hard for such a small percentage of the budget.... until Donald Trump became your president.  Seems pretty obvious to me what your motives are!
When will the liberal voters realize these Democrats are as fake as plastic and could not give two Hoots about anyone but their own egos ...winning politically is all they care about... that means votes getting votes and getting more votes from the dead from the prisoners from the illegals more refugees more refugees more votes... Libs to all illegals: we will give you free housing free money free tax refunds free welfare free healthcare come to us all you who are burdened and we Democrats will do whatever we can to warehouse you in poverty crime and squaller all of you just vote for us ... and guess what the stupid lame & wimp Republicans won't speak up and stop us
Democrats  are also killing ILLINOIS,
Your job is to protect us and keep us safe!  You will have blood on your hands if you don’t fix this!  You will have to live with the fact for those that die of illegal immigrant acts..to include bad drug running!  I have faith in you sir...pull the plug  on this and do the right thing...screw Congress!  Praying for you!
Your job is to protect us and keep us safe!  You will have blood on your hands if you don’t fix this!  You will have to live with the fact for those that die of illegal immigrant acts..to include bad drug running!  I have faith in you sir...pull the plug  on this and do the right thing...screw Congress!  Praying for you!
Actually, this has nothing to do with YOU - you narcissistic boob!
Actually, this has nothing to do with YOU - you narcissistic boob!
BUILD THE WALL....ignore the trolls on here....anyone with any intelligence knows your a great president
BUILD THE WALL....ignore the trolls on here....anyone with any intelligence knows your a great president
The game is uncovered.. Bring more illegal immigrants to get more votes for the (democrats!!) . Build the wall .
They all knew Chuck and Nancy did a crappy job on rebuttal, because they kept sending out more and more moronic Democrats to say something, Bernie, that drunk driver Beto from Texas, and the crazy Cortez chick all came forward. Then the professional liars in the corrupt media took over to tell us why Americans don't deserve protection, and why illegals should come ahead of US citizens. I watched none of it, I turned it off after the POTUS spoke but, but my daughter's twitter feed was on fire. Great job Mr President, stay strong, your voters are still with you.
Good Lord, the democrat's are acting so DESPERATE tonight. They're scurrying around like RAT'S in the kitchen, when the lights have been turned on. (lol)  Danger, danger, Trump's going to convince the world we need a wall. We must stop him! We must stop him! (lol)  How pathetic they are.
Good Lord, the democrat's are acting so DESPERATE tonight. They're scurrying around like RAT'S in the kitchen, when the lights have been turned on. (lol)  Danger, danger, Trump's going to convince the world we need a wall. We must stop him! We must stop him! (lol)  How pathetic they are.
For two solid years Trump has had the White House and the Republicans have had control of both the Senate and the House.    In the two years that Republicans controlled it all they won a few very hard fought battles.   Democrats fought hard but were unable to stop Trump's Tax reform bill, Supreme Court Justice appointments, and Federal appointments.    Now Trump wants Americans to believe that the reason his wall has not been built is because the Democrats have stopped him.  He couldn't get enough support for his wall from his own party.   Now that the Democrats regained control of the House, Trump is using Federal Workers, Federal Contractors, farmers, the list goes on, and the most vulnerable among us as collateral damage while he throws a temper tantrum and shuts down the government with threats to not reopen it until he gets his way.   Prior to shutting down the government, Trump proudly stated on national TV that he would take the full credit for the shutdown and was proud to do it.   Now suddenly, none of this is his fault.  It's the fault of the Democrats who for two solid years were just trying to keep their heads above water because of the power and control Trump was wielding.   The success of the Democrats in the Mid-Terms are a testament that the American people overall are not happy with Trump's presidency.   One of the corner stones of Trump's campaign was to build the wall.   I'm personally old enough to remember when Mexico was going to pay for it.  :)   Trump is nervous about his bid for re-election.   He feels he has to get this wall up as a matter of his own political survival.   Shutting down the government is a serious issue.   Trump is using the government shutdown like an impetuous child.  He doesn't care who gets hurt.   He spews hate and fear to Americans rather than working with his own party as well as Democrats to come to an agreement on rational border security measures.   His is not the behavior of a rational person and most certainly is not acceptable for someone holding the position of President of the United States.   He is acting more like a terrorist than a president.    Disgusting.
26 days Clinton shut down 16 days Obama in history of government shut downs only 3 times republicans controlled house  stay strong secure border stop all taxpayer funding to ALL illegals in country and get term limits with ban on lifetime benefits
Children in flint no water companies in Florida dumping cancerous toxic waste at our back door killing everything causing salt water fish to be extinct by 2048, cost of living constantly goes up every month trump is in office as it is and going to be worse with this wall. So it makes exactly 0 sense to build it.
Yes Americans want Border Security Democrats want Border Security everyone wants it except you Donald Trump you want a wall. So what's more important your useless wall or putting Federal employees back to work because both Republicans and Democrats have pushed bills with Border Security funding and or Government Funding and you've said no because wall Funding was not written in. You own this shutdown you initiated it and now continuing it.
Of course! I’m so dang upset over the democrats that I can’t stand it!!! How in the hell Can President Trump get anything done that will help our country with Pelosi and her puppets in office!! This is the worse of the worst! Why do the democrats get to fire back with lies after OUR President talks! I’m sure I speak for millions of Americans when I say this has got to stop!!! I have NEVER seen anything like what the media is doing and what the Democrats are doing to our people, our country and our children!! OUR PRESIDENT NEEDS TO YOU ABLE TO DO HIS JOB FOR ALL OF US!!!!
Of course! I’m so dang upset over the democrats that I can’t stand it!!! How in the hell Can President Trump get anything done that will help our country with Pelosi and her puppets in office!! This is the worse of the worst! Why do the democrats get to fire back with lies after OUR President talks! I’m sure I speak for millions of Americans when I say this has got to stop!!! I have NEVER seen anything like what the media is doing and what the Democrats are doing to our people, our country and our children!! OUR PRESIDENT NEEDS TO YOU ABLE TO DO HIS JOB FOR ALL OF US!!!!
Build the wall.  It wont prevent illegal invaders totally but will significantly reduce their chances to get in.  We have been Promised a wall since Jimmy Carter but it has all been talk and no action.  The majority of Americans support you stay strong.
Yes you bet I am, it's the only thing standing in the way of tyrants and idiots like you that think they have a right to the services and wages of others.
Yes you bet I am, it's the only thing standing in the way of tyrants and idiots like you that think they have a right to the services and wages of others.
Glenn Lord Sr. My, my, you are such a strong believer in our Constitution, aren't you comrade?
It's us against those that hate America, build the wall and to Hell with the democrats.
It's us against those that hate America, build the wall and to Hell with the democrats.
And you are holding back vets much needed money over all this unnecessary nonsense! Shame on you! You know a lot of them need meds and counseling and rehabilitation and doctors and to pay for their and their families to have housing! You are heartless, cold blooded and selfish and on a very big ego trip and people are or will suffer. That’s not good! You’re not a good person.
The Democrats don’t give a rats ass about the American people!! They just want to stop President Trump from for filling his word!! unlike that Traitor Obama!! It’s time we bring Obama to justice!!! Arrest And convict him of treason!!! And if the minorities want to riot in the streets. We got nationalguard to take care of that problem too!!
This idiot in chief is a lying bastard who doesn’t know what the truth is if it came up to him and introduced its self. He’s a freakn clueless lying asshole.
This idiot in chief is a lying bastard who doesn’t know what the truth is if it came up to him and introduced its self. He’s a freakn clueless lying asshole.
SHUTDOWN: O.K.  Again.  Let me try to explain the procedure again:  Let's say that Trump gives up on getting the wall funded. *stick with me*  Does that immediately end the shut down?  For the people who received an indoctrination instead of an education, the answer is NO.  The HOUSE needs to pass the bill *the CR*.  Then it goes to the SENATE for approval.  Once both the House and Senate pass the bill, THEN it goes to Trump.  If Trump signs off on it, the CR becomes law and the shut down is over.  If Trump doesn't sign off on it, the shut down continues. Then and ONLY THEN, it will be a Trump shut down. I know I lost most of the Democrats with this simple but TRUE example, but that's how it works.  NOW:  Explain HOW the shut down happened?  A bill *the CR with wall money* passed the HOUSE and went to the Senate.  The SENATE did NOT pass the bill because they need 60 votes and there aren't 60 Republican Senators.  So the bill *the CR* NEVER made it to Trump to sign or to veto, which means Trump DID NOT cause the shut down and IS NOT responsible for those who are not getting paid.  Trump is trying to find ways to GET THOSE PEOPLE PAID.  I know that I lost the rest of the Democrats who believe, despite the truth, facts and the legislative process, that Trump is responsible for the shut down. If people want to blame anyone for the government shut down, Blame Schumer and his sycophants in the Senate for shutting down the government and starving sick children and single mothers.
ILLEGAL isn't a RACE..ITS CRIMINAL.  The people who claim its inhuman-where are they with American Vets? Homeless citizens? THIS Border Security is about trying to destroy Pres Trump..and to allow more illegals into the US... IRONICALLY the DEms want BACKGROUND CHECKS for US CItizens BUT not for illegals?? Besides increasing disease, crime, human traffiking, drugs AND hundreds of thousands of illegals without skills/education/money or the ability to be independent... and these illegals want to be on the welfare of American taxpayers-----CAN the DEMS give us reason WHY we should have open borders???
"Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make no progress." -Senator Chuck Schumer, 2009  "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented and unchecked." -Barack Obama, 2005  "I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to try to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders." -Hillary Clinton, 2008
I am certain it's to stop you from fulfilling another promise.  But, hopefully the Dems will grow up and realize that our nations future successes depend on building this wall. The American tax payer can not keep paying for housing and food for all of these illegal people. We already have enough homeless and hungry people to care for.
Donald Trump you will get the wall and a lot more.  And of course, Pelosi and Schumer will take credit for it.  Obama will say he orchestrated it back when he was just a freshman chimp.  But who cares, you're getting the wall.
According to Nancy Pelosi's own speech, "only 2,500 ILLEGALS came across the boarder last week." According to her own speech about a week ago, each illegal "only costs the US Tax payers $70,000 a year." So lets break this down into "factual" numbers according to Ms. Pelosi. Those 2,500 illegals will costs the American Tax Payers $175,000,000.00 (that is 175 MILLION) in the next year. If the 2,500 is an average week then that is 130,000 a year in ILLEGALS. It will cost the American Tax payers over 9.1 BILLION DOLLARS a year to support them! This is only to feed, house, educate and give them health care. If any of them commit a crime and is arrested, then the figure goes up because then US Citizens PAY to DEFEND them! These figures come from the Nancy Pelosi's speeches to convince US Citizens that there is no crisis at the board. REALLY??? Democrats use them to SLAM Trump but neglect to give the full picture! Wake up America and BUILT THE WALL!
go trump go!!  Stop the senators paychecks too! Build that fucking wall!  We the people want it. That's why i voted for you. Stand up to our stupid govt. Hell yes build it and they will come!
go trump go!!  Stop the senators paychecks too! Build that fucking wall!  We the people want it. That's why i voted for you. Stand up to our stupid govt. Hell yes build it and they will come!
Thank you Mr President ❤️you’re fighting with thee most corrupt idiots in the history of our country! We know this! Stand your ground!  BUILD THE WALL!!!!
Thank you Mr President ❤️you’re fighting with thee most corrupt idiots in the history of our country! We know this! Stand your ground!  BUILD THE WALL!!!!
The dems are afraid if Trump gets the wall he will be reelected. Their lust for power is priority one. They are scum.
The dems are afraid if Trump gets the wall he will be reelected. Their lust for power is priority one. They are scum.
We must completely over hual the immigration process in its entirety.. wall=yes ICE= yes Expired Visa= yes Stop illegal newborns in US= yes Illegals voting=yes Illegals recieving our benefits= yes
We must completely over hual the immigration process in its entirety.. wall=yes ICE= yes Expired Visa= yes Stop illegal newborns in US= yes Illegals voting=yes Illegals recieving our benefits= yes
Build the wall and let's re open the government and move on with your agenda just do it
Build the wall and let's re open the government and move on with your agenda just do it
It’s really sickening the way MSM is covering the anticipated speech and saying it’s not going to be factual and there is no crisis.  Get all your facts out there — especially the fact that they are proposing money from our budget and tax dollars to build a wall in Tunisia.  The minuscule percentage of the budget that 5B is and the billions paid out every year in “social programs” for ILLEGALS, including the cost of sanctuary cities, prison, opioid epidemic, human trafficking etc.  There better be a comprehensive plan of immigration reform, e-verify, a census with the citizenship question on it, cleaned up voter rolls, a consistent election process in all states, etc.  Do Dems not want it nor see that you were elected because you promised this reform — it’s not a political promise it’s the job you promised to do.  And it’s what we voted for.  They offer no solutions, just opposition.  Design the wall based on what the border patrol tells you they want and need — not the Dems.
You are correct President Trump.  It is 100% about keeping you from winning in 2020.  The Dem's hate America and are obsessed with power at levels unimagined in our nation's history.  Keep fighting, because we really have nothing left to do.  We love you and we love your beliefs.  We know your heart and we know that you are our last Hope.  If the dems win, the nation is doomed and we will be flooded with cancers disguised in human flesh that will be unbeatable. We will be poisoned till death as a nation.  Please keep fighting.  I am so glad that Lindsay Graham is on your side and he is willing to back the TRUTH. Keep fighting Mr. President we love you!
THERE IS NO CRISIS..YOU ARE A STUPID IDIOT..CONGRESS PLEASE IMPEACH THIS MOTHERFUCKER
Trump should pay for the wall HIMSELF, since he LIED about getting Mexico to pay for it!  Don't steal our taxpayer money because you couldn't deliver on your promise!
Trump should pay for the wall HIMSELF, since he LIED about getting Mexico to pay for it!  Don't steal our taxpayer money because you couldn't deliver on your promise!
Build the wall however you have to do it. The Dems haven't done anything for the last two years . It's my money paying for their BS and I'm tired of it . They sit there on their high horse making jokes , nothing funny about it .
Build the wall however you have to do it. The Dems haven't done anything for the last two years . It's my money paying for their BS and I'm tired of it . They sit there on their high horse making jokes , nothing funny about it .
Another Trump lie:  All four living former presidents deny telling Donald Trump that they support his long-promised border wall, contradicting the president’s false claim that his predecessors “told me that we should have” built the wall.  “This should have been done by all of the presidents that preceded me, and they all know it,” Trump said during a news conference on Friday. “Some of them have told me that we should have done it.”  On Monday, former President Jimmy Carter joined the three other living former presidents in confirming that Trump lied about the claim.  “I have not discussed the border wall with President Trump, and do not support him on the issue,” Carter said in a statement through his presidential center. Spokesmen for former Presidents Bill Clinton and George W. Bush told Politico Friday that neither of them had discussed the border wall with Trump. Former President Barack Obama’s spokesman declined to comment.  Aside from a brief interaction at former President George H.W. Bush’s funeral last month, Obama has not spoken to Trump since leaving office in 2017, Politico reported.  However, Obama has repeatedly railed against Trump’s proposal for a border wall.  “We can’t just put walls up all around America. Walls don’t keep out threats like terrorism or disease ― and that’s why we propose leading our alliances and helping other countries develop, and pushing back against tyrants,” Obama said in a speech in September.  During Trump’s presidential campaign in 2016, Obama called the wall “impractical” and quipped: “Good luck with that.”
Another Trump lie:  All four living former presidents deny telling Donald Trump that they support his long-promised border wall, contradicting the president’s false claim that his predecessors “told me that we should have” built the wall.  “This should have been done by all of the presidents that preceded me, and they all know it,” Trump said during a news conference on Friday. “Some of them have told me that we should have done it.”  On Monday, former President Jimmy Carter joined the three other living former presidents in confirming that Trump lied about the claim.  “I have not discussed the border wall with President Trump, and do not support him on the issue,” Carter said in a statement through his presidential center. Spokesmen for former Presidents Bill Clinton and George W. Bush told Politico Friday that neither of them had discussed the border wall with Trump. Former President Barack Obama’s spokesman declined to comment.  Aside from a brief interaction at former President George H.W. Bush’s funeral last month, Obama has not spoken to Trump since leaving office in 2017, Politico reported.  However, Obama has repeatedly railed against Trump’s proposal for a border wall.  “We can’t just put walls up all around America. Walls don’t keep out threats like terrorism or disease ― and that’s why we propose leading our alliances and helping other countries develop, and pushing back against tyrants,” Obama said in a speech in September.  During Trump’s presidential campaign in 2016, Obama called the wall “impractical” and quipped: “Good luck with that.”
What else do dems have to do? You got unemployment down to 3.7%, millions more jobs, have and /or are getting us better trade deals, tax cut......What do the dems have to run on? Fixing the economy? Ha Ha Ha Ha
What else do dems have to do? You got unemployment down to 3.7%, millions more jobs, have and /or are getting us better trade deals, tax cut......What do the dems have to run on? Fixing the economy? Ha Ha Ha Ha
When these self gratifying , liberal, socialist pushers were put into office, they had to swear to uphold the constitution and protect our boarders! Anything less than that is a act of TREASON.
When these self gratifying , liberal, socialist pushers were put into office, they had to swear to uphold the constitution and protect our boarders! Anything less than that is a act of TREASON.
We should "spend money to build a barrier to ... prevent illegal immigrants from coming in ..." (Hillary Clinton in 2015) "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented, [and] unchecked ..." (then-U.S. Sen. Barack Obama in 2005) "Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple ..." (U.S. Sen. Chuck Schumer in 2009)
We should "spend money to build a barrier to ... prevent illegal immigrants from coming in ..." (Hillary Clinton in 2015) "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented, [and] unchecked ..." (then-U.S. Sen. Barack Obama in 2005) "Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple ..." (U.S. Sen. Chuck Schumer in 2009)
Most of the idiots that post here got their education from a tampon box. There is no way they can understand the process of absolute genius when they are limited by their “feels” as actual facts.  Remember.. a well fed slave will never want to be freed. Fund the wall by cutting unnecessary handouts. How many jobs could be created if you took those welfare junkies and made them build the wall for their meal ticket...?
Most of the idiots that post here got their education from a tampon box. There is no way they can understand the process of absolute genius when they are limited by their “feels” as actual facts.  Remember.. a well fed slave will never want to be freed. Fund the wall by cutting unnecessary handouts. How many jobs could be created if you took those welfare junkies and made them build the wall for their meal ticket...?
Build the wall! Come to our country legally!
Build the wall! Come to our country legally!
Tell em to get it Done or the country mine as well lower the flag permanently. You can also tell all the anti Trumpers that if they wanna protest they should go home and take down the fence's in their own yard if they dont believe we dont need barriers. Either way I'm all for it.
Tell em to get it Done or the country mine as well lower the flag permanently. You can also tell all the anti Trumpers that if they wanna protest they should go home and take down the fence's in their own yard if they dont believe we dont need barriers. Either way I'm all for it.
Liz Hall  REALLY?
Liz Hall  I'm a DECENT American citizen, work, pay my bills, and educated!! I just don't agree with the method he's using to get what he wants. It can be accomplished thru other means without hurting so many people in the process. I'm not looking for a fight just stating my opinion, and it's my right!! I guess you weren't taught, "If you can't say something nice maybe you shouldn't say anything at all."
Angie Glass-Finegan Great build it to keep Americans safe.
Sheryl Helmich What's wrong with you!!!!😳😳😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂😂
Sheryl Helmich Wake up. He had over 300,000 more jobs added in Dec.❤Maybe you need a second job, like a lot of DECENT AMERICANS
Sheryl Helmich Wake up. He had over 300,000 more jobs added in Dec.❤Maybe you need a second job, like a lot of DECENT AMERICANS
I'm a military wife. I don't oppose the boarder and policing it but we have the East/West coast and the northern boarder as well not to mention the airways. You can't encapsulate the United States!!    Americans want to pay their bills, feed their families, have a roof over their heads. Mr President you are hurting the American people! Why can't you see that?  What's wrong with you? How can you sleep at night? You'll eat, have a roof over your head, and be able to pay your bills! You need to put yourself in the common wealth of America's shoes just maybe you'll have compassion. That remains to be seen.  You started out doing good but you've recently lost sight and are hurting the American people and that is unacceptable, Sir!! Why doesn't the government spend the money that has been confiscated from Chavez (drug lord) and put it to good use. All drug money that's Confiscated period!! That makes good sense to me and we, the Americans don't pay the price!! Please, please, think about it for Gods sake.
I'm a military wife. I don't oppose the boarder and policing it but we have the East/West coast and the northern boarder as well not to mention the airways. You can't encapsulate the United States!!    Americans want to pay their bills, feed their families, have a roof over their heads. Mr President you are hurting the American people! Why can't you see that?  What's wrong with you? How can you sleep at night? You'll eat, have a roof over your head, and be able to pay your bills! You need to put yourself in the common wealth of America's shoes just maybe you'll have compassion. That remains to be seen.  You started out doing good but you've recently lost sight and are hurting the American people and that is unacceptable, Sir!! Why doesn't the government spend the money that has been confiscated from Chavez (drug lord) and put it to good use. All drug money that's Confiscated period!! That makes good sense to me and we, the Americans don't pay the price!! Please, please, think about it for Gods sake.
Walls work pretty damn well, they served the Romans, the Chinese built one hell of a wall, the wall in Berlin stood longer than it should have, we have been guarding one heck of a wall on the 38th parallel for nearly 70 years, The Sumerians’ Amorite Wall worked great, the Long Walls protected Athens, the  Great Wall of Gorgan known as Alexander the Great’s Wall, Hadrian’s Wall and the Theodosian Walls and Nancy Pelosi’s Manor Wall. Seems walls are a great idea to keep criminals and trash out. Just build some nice gates for green card workers and legal immigrants....
Walls work pretty damn well, they served the Romans, the Chinese built one hell of a wall, the wall in Berlin stood longer than it should have, we have been guarding one heck of a wall on the 38th parallel for nearly 70 years, The Sumerians’ Amorite Wall worked great, the Long Walls protected Athens, the  Great Wall of Gorgan known as Alexander the Great’s Wall, Hadrian’s Wall and the Theodosian Walls and Nancy Pelosi’s Manor Wall. Seems walls are a great idea to keep criminals and trash out. Just build some nice gates for green card workers and legal immigrants....
Mr. President Donald Trump.  I'm a Dane living in Berlin. Europa needs a President like you, the best USA President since President Ronald Regan.  We Europeans have the German desaster Angela Merkel.  Look at Europa and see what she have done with the Europeans people.  We are over flooded with Muslims and Africans too, and Islam makes so much krime and chaos over all in Europe.  Killing, terror, rape the European womens, that is what Angela Merkel and her terror army from the muslims and africans have done with Europeans citizens.  We do not have a wall, and Europe need it.   You can build it and protect your citizens from the deasters like what we do have ib Europe.   Mr President Donald Trump.   Build the wall!
Mr. President Donald Trump.  I'm a Dane living in Berlin. Europa needs a President like you, the best USA President since President Ronald Regan.  We Europeans have the German desaster Angela Merkel.  Look at Europa and see what she have done with the Europeans people.  We are over flooded with Muslims and Africans too, and Islam makes so much krime and chaos over all in Europe.  Killing, terror, rape the European womens, that is what Angela Merkel and her terror army from the muslims and africans have done with Europeans citizens.  We do not have a wall, and Europe need it.   You can build it and protect your citizens from the deasters like what we do have ib Europe.   Mr President Donald Trump.   Build the wall!
Haha. Trump you’re an idiot.   You had the White House the house AND senate, yet your dumbass still couldnt get it done because Americans don’t think the wall is necessary. Not even the gop supported you.   You and your people are lying about 4000 “terrorists?”  The real number is 6 and most come from the airport.   The democrats are simply saying enough.   And did you see that headline about your campaign manager sharing intel with Russia intel.   We have some collusion....Donny the fraudy.
Haha. Trump you’re an idiot.   You had the White House the house AND senate, yet your dumbass still couldnt get it done because Americans don’t think the wall is necessary. Not even the gop supported you.   You and your people are lying about 4000 “terrorists?”  The real number is 6 and most come from the airport.   The democrats are simply saying enough.   And did you see that headline about your campaign manager sharing intel with Russia intel.   We have some collusion....Donny the fraudy.
Schumer and Pelosi:  Retire old man! Retire old woman! We need new blood in the senate. The president knows how the world is now. It’s not like it was many years ago when people came here from other countries to work hard and become a citizen. Today they come to take advantage our open system, have as many children as they can and we the American tax payer pays for them freebies.They come to destroy us  from within. And with people like you Schumer and crazy Nancy who have been in there way to long they  should be retired. They are not thinking in 2919.  We have to protect our boarders,not immoral,hypocrites democrats. No questions,please President Trump❤️🇺🇸  build the wall!!!
Schumer and Pelosi:  Retire old man! Retire old woman! We need new blood in the senate. The president knows how the world is now. It’s not like it was many years ago when people came here from other countries to work hard and become a citizen. Today they come to take advantage our open system, have as many children as they can and we the American tax payer pays for them freebies.They come to destroy us  from within. And with people like you Schumer and crazy Nancy who have been in there way to long they  should be retired. They are not thinking in 2919.  We have to protect our boarders,not immoral,hypocrites democrats. No questions,please President Trump❤️🇺🇸  build the wall!!!
Yes we do, and do do they! They do not want to give you success!!  Democrats say: see below quotes...  "Illegal Immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make no progress." -Senator Chuck Schumer, 2009 "We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected, undocumented and unchecked." -Barack Obama, 2005 "I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to try to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders." -Hillary Clinton, 2008
They won't ever give you a thing.  They don't care about the USA.  They are globalists.  When they said they wanted to secure the border in past years......they LIED.  They only wanted the votes on both sides of the isle.  Lying is a means to an end for these despicable people.  They really just need to be ignored and avoided.
They won't ever give you a thing.  They don't care about the USA.  They are globalists.  When they said they wanted to secure the border in past years......they LIED.  They only wanted the votes on both sides of the isle.  Lying is a means to an end for these despicable people.  They really just need to be ignored and avoided.
My President is being Obstructed by Democrats from doing the job We The People overwhelmingly elected him to do. He promised us border security and protection, and we want OUR tax dollars used to erect “steel slats”, not brick walls like surrounds the Obama’s and Pelosi’s mansions, to name a few. If the Dems continue to obstruct the work of our President, maybe they should be paid by merit/hour? Something We The People should consider discussing to vote on for the next election!
Don’t give in Mr President!  Keep us shut down till the Dems get on their knees and apologize to the American people for ruining Our Country!  MAGA 2020!!!
Don’t give in Mr President!  Keep us shut down till the Dems get on their knees and apologize to the American people for ruining Our Country!  MAGA 2020!!!
These Democrats are unbelievable!! They do not care about your safety!! I can hardly believe this BS they are telling and to belittle the president !! His main campaign was to secure our borders and we voted for him to do what he promised he said he would ... now the Dems want to say that , that is not what the American people want? WHAT?  Are you kidding me .... we would only want Legal immigrants to this country not ones who think they can just push and free load off us and expect us to change our laws.  Do you taxpayers want to pay for these illegals . The healthcare and housing , food etc that we would have to supply to them gives them handout that we Americans don’t even get!!  You either come her legally or stay out !!   BUILD THE WALL
Americans want security, 70% don't want the wall. Pay attention Cadet Bonespurs. And your "promise' was do the doucebags in your base, not to the majority.
No taxpayers money for the wall liberals?  Fine. We'll GoFundMe it. Oh by the way. No more taxpayer's money for illegal immigrants. No food,shelter, education, or medical help. GoFundMe them yourselves.  Fair deal. Wall is 25 billion one time investment. Illegals cost 125 billion a year. You liberals are stupid. Stop funding illegals with my taxes.
No taxpayers money for the wall liberals?  Fine. We'll GoFundMe it. Oh by the way. No more taxpayer's money for illegal immigrants. No food,shelter, education, or medical help. GoFundMe them yourselves.  Fair deal. Wall is 25 billion one time investment. Illegals cost 125 billion a year. You liberals are stupid. Stop funding illegals with my taxes.
PLAY THESE TONIGHT  .............“We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected., undocumented, unchecked” . 0bama 2009 “I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders” Hillary Clinton 2008 “Illegal immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make n progress”. Chuck Schumer 2009
PLAY THESE TONIGHT  .............“We simply cannot allow people to pour into the United States undetected., undocumented, unchecked” . 0bama 2009 “I voted numerous times… to spend money to build a barrier to prevent illegal immigrants from coming in. And I do think you have to control your borders” Hillary Clinton 2008 “Illegal immigration is wrong, plain and simple. Until the American people are convinced we will stop future flows of illegal immigration, we will make n progress”. Chuck Schumer 2009
You go orange clown keep the circus going
You go orange clown keep the circus going
That's right trump! Stop the welfare for immigrants and free health care, they'll leave.  If they do work, They come here make money and send it back home. They are good for nothing
To all of Congress who don't want a barrier ( wall of some kind ) with armed guards.       You should lead by example and remove your walls and armed security you have protecting your loved ones.    As we all know most of you have one just like Nancy Pelosi.    You want our respect....     Earn it..      Put this Country and it US Citizens  first before you give away our tax earned dollars to other countries.
To all of Congress who don't want a barrier ( wall of some kind ) with armed guards.       You should lead by example and remove your walls and armed security you have protecting your loved ones.    As we all know most of you have one just like Nancy Pelosi.    You want our respect....     Earn it..      Put this Country and it US Citizens  first before you give away our tax earned dollars to other countries.
Why don’t you change it to ports of entry.......your statistics don’t support a wall. Plus it’s ridiculous. Democrats are giving you hits, ports of entry.....
Stand your ground President Trump that's what your supporters expect and will continually stand up and support you 💯%!!! MAGA ONWARDS!!!
Stand your ground President Trump that's what your supporters expect and will continually stand up and support you 💯%!!! MAGA ONWARDS!!!
Ron Wissler then why is he still demanding it?
Ron Wissler As vets go homeless, children are hungry, the seniors go without.  There is a special place in hell for you bigoted republicans.
Ron Wissler As vets go homeless, children are hungry, the seniors go without.  There is a special place in hell for you bigoted republicans.
If this bullshit wall was such an emergency, why didn't you get it while you controlled the house and Senate?  This alone makes you a fucking liar.
If this bullshit wall was such an emergency, why didn't you get it while you controlled the house and Senate?  This alone makes you a fucking liar.
Millions of Liberal junkies don't want their drugs from Mexico to dry up and the cartels are known to buy politicians. The DNC Chuck Schumer Speaker Pelosi are on their side but really? http://thefederalist.com/2019/01/02/central-american-countries-helping-middle-easterners-illegally-enter-united-states/?utm_source=deployer&utm_medium=email&utm_campaign=newslink&utm_term=members&utm_content=20190108235300&fbclid=IwAR1TQUQfKVBqpC8Dj-PNbt8JpQvDxntJzuk661RvoerWnDyTFCCnElQIHQc … al Shabaab terrorists? #BuildTheWall
The only thing needed to prove fake news is Hillary won oops wait a second
Use your emergency powers. Enough with the  communist enemy with in our own government  and their lying  propaganda  deep  state media arm. Expose them all. Talk straight and tell the whole truth.
When we're done building the wall on Mexico we're going to be the biggest consumers of Steel we're going to be able to pay for the wall around Canada from the proceeds of Mexico
When we're done building the wall on Mexico we're going to be the biggest consumers of Steel we're going to be able to pay for the wall around Canada from the proceeds of Mexico
If Trump declares an "emergency" it just proves he's the biggest baby on the planet. There is no "emergency", you blubbering drama queen.
THE DEMS ARE UNHINGED. TIME TO MOVE WITHOUT THEM. YOU KNOW LIKE WHEN OBIE SENT ALL THAT CASH TO HIS TERRORIST FRIENDS WITHOUT CONGRESS APPROVAL.  YEAH..LIKE THAT. #KAG
THE DEMS ARE UNHINGED. TIME TO MOVE WITHOUT THEM. YOU KNOW LIKE WHEN OBIE SENT ALL THAT CASH TO HIS TERRORIST FRIENDS WITHOUT CONGRESS APPROVAL.  YEAH..LIKE THAT. #KAG
Stand strong President Donald J. Trump. The American people are behind you.
Stand strong President Donald J. Trump. The American people are behind you.
Biggest news story in existence right now! And I don't expect you blind supporters who have your eye on that stupid wall and this con-job distraction that he's got going on to understand... But you will soon understand what all of this means. And you will stand, jaw dropped. And feeling quite foolish.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
Biggest news story in existence right now! And I don't expect you blind supporters who have your eye on that stupid wall and this con-job distraction that he's got going on to understand... But you will soon understand what all of this means. And you will stand, jaw dropped. And feeling quite foolish.  https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
THE RUMP is the enemy of truth, justice and honesty and the enemy of REAL AMERICANS !!!
If you declare an emergency, when there IS NO EMERGENCY. that is ABUSE OF POWER.  More ammo to get you impeached, so go ahead.
Americans want you behind bars. The end.
The campaign gave you a Wall to talk about because your an aging dotard. So they said train him to talk about the WALL so he remembers to talk about immigration. TRUTH liar does not escape the majority of Americans. The only crisis is you.We must remove you NOW. Let's see the lies you tell to try and declare a national emergency. Your not our dictator, you are abusing the office. You are lying ,no , let me repeat, no terrorist have come across the southern border#mueller time#impeachthetyrant
The campaign gave you a Wall to talk about because your an aging dotard. So they said train him to talk about the WALL so he remembers to talk about immigration. TRUTH liar does not escape the majority of Americans. The only crisis is you.We must remove you NOW. Let's see the lies you tell to try and declare a national emergency. Your not our dictator, you are abusing the office. You are lying ,no , let me repeat, no terrorist have come across the southern border#mueller time#impeachthetyrant
Trump is now pinning his near-term political future on his promise of a wall that would no longer be a wall, and that neither Mexico nor Congress is willing to pay for. All of this in the service of a campaign promise that never had broad public support in the first place. Trump supporters are a minority in this country, not "we the people".
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
Stand strong President Trump. America is behind you. Build the wall! The Dems will stop you anyway they can! You should play clips on TV tonight of other times Nancy and Chuck agreed to the wall. If you didn't want the wall, they would. They need to put America first before their own agendas and temper tantrums. Build the wall and shut down the border!
Stand strong President Trump. America is behind you. Build the wall! The Dems will stop you anyway they can! You should play clips on TV tonight of other times Nancy and Chuck agreed to the wall. If you didn't want the wall, they would. They need to put America first before their own agendas and temper tantrums. Build the wall and shut down the border!
If the BBC was broadcasting proTrump news the Democrats would be yelling and demanding that foreign press has no right to interfere in our politics in our country.
If the BBC was broadcasting proTrump news the Democrats would be yelling and demanding that foreign press has no right to interfere in our politics in our country.
OVER 15,000 PEOPLE DIE FROM HEROIN EACH YEAR...THAT IS 327 PER WEEK!!  90% to 94% of heroin consumed in the United States COMES FROM MEXICO!!  70,000 AMERICANS DIED OF OVERDOSES IN 2017......58,220 AMERICANS DIED IN THE VIETNAM WAR!!  FIGURE THOSE OUT AND NO DOUBT WE NEED THAT STRONG WALL.
You promise Mexico will pay the wall.
100/100 PERCENT WITH YOU MR PRESIDENT. All thoes who would impede sensible border protection share in the guilt and responsibility for the deaths of innocent Americans..how can one not care for anothers child is staggering.  https://www.facebook.com/189531267729007/posts/2494717580543686/
100/100 PERCENT WITH YOU MR PRESIDENT. All thoes who would impede sensible border protection share in the guilt and responsibility for the deaths of innocent Americans..how can one not care for anothers child is staggering.  https://www.facebook.com/189531267729007/posts/2494717580543686/
No matter your political standing you must love and protect your country.  Just hating 1 man is not a good answer, grow up.
Actually any of the polls I have seen recently say 56% of Americans DO NOT want the wall.  http://fortune.com/2018/12/12/trump-border-wall-poll/
Boarder security and a wall are two different things! You just want the wall because of your inflated ego...smh
ONLY THING THEY CARE TO DO IS STOP THAT WALL AT ANY COST! ... EVEN IF THE COST IS  THE DESTRUCTION OF AMERICA AS WE KNOW IT... LOOK AT THEIR ACTIONS...
Mexico will paid the wall? Trump need to pay taxes and pay the wall :)
God don't mess with a son of a b****
Sue Schuster Aalykke I prefer he not keep ANY promise regarding that wall. Border security does not equal a wall.
Sue Schuster Aalykke durp durp durp dur dur  durrrrrrrrrrrppppp durp durp !!!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒 ooooohh ooooh ah ah !!!!
The promise you made is Mexico would pay for the wall.  You are not keeping your promise.
I QUESTION, HOW IS ALL THE DIVISION AND THE HATE AND FEAR MONGERING AND EVIL THOUGHTS AND ACTIONS MAKING AMERICA GREAT AGAIN? IS THIS “THE LAND OF THE FREE AND THE HOME OF THE BRAVE”? GOD BLESS AMERICA? COULD GOD SOON BEGIN TO WONDER WHY? IS AMERICA BECOMING NO LONGER WORTHY? IS THE END NEAR? IT’S TIME TO CHANGE TO PLEASE GOD!
We got your back President Donald J. Trump!
Will Woolley my boy
Will Woolley my boy
Nancy Pelosi 🇺🇸202🇺🇸225🇺🇸4965🇺🇸  Chuck Schumer 🇺🇸202🇺🇸224🇺🇸7433  1) Be polite  2) walls work. It will slow them down with great surveillance will allow agents time to respond and apprehend  3) you are smart enough to know the threat is from the unknown and not those who have overstayed. Those were screened by a consulate OFFICER and the hairs on the back of the neck of a border patrol agent at a port of entry.  4) you will punish every Democrat on every ballot until you get the wall democrats have already voted for in the past.  5) it is a win for America and not President Trump  Thank you for standing up for America and the rule of law. Looking forward to your 2020 win.
Nancy Pelosi 🇺🇸202🇺🇸225🇺🇸4965🇺🇸  Chuck Schumer 🇺🇸202🇺🇸224🇺🇸7433  1) Be polite  2) walls work. It will slow them down with great surveillance will allow agents time to respond and apprehend  3) you are smart enough to know the threat is from the unknown and not those who have overstayed. Those were screened by a consulate OFFICER and the hairs on the back of the neck of a border patrol agent at a port of entry.  4) you will punish every Democrat on every ballot until you get the wall democrats have already voted for in the past.  5) it is a win for America and not President Trump  Thank you for standing up for America and the rule of law. Looking forward to your 2020 win.
Your promise, President Donald J. Trump, was to have Mexico pay for The Wall. Why are you stopping from fulfilling your promise?
To be secured , you need 2nd wall between Canada and the US ,fence America in like Israel !
Go Pres. Trump. We aĺl know that you only want the best for your people.
You would have been wise to completely Shut Down the Border.
You would have been wise to completely Shut Down the Border.
Yea shutdown Sandra Cuevas
Smart girl Brooke Cloninger.
Smart girl Brooke Cloninger.
ALL HAIL EMPEROR Donald J. Trump!
I'm from Germany and I know the meaning of a wall. Build the wall! Build the wall!! Away with the Deep State - every day of delay are innocent dead more.
Amen
Hi
tttttttell
They are not interested in one thing or the other, they are concerned about their own skin. In other words, they will try to get you in the pan in every possible way. Even with the worst tricks and feints. Be assured. The snot lives and keeps trying to kill you. Flatten them before they do.
Working together!!! 💪
No wall.
No wall.
Drey Claude This is not a Trump issue. You must be 2 year's old. It's been a big issues since. President Reagan. Bush Clinton bush Obama all recognized it. Finally someone wants to fix it
TROLL ALERT!!!
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Jesus Weeps! Mike Pence, a “man” who states he is a devoted follower of Jesus Christ LIES to his fellow Americans concerning Southern Border & defends the LIES of Donald J Trump. HE IS NOT A MAN OF GOD!   https://www.google.com/amp/s/thinkprogress.org/pence-defends-trumps-lie-presidents-dont-support-border-wall-f71c1ad56e10/amp/Pence was asked about Trump’s blatant border wall lie during interview. It didn’t go well.thinkprogress.org
Revolution
Build it!
WALL!
Promise
Yes we do!!
Yes we do!!
Build it
Trump 2020
Natalie Harris Gilbert build the wall! Protect America! MAGA!
Yes we do !
Yes we do !
Lies already
Agree
support you
Bullshit
News is saying the wall ball is in Trumps court—- NO ITS IN THE DEMOCRATS COURT.  Dems are just standing there with their thumb in their ear.
Your campaign stunt is coming back to screw you. You never wanted a wall. You lied.
You Are a Joke
You Are a Joke
Retiring Border Chief says Trump wall is waste of time and money. https://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trumps-border-wall-waste-time-money-retiring-border/story?id=44978156&cid=share_facebook_widget&fbclid=IwAR0pVc6X3cluWJSHyg0mMsRlizx7wwK2sTBt-0qPQuCl3_EUy_OqwVbqAegRetiring Border Chief Calls Trump's Wall a Waste of Time, Moneyabcnews.go.com
Uhhh.... your promise was Mexico would pay for it... you even wrote a written statement saying THEY WOULD PAY.  So you are stopping yourself because you made false proclamations.
If anyone wants to contribute to the education of the planets climate changes for future purposes, you can donate to the Magnetic Field Monitoring Centers, payable to Nna Emeka. Contact me. Magnetic Field Monitoring Centers hopeful to have been informative and wishing everyone well through the climate changes. https://m.facebook.com/story/graphql_permalink/?graphql_id=UzpfSTEwMDAwNjQ3NDY5NzgzMjoyOTI2NTg1Nzg0MjMzODgz
OPEN the portion of goverment that YOU are holding hostage!! What's wrong with you??? You are the one that said "I'll take the blame and NOT blame you Chuck!!!!!!! What's wrong with YOU?
Hold all the pay for those who don,t want the wall Release The Names Of All Who Used The slush fund. Make Them Pay it Back. More Cleaning Needs To be Done Mueller Belongs In jail with comey,rosenstein,Kelly holder,Rice Lynch,Schiff Clapper,Brannen Obama clintons And more. Get The Scun Out..
The sad part about your comment is that it has nothing to do with what is best for the country. All that matters to you is getting your way at all cost. The facts don't support much of what you say. You lied to us about who would pay for the wall. You lied about carrying the mantle for the shutdown. You lied about being proud to shutdown the government, holding it hostage and putting 800,000 people out of work. Working together means give and take on both sides, and not everyone else should give and you just get to take.
Stop calling them Democrats. They are no longer Democrats. They are Communists. Party first. Country last. Communism's core tenant.
So let's all take a poll on how many lies he's going to tell tonight over border security you don't need a wall people we need better border security what a lying POS POTUS
So let's all take a poll on how many lies he's going to tell tonight over border security you don't need a wall people we need better border security what a lying POS POTUS
Lmaoooo ur promise failure is solely urs and Mexico's. Democrats have nothing to do with ur incompetence. Lmaooo  and they don't need u when it comes to border security. They were already talking about it
Lmaoooo ur promise failure is solely urs and Mexico's. Democrats have nothing to do with ur incompetence. Lmaooo  and they don't need u when it comes to border security. They were already talking about it
Yes
Amen
Amen
Yes
You got this
You got this
Thank you
Trump 2020
Trump 2020
Distraction
Fake news
MAGA. 🇺🇸
Amen
Hero
I would say restoring dignity to the office of the Presidency, getting you out of the White House and then fumigating the place is more of a priority
I would say restoring dignity to the office of the Presidency, getting you out of the White House and then fumigating the place is more of a priority
NO AMNESTY OR CITIZENSHIP DEAL! Don't cave for DACA or Dreamers because they are already talking about what is going to happen to the ones flooding our borders now. Soon we'll have 100 million illegals turning America into a 3rd world hellhole like what they came from.
NO AMNESTY OR CITIZENSHIP DEAL! Don't cave for DACA or Dreamers because they are already talking about what is going to happen to the ones flooding our borders now. Soon we'll have 100 million illegals turning America into a 3rd world hellhole like what they came from.
Both
MAGA
MAGA
Demorats don't care about this country they care about citizens of other countries and the kickbacks from the cartels.
No DACA!
No DACA!
Build
Do it !
Do it !
Build it ❤🇺🇸
Build it ❤🇺🇸
Build it!
Build it!
Yes
Now!
Good
Yeah
Build it!🇺🇸
Build it!🇺🇸
YES WE DO
No we dont.
Thanks
Get it passed
Build it!!!
Build it!!!
I like
Don't cave!
YES, WE DO!
Yes yes ye
Amen Bob !!!
Build it!
Americans may want border security, but the majority of them don’t want a wall. There are better ways to secure the border. Ask some actual experts and maybe they can explain it to you. If you will actually listen.
Americans may want border security, but the majority of them don’t want a wall. There are better ways to secure the border. Ask some actual experts and maybe they can explain it to you. If you will actually listen.
whats more important to the republicans? bowing down to a dictator or having a president that actually listens and makes deals instead of throwing temper tantrums. Border security yes, opening up gov. yes, giving into a spoilt entitled brat that thinks he know everything better than everybody else including his generals NO. Collusion proven, election meddling proven, corruption proven..getting closer to swamp thang everyday. Indite, impeach and lock him up!
Stoping you build the wall president trump the people stand with you🖖
Wall
Yup
Love you ❤️
Build it!!!
Build it!!!
MIRROR IMAGE SON?
Dick
Merica 🇺🇸
SAPPERS
Yes  we do!
Yes  we do!
SAPPERS
Yes we do
Both .
Build the WALL don't give up PRESIDENT DONALD J TRUMP
Build the WALL don't give up PRESIDENT DONALD J TRUMP
GFY.
Wow!
Gfy
Yes
yes
Amen!
Amen!
F'king Whack job!
Build it
Amen!!
Shut up.
Great speech!
Lock him up!!!
Lock him up!!!
Yes we do!
Lie baby
There's far more important issues to deal with than building a fucking wall!
Amen
Yes
Yes
Great Prez
Stopping
Build it!!!
Build it!!!
Fake news
YES we do!!!
Build it
Americans want border security; the majority (69%) just don’t think a wall is an effective way to do it.
Maga
Yes
Yes!
Amen
Amen
Yes.
Stay strong 💪
Stay strong 💪
Yes we do
Yes we do
Yes we do!
Mexico!!
No weeeeek dont
Liar
Yes
Liar
Gfy
Gfy
Amen
Exactly!
MAGA 2020
❤️ you trump
❤️ you trump
Do it Pres. Trump
Yes we do !
Yes we do !
Yes
Ha
Ha
Gfy
Gfy
I'll ride with you Rick Renfroe
I'll ride with you Rick Renfroe
I dont care
yes we do
😂😂😂😂 Ay3ka
Yes we do!
No we don’t
Yes we do!
Go Trump!
Roman Abramovich....is a Russian billionaire with ties to Putin, a friend of trump, and co-owner of a number of steel mills in the US, and quite 'coincedentally', the only mills capable of producing the rail lengths necessary for the wall...and conveniently, there are no tariffs for the Russians. Starting to make any sense yet?
Lies
Your promise was to get mexico to pay for the wall, liar in chief 😏
Lies
Both
That right
Go trump
go for it
go for it
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Amen
Amen
Build it
Build it
Stoping you
Lies lies
Ass
Build it.
Yes we do!
Yes we do.
Yes we do.
Build it !’
Yes sir
Build it!
Yes
Wall!
Yes ... we need it
Yes we do!
Yes
Yes
Any president who is working to keep his campaign promises not only deserved to be appluaded, he deserve to be celebrated. Thumbs up president Trump for putting your people first.
Obstruction!
Don’t budge
Don’t budge
Yes we do!
Yes we do
Yes I do!!
Yes I do!!
Build it!
Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes we do!!!
Hold fast!!
So true
Trump2020!!
I agree
YES!
My man
My man
We do!
I'm with ya
Yes Please
Yes Please
Agree!
Agree!
Build it!
Exactly.
Ha
YES, we do.
Well said.
Absolutely
Your on fire 😆
Yes, we do!
Build it
Build it
Yes:: we want d wall;;
GFY
GFY
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
GFY
GFY
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Yes we do.
Amen!
Fascists
Yes  we  do
Resign
Michaelsummers
Michaelsummers
Build it !!
Build it !!
yes oh yes
yes oh yes
Yes we do!
BuildthseLl
F snoop dogg
Exactly
Absolutely!!
You lie.
No wall!
No we dont
Liar
Liar
WALL
WALL
WALL
Trump2020
Small child
Small child
Dicktator
Dicktator
Yes we do
Yes I do!!!
Build it
Do it !
Do it !
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Gfy
Mexico
Chris Bochek let's get this wall built 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Chris Bochek let's get this wall built 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I bet you are 🤔🤯
Talking about you!!!
Never trust a liberal🤔🤯🤬
Can we put Matt Hoffman on the side of the wall.
Amen.
Nope!
W Trump.
Amen!
Go Donald!!!
Yes we do
Yes we do
Yes
Liar
Just.  Stopping.  You.
I agree
Yes
Holy crap🤦‍♂️
For you Mr. President.
YES !
What
No we don't
Absolutely!
I know I do
He’s the bully
He’s the bully
Amen
Gfy
Absolutely
Trump 2020
Trump 2020
Yes we do!
Gfy
Gfy
A+
TRUMP,2020!!!
TRUMP,2020!!!
Amen!
Don’t cave
Gfy
Gfy
Build it NOW
Build it NOW
Purely hate
Yes
Go kick there asses
Tell em sis
TRUMP 2020.
TRUMP 2020.
Build it!
Build it!
Dam right
Build it!
Propaganda
Ousting you!
Fire them!  Lol
You are not working together with anyone. You are being a big baby. You are thumping around demanding something unreasonable and taking your toys going home if you don't get it kicking everyone on the way out. Insane. You need to put the people back to work and negotiate sensible border security.
Yup 👍🇺🇸
Dave Miller hey your TDS is showing maybe you should take a dose of stfu.
Gfy
Gfy
Yes we do
MAGA!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
MAGA!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes we do!
Go man go!
Delusional!
Right
Exactly
Absolutely !!
❤️ my president
❤️ my president
Trump🇺🇸
Build it!
Yes we do!!
Build it
Exactly
Fake  crisis.
Yes we do!!!
fake news
fake news
Yes we do!
Build the wall!! 🇺🇸
More lies...
Sad.  Just sad.
Omg. This guy.
Good question.
Get em sir
Exactly!!!
Exactly!!!
Yes, we do.
Yes, we do.
Build it
Boss
Yes we do
Get'r done
Mueller time! Hahahahaha
MAGA ! BUILD THE WALL
MAGA ! BUILD THE WALL
Stick to it
Amen 🙏🏼
100 % Trump
100 % Trump
Well said
Well said
Build It!!!
We do
Maga!
Wall please
Keep #MAGA
Liar
No.
Yes we do
Yes we do
I agree.
MAGA!🙏🏼🇺🇸
Yes we do.
Stop Them
💖Trump!
yes we do
Yes we do.
I love you
Yes
Build it!
Exactly!!  ❤️🚂🇺🇸
Yes we do :)
And now
So true
No wall.
Build it
Build it
U GO SIR !
I’m with Trump 🇺🇸
Agreed
Yes we do!!
Security !
Security !
Wall Now
YES WE DO
Right!
Build it
build it !
Yes we do!!!
#USAinJO     #Whitehouse #FBI #Fox_News #ABC_News #CNN #Donald_J_Tramp #Speaker_ryan  Dear Mr, #JIM_BARNHART #US_Empassy_in_Jordan  Kindly take a look to my case and give me few minutes to explain my problem ..  As we are American company and we pay tax and our ID company is     EIN 35-2517909  DUNS: 004044035  My case is related to what is happening in Jordan with tobacco and cigarettes and it is in summary:  I entered container 40 feet of American cigarettes to Aqaba port and my goods had been stolen and someone put bricks instead of my cigarettes and I face many problems with the custom and till date nobody is helping me to solve it ..  We had talked to the Jordanian government about the problems faced by American companies in Jordan. I have encountered a problem with customs for two years.  1- The goods were sold according to official invoices and received a check in progress according to the custom in Jordan and export. 2 - The goods were cleared and loaded in containers 40 feet under customs supervision and a customs lead was placed. 3- The container was delivered to the customs team's patrol according to the duly written book. 4- The customs circular book was received from the customs office of Aqaba, which is subject to inspection of the lead by the competent examiner at the container port. 5- A description of the customs at the container port has been explained that the goods inside the container smoke are identical to the customs declaration inside the yards of the port. 6 - When reviewing the clearing company of the port of containers to pay the port fee did not find the container on the port system and was informed port for field research. 7 - The representative of the clearance company was informed that the container according to the cameras entered the port at 2:34 pm (note that according to the cameras entered the port the previous day at 11 pm). 8- The customs of the port have been asked to inspect the container on the fact by the commission .. Where bricks were found instead of cigarettes inside the container .. Based on what has been made it is quite clear that the responsibility lies between the Jordanian Customs and the Aqaba Container Terminal beyond any doubt.  Because of all the above I lose my money and I couldn't enroll my children at school or send them to State to study there.   I want a solution because we collapse because of this problem.  On the other hand , I can't pay to the bank mortgage and my house in Jordan at risk from the bank ..  I need from your highness to solve my problem so I can teach my children and pay for bank .  Your quick reply is appreciated.   Thank you for your time ,   Moe AL Hazzam MO Hazzam
Absolutely
Amen!
Wow
Agreed!
Liar.
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
Build it!
Never mind
Yes, we do!
POS!
Liar.
Yes we do
You promised to release your taxes as well. You lied.
You promised to release your taxes as well. You lied.
STAND!!!
Yes
Yes
LOL Bullsh#t
Exactly
Man shut up
Man shut up
Yes we do
Faux news.
BUILD. THE. WALL.
❤TRUMP❤
Trump-chan, please host meme review to save the internet from communism!
Yes
MAGA!
YES !!!
YES !!!
Leung Freuy right on great ally goblino if i am saying that correctly LOL
Leung Freuy right on great ally goblino if i am saying that correctly LOL
Trust the Emperor, he delivers and protects
Trust the Emperor, he delivers and protects
Leung Freuy our God Emperor speaks
Lies.
🐷💩liar
Electric fence
Exactly!😊
Stopping you
Yes
Stopping you
MAGA 🇺🇸
Then why haven't you spent more than 6% of the money already allocated for border security?  Why are you lying about the size and nature of the "threat"?  Oh, and by the way, it's been revealed today that Manafort gave the Russians internal polling data.  Can you say collusion/conspiracy with a foreign power on the part or your campaign chairman?
Then why haven't you spent more than 6% of the money already allocated for border security?  Why are you lying about the size and nature of the "threat"?  Oh, and by the way, it's been revealed today that Manafort gave the Russians internal polling data.  Can you say collusion/conspiracy with a foreign power on the part or your campaign chairman?
Go 45
Yes we do!
Yes we do!
To stop you
Yes we do!!
MAGA
Yes he is.
No.
Typical LibTard Projection.
Typical LibTard Projection.
Phylis Ledesma get back to me when you graduate from high school.   Trump loves uneducated people like you.   Too stupid to check the actual facts.   Just chant along like a kindergartner.
Phylis Ledesma get back to me when you graduate from high school.   Trump loves uneducated people like you.   Too stupid to check the actual facts.   Just chant along like a kindergartner.
Susan Urena could you hold your breath while you wait on that not-happening impeachment?
When your “promise” is moronic and no one with any education supports you, you are wrong and a loser.   Networks will only cover your ranting on delay so they can show viewers the actual facts next to your lies.   Get ready to be impeached.
When your “promise” is moronic and no one with any education supports you, you are wrong and a loser.   Networks will only cover your ranting on delay so they can show viewers the actual facts next to your lies.   Get ready to be impeached.
Border
Wtf
JBTFW! ❤️🇺🇸
Stopping you.
Mueller
Resign!
YES WE DO!!!!
Yes  we do
Americans want help with the homeless, the veterans, the health care, mredical, insurance, jobs in the states,  an open government.....STOP THIS NONSENSE#45....Just RESIIGNNNNN NOW!!!! #45!!
Americans want help with the homeless, the veterans, the health care, mredical, insurance, jobs in the states,  an open government.....STOP THIS NONSENSE#45....Just RESIIGNNNNN NOW!!!! #45!!
Hang tough Mr. President, you got this, the People are with you!!!
Hang tough Mr. President, you got this, the People are with you!!!
Nope
A. BIG. BEAUTIFUL. WALL!
A. BIG. BEAUTIFUL. WALL!
Go trumpster
Yep
Hell yea!
Pelosi and Schumer looked like they saw a ghost. They sure are polished liars.  Haha.  And, of course, the mainstream media immediately began to spin what was said. This is better than WWE Rassling!
Yes!
The media/Democrat(Communist) party is making a last ditch effort, Trump beware.
The media/Democrat(Communist) party is making a last ditch effort, Trump beware.
Impeach
YES WE DO!!!
YES WE DO!!!
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️TRUMP TO JAIL ⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️⬛️
expect to see TRUMP WORKING at his best tonight "LIKE A BULL IN A CHINA STORE"
We people can see what the democrats are doing.  They are using their personal opinions of the president, to make themselves appear more powerful, and try to damage his future and accomplishments.  It's not about what the democratic people want that should determine what happens to our money, alone. It is about what we the people want.  We  the people voted our president in office, because we see what he is capable of doing. Not to let the democrats stop the president in fulfilling his promises to us, the people. Seems to be some very disrespectful, devious, jealous and rude people in the democratic party towards our president. Democrats who think they are right to ridicule our president, are not right.   It doesn't matter, whether you like the way our president acts, behaves, walks, talks etc.. What matters is to stop holding the president back, from his potential talent. Just because you, are afraid to be hidden behind, and want to be heard, doesn't make your actions correct.  Show respect. Stop hindering our President progress... I have never seen such disrespect, towards any other president in all of my life, as I see with this president. We the people don't want our President to be disrespected.
So put money towards more ICE agents. better vetted and trained, creating jobs in the process.  Put more money into weapons and tools for border agents.  Put more money into tech for better surveillance and tracking.  Enact safer gun laws to protect our citizens from the real threat of Americans who use Ar-15's against our schools and public venues.  Be sensible, factual and actually do some good, instead of lying to the people you're supposed to protect.
Day 719 of 1462 (Illegitimate Presidency) - Con Man Trump addressing (LYING TO) the Country right now and has already lied by stating that the “wall” will pay for itself & blaming Congress for the shutdown.   https://m.huffpost.com/us/entry/us_5c34c016e4b01e2d51f79e62
A BITTER WARNING TO THE AMERICAN MEDIA You are accomplices in murder if something ever happens to our President   WESTERN EUROPE AfD leader blames media smear campaign for ‘assassination attempt’ on state chairman  https://voiceofeurope.com/2019/01/afd-leader-blames-media-smear-campaign-for-assassination-attempt-on-state-chairman/?fbclid=IwAR1dZEvQ5_A_bBaxvKRNzyaH6N84llcUIFYEPXzwQBuDPLIdjnt1gZCtMAU#.XDUAo2ViSGd.facebook
Paper trail never lies! Supreme Court ruling today! Robert Mueller's money trail from Donald Trump to the Russians! Hold onto your hats and your Depends undergarments! That money Trail never lies honey never never never never never never never lies! This man that was on the brink of Ruin just a few years ago is suddenly back on top again just like his son-in-law and his son in laws family who were in debt over 500 million dollars and on the brink of bankruptcy but suddenly... Everybody's fat and happy since the election. Who could it be? Well it ain't Satan! But it's close! Vlad the Putin!
Mentioned  before holidays.  Three Mexican immigrants busted selling meth. One life the other 18 and 20 yrs. Million each to keep in the prison system.  Then they can be deported. Not to mentioned attorneys have to be paid to defend them. Build the wall.
Mentioned  before holidays.  Three Mexican immigrants busted selling meth. One life the other 18 and 20 yrs. Million each to keep in the prison system.  Then they can be deported. Not to mentioned attorneys have to be paid to defend them. Build the wall.
FOREIGNERS, that’s what's important to the Democrat cabal. Foreigners and the Democrat votes they will bring.   America and Americans first!  Build it!
I think Republicans are smarter than Democrats these days, despite being of the left-wing persuasion. And before you think it's none of our business here in Europe, remember your country is quite important to all of us. God bless The President!
Build the wall just tell the cia to lower their coke prices
Let the president do his job protect America, build the wall protect our boarders. Americans want border security.
BS
Ever have the feeling you've been cheated?  https://www.justsecurity.org/62156/terrorists-southern-border-myth-reality/  Taken at face value, rhetoric from the White House and the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) would lead Americans to believe that the United States is facing a terrorism crisis at our southern border. The picture being painted is one in which thousands of terrorists have been stopped crossing our southern border to infiltrate the Homeland. If that were true, that would indeed be a crisis.  In reality, no such crisis exists.  Our federal courthouses and prisons are not filled with terrorists we’ve captured at the border. There is no wave of terrorist operatives waiting to cross overland into the United States. It simply isn’t true. Anyone in authority using this argument to bolster support for building the wall or any other physical barrier along the southern border is most likely guilty of fear mongering and willfully misleading the American people.  Why do I know this? As Director of the National Counterterrorism Center (NCTC) from December 2014 until December 2017, it was my job to lead the government’s efforts to collect and analyze all available information about terrorist threats to the Homeland. It was my responsibility on behalf of the Intelligence Community to synthesize and present that terrorism picture to our most senior decision makers – up to and including the President of the United States — so that sound decisions could be made about how to protect the Homeland from terrorist attack.  Here is ground truth on this issue. Terrorist groups like al-Qa’ida and ISIS spend time talking about, brainstorming and even fantasizing about ways in which they can do harm to the United State. At times, those conversations have certainly included discussion of ways in which terrorist operatives might be inserted into the Homeland. But we also knew from intelligence reporting that terrorist groups have very high regard for our Homeland Security capabilities, including our border security. They know we had become a much “harder” target than at the time of 9/11 and that getting their operatives into the United States is an extremely challenging proposition. Cont-
Not even you wants a wall. Otherwise you would not have backed out of the funding compromise before Christmas. Enough to find the wall for 2 years. Shame.
True
Build it!
Build it!
Look you lie a lot! Its to the point no one believes you anymore.
Were with you President Trump
No but you lied that Mexico was going to pay for it,maybe you asking wrong folks to pay for your wall for border security.
Stand strong most of the American people are on your side.
WALL IS COMING. GET READY. TRUMP HAS THE AUTHORITY. GAME OVER. ;)
Suck it up
You are playing the stupidest game with semantics.  Replace the term “border security” with wall and the statement is false.  You need to recognize we all want secure borders, your the dim wit that keeps making it about a wall
If they do the actual fact-checks; Trump has been fighting/stating the same for over 20 years about border security; its not “politics” to him…meanwhile Schumer and Pelosi have signed for the wall 16 times already… Who are the liars here? They need to stop this government shut down by getting to work like they’re paid to do and negotiate a compromise. Stop putting politics before the people.
They Prefer Sending Money To The Foreign Countries For Obortions,Instead Of Keeping America safe.  Take There Pay And Hold It.
No, American doesn’t want this waste of our tax dollars on a useless new wall.  There’s already a wall in place. https://www.cato.org/publications/commentary/why-wall-wont-work
No, American doesn’t want this waste of our tax dollars on a useless new wall.  There’s already a wall in place. https://www.cato.org/publications/commentary/why-wall-wont-work
Thank you President Donald J. Trump!!
Get it done, or shut it down. God bless you, Mr.President.
gofundme WeFund The Wall
And how in the hell would you know? Do you stand at the boarder and count?
Over stayed Visas is a bunch of bull.  50,000 a month cross through Texas, New Mexico, California and Arizona undetected every month.
Vicki Oldham  Child, that was campaign rhetoric.  You didn't expect Mexico to wtite a check did you? It appears that with the mess at their border because of the caravans, they are incurring some expense. We also have a new trade agreement with Mexico.
The promise is, “Mexico will pay for the wall.” Keep your damn promise.
How many people have a fence around your property? Why do you have a fence? Do you have locks on your doors? Why?  Take a moment and think about the question.
I believe your promise was that MEXICO WAS GOING TO PAY FOR THE WALL. But you went and stuck your foot in your mouth saying you were toning to make somwone else pay billions for something.  Surprised you don't have athletes foot, in your mouth, for how many times your foot ends up there.  Then again, you are no athlete.
I believe your promise was that MEXICO WAS GOING TO PAY FOR THE WALL. But you went and stuck your foot in your mouth saying you were toning to make somwone else pay billions for something.  Surprised you don't have athletes foot, in your mouth, for how many times your foot ends up there.  Then again, you are no athlete.
Maybe they haven't heard of them insurgents that have been pretty much going to war vs natives and Americans using guerrilla tactics. Trump is right, the terrorists are real homegrown or not, America and the reservations need better security and better laws.
Stand Firm President Donald J. Trump. ❤️
Only your 38 % raicist base want the border wall, as you Donald the CLOWN Trump would say "SAD "
You will not overthrow the government of the United States of America tonight.
Americans do not want the wall. That is a mis statement.  Only a few want it, most think it is a scare tactic.    Try using an independent source not Fox.  You might get accurate and unbiased information if you made measured and thoughtful actions and statements
On 21st December Donald Trump tweeted  “With so much talk about the Wall, people are losing sight of the great job being done on our Southern Border by Border Patrol, ICE and our great Military. Remember the Caravans? Well, they didn’t get through and none are forming or on their way. Border is tight. Fake News silent!” So after being “tight” on 21st December  there is now a national emergency?
Subash Shrestha loves you, President Donald J. Trump
Nancy Pelosi DC ph# (202)-225-4965 left message... build the wall. Here's Chuck Schumer DC ph# (202) 224-6542. Repost numbers. Let's do this...Build the Wall! Everyone call!! Fill their machines with BUILD THE WALL!!!… #Trump #Trump2020 #MAGA #BuildThatWall
Build the WALL NOW!!!!!!!!!  Texans support you, President Donald J. Trump!!!!
Build the WALL NOW!!!!!!!!!  Texans support you, President Donald J. Trump!!!!
PAPER TRAIL NEVER LIES!  HANG ON! IT'S ABOUT TO DROP LIKE A FART IN CHURCH!   https://www.washingtonpost.com/amphtml/politics/courts_law/supreme-court-rules-against-mystery-corporation-from-country-a-fighting-subpoena-in-mueller-investigation/2019/01/08/a39b61ac-0d1a-11e9-84fc-d58c33d6c8c7_story.html
You are supposed to represent the people of this country. You are clearly incapable of that job, as you are oblivious to the fact that the majority of this country doesn’t want your wall!
Millions of Sane Americans Stand With You. Whatever it takes to build the wall.
Your promise was Mexico would pay. Keep your promise.
Your promise was Mexico would pay. Keep your promise.
Only a madman with the mind of a spoiled 5-year-old would do what this egomaniac is doing to the country just to get his own way. On a policy that is demonstrably wrong and to which a majority of Americans are opposed. More rope, please. He's almost ready to put the noose around his neck.
Only a madman with the mind of a spoiled 5-year-old would do what this egomaniac is doing to the country just to get his own way. On a policy that is demonstrably wrong and to which a majority of Americans are opposed. More rope, please. He's almost ready to put the noose around his neck.
BUILD THE WALL. TRUMP ALL THE WAY 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Your "promise" was that you would get Mexico to pay for it. Either keep your promise or stop your whining and blaming others for your failure.
Your "promise" was that you would get Mexico to pay for it. Either keep your promise or stop your whining and blaming others for your failure.
Im a Filipino residing in the Philippines. Your Pres Trump has political will. He will do what he promised even against all odds for the betterment of the American people.  Great leader. Deserving to be reelected.
Yes, WE the people want more border security!  Democrats do not care about the American people!  Don't end the shutdown until the Democrats want to do the right thing and fund border security.  WE the people stand with YOU, Mr. President!
Bookies all over are taking bets on how many lies you vomit tonight in your propaganda speech.
Bookies all over are taking bets on how many lies you vomit tonight in your propaganda speech.
God bless you President Donald J. Trump
God bless you President Donald J. Trump
How is it possible the Liberals, Socialists, and Democrats do not want safety and security for American citizens?  More importantly, why in blazes would anyone vote to put these knuckleheads in office as elected officials allowing them to spread ....fertilizer to the entire planet.
Build the God Damn Wall! You want to come in do it Legally! DACA Sucks!  BUILD THE DAMN WALL!
The corrupt CNN and MSNBC is colluding with the Democrats to spread lies and cheat the 🇺🇸 of the Wall boycott those crooks and imprison them
There are real hard drug dealers. There are real terrorists. There are real cartels. Oil and drug cartels are puppet mastering our nation. It has to stop.
A wall would employee lots of people on a BS build, with drug trade being a billion dollar trade , I am sure they can come up with quick ways  to put holes in the wall.
The same year that Trump's FCC Chairman Ajit Pai killed broadband privacy and cheated Network Neutrality to death, the Trump tax plan delivered a $20B windfall to AT&T -- both Trump and Pai claimed that the measures would stimulate the economy and trickle down to the rest of us.  Now, AT&T is saying thank you to America by prepping mass layoffs in ten of its operational hubs in New York, California, Texas, New Jersey, Washington State, Colorado, Georgia, Illinois, Missouri, and Washington, DC. They've also cut investment in broadband rollout.  https://motherboard.vice.com/en_us/article/nepxeg/atandt-preps-for-new-layoffs-despite-billions-in-tax-breaks-and-regulatory-favors
You looked at the TelePrompTer. You did not look the camera in the eye the way Presidents give Addresses to the People of the United States.  It was awkward, monotonous and numbers sounded very inflated.  You were told to make this address despite your better judgment.  It was weak, and left it to the Democrats for a solution.  Weak and very unpresidential on your part.  Open the Government. Set talks for border security.  You can do it immediately.  Congress will still try to find their zippers.
Build the wall. Secure our borders. Keep America and Americans safe. President Trump you are the greatest President America has ever had. Please once again secure our borders.  Prayers for you President Trump.  May God always Bless you🙏
Keep the government closed until the wall is completely built! Build the wall!
John Basil Barnhill said, "Where the people fear the government you have tyranny.   Where the government fears the people, you have liberty." Lets protect our country from not only the illegal immigration, (BUILD THE WALL) but from the rampant corruption in our government.  It is really scary to see how many people in government get away with murder...literally. A government big enough to give you everything you want, is a government big enough to take away everything that you have."
John Basil Barnhill said, "Where the people fear the government you have tyranny.   Where the government fears the people, you have liberty." Lets protect our country from not only the illegal immigration, (BUILD THE WALL) but from the rampant corruption in our government.  It is really scary to see how many people in government get away with murder...literally. A government big enough to give you everything you want, is a government big enough to take away everything that you have."
Those who supported walls, fences, barriers, etc. for the US-Mexican border BEFORE the current POTUS took office, but now have some hardliner's objection to it, also have a moral and political obligation to explain why they have changed their minds. If these partisan tools can't justify their reversal with REAL WORDS, then they should be ignored for disrespecting our intelligence.
They are trying to keep you from fulfilling your promise. They were for securing the border before you were elected President, just as you said in your speech.  In my opinion they are trying to compete with you for Power. You have the highest office in the land and they are trying to overpower you. They need to be reminded, you are ,President. They are suppose to be working with you for the good of the people.
They are trying to keep you from fulfilling your promise. They were for securing the border before you were elected President, just as you said in your speech.  In my opinion they are trying to compete with you for Power. You have the highest office in the land and they are trying to overpower you. They need to be reminded, you are ,President. They are suppose to be working with you for the good of the people.
We as a nation have been very blessed for a very long time. I can’t believe God would have us treat and talk about these people, many innocent and truly wanting a better life like your ancestors, the way Trump and others are doing. Hasn’t enough barbarism happened everywhere white peoples have settled? You’re not superior and God I think is teaching you that right now, especially Trump.
Why is our media arguing against the wall? They're supposed to be reporting on the pros and cons....not lobbying against our President enforcing OUR sovereignty!!! If the President is elected because he promised a wall...then of course he should do everything to build the wall.
I say put those caravan people to work building the wall. Create some nice tent cities with food etc, teach them to speak English and then if they prove to be great workers on the wall, learn our language and our real American values of hard work, not easy hand outs, let them stay. #kag2020, Donald J. Trump best President EVER!!!!!!
I say put those caravan people to work building the wall. Create some nice tent cities with food etc, teach them to speak English and then if they prove to be great workers on the wall, learn our language and our real American values of hard work, not easy hand outs, let them stay. #kag2020, Donald J. Trump best President EVER!!!!!!
Edward Dennis Toppe shut up idiot
Keep it shut Mr. President...the millions she talked about can get a real job in the private sector....surely they are not that incompetent that only government can offer them a job?
Just please reopen the government. Millions are in need of food stamps, military retirement pay and many more of pay checks. Please mr. President
Ben F. Gilbert  speak for yourself you dummy.
Mr. Trump, No Americans dont want border security, they want you gone as president. Your a entertainer. Not a politician. You are making the presidency a entertainment place  Which many Americans are hurting because of your ways
Mr. Trump, No Americans dont want border security, they want you gone as president. Your a entertainer. Not a politician. You are making the presidency a entertainment place  Which many Americans are hurting because of your ways
Hahahahahahahaha ONCE AGAIN!!!!!!!! THEY JUST ADMITTED THEY WANT BETTER BORDER SECURITY!!!!!! ARE THEY JUST THAT STUPID!!!!!!!!!!
Hahahahahahahaha ONCE AGAIN!!!!!!!! THEY JUST ADMITTED THEY WANT BETTER BORDER SECURITY!!!!!! ARE THEY JUST THAT STUPID!!!!!!!!!!
A poll on FB,asked  1) You want the wall hit <3  2) If you don't want the wall,hit 😡 After over 3,300 responses,they only got 2 😡 Only TWO LOL Yet,the liberal media tries to tell us more than half of Americans do NOT want the Wall. LIARS!!!!!
The DumpTrump Controlled The House And The Senate For TWO YEARS! WHY DIDN'T THE REPUBLICANS GIVE HIM THE MONEY FOR THE WALL!!?? BECAUSE THEY DON'T WANT IT!! WHY WAIT TO FIGHT WITH THE DEMOCRATS?? Y'ALL BETTER WAKE UP!!
Many want you out of office.
Many want you out of office.
Fox entertainment is just that! Try a different source!
Sorry they don't count. Only the democrats wants are taking  presidence over the needs of the American voters
All border security is needed. Right now, most of it is shut down due to your Shut Down, that you claim you own. We all heard you. The 3rd shut down in less than a year.   How can you hire and keep the best and brightest, if you refuse to pay them? You're destroying our country.
Linda Martin  Wow! You are ate plumb up with it.
So what will it be tonight don the con??  Your version of "Wag the Dog", Orson Welles "War of the Worlds", or George Orwell's "1984"?  OR just plain ol'  GAS LIGHTING!
So what will it be tonight don the con??  Your version of "Wag the Dog", Orson Welles "War of the Worlds", or George Orwell's "1984"?  OR just plain ol'  GAS LIGHTING!
Donald J. Trump is the President of the United States of America, he is MY President, he is YOUR President, He is OUR President, you do not have to like it, but We The People do not want to hear your whining and crying, so put the pacifier in your mouth and have your mommy change your diaper because that is the only thing you can get changed, then get into your safe space in the fetal position for at least the next 6 years.
Coming soon: ……THE END OF THE ORANGE CLOWN ! ......... 🤡 🔚
Mr. Pres. I have a great idea to solve this shutdown and stickier boot into the Democratic Party's mouth. Tell them that you will give them the hundred and $150 billion in foreign aid, And make sure they give you the $5.8 billion for the wall. Here's the deal breaker, but I think this might work. The $54 billion if they want to add to that foreign aid, and you should do this like on camera so the whole world can see, that that $54 billion will be spent at home here in America to take care of and fix the homeless problem. Damn I need to be in politics. Because not only the Republicans would be satisfied, the Democrats would be satisfied and now America would be satisfied that is both parties would be spending $54 billion to help solve the homeless issues. Damn I'm good. Let me know what you think Mr. Donald J. Trump !... let me know if you want me to come work for Sir . /Salute - Oh and I'm prior service too Mr. President =)
Fasten you seatbelts folks ,I seen a sign and that sign   reads ,stop the hate or you will be haltered .  Signed by God .
Mr. President, please hold the paychecks of Congress and you’ll see them come to the table!  That should be considered!  They’re supposed to be working for the American people not illegals and not giving money for foreign aid while our country is being invaded and drugs pouring over our borders!  When people come to our border waving the flag of their country that is an invasion.
Mr. President, please hold the paychecks of Congress and you’ll see them come to the table!  That should be considered!  They’re supposed to be working for the American people not illegals and not giving money for foreign aid while our country is being invaded and drugs pouring over our borders!  When people come to our border waving the flag of their country that is an invasion.
Bro, no one is stopping you from having mexico pay for the wall like you promised. I dunno what you're trippin about. Democrats say mexico should pay too lol, get it done then.
Obama wanted a lot of good things an obstructionist GOP stopped.  Welcome to reality. Not tv
French canadian here , and i would love to see a prime minister in canada like your president , america , but we got a Unicorn lover instead . Wow
Dave Tuttle he will not get his wall, he will get money for border security. I think you should thank your lucky stars that a terrorist doesn't try to pull another 9/11 while our government is shutdown while a few hundred TSA saying "I don't care, I'm not getting paid!"!! When there is no incentive for their being present people care less!!
And in the end they will. when they are no longer coming into our great country. And costing us millions of dollars every year. And no longer killing our American people.
Your promise was and will forever be known that " We're going to build a Wall, a great wall!! Aaand MEXICO'S GOING GO PAY FOR IT"!!! Liar!
Stand your ground Mr. President! Millions of Deplorables are behind you!!!
You are so proud to shut down the country. Your words.
You promised Mexico would pay for it.  You took full responsibility, nay, PRIDE, in shutting the government down.  Your lies aren't working.
And we the people know it! Build the wall! Demonrats biggest fear is the truth and the American people
The brown people are coming!  The orange man says the brown people are bad. He tells me to be scared.  Scared is great.  I am orange.
There are lots do,sir. Stop wasting time on this and work hard to position your country back to the top
Keep the government shutdown. Build the wall. Clean the swamp!
Times they're changing remember. Promises promises promises parole parole paroles. C'est pourquoi ? Forget your promises and be realistic! Dear Mr President., 😳😔☕☕🏃wanna coffee? 😀
We sure do NOW DONT GIVE IN TO THEM!! No compromise without wall funding-veto EVERY SINGLE ONE of their bills til they stop obstructing! Dems care nothing about American citizens, our security or economic well being!
We are standing by our President Donald Trump concerning the wall. #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
We are standing by our President Donald Trump concerning the wall. #BuildThatWallPresidentTrump
More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
Instead of using fact checkers, they should just add a laugh track to Trump's speech. Hit the laugh track every time he lies
Hello my baby ...I'd like to know if you will be sugar baby....for a start I promise I will pay you 500$ twice a week for weekly allowances if that going to be enough for you   Please text me on hangout @deangeorgecain1@gmail.com                 Or  Kik me @ deangeorgecain1          Or text me        2027534298
100/100 PERCENT WITH YOU MR PRESIDENT. All thoes who would impede sensible border protection share in the guilt and responsibility for the deaths of innocent Americans..how can one not care for anothers child is staggering.  https://www.facebook.com/189531267729007/posts/2494717580543686/
Stop acting like the two are related.
does anyone know if Trump is steaming this thing tonight and what the delay is going to be on his FB page :D  Can't wait to hear all the democraps after this going to be gold
does anyone know if Trump is steaming this thing tonight and what the delay is going to be on his FB page :D  Can't wait to hear all the democraps after this going to be gold
Kyle Sakamoto God had a wall build check it out it's in the bible ,keep reading you might learn more than that stupid.
Meanwhile, you clearly don't listen to the voice of thevmany faith leaders and loving Christians in the United Church of Christ, Methodists, Presbyterians, Mennonites, Quakers and others who speak out against the wall. Even some of the Amish who are informed of current events speak out against the wall. It is not Christian to build walls.
Meanwhile, you clearly don't listen to the voice of thevmany faith leaders and loving Christians in the United Church of Christ, Methodists, Presbyterians, Mennonites, Quakers and others who speak out against the wall. Even some of the Amish who are informed of current events speak out against the wall. It is not Christian to build walls.
Democrats are cutring their own throaghts acting the the way they are.
Then open the government and send troops. Cant be that bad if you're sitting in your office while keeping the government shutdown.
Don’t hold our federal employees and a chunk of our economy hostage as you play your political games. A majority of Americans do not want your Shutdown or your Wall.
Don’t hold our federal employees and a chunk of our economy hostage as you play your political games. A majority of Americans do not want your Shutdown or your Wall.
The Democrats are not preventing you from a campaign promise, getting funding fron Mexico is!
Keep the stand...they are playing softball... You play hardball!
Behind you all the way President Donald J. Trump
Behind you all the way President Donald J. Trump
You said Mexico would pay. You lied.
Point out their hypocrisy; roll the tapes, do a fireside chat; expose frivilous spending practices in the budget. Point out the fact they aren't rejecting their salaries in solidarity of the shutdown; point out that while the government is shut down they are taking VACATIONS!!! Burn Their ASSES DOWN!
Point out their hypocrisy; roll the tapes, do a fireside chat; expose frivilous spending practices in the budget. Point out the fact they aren't rejecting their salaries in solidarity of the shutdown; point out that while the government is shut down they are taking VACATIONS!!! Burn Their ASSES DOWN!
Stand strong! Thank you for trying to protect us!❤🤕
YOUR PROMISE:  who’s gonna pay for the wall?  WHO’S GONNA PAY FOR THE WALL?   PROMISE BROKEN!!
Um hiding fact USA had electric car 90 s that out raced sports cars but demand all now buy hybrid ...,oh yes made by dog eaters and whale killers
Border control all the way, we want a wall for the safety of America!
Border control all the way, we want a wall for the safety of America!
I think you answered your own question Mr President. The great American people are lucky to have you fighting for them.
Border construction and cleanup America of communist and socialist supported by Democrat far left party.
All that winning...all those fulfilled promises. MEXICO is paying for the wall!! You promised. Make it happen Mr Con Man.
All that winning...all those fulfilled promises. MEXICO is paying for the wall!! You promised. Make it happen Mr Con Man.
You can't fulfill your promise if you need funding from outside of Mexico.
So if that’s true why are WE supposed to pay for it?
Mike Stoumbaugh show me the money honey
Becky Lao they all ready have.
You promised the Mexicans were going to pay!
Hammer time. Show fences around their homes tonight. Ask them why they support open borders and are against voter ID. I think we all know why
Hammer time. Show fences around their homes tonight. Ask them why they support open borders and are against voter ID. I think we all know why
Stopping you, Mr President. They hate you and everyone who voted for you. They want socialism and one world government. Stand strong. Build the wall.
Stand Strong President Trump 💪🏻 We The People Are Standing Behind You 🇺🇸
We need to get the after you dialed in after you we can't lose America again
Poor desperate grasping gormless liberal parasites and their incestuous checkout line tabloid entertainment news.
Mike Pence MR. VICE PRESIDENT -- EXCELLENT JOB TODAY!!! YOU HANDLED THAT SLEAZY JOHN KARL SO WELL!! STAY VOCAL!!! Good Morning America CBS GOP Fox News Judge Jeanine Pirro Lou Dobbs POTUS Donald J Trump Lara Trump
Americans want border security. Americans DO NOT WANT an ineffective 4rh Century solution to a 21st Century problem.  Americans want to see you REMOVED FROM OFFICE AND LOCKED UP for the criminal you are.  When that happens it will be a great day in the USA!
you said big beautiful wall.  That is what we expect, not a token section of slatted fence
The Schumer, Pelosi shutdown continues. They don’t really oppose a wall, just a president elected by the people!
Trump people need to realize ever American is documented either by birth certificate social security card other forms of ID what makes them special????
The President's most important job is to protect the borders of the United States. It's a no brainer.
You are a liar and Mueller is coming...
You are a liar and Mueller is coming...
The laid-back head of a Russian state bank was an unusual choice of emissary -- and brought an unusual present. What was he after?      https://foreignpolicy.com/2017/07/25/why-did-russia-send-sergei-gorkov-to-meet-with-jared-kushner/
If your mouth is moving you are probably lying
Shawn Caulder they are both the same thing in principle. the government functions like the rules of a household on a bigger scale. people who live in a home are governed by those rules, and walls of a home are meant to allow authorized people to enter just as the walls of a country are meant to only allow authorized people to enter. its interesting how you do not seem to be able to internalize such an easily understood idea
Gian Dovidio that analogy makes you look like a idiot. Just fyi. Do we put a wall on east and west coast?  Canada?  Its a 10th century solution thoughtof and supported by people who are intellectually challenged.
do people live in houses without walls? lol, nope. so, why should the collective home of every american not have them?
do people live in houses without walls? lol, nope. so, why should the collective home of every american not have them?
Jacquelyn Scherer that’s my problem no one is telling us how we will secure our border just saying no to a wall for spite isn’t going to help.  I would like the benefits they get for seeking asylum cut off
Jacquelyn Scherer he is speaking on behalf of Americans he has walls an armed guards.
Jacquelyn Scherer how would you suggest securing the border? Honest question.
“Working together to secure the border” does NOT require a wall.  Get over yourself!
“Working together to secure the border” does NOT require a wall.  Get over yourself!
Everything you promise will be rejected by Democrat because they want you to see fail on your administration. Illegals are Democrats safety net voters. Why was Obama and Democrats gave 150 billion dollars cash to the enemies and not allowing to protect US citizens?
Anything you say or do as a president there must people or group of people who will kick against it in away... just keep doing what you think is right in your regime... When it gets to theirs let them come and undo it. Many sick people all the place.
Anything you say or do as a president there must people or group of people who will kick against it in away... just keep doing what you think is right in your regime... When it gets to theirs let them come and undo it. Many sick people all the place.
It’s all about you it doesn’t matter what you are in favor of they are against a bunch of terds
Not like the brazen giant of Greek fame, With conquering limbs astride from land to land; Here at our sea-washed, sunset gates shall stand A mighty woman with a torch, whose flame Is the imprisoned lightning, and her name Mother of Exiles. From her beacon-hand Glows world-wide welcome; her mild eyes command The air-bridged harbor that twin cities frame. “Keep, ancient lands, your storied pomp!” cries she With silent lips. “Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tost to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!”
Not like the brazen giant of Greek fame, With conquering limbs astride from land to land; Here at our sea-washed, sunset gates shall stand A mighty woman with a torch, whose flame Is the imprisoned lightning, and her name Mother of Exiles. From her beacon-hand Glows world-wide welcome; her mild eyes command The air-bridged harbor that twin cities frame. “Keep, ancient lands, your storied pomp!” cries she With silent lips. “Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tost to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!”
Your promise is whack! You just want something built with your name on it.
Donald Trump - Award winning Crisis Actor
Donald Trump - Award winning Crisis Actor
Mr. DJ Trump I am sure that the members of the house, the speaker of the house, and the senent wasn't elected to block what you are doing to protect America and it's borders. I have noticed that these same ones go out of their way to block your plans, even if they wanted the same thing when they were in Obama's cabinet and presidency. Please don't give up your plans, you are doing a better job than any one before you. I praise God for you.
Funny that you cut tons of programs and things when you first went into office saying we had no money for health care and education and so forth but all of a sudden we have money for a wall? Are you lying to us again, Donnie?
So first year we save 270 billion Next yr we save 275 billion Wow that's simple math for democrats to understand Looks to me like wall pays for itself and is a money maker
Help me understand. Democrats say border crossings are down, how do they count them if they sneak over where there are no walls? Help me understand Democrats say drugs come in through truckers. Should be able to stop them? None come in where there is no wall?
James Mattis’ resignation letter.   Dear Mr. President:  I have been privileged to serve as our country's 26th Secretary of Defense which has allowed me to serve alongside our men and women of the Department in defense of our citizens and our ideals.  I am proud of the progress that has been made over the past two years on some of the key goals articulated in our National Defense Strategy: putting the Department on a more sound budgetary footing, improving readiness and lethality in our forces, and reforming the Department's business practices for greater performance. Our troops continue to provide the capabilities needed to prevail in conflict and sustain strong U.S. global influence.  One core belief I have always held is that our strength as a nation is inextricably linked to the strength of our unique and comprehensive system of alliances and partnerships. While the US remains the indispensable nation in the free world, we cannot protect our interests or serve that role effectively without maintaining strong alliances and showing respect to those allies. Like you, I have said from the beginning that the armed forces of the United States should not be the policeman of the world. Instead, we must use all tools of American power to provide for the common defense, including providing effective leadership to our alliances. NATO's 29 democracies demonstrated that strength in their commitment to fighting alongside us following the 9-11 attack on America. The Defeat-ISIS coalition of 74 nations is further proof.  Similarly, I believe we must be resolute and unambiguous in our approach to those countries whose strategic interests are increasingly in tension with ours. It is clear that China and Russia, for example, want to shape a world consistent with their authoritarian model - gaining veto authority over other nations' economic, diplomatic, and security decisions - to promote their own interests at the expense of their neighbors, America and our allies. That is why we must use all the tools of American power to provide for the common defense.  My views on treating allies with respect and also being clear-eyed about both malign actors and strategic competitors are strongly held and informed by over four decades of immersion in these issues. We must do everything possible to advance an international order that is most conducive to our security, prosperity and values, and we are strengthened in this effort by the solidarity of our alliances.  Because you have the right to have a Secretary of Defense whose views are better aligned with yours on these and other subjects, I believe it is right for me to step down from my position. The end date for my tenure is February 28, 2019, a date that should allow sufficient time for a successor to be nominated and confirmed as well as to make sure the Department's interests are properly articulated and protected at upcoming events to include Congressional posture hearings and the NATO Defense Ministerial meeting in February. Further, that a full transition to a new Secretary of Defense occurs well in advance of the transition of Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff in September in order to ensure stability Within the Department.  I pledge my full effort to a smooth transition that ensures the needs and interests of the 2.15 million Service Members and 732,079 DoD civilians receive undistracted attention of the Department at all times so that they can fulfill their critical, round-the-clock mission to protect the American people.  I very much appreciate this opportunity to serve the nation and our men and women in uniform.
Your promise was Mexico will pay, not 'We the People'. You lied. Again. As usual....
The wall is not effective border security at a cost that could be used elsewhere. Give up on your vanity structure and support Americans instead of yourself. You are hurting Americans, and destroying our economy.
The wall is not effective border security at a cost that could be used elsewhere. Give up on your vanity structure and support Americans instead of yourself. You are hurting Americans, and destroying our economy.
POTUS;   In the end,  liars will..........  I will just tell you myself when that day comes.   Will remind you of Vagina comment as well.  Will let your testicles answer to such comment. This as we are both males and have the same.    Took a lot of testicles to say such comment.  Remember them,  i have some too.     Brown and Proud sir.   God bless you and your family; excited to meet you soon. Santa Clause is giving me early Christmas present.    Have a beautiful evening.  Listening to you shortly.    Respectfully;  Omar Martinez
It's obvious to everyone, if they are truthful, that their main goal is to stop Trump from fulfilling his promises, rather than work in the interest of America and its citizens.
How about using our resources to actually serve the people....no wall.
Jill Travassos Not true, not even close. Let's see your source, because you are either lying or someone misled you.
82% OF AMERICAN CITIZENS WANT THE WALL. IT'S THE #1 CONCERN OF ALL AMERICANS.
yeah.... a lot of Republicans think the wall is a stupid idea, too.
Heather Stevens why dont you?
Mary Kay Gaffney why don't you go live on the other side of the wall if you don't think it is an issue and see how safe you are
No we just want YOU  on the other side of the border. Permanently. Go live with your boyfriend Vlad.
No we just want YOU  on the other side of the border. Permanently. Go live with your boyfriend Vlad.
Pres. Trump says there's a 'national security crisis' at the southern border that justifies shutting down the government -- but illegal border crossings last year hit a 46-year low, and the U.S. military has already sent home half of the 5,900 troops that Trump ordered to the border before November's election.
Most of us know the Dem's, Hollyweird, & our media lie their pants off.
Most of us know the Dem's, Hollyweird, & our media lie their pants off.
Is your promise based on studies and and expert testimony or just a political whim?
Mr. President used the billions of dollars you confiscated from El Chapo
Mr. President used the billions of dollars you confiscated from El Chapo
Yeah, but they don't want a wall.  How about you keep America safe by resigning?
Only a wall will stop El Niños from invading the country.
Only a wall will stop El Niños from invading the country.
Mr President, how much did you know about your campaign manager sharing polling data with Russian intelligence?
Mr President, how much did you know about your campaign manager sharing polling data with Russian intelligence?
He’s trying! The democrats only want to give foreign aid and don’t want to give anything for American protection.
He’s trying! The democrats only want to give foreign aid and don’t want to give anything for American protection.
Valentina Hansen I totally agree.  Why are we blowing away $54billion  on countries that could not care less about us.  Use that money to build the wall.
How about instead of sending 54 BILLION in FOREIGN aid, you take care of Americans first!!!!!!!!!!
The liberals are not concerned about the security of the USA.  All they want is "POWER"  If they can defeat this wall then they can declare themselves a winners.  They will be all powerful and pass any impeachments and obstacles that they want
tRump university was a scam!!  tRump was sued & had to pay millions of $$       Trump University was never a university. When the “school” was established in 2005, the New York State Education Department warned that it was in violation of state law for operating without a NYSED license. Trump ignored the warnings. (The institution is now called, ahem, “Trump Entrepreneur Initiative.”)              https://www.nationalreview.com/corner/trump-university-scam/
Ahead of Trump address, a new poll shows how many Americans say there's a 'crisis' at the border
Build the WALL and make the dems pay for it with their ill gotten gains. You can do it because after all you are the Greatest American President Ever and you are Making America Great Again on a Daily Basis 🇺🇸👊🇺🇸
Unfortunately it’s stopping you from anything you do. They are sore losers and they can’t se past the end of their nose.
Because you are taking their votes away. Lol
Joshua 1: 9 Reina-Valera 1960 (RVR1960)  9 See that I command you to be strong and courageous; Do not fear or be dismayed, for Jehovah your God will be with you wherever you go. GOD BLESS THE U.S.A FOREVER!!! GOD BLESS PRESIDENT DONALD TRUMP FOREVER!!!
President Trump your doing a great job, build the wall
So first year we save 270 billion Next yr we save 275 billion Wow that's simple math for democrats to understand Looks to me like wall pays for itself and is a money maker
Demoncrats are the resistance.Best thing for you to do tonight is come out and say the wall is unnecessary because border partol is doing a really great job of stopping the drugs and the illegals and the human traffickers.Tommorrow they will be telling the nation you don't want to protect it's people and start throwing the money at you.
Demoncrats are the resistance.Best thing for you to do tonight is come out and say the wall is unnecessary because border partol is doing a really great job of stopping the drugs and the illegals and the human traffickers.Tommorrow they will be telling the nation you don't want to protect it's people and start throwing the money at you.
The ONLY thing Democrats care about is blocking you regardless of what you’re trying to do!  Then in 2020, they will say that you made promises you couldn’t keep.
donnaprice honey did you even GO school? THINK LONG AND HARD ON THAT. Trump has done major things for the people. Yes he could have got the wall but 24/7 the democraps are turning on him to the point they think that is their job. democraps have DONE NOTHING for the the people. they  raise taxes and give it to iran and other countries. So maybe you need to quit msm and get som facts.
donnaprice honey did you even GO school? THINK LONG AND HARD ON THAT. Trump has done major things for the people. Yes he could have got the wall but 24/7 the democraps are turning on him to the point they think that is their job. democraps have DONE NOTHING for the the people. they  raise taxes and give it to iran and other countries. So maybe you need to quit msm and get som facts.
What is important to me is that a 6 year old boy is waiting for the new experimental drug to hopefully treat his rare degenerative disease before it is too late. The FDA is shut down and the boys doctor just gets an answering machine. How many other children are waiting also? Trump is saying without a wall he won’t open the government. He is just being stubborn. He was offered a compromise for a month to work on a solution after the gov opens back up. I just now heard someone called CNN to tell the boys mom they would see what they can do for the 6year old. What about all the other children and adults waiting for their drug to be approved? Do you have to be on TV to get help?
What is important to me is that a 6 year old boy is waiting for the new experimental drug to hopefully treat his rare degenerative disease before it is too late. The FDA is shut down and the boys doctor just gets an answering machine. How many other children are waiting also? Trump is saying without a wall he won’t open the government. He is just being stubborn. He was offered a compromise for a month to work on a solution after the gov opens back up. I just now heard someone called CNN to tell the boys mom they would see what they can do for the 6year old. What about all the other children and adults waiting for their drug to be approved? Do you have to be on TV to get help?
Agree wholeheartedly Mr President.   No offence though. I caught Ur address from the Oval office. YOU  NEED  TO  BE  ABLE  TO  STEP  BY  STEP,  EXPLAIN  YOUR  REASONINGS  BETTER Sir.  But I wholeheartedly agree with U Mr President
You just got $800 BILLION more dollars for defense - you can't find the money in there?? Ask the DOD to repay the $12 TRILLION they LOST. Come on, man, we're hurting out here.
YOUR promise donald WAS that Mexico would pay for a wall or did you forget that "small" detail!
🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻🔻  THE UNITED STATES PRESIDENT, COMMANDER, AND CHIEF IS TRYING TO PROTECT THE AMERICAN PEOPLE AND SAVE LIVES... THE FIRST FAMILY HAS MY FAMILIES SUPPORT 100% PERIOD !!!
Tim Kennelly
Donald Trump is gonna fill up his diaper live on television
Donald Trump is gonna fill up his diaper live on television
No what’s more important is not spending a bunch of tax payer money when you said someone else was going to pay for your pet project.
We want a fully functioning government, with all hard working government employees earning their salaries.  Stop the games and re-open the government NOW!  A wall will not stop the flow of drugs and the majority of immigrants are hard working, peaceful people.  Enough of the fear tactics.  There are more effective options to increase border security than a wall.  Open the government now!
We want a fully functioning government, with all hard working government employees earning their salaries.  Stop the games and re-open the government NOW!  A wall will not stop the flow of drugs and the majority of immigrants are hard working, peaceful people.  Enough of the fear tactics.  There are more effective options to increase border security than a wall.  Open the government now!
Stopping the wasteful Trump monument is the important thing.
Yes, most Americans are not brain dead like the Democrats....for one thing it costs this country over 200 billion per year for illegal aliens payout as opposed to $5 billion for a wall....do the math...its common sense to do the wall...
Speak the truth in Love for our Country America and all
You could ask for 5 billion for cancer research Mr. President and they would appose it.    🖕 them puppets. Build the wall off the 800 thousand checks your not mailing out. Keep it shut down!!
You could ask for 5 billion for cancer research Mr. President and they would appose it.    🖕 them puppets. Build the wall off the 800 thousand checks your not mailing out. Keep it shut down!!
No matter your political standing you must love and protect your country.  Just hating 1 man is not a good answer, grow up.
Don't believe the FAKE news! Trump was voted in by the people! The people want a wall and border security! The people want better care for the veterans, seniors & homeless! The people want our politicians to take care of US first! Stop the fighting and take care of business!
This whole thing is a disgusting waste of time and money. What kind of 'leader' wants to shut the government just to bully his way to a 'win'?
We want security where it needs to be, not funding a self made crisis and ego stroke.   I’m looking forward to the hilarity of your circus show tonight. Remember to get out of your seats folks and actually researching the numbers since the potus has a history of lying. #TrumpsFakeNews #TemperTantrumTrump #DumpTrump #TheTrumpShutdown
What's the crisis? Tens of thousands of people coming into our country illegally every year.  Why is Trump declaring it a crisis now?  Because Democrats and Republicans FAIL to secure the border.  Both parties failed to do what was needed for DECADES.
Since it's our border. Take the money they ve given to you already, open the government the get a go fund me page so the whole Americans will contribute to it. I have 50 dollars for it already. We all need a secured home let alone a country.
Very true President how ever if the retarded Republicans would stop being so nieve an just decriminalize cannabis in the bill they proposed. The dems would be back at the table. 33 percent of that tax revenue from the decriminalization of cannabis would go to the wall. If your using all 50 states as an example that 33 percent would build the wall an still have some left over. I dont have a party choice however I recognize how corrupt an evil all parties are
Americans want a Wall, and put the dems. om the other side of it, while you are at it.
We certainly do have a choice about how to work towards solutions.  Open the government.  Stop immorally holding 800,000 Americans and their families hostage to your decision not to genuinely negotiate like our Founding Fathers required when they designed our complex method of lawmaking.  Why do you CHOOSE to hurt 800,000 Americans and their families?  This is IMMORAL. Your chosen approach is IMMORAL.
We certainly do have a choice about how to work towards solutions.  Open the government.  Stop immorally holding 800,000 Americans and their families hostage to your decision not to genuinely negotiate like our Founding Fathers required when they designed our complex method of lawmaking.  Why do you CHOOSE to hurt 800,000 Americans and their families?  This is IMMORAL. Your chosen approach is IMMORAL.
Dont promise what you cant deliver and stop lying
We are with you President Trump don't let these liberals stop you. The constitution says the President is responsible for security of our boarders.
Did you just ignore everyone saying build the wall and say no one wants it. 😂🤣😂🤣😂
Working together requires you to actually give up the idea of a stupid, pointless wall no one wants.  Learn how to collaborate and work with people who have different views than you and learn how to separate fact from fiction.  There are already plenty of bills waiting to be passed that most people ACTUALLY approve of.  Stop acting like a spoiled child.
Working together requires you to actually give up the idea of a stupid, pointless wall no one wants.  Learn how to collaborate and work with people who have different views than you and learn how to separate fact from fiction.  There are already plenty of bills waiting to be passed that most people ACTUALLY approve of.  Stop acting like a spoiled child.
Hold Fast on the Wall! God is with you! Save America!
campaign promises broken first 2 years 1. didn't repeal and replace obamacare 2. mexico isn't paying for his wall 3. stock market reaching new lows everyday 4. Hillary still not in jail 5. didn't release his taxes 6. only swamp that's draining is his own administration 7. hasn't added any jobs promised 8. No new ethics reforms to reduce the corrupting influence of special interests 9. making collage more affordable  10. hasnt Provided matching contributions for low-income families to the dependent care savings account 11. Allow Americans to deduct child care and elder care from their taxes 12. Reduce the number of tax brackets from seven to three, and likewise greatly simplify tax forms 13. Propose and pass tax simplification bill in which the largest tax reductions are for the middle class 14. Let states manage Medicaid funds 15. Leverage public-private partnerships and private investments through tax incentives to spur $1 trillion in infrastructure  16. Direct the secretary of the treasury to label China a currency manipulator 17. Impose a five-year ban on White House and congressional officials becoming lobbyists after they leave government service 18. my coal miner buddies are still broke
Behind you -rooting for you -USA USA USA -and this great nation to stay sound and sovereign!! Our man- President Trump!!
https://media.8ch.net/file_store/0fb7a32b5a9e587ce2b1cecaf77bbe32340f91d8a4e7c57096dd73ea9c4987d4.jpeg  MAGA   WWG1WGA
Fund the wall... Build the wall!!
Fund the wall... Build the wall!!
Stop killing sea lions!
We Americans dont want border security
and this is very much my country, I have ancestors who came over on The Mayflower.
Jill Travassos well actually, the MAJORITY of Americans DID NOT ELLECT HIM AND DO NOT WANT A FOOLISH POORLY PLANNED OUTRAGEOUSLY EXPENSIVE DEFICIT MULTIPLYING  VANITY WALL.
Jill Travassos well actually, the MAJORITY of Americans DID NOT ELLECT HIM AND DO NOT WANT A FOOLISH POORLY PLANNED OUTRAGEOUSLY EXPENSIVE DEFICIT MULTIPLYING  VANITY WALL.
ZOYA. WE WANT THE WALL. THAT IS WHY WE ELECTED TRUMP.  NOT YOUR COUNTRY!
What's more important to any American is responsible budgetary spending. Your vanity wall or metal bars is insanely expensive and ineffectual. Your fear tactics are misinformed and insane. How people believe a word of what you say is amazing.
What's more important to any American is responsible budgetary spending. Your vanity wall or metal bars is insanely expensive and ineffectual. Your fear tactics are misinformed and insane. How people believe a word of what you say is amazing.
Build that wall aready!
Thankyou, Lord, I am a proud Canadian!!
Best president ever. Build the wall
Biuld the Wall 😎
Stand firm and BUILD THE WALL!!!
I want the wall and drones
love from india to amricans but please love indians also there
THE DEMS HAD IT IN 2013. THEY WERE GIVEN 43 BILLION TO SECURE THE BORDER. WHERE IS THAT MONEY?????
Show me the Pesos
THANK YOU SIR!! GO TRUMP!
Build the wall Sir.
Liberals are wasted wow!!!!
Stop lying fake president
BUILD THAT WALL!!👍🏻
Build this fucking wall !!!
Build this fucking wall !!!
And more term limits!
Janice Rose so you are happy that actual border security is going unpaid right now?
Border security all the way
We need that wall. Build it pleases
They could care less about this country
Secure the border!
Yes thank you
Don’t give in!!!
Please build the wall!
Please build the wall!
Ballonies You are very wrong
2yr old tempertantrum
BUILD THE WALL!   WIDE AND TALL!
Don get you another glass of Democrat kool aid.
I AGREE WITH YOU M.R PRESIDENT
#Save Alappad #Stop Mining
We just want OUR wall!!!!
we support you Mr. President.
Build T H I C C wal
Good job big D keep it up We luv ya
Where is his taxes.
Getting your lying ASS out of the whithouse.
Will someone please take this oompa loompa’s facebook away smh this is the only carrot I would avoid in this world
If anyone else was saying the same thing trump all his lies people would be having a cow!!
Mr. President just do the job that we elected you to do. Secure our borders! Quit sending an olive branch out to the Democrats. Quit asking them to come across the aisle and work together to better the country. we all know the Democrats are not about to do that. They are only about hate and resistance. No bargains, no quarter. #BuildTheWall #Now #MAGA🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
America spoke when we voted you into office. This was a main concern of yours on that political trail. The Democrats are going against everything that democracy stands for.
America spoke when we voted you into office. This was a main concern of yours on that political trail. The Democrats are going against everything that democracy stands for.
But you promised the Mexicans would pay for your wall..hold them to it!
The majority voted for Trump, the majority voted for the wall. Pelosi and Schumer have flipped flopped on this issue over the years and ignored the problem to the point that it’s totally out of control. Mexico will pay for it one way or another regardless.
Tony Jeannette troll
Fake crisis, fake mother f×cking president.
Fake crisis, fake mother f×cking president.
Your promise was that Mexico was going to pay for the wall. Stick to your promise.
Your promise was that Mexico was going to pay for the wall. Stick to your promise.
Walls don’t work.   The Dutch built a wall around New Amsterdam to keep the “bad hombre’s” out.  The British invaded by sea, took New Amsterdam and renamed it New York, your home town. Then tore down that useless wall and built a street..... and named it Wall Street.
Walls don’t work.   The Dutch built a wall around New Amsterdam to keep the “bad hombre’s” out.  The British invaded by sea, took New Amsterdam and renamed it New York, your home town. Then tore down that useless wall and built a street..... and named it Wall Street.
Balance the budget and collect a surplus then you can have your wall. It is not about YOU!
NEVER THOUGHT I WOULD BE ON MY KNEES EVERY NIGHT PRAYING FOR MY COUNTRY AS MUCH AS I HAVE BEEN OR WILL BE. GOD BLESS AMERICA!!! YES AMERICA NOT RUSSIA. AMERICA NOT THE PERSON IN THE WH. I PRAY OUR CONSTITUTION HOLDS. I PRAY THE FEW FREEDOMS WE HAVE LEFT REMAIN INTACT!! GOD BLESS AMERICAN MY HOME SWEET HOME!!
I Agree With Yu USA/American President Donald J. Trump That the Border Wall Must Be Built As I Say Don't Be Intimidated By Democrats Especially House of Representatives Speaker Nancy Pelosi as I Say The Republicans Have a Majority in Senate So Build the Wall and Show Democrats Yu Fulfill Yur Promises As I Say God Bless Yu President Donald Trump Very Much.
I WANT BORDER SECURITY. BUILD THE WALL. WHO CARES WHO GETS A PAYCHECK OR NOT. WHAT'S IMPORTANT IS THE WALL.
PRESIDENT TRUMP, PLEASE CONSIDER HANDING OUT PINK SLIPS TO REDUCE FEDERAL EMPLOYEES THAT ARE NOT NEEDED. WE HAVE WAY TOO MANY THAT WANT TO SIT ON THEIR @$$$$ES & NOT GET WORK DONE ON TIME OR NOT AT ALL. TOO MUCH INCOMPETENCE AND NOT WORTH THE PAY.  THEY CAN STOP BITCHING AND GET A NON-GOVERNMENT JOB.
Build the wall! God Bless President Trump!!...Trump 2020
Build the wall! God Bless President Trump!!...Trump 2020
NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL , NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL, NO WALL.
AND SO DO THE PEOPLE.MAYBE WE NEED TO RALLY!!!SO WE THE  PEOPLE CAN ALL SHOW WE WANT THE WALL. AND WE WANT IT  NOW!!!!
DUMBOCRATS DO NOT WANT SECURE BORDERS BECAUSE THEY KNOW THE VOTING BASE OF ILLEGALS THEY ALLOW TO VOTE WOULD DWINDLE DOWN TO NOTHING! ITS THE ONLY WAY THEY WILL WIN THE ELECTION! 🙄😡💩🙄😡💩😡💩
HERE IS HOW YOU CAN GET YOUR BORDER WALL UP QUICKLY.  https://www.facebook.com/100014708914788/posts/538492803317679/
President Trump, the demorats continue to buck every change because they are cry babies, BUT what they forget is that YOU ARE THE PRESIDENT and you have researched the best way to secure the borders with the border patrol and they have called for, begged for the 'WALL', unfortunately you have a bigger wall of cry babies in the democrat party that can't get past you being elected.    PRESIDENT TRUMP WE ARE PRAYING FOR YOU AND THE WALL.   WE ARE BEHIND YOU AND ON THE SIDE OF YOU ALL THE WAY!!!!!   GO AHEAD AND MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN!!!!!!!!
People overwhelmingly want security but don't let the poll numbers fool you about who thinks a wall is unnecessary or necessary.. With the leftist news outlets brainwashing folks that walls don't work, is it any wonder some buy into that drivel. If those folks were on the border with our border agents, they'd change their minds fast! Walls/barriers work and if they didn't then why put them around prisons, around our military bases, around airport runways and hangers, around electrical transformers and gee, seems under Obama they felt the fence around the White House needed to be taller, Walls, fences or barriers of some kind absolutely work!
#PROUDOFOURPRESIDENTTRUMP!   KEEP AMERICANS SAFE...NATIONAL SECURITY IS A GOOD THING. BUILD THE WALL PRESIDENT TRUMP!  WE ARE BEHIND YOU ALL THE WAY
This isn't just about the wall, it's a statement to Congress to work together on border security, immigration reform and upholding our laws by stopping sanctuary city protections. They have kicked the bucket too long and our social benefit systems are being robbed - which includes aid to vets, elderly, children, Medicaid/Medicare, social security. Not to mention the disease not treated and unvaccinated people that is causing uprisings in eradicated illnesses and diseases we had not seen, like this cold started polio. That's what this is about! Be a voice with us in telling Congress to do their jobs. If you can't donate even one dollar, sign the petition at wefundthewall . com! Thank you for caring about America's ability to sustain and help others, the right way! Please share.
You are so clueless you don't understand how government works....53 Republicans control the Senate but they need 7 Democrats to vote yes...it takes 60 votes to pass a bill to fund government and a wall.
You haven't fulfilled any yet and the majority of Americans don't want your wall republicans and democrats alike, that's why you didn't get it funded when republicans controlled all 3 branches.
You haven't fulfilled any yet and the majority of Americans don't want your wall republicans and democrats alike, that's why you didn't get it funded when republicans controlled all 3 branches.
Most of us are behind you President Donald J. Trump SECURE THAT SOUTHERN BORDER!!!!!
When Las Vegas is taking bets anf placing odds on how many times a President is expected to lie during a national address....thats a crisis... Resign...and we might go easy on you regarding russia...
DO NOT CAVE TO THOSE TWO LOW LIFES, PRESIDENT TRUMP, BUILD THAT WALL, I FOR ONE ARE 100% BEHIND SECURING OUR BORDER FOR THE SAKE OF OUR COUNTRY AND THE SAFETY OF OUR CITIZENS !! IF THE TWO OF THEM PELOSI AND SCHUMER WANT TO ACT LIKE TWO BRATS PUT THEM INTO TIME OUT...
There have been multiple bipartisan solutions to border security that the executive branch torpedoed. #mostcorruptadministrationever
Oh please get over yourself. If you cared anything about the people you would get over your tantrum and stop your shutdown.
Wasn't your promise NO AMERICAN TAXPAYER MONEY WILL GO TO PAY FOR THE WALL, I GUARANTEE IT? How come you can't manage to keep THAT "promise"? Maybe if your administration would stop constantly lying to the American People, they would be more likely to support you..... just a thought, it's obvious you simply are not capable of telling the truth, even when it's pathetically simple to disprove your bullshit.
As it is writing dont paytronize a influence al person .
Let’s do it!
President Trump is right!!! Democrats better realize the American people elected them to do their jobs if they don't do it that should be fired!
But you said you would own it. You would take the mantle, remember? I remember. That was WEAK, and you are a doddering fool.
But you said you would own it. You would take the mantle, remember? I remember. That was WEAK, and you are a doddering fool.
Build that WALL!  THANK YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP AND FAMILY FOR FIGHTING FOR THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!  MAY GOD BLESS YOU ALL!  WE KEEP YOU IN PRAYER!
THANK YOU! ☮️🇺🇲️👨‍🌾
____________  RESIGN  —————
THEY JUST LOOKED SO BAD. WHEN SHE STARTED TO SPEAK MY JAW DROPPED OPEN. IS SHE FOR REAL.  HOW ABOUT TERM LIMITS?  Gee. There’s an idea.
I PUT UP A FENCE WITH A GATE AROUND MY HOUSE I DO NOT PUT A GATE AND THINK I AM DONE AND IF I CAN'T AFFORD BOTH AT THE SAME TIME I START WITH A FENCE TO MAKE ANYONE WHO WANTS TO COME IN MY YARD THROUGH THE AREA WHERE THE GATE WILL BE. Pelosi, Nancy (202) 225-4965 Sen. Charles Schumer ph: (202) 224-6542 #BUILDTHEWALL
Wall wall wall
WHAT'S MORE IMPORTANT TO THOSE DEMOCRATS IS STOPPING YOU FROM FULFILLING ONE OF YOUR PROMISES PRESIDENT TRUMP!! THAT'S WHAT YOUR HATERS ARE DOING!! THEY DON'T CARE ABOUT BUILDING NO WALL!! THEY JUST HATE YOU FOR TRYING TO DO SOMETHING DIFFERENT FOR AMERICA!! THAT'S IT!! THEY DON'T LIKE THAT NOR DO THEY LIKE YOU!! DON'T EXPECT FOR YOUR HATERS TO SUPPORT YOU & WORK WITH YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP!! IT AIN'T GONNA HAPPEN!! LET'S GET THE WALL BUILT WITHOUT THEM HATERS!! LORD, PLEASE HAVE YOUR WAY & HELP OUR PRESIDENT TRUMP TO ACCOMPLISH WHAT YOU WANT HIM TO ACCOMPLISH IN JESUS NAME,  AMEN!! THANK YOU JESUS!!  :) PRESIDENT TRUMP FOR 2020!!  :)
Build it One dead cop is one too many
Build it One dead cop is one too many
YES, WE DO Uncle Donald J. Trump! Trump True...
Americans want secure borders but our borders are extensive. Southern, northern, airports and ports. A wall on the southern border is ineffective. Increase border security at all points of entry. People and technology. Stop your silly tantrum and reopen our government
Yes !! Wall wall wall wall wall
WALL, WALL, WALL
Press on Mr. Trump!
Donald J. Trump  #KAG  "The shutdown sent Republican poll ratings plunging, cost the government billions of dollars and damaged the nation’s international credibility. Mr. Obama refused to compromise, leaving Republican leaders to beg him to talk, and to fulminate when he refused. For all that, Republicans got a slight tightening of income verification rules for Americans accessing new health insurance exchanges created by the Affordable Care Act."  https://www.nytimes.com/2013/10/17/us/congress-budget-debate.html
Anne Crossway another poll...hahaha, and from CBS even. BUILD THE WALL
“You fail all the time, but you aren't a failure until you start blaming someone else.” - Bum Phillips, NFL football coach  Everyone agrees we need border security, but the MAJORITY of Americans do not want to spend our money on your cost-ineffective wall.  Give it up, fool!!!!  Most Americans don't support building the wall...  https://www.cbsnews.com/news/cbs-news-poll-americans-dont-support-building-the-wall/Most Americans don't support building the wallcbsnews.com
Um, pretty sure you promised Mexico would pay for your wall, so wtf are you talking about? Talking to you Donnie.
And I think you suck.
Democrat leaderships rebuttal speech after the President show's spite and malice to the core. They wouldn't negotiate anything that show's the President in a positive light. Hang tough Mr. President and thank you!
Democrat leaderships rebuttal speech after the President show's spite and malice to the core. They wouldn't negotiate anything that show's the President in a positive light. Hang tough Mr. President and thank you!
BUILD THE WALL.    TRUMP YOUR COUNRTY IS BEHIND YOU AND WE SUPPORT YOU.  SO PLEASE HOLD FIRM AND BUILD THAT WALL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!-!
BUILD THE WALL.    TRUMP YOUR COUNRTY IS BEHIND YOU AND WE SUPPORT YOU.  SO PLEASE HOLD FIRM AND BUILD THAT WALL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!-!
Build it!!!!!!!!
We support you Donald J. TrumpDonald thank you and God bless you sir
Yes he is doing exactly what we want!
No work no pay! Stop their pay!
Let whine and cry till u get a wall . waste of us dollars!!
Go for it and do not give them not one inch!
So just give up then.
Make them fold
Build that wall!!
Build that wall!!
Stand strong Trump!!!
call for a referendum
God will help you sir
I want border control
Board Strong
Trump all the way.
yes  we need this wall go for it trump
Thank you sir!
I want the wall
Speed it we need it !!!
Stand firm Mr President!!!
I stand for border security. Very proud of you Mr President.
Take it easy Sir & Take care  Best wishes
I so so so support Trump
Behind you 100% Mister President
You the one I love . By ? For life !!!!!
Democrats are nuts. Build the wall.
Mr Rakeem I'm building a wall on YouTube also terrorist talk
Stop fucking with the people or you’ll have riots on your hands
You promised Mexico will pay for it
BUILD THAT WALL!!!
BUILD THAT WALL!!!
yes we do but what about an invisible eletric fence
Absolutely necessary
cant ya just let that one go......
I want border security
Build that wall!
Give us border security!,,,,,
Give us border security!,,,,,
Thank you Mr. President.
Secure border!
No.  Lying. Don.  It’s. All. About stopping. U
God bless president trump
THERE IS NOTHING AMERICAN ABOUT THE DEMOCRAT PARTY
THERE IS NOTHING AMERICAN ABOUT THE DEMOCRAT PARTY
I want border security! Thank you for all you do Donald J. Trump
NOT ONLY DO WE NEED THE WALL ,WE ALSO NEED TO BAN SHARIA LAW, THIS IS A HOLY WAR ALWAYS HAS BEEN , IT'S TIME TO DRAW THE LINE ,, WHILE THERE IS STILL TIME ,, GOD SPEED..
NOT ONLY DO WE NEED THE WALL ,WE ALSO NEED TO BAN SHARIA LAW, THIS IS A HOLY WAR ALWAYS HAS BEEN , IT'S TIME TO DRAW THE LINE ,, WHILE THERE IS STILL TIME ,, GOD SPEED..
> Donald J. Trump, You promised that Mexico would pay for the wall.
Stand firm.
Stand firm.
Build the wall  President Donald trump
Stay Strong
Jud Carter bullshit
The God of the Bible says we should Remove the aliens from our land, not welcome them with open arms.  Numbers 33:55-56.
The God of the Bible says we should Remove the aliens from our land, not welcome them with open arms.  Numbers 33:55-56.
USA was some ather borders to protected
Feed your hatred!
Strung out on Fox News.
Strung out on Fox News.
We need the border!
God bless you president
That's a trick question
Right. If you say do it... they say don't. Just do it. MAGA
Right. If you say do it... they say don't. Just do it. MAGA
working together.....obviously!!!!
working together.....obviously!!!!
I support a border!!
Prayers for you ........,
1. Shut Down the Border.  2. Open Govt.
Keep it closed til they give it up sir
Yes we do Mr. Trump my President.
Yes!  Build the wall!
Yes!  Build the wall!
Thank you Sir! For being our President!
Thank you Sir! For being our President!
Stop government shutdown!
Absolutely  true  just get it done
yes we do. I speak for my family.
Stand firm, We support you!!!!
FINISH THE WALL!
Don't put it off.  Need it now!
GO, MR. PRESIDENT!!!!!!!!
HOLD YOUR GROUND WE HAVE SO MANY HERE WE CAN'T AFFORD .
WE NEED TO LAUNCH THE CRIMINAL NRA
WE NEED TO LAUNCH THE CRIMINAL NRA
Please  build the Wall!!
Don't give in to those turds
stop Congress paychecks!
We support you, Mr President
Yes just build the wall
Really ?? When's this happing ?
Build it baby!
Yes me and my 5 want security
Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Remember the Alamo, 100 Americans held off Sana Ana's 4000 trained Army for days behind a Wall, without the wall the Army would have marched through Texas changing America in a very different way, built the Wall
Stop the democrat shutdown!
Border security is necessary!!!
Border security is necessary!!!
Yes we want Border Security!  You doing Great President Trump
No one can stop you ❤
The Trumpanator
Working for the secure every family member.
Build build build the wall!!
Hurting you , our president it is so obvious
Secure our Borders
See you in Moscow   Putin
Don't back down Mr. President.
We support you. Build the wall!!
Get this wall built
Build the flippin wall already.  NOW.
Stopping you
Don't give up I'm for you.
yes to the wall
Thank you Mr President
How about a go fund the wall?????
Stopping you obviously!
Albert needs help!!!!!
Amen. We do want border security!
Dems sent open borders
Brown terds flying south
Welcome aboard!
We want a wall
I believe a solution will be reached just needs to be sooner
Patriot Movement AZ
Keep it shut down
DONALD J TRUMP ...ESAD
Shut up, #DotardTrump !
Build it! Don't mess up.
Behind you 100 percent sir
I think it's pretty obvious!
Build that wall Trump!!!
Do what you have to BUILD THE WALL!
DONT BACK DOWN DONT BACK DOWN
DONT BACK DOWN DONT BACK DOWN
We do want border security!
Build the wall Trump build the wall
Democrats are now the ennemies of this country
get her done MR President.
Yes build the wall !!!
They want your successful butt
No they don't.
https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=10218277645353133&id=1250886953 here's an idea
Build the wall!! We need it!
you are number one
We support you.  Build the Wall!
The best president
Dont give in. Build the wall!
Your absolutely right,
Build the Wall. Go Trump 👍
Build the wall Mr. President! We stand with you!
Build the wall Mr. President! We stand with you!
Your promise to the people was Mexico would pay for the way, so if you can’t get the President of Mexico to pay then your so rich you should pay.
Do yall want to battle with me damn lizzards?
WE WANT A WALL. I STAND BESIDE YOU.
Trump's got a wall ivankas got them sugar walls 😉
Don’t give in. No DACA. Build that Wall
Yes we do!!!!
what station what time??
Hold strong 💪
Stand your ground President Trump!!!🇺🇸❤🇺🇸😋🇺🇸❤
Stand your ground President Trump!!!🇺🇸❤🇺🇸😋🇺🇸❤
Don't back down. Build the wall!
Don't back down. Build the wall!
Trumph has gone to mad.
Ill give you 3 million guesses
Obstructionist
That seems pretty obvious.
So true build the wall.
Best president ever!!!!!♥️♥️♥️
Build the wall !!!🇺🇸🇺🇸💯
They dont want you to succeed
You are right on Mr President !
Stay strong Mr. President!!!
Stay strong Mr. President!!!
Kick their ass. Build that wall
People need there jobs back
We already have one
PRESIDENT TRUMP, YOU ARE "WE THE PEOPLE" BECAUSE "WE THE PEOPLE" WANTED YOU THERE!!! PLEASE STAND YOUR GROUND!!! NO MATTER WHAT THEY SAY..... WE THE PEOPLW ARE WITH YOU ALL THE WAY!!! THANK YOU FOR ALL YOU DO FOR US!!! GOD BLESS YOU & OUR FIRST FAMILY!!! #MAGA #TRUMP2020 #45ISMYPRESIDENT
PRESIDENT TRUMP, YOU ARE "WE THE PEOPLE" BECAUSE "WE THE PEOPLE" WANTED YOU THERE!!! PLEASE STAND YOUR GROUND!!! NO MATTER WHAT THEY SAY..... WE THE PEOPLW ARE WITH YOU ALL THE WAY!!! THANK YOU FOR ALL YOU DO FOR US!!! GOD BLESS YOU & OUR FIRST FAMILY!!! #MAGA #TRUMP2020 #45ISMYPRESIDENT
Try telling the truth
Get em Mr President
I'm with Trump on this
I'm with Trump on this
Not with America tax dollar's!
The walll for HR1??????
Get Television address Tonight ,Sir <
Stay strong Trump.
Keep going Mr. President
Let’s build the wall!🇺🇸
Damn right we do.
Stick to it. President Thrump
Bypass Congress
We support you, President Trump! GOD bless you!
That answer itself. MAGA
🇺🇸 Build that wall 🇺🇸 MAGA 🇺🇸
Yes we do! Do not back down!
Yes we do! Do not back down!
my only question why didn't he do it sooner
Build the wall.  Please
I agree with President Trump.
Wake up sheeple!!!!!!
Keep gov shut build the wall
Stay the course! Build the wall!
Don't back down Mr. President
We want border security... Now
BIG ASS WALL PLEASE
Agree and support 100%
NO WE WANT HEALTHCARE, BALANCED BUDGET, SOCIAL SECURITY FIXED, ECONOMIC INEQUALITY ADDRESSED, INFRASTRUCTURE PACKAGE AND EQUAL RIGHTS YOU DOLT.
NO WE WANT HEALTHCARE, BALANCED BUDGET, SOCIAL SECURITY FIXED, ECONOMIC INEQUALITY ADDRESSED, INFRASTRUCTURE PACKAGE AND EQUAL RIGHTS YOU DOLT.
not gonna happen
not gonna happen
no they don't -
🇺🇸🗽🗺❤️🗺🇺🇸❤️TRUMP 2020🗽🗽🇺🇸❤️🗺
🇺🇸🗽🗺❤️🗺🇺🇸❤️TRUMP 2020🗽🗽🇺🇸❤️🗺
Looking Foreword to TONIGHT !!!!! :)
Stand strong, Mr. President!  🇺🇸
Stand strong, Mr. President!  🇺🇸
Democrats want to continue destroying our nation
Secure secure!!
Build the wall 😊 Trump 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Strongly support Our President Donald Trump.
Build that wall!
Good morning trump sir
Please build this wall.
Thank you for working so hard for America. 🇺🇸🇺🇸
Thank you Mr President!!
dems don't care about anything but,  arguing
We need a coup 🙄
IMPRACH TRUMP
Stay firm Mr. TRUMP
Thank you 🙏❤️
Stay strong!
Do it Trump we support this
What time is the speech?
Dems are just mad because you are making them look bad. They've been in politics for years and you come in and run circles around them getting the job done while they just keep flapping their lips..
world's dumbest leader ever.
That's "We, the people" to you all.
Get it done boss
Get it done boss
WE WANT BORDER SECURITY!!
AND BETTER FINANCIAL AND SAFE GOVERNMENT
are you can give me a 1mlion $??
Stay strong, please
Hell yeah we want a big tall wall!
Did I hear steel reinforcement
Just wait until we get our landing pads Out on the Ocean
end the shutdown
Yes, we do. Build the wall.
God bless you Mr. President!
Great speech tonight!
Waste of money
trumpty dumbty fall off the wall
Who knows, they always find something 🙃
Will make it Donald, hang in there...👍
Go Trump! 2020. I support you.
Haters gunna hate, Mr. President.
Awesome job,Mr.President
Thank you sir!
Stand Tall. Be proud
President Trump. BUILD that WALL   You got this !
I HOPE he is able TO get it done
The democrats, his vanity, prevent him from realizing that Donald Trump is a person of principles vasados in the perseveranica. Its objective is to serve the community with transparency. Your confidence is the border wall to secure the border.
57% of people don't want the wall.
We want our fucking money !!! Tf you talking bout
WE WANT THE WALL!!!!
Best to be prepared than unaware !
Repeal 22nd amendment
We want a wall!!
We got your back
We got your back
Keep on course Mr. President !
Yes we do TRUMP and we are behind you
Build the wall! We are with you!
Build that wall!!!  So very proud of you!  🙏🙏🙏🙏🙏🙏
Yes we want border security.
MAGA!!!! BUILD THE WALL!!!!
YES WE DO!!! 100%....GO TRUMP!!!
Military Emergency !
built the wall mr president👍
built the wall mr president👍
Build that wall.
Great speech last night!
No wall! #FakePresident
They don't won't you to do either one
EAT A D*CK, MOTHER F*CKER 🤡😂😂😂😂🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽🖕🏽
LOCK TRUMP UP !!!
LOCK TRUMP UP !!!
HEAVEN:  NO WALL.... NO TRUMP!!!!!
Go fund me...the wall
Go fund me...the wall
Build it Mr Trump
Correct, My USA
We support you ❤️
Lets get this wall built!
You know how to do it.
Hang in there Mr. President. Build it.
The democrats.  Lol.
Do it sir. just do it.
Yes we want the boarder now!
Get It Done!
BUILED THE WALL
How many promises have you fulfilled? https://youtu.be/S4YxzVtWci4
Build our wall
Brian Larson we together will build a Great Wall!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
We are with you!!
No we don’t can’t u read no dam wall
😊She's a nice person! HbD
And more votes.....
Only border your Imagination . Wall border not enough !
Keep the faith
We do with you all the way
STAND FIRM. BUILD the WALL.
no promises have been kept . we have been screwed over time an time again
Build the wall President Trump!!!
Stand firm trump
Build the wall. We are with you!!!
Go home to Manhattan...
You go Mr. President!!!!
Bunch of lost sheep’s under here smh it’s sad
Yes, build the wall.
Build the wall! It’s long over due!
Judy Lipscomb They Will!!
Federal workers want to be paid too!
Build that wall!!!
Is that a rhetorical question?
I agree with you!!!!!!!!!!
Make it happen!!!!
I want the wall
Yes we do!!!
I want border security!
You going to prison
You going to prison
Secure the border by stopping you.
WALL WALL WALL WALL 🇺🇸
Mr. President, there no way in h-ll that a meaningful dialog would occur with the delusional Social/Democrats. things will only deteriorate. Martial Law would expedite the fix for what ails the delusional Social/Democrats. Immediate arrest of top Democrats & Republicans
Build that wall!
Stand firm, Mr President!
YES< AMERICA  WANTS  BORDER  SECURITY !!
Want the border
Want the border
A wall is not the answer.
Done more smartly want it.
Build a big WALL!!!!!!
Build that wall. Hold that line.
BUILD OUR WALL.
yes we do build the wall.
Love our President!
Love our President!
BUILD THE WALL!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Amen Mr President
You lie. Neverending. You just lie.
Total waste of air time.
Damn straight we do!!
The Democrats are mainly concerned with keeping at least a third of the population disenfranchised.
The Democrats are mainly concerned with keeping at least a third of the population disenfranchised.
Lies and bullshit...
Boycot tacos and burritos
Build that Wall.
We love Trump!
Yes we do Mr. President!
Democrats are anti-  America.
Stay strong a. Build the wall.
Mr President,  Build The Wall
Yes we do thank you Trump
We support our President
2020  Big BLUE  Tidal Wave coming
Build the WALL  Mr President
Build the WALL  Mr President
Build the dam wall!!!!
Stand firm, Mr  President
Yes of course 👍👍👍
a wall Maybe just a little Band-Aid on a gaping wound
delusional as always...
You people are sick asf.
Stop paying them then
As for me, seeing trump in prison
Nah, I'm good. Thanks.
Build the wall!! Go Trump🇺🇸🇺🇸
Secure that border!
Do Not Give In!!!
YOU are so fucked
YOU are so fucked
You are so fucked
You are so fucked
National Security now!!!
Build the wall. Hold firm.
Build that wall! 💯
Keep it shut down Donald!  Stand firm!
Stand by your  promises
Stand firm mr. President stand firm we have your six!
BUILD THAT WALL Mr. President!!
BUILD THAT WALL Mr. President!!
Build that WALL! We're with you! 👍
We all know the answer to this
Your promise was M.e.X.I.C.O.!
Kinda want my hubbies pay check!!!
Local NBC affiliates are not showing it in Virginia Beach area
Keep it shutdown
Don't stop winning!
Don't stop winning!
STAND FIRM TRUMP!
Stay strong
Border security!
BUILD THAT WALL !!!!!!
BUILD THAT WALL !!!!!!
We the people want the Wall
Stay Strong Mr. President!
We are with you, Mr. President!
Alaska in May!!!
That wall WILL be built
AMERICANS WANT THE WALL!
I want a border wall.
I want a border wall.
Yes!! #BuildTheWall
Yes!! #BuildTheWall
Enjoy the day
Enjoy the day
You are so fucked
You are so fucked
100% Build the wall!!
You are RIGHT, DJT!! Just do it! ❤️❤️
We want border security!
We want border security!
Yes We Do ! We Want the Wall !
Yes We Do ! We Want the Wall !
What a Dick Head
it's clear that the dirty dems will threaten the security and safety of the entire nation just so they can play games and be childish. the wall is something we all wanted...they are still licking their wounds from you winning the presidency. If they want approve a wall, I say we take down every wall they have around their homes. It's incredibly irresponsible of them to act this way!
Yes we do hang in there
Buld the Wall!
Just get it done.
stand with trump
stand with trump
WE DONT WANT A WALL
Trump's Strategy: DIVIDE & CONQUER
Don sounds like he is caving.
Thank you President Trump!
Still your president snowflake
Don't give an inch Mr. Trump.
You got this Mr Trump! We support you
god bless you . you are very presidental
Pay the Coast Guard
BUILD OUR WALL!!!!
I WANT SECURE BORDERS...
Shut it down and Build the wall!!!
Mr President ! Build the wall .
NO WALL EVER!!!!!!
Do what you got to do .just do it
Not accomplished with a wall!
We love you!!! MAGA!!
Yes we do Mr. President
Stand strong
Yes we do want the wall!!!!!!!!!!
Close the border !!!! For good !!!!!
Don't give In!!!!!! We are with you Mr. Trump
We need a wall!!!!!
Put Schumer and
Wish we had a wall
Yes absolutely Right.
Term limits!
Build that wall Trump keep us safe!!!
DOW IS UP AGAIN. THANK YOU TRUMP!
WALL IS COMING. GET COMFY! ;)
LOVE THIS PRESIDENT.
LOVE THIS PRESIDENT.
THE WALL IS COMING KIDS. GET COMFY. ;)
Hang in there Mr. Trump. We know you have aces up your sleeve. ThankQ+ . . . MAGA! WWG1WGA! Donald J. Trump 2020
Secure our borders!!
Dems!!  Are playing games!! Screw em.
Dems!!  Are playing games!! Screw em.
We won't be happy till it's done!!
We won't be happy till it's done!!
Yes we do Mr. President
Absolutely, BUILD THAT WALL!
It's all about your ego.
Build it,, and they can't come...
Love u trump keep doing great
Stand Strong !!!! build the Wall !!!!!
I want border security!
Let’s build the WALL.
Shutdown the border!
“FOX news is fake” said Donald Trump
Love our president...
We really need the wall
Come one come all.  Dig under it!
I support trump period.
Keep fighting Mr Trump
We need that wall !
Build the wall!!! Protect Americans!!!
Don’t give in to the Democrats stand your ground
Build the wall! Trump 2020
Get it done Mr. President!!!
Get it done Mr. President!!!
Yes we do!!🇺🇸
Yes we do!!🇺🇸
Build  the  wall and  make  el  Chapo  pay.
Faux news, lol
BTW. Build that Wall.
Who's the "pussy"? YOU!!
You didnt say we would
AMERICANS WANT OUR W2S!!!
Yes we do!!!🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes,We Do Want It. Thank You President Trump.
Build that wall now
Build that wall now
Brilliant man!!
Brilliant man!!
I will be watching
All they care about is stopping you Mr president
That's right you have pen to
It's wrong mister Torn Brain
They aren’t too smart
BUILD the WALL   We Support You 100%
Don’t give in!
Yes we need this
Stand strong Mr President
One in the same
Praying for you
Border security
Yes please build the wall
All the way with Trump!
Just build the damn wall already!!!!!!
Thank you for representing us!!
Border Security  🇺🇸️👍
The liars wanted it!
Dont back down mr president!
🇺🇸 God Bless President Trump 🇺🇸
Don't give up!!
I agree, but no wall
No good deed goes unpunished.
We want the Wall
We are with the President!
Isaiah 54 :17 🇺🇸💗 🙏
Americans want security
Build it!!!!
Build it!!!!
Security yes wall not so much.
Stand your ground! You are doing a great job!
Stand your ground! You are doing a great job!
Just shut down the southern border
Just shut down the southern border
❤️🇺🇸💙BUILD THAT WALL!!!!❤️🇺🇸💙
#NationalEmergency  Just do it
Build the wall, Mr. President.
GOD HAS THIS DON'T WORRY
Protect us please. God bless you 🇺🇸
Stay Strong Mr President!
Thought Mexico was paying for it!!
ITS OUR WALL! #BuildIt
Impeachment is the only way
BuildThe Wall
You've got that right, Mr. President!
Dam right we do build it
Secure the border!
Yes build the wall
Give it to em Pres!
Bye Trump lovers! It's all over. Nice try but he's finished!
Fucks News says so, must be true
Stay strong!! Thank you Mr. President!
We want the wall. Build it
Yes we the people do
It's a start
You tell him, Sharon.
I’m getting me a yellow vest
Build that wall POTUS!!!
Build that wall POTUS!!!
OUR GOVERNMENT IS CORRUPTED.
We want the wall. 👍🏻♥️🇺🇸
Secure the border!
Build that wall!
True ! Border Security is the best option to choose...
True ! Border Security is the best option to choose...
Thank you Mr. President!
I think we can do both
Build the wall Mr President
I sure want Security
Stopping you from fulfilling another one of your promises
WHAT IS SO AMAZING ,DEMOS HAVE NOT ONCE GIVEN ANY EXPLANATION AS TO WHY IT IS WRONG FOR THE WALL , yet they have walls around their houses
Trump for 2020
Keep the faith Mr President.
Build the wall Mr President
HE is not the answer
BUILD THAT WALL!!!!!!!!
He is negotiating. Sometimes you have to stand firm.
Stopping you from doing anything for our country!
The numbers don’t show it.
Build it, Build It, BUILD IT
Stopping you! Build that wall!
Vote Out republicans.
Yes, yes, yes
Secure the Border
Smh.So much hate and bs on this
Smh.So much hate and bs on this
Thank you sir. We srand behind you.
dirty politics
Stand strong.  We are behind you.
CLOSE THE BORDERS PLEASE !!!
sure border security
YES WE DO!!! CITIZENS FIRST!!
Yes we do!  You are right!!
Secure the border build the wall
Stand Firm Mr. President!!
Thank you President Trump... God bless
Thank you President Trump... God bless
Dont let them
laughable ..... numbers show it ... what a joke....
BUILD THE WALL! PLEASE!
no matter who pay's...just the wall
We want a wall
Stand strong.
Stand strong.
BUILD THE WALL SIR !!! #WEGOTYOUR6
We are with you
GO TRUMP !!!!!!!
Secure the border
It's Apparent
Border security =/= border wall
if you build it juan wont come
Democrats =🐑
Build that wall now
WHERE IS THE PESOS?
Stand Strong Sir!
FEARMONGERING AT ITS BEST
Declare a national emergency! Obama was always doing things without Congress!
Declare a national emergency! Obama was always doing things without Congress!
Now USA pays. Not Mexico
Build that damm wall
You are so fucked
You are so fucked
Us true Americans do
I agree......😏😏😏😃😃😎
Demarats, go to he##
Yes, but a wall is not the answer.
BUILD THE WALL NOW! TRUMP 2020!
BUILD THE WALL NOW! TRUMP 2020!
I want it done
No. They don’t want a wall.
We want the wall
We want the wall
Thank you! Great speech last night!
Please, stop drinking the koolaid
Please, stop drinking the koolaid
I think what’s important is; YOU STOP YOUR CONSTANT LYING
Please go away Donald. Soon!
Stand strong  We are with you🇺🇸🇺🇸
They will lose this battle
Great speech .keep fighting
Ppl have spoken..why u in office..
PLease build the wall!!
Love builds bridges not walls!
Go on down to the border today and let those men and women know that unless I get my wall I will not be paying you coming to work every day and find one sucker to do a photo op acting like it is okay so your base is happy.
Go President Trump!!!!
I stand for you Mr. President.
Stopping you Mr. President🇺🇸
Build that Wall.
Build that Wall.
Little words from a ignorant man
do whats needed mr. president
Secure the border
da border in Canada
Sir you are wrong.
Keep it shut down
Build that WALL!!!!!
Stopping you!
Stopping you. Obviously.
Yes....build that wall!
Build the wall Mr. PRESIDENT
No turning back
Build that wall!
I want boarder security!!!
Yes build the wall
stand stong! dont cave ! build that wall
Stay strong
Build that wall!!!!
STOP YPOUR LIES!! RESIGN!!!
National emergency!
That’s a waste of money ... period
Border security NOT a WALL!
Obviously the latter...
No they don’t.
It’s not USA . For sure
Not the way you are doing it
Great speech, Mr. President!
YES WE DO … BUILD THE WALL.
Finish the wall
Terrible man if the year!
#TRUTH Thank you #POTUS 45💜🇺🇸 :)!
Secure our borders!!!
Exactly!! #SecureOurBorders!
Exactly!! #SecureOurBorders!
Stand strong Mr Trump .🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
#FakeCrisis from a #PropPresident
Yes we want our country secure
Democrats do not want border security
Ed Smith I see you rather the Clinton news network CNN
Fox news = FAKE news
Fake news. They have been willing to work with you.
Let's get our wall
We need to start a  petition.
Good morning mama ji
We want border security
Build that wall!
Secure it.... build the wall
Yes we do ! Build that wall !!!
Give it a rest geez
5.56 secures the border well 😂😂
BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT
CLOSE ALL OUR BORDERS
Yes we do! Thank you!
Working to secure border. #GoTrump
Obviously stopping you.
Build the wall President Trump 2020🇺🇸🙏
We don’t need more
We don’t need more
Dam right we do!!!
Stay strong Mr. President!
Build that wall Mr. President!!!
Take it down and build the wall..
Their crimes will be exposed in 2019. Q
Build that wall!!!!!!!!!
GREAT speech,  Mr. President!
GREAT speech,  Mr. President!
Will tonights talk be on here live?
Stand with Trump 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
BUILD THAT WALL MR PRESIDENT
So do Canadians!
We are with you President Trump.
We need the wall
But the Democrats don’t
When your right your right!!!!
Build the wall Mr President 👍
Close the Border
Build that fuckin wall
Don't give in or sign any bills they want for the next 2 years!!!
Yes we do SIR....PLEASE
Like he said his promise , Just full of lies.
Stand Strong....
YES we do!!!!!!
Stand you ground.
They jusy want to stop you.
Pride before their downfall. Don’t worry Donald J. Trump God has his hand on you! Build that wall!
Keeping you muzzled, motor mouth!
Don't cave build the wall
Amen!!!... Angels SEE
Build OUR WALL now.
You have my vote 2020
I want peanuts
I want a wall! take a survey!
We need a 30 foot wall!
Utterly ridiculous
C. None of the above
Really can’t wait to laugh
https://www.wnd.com/2006/09/37956/       older post but still valid
Enough games get this built
No they don’t
Build the barrier!
Yea President Donald J. Trump, they are just so jealous of your good ❤️ and success in helping our Nation.  They had so many years/chances to, during their high paying job to move their BEHIND!  Thank you Donald J. Trump for always thinking of our Nation and for working for FREE!  Please do not allow them to discourage you!  They are not REAL!  Can’t do what they promised!   🙏God bless 🙏 you and our Nation President Trump!
Donny , you are the King Troll . You had 2 years and a majority in Government and did nothing . Now you blame the Democrats .
Build it now!
Stop paying Dems salary!
Yes build that wall
Yes build that wall
Yes to border security!
Always full of bullshit
😂🤣😂🤣😂🤣 some more lies...
Yes. Border security. No wall!
I stand here with you
I stand here with you

THE WALL IS COMING SON. GET COMFY! ;)
YOUR NAIVETE IS CUTE SON. SANTA ISN'T REAL EITHER. ;)
Chicken little all over again!
MR. PRESIDENT SWEET SLEEP IN JESUS NAME.....ON THIS NITE...
MR. PRESIDENT SWEET SLEEP IN JESUS NAME.....ON THIS NITE...
Wow that's awesome
Build the wall! Then end the fed!
You got my vote on it cheif
Stay strong!!!
Build the wall, Mr. President
This promise needs to be kept too  https://youtu.be/r_Z9Rubof0g
BUILD THE WALL!  IMMIGRATION REFORM!
You are a sucker
Nailing the address! ✊👍
BUILD THAT WALL!
BUILD THAT WALL!
I love your opinion.
Paul Barron the democrats are holding back progress and the will of the nation
DO DO let me Help you In NY !!! 👈🏽👈🏽👈🏽
DO DO let me Help you In NY !!! 👈🏽👈🏽👈🏽
Abso-freakin'-lutely
Donald Trump, a true G. #maga
We are with you 🇺🇸
anyone with half a brain and some common sense wants security
100%!!! With you Mr. President
MAGA Potus your the best ever !!!✝️❤️🇺🇸😃
Stay the course Mr. President.
Do you have emphysema?
Individual 1 telling more lies.
Do it.....it's RIGHT! !!
Keeping Americans safe
tell that to the democrats
Open up the Government.
Build the wall.  N. O. W. !
Their goals of communism!
Electrify the damn wall.
Yep build the wall
Build that wall ASAP
TRUMP 2020...Build our  WALL!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸👍
Secure that border
lol hes such a troll. I love it.
Trump is the CRISIS !
We stand with you all the way!!!
Go Trump! We are behind you!!
I support President Trump!
How will it secure us, again?
We know the democRATS are against anything you want President Trump but We The People are 100% behind you!!!  (Y) (Y) 🇺🇸️🇺🇸️
We know the democRATS are against anything you want President Trump but We The People are 100% behind you!!!  (Y) (Y) 🇺🇸️🇺🇸️
It's time Schumer puts the money where his foot is!!  https://youtu.be/HmdiisLr5ug
It's time Schumer puts the money where his foot is!!  https://youtu.be/HmdiisLr5ug
We The People want the WALL!!!
YES WE DO!!! CLOSE THE BORDER!!!
We're not stupid.
We love you President Trump
Not according to the polling!!!!!
LO C K   I T  D O W N   T I G H T
Thank you Mr President
Stand firm, build the wall!
So true President Trump!!!
Americans first!  Build the wall!
Grow up and learn before u make comments !!!
Build the wall Mr trump
Stopping you must be the answer there Mr POTUS.
I stand with President Trump
Throw a tantrum tonight big guy!!
Good job Mr. President
Don’t give in!!!! America first 🇺🇸
Still with you ❤️
lies from the worst president ever.
Build the wall!Trump 2020!
Real Border Security
Let’s do it! And then Drain the Swamp
#GoFactYourself#   liar
AMERICA 1ST, NOT 2ND!!!!
American paychecks
Stopping you! Anyway they can
Stopping you that's all they want
Stopping you that's all they want
We want border security!
democrats want OPEN BORDERS!
They are looking for voters
BUILD THE WALL Mr. PRESIDENT.
Stop congress pay checks
Thank you President Trump 🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Stopping you !
Keep on fighting for the right thing Mr.President!
I think those Friends cant count 😂😂😂
Well it's not working together
Secure The Wall
Keep on doing the best job ever!
Ms President  Trump   🌎referendum✅?🌏🌍
Borders Security,
They do not care about America.
obviously stopping you.....
This wall stuff again...
Yes we do want border security!
Hillary wants it too!  https://youtu.be/AlFi0QUboxs
You snivelling con man!
Yes we do! Build the wall!
$5.7 Billion for Border Security
Good fences make good neighbors
L O C K   I T   D O W N
L O C K   I T   D O W N
59 percent of americans are  against it !!! Try again
Whose numbers?
TRUMP..2020...BUILD THAT WALL!!
Build the wall Mr. President!
Build the wall Mr. President!
I demand national security!
Not allowed to text it
Secure the borders!!
Border this border that. Geez u sound like a broken record
We the American people support you Mr President Donald Trump 100%
We want the wall Sir!
I want BORDER security definitely...
plz come take over canada
Bravo 👏🏻 best president ever
Israel must help Americans
We want security, but no new wall
Yes we Do! #Buildthewall
DEMOCRATS ARE REATARTS !!!
DEMOCRATS ARE REATARTS !!!
Fix our roads & bridges ‼
Cheeto is what cheeto does
Great question .
Dig that ditch
Obama want build wall too
We support you President!
U right Trump 😎😎😎
Coming soon: ……THE END OF THE ORANGE CLOWN ! ......... 🤡 🔚
You need a campaign slogan
Amen preach it Mr. President
Built the wall!!
Dam straight !
DON'T GIVE IN!!! GET OUR WALL!!!!!
Is this a trick question?
Border security!
Moore Bullsh!t
That's obvious...democrats just being democrats.
I support building the wall!
Secure the border
If there is a National Crisis at the Border, and Homeland Security is shut down, and you own the shutdown, just open it back up and work through the issues.
Secure the border.
Support trump 100% 💪America💪 God bless trump and america 👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏
Support trump 100% 💪America💪 God bless trump and america 👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏
Damn right......Build the Wall!
Thank you Albert he really is the best I have seen .
HUAC would solve a lot of this.
Thank you POTUS!!
JUST BUILD IT!!! GEEZ.....
Fake news at its finest
Fake news at its finest
Stay Strong. We're with you!
Wall or war... Your choice
Yes we do want it
Yes we do want it
Cut off the Senators pay.
Cut off the Senators pay.
Stand firm mr President
We are with you from Florida President Trump.Build The Wall...
GOD IS THE SUPREME POWER
Yes we do! And proper vetting
We want the wall built...
We want the wall built...
WHY ARENT YOU CALLING OUT THE DEMS FOR WHY THEY TRULY  DONT WANT WALL  WALLS ARE LESS VOTES !! THATS THE  ONLY !!! REASON VOTES AND POWER!!
WHY ARENT YOU CALLING OUT THE DEMS FOR WHY THEY TRULY  DONT WANT WALL  WALLS ARE LESS VOTES !! THATS THE  ONLY !!! REASON VOTES AND POWER!!
Fear is all you have.
Fact checked by Fox news: https://youtu.be/-Ljzg-koH5Y
Utterly ridiculous.
The democrats,are delusional   and  crazy too
We are behind you 💯 %
Roger that ICU backup please
We WANT the wall we NEED the wall and we WILL get the wall
Trump stepping up his lies
Trump stepping up his lies
We want the Wall, BUILD The Wall.
Donald Trump 2020 land slide
Impeach the mother.....
Preach it Mr. President...
Us legal tax payers do.
Yes we do! #BUILDTHEWALL
I support you Mr President 100%
Thankyou Mr. President
THEY WANT TO BLOCK YOU   STAY STRONG.
Thank you!
Hold the line.
Hold the line.
We do.  Shut it down.
Stop melting snowflake!
Stop melting snowflake!
FROM PIGLIOSI.
FROM PIGLIOSI.
Bullshit lies.
They are fiends on a mission. All they can envision is stopping you, even if it means destroying themselves.
Can't wait for your speech Mr. President! ❤️
Yes we do!!!
Show them for the losers they are!
BUILD THE DAM WALL
STAND TOUGH....DO NOT CAVE!!
Fake promise... fake president...
We stand behind you sir! Build the wall!
We want border security
Build the wall!!! No compromises!
Unfortunately, the first one.
He is the best president 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
He's has two year... Two. Years.
Absolutely! Just do it!
Absolutely! Just do it!
Yes, please build the wall.
More lies from the far right.
sadly,  we know the answer to that
Donald Trump AMERICA GOOD GOOD GOOD GOD bless you Thank you  very much AMERICA AMENA JESUS GOD AMERICA
You promised that MEXICO WOULD PAY FOR IT.
Yes he is build the wall.
Yes  We the people want security. !
Donald trump 2020 Donald trump Jr 2024
Stand your ground Mr President.
Build That Wall  We Will Back You.....
Stand firm President Trump!
Stand firm President Trump!
Actually, the Dems are saving America money, because a wall will not stop people from entering the US.     It can be scaled as easy as this   . https://youtu.be/lhNs7HcBW6o
Great speech tonight!!
We support our president!
Build that beautiful wall!
IMPEACHMENT & JAIL!
IMPEACHMENT & JAIL!
Standing with you Mr. President!!
A wall won't work.
Yes we do! First priority our safety! BUILD THAT WALL! I DON'T CARE HOW LONG IT TAKES THE SHUTDOWN!..
How many ppl called in?
Devon Tall Trump is building a wall through the National Butterfly Center in Texas, which will wipe out these endangered butterflies. Rio Grande or not.  https://www.nationalbutterflycenter.org/?fbclid=IwAR2fS59lK4K-vJSJoCBpkbpxfXvNnKxdci31x58XcRogayYZ4BPk75iehPY
That's because they have a river on the border. What do the border Patrol agents say?
https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/
Mayor of Texas Border Town says wall is pointless, there is no crisis...  https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/Mayor of Texas Border Town: There is No Crisis Here, Trump's Wall is Pointlesstruthout.org
BULLSHIT ARTIST AT WORK?   LOL
We love our President
Yes Sir !!!  We do !!!
The American people demand a border wall !
Stopping all your lies!
Build that wall!!!! Please!!!
Build that wall!!!! Please!!!
We all know how crazy liberals are
You will figure it out Mr President.
You will figure it out Mr President.
Do not back Down Trump
Build DA WALL !!!!!!
Our country is falling apart.
We want the Wall👍🇺🇸
We sure do 👍👍👍👍👍👍🇺🇸🇨🇱🇮🇱
Stop the government shut down!!
President Stupid  Strikes Again 😡
Zero Lies #WINNING
We’ve got your back Mr President!
We’ve got your back Mr President!
Yes WE do Mr. PRESIDENT
We need the wall!
BUILD THE WALL! WE SUPPORT YOU!!
BUILD THE WALL! WE SUPPORT YOU!!
Build our wall!
The American People are with you 1000%!  #KEEPTHEGOVERNMENTSHUTDOWN!  #BUILDTHEWALL #MASA! #BESTPRESIDENTSINCEOURFOREFATHERS
Thank you Mr President🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Go sit in the corner ya PO💩🤡.
Very good Mr.President
We the People want the wall!!
We the People want the wall!!
WE LOVE YOU TRUMP!!
WE LOVE YOU TRUMP!!
MR PRESIDENT WE DON'T WANT THESE ILLEGAS ENTERING OUR COUNTRYANYMOORE THIS HAS TO END . BUILD THE BIGGEST WALL YOU CAN --WE WHO VOTEDFOR YOUU WANT ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION ENDED .
Secure the border
Yes they do, but not a wall
Please stop lying
Please stop lying
We don’t want your stupid wall Donald J. Trump
We don’t want your stupid wall Donald J. Trump
STAND FIRM MR. PRESIDENT <3
We support you Mr President
PLEASE DON’T GIVE UP MR PRESIDENT! BUILD THAT WALL NOW! WE’RE WITH YOU ALL THE WAY! PRAYING FOR YOU IN JESUS NAME!🙏🙏🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
PLEASE DON’T GIVE UP MR PRESIDENT! BUILD THAT WALL NOW! WE’RE WITH YOU ALL THE WAY! PRAYING FOR YOU IN JESUS NAME!🙏🙏🙏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes, National Security first!
Damn right  we do.
Build the wall. 😎😎😎
Stand your ground!!!
Stand your ground!!!
Border security please
Border security please
Im with Trump ! MAGA
Im with Trump ! MAGA
Yes , we want border security , we are with you Mr. President
Yes , we want border security , we are with you Mr. President
Yes we do!!!!!
Greatest President!!!  #MAGA #TRUMP
Greatest President!!!  #MAGA #TRUMP
MEXICANS FOR TRUMP.
MEXICANS FOR TRUMP.
The communist agenda was at their finger tips when you disrupted them.  Had Hillary won the USA would have been full blown communist.  On board all the way with you
The communist agenda was at their finger tips when you disrupted them.  Had Hillary won the USA would have been full blown communist.  On board all the way with you
BUILD IT HOSS!!!
Well said Lee Cunningham this exactly correct. Well done brother
Well said Lee Cunningham this exactly correct. Well done brother
Stopping you is their greatest aim.
Stopping you is their greatest aim.
Secure the border
Secure the border
Well are kids are getting dumber I'd say that's a reason for national emergency.
Build it!!!!
Build it!!!!
The only reason America sees immigration as such a large issue ITSBECAUSE HE CONVINCED YOU OF IT PEOPLE . Y’all were not even worried about this like that until he started tearing families apart just likeHitler did and started fabricatingthis idea that ONE RACE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR YOUR DISPAIR - we created our own problems . Blame ourselves
That’s only what you and your radical base want. You are throwing a childish temper tantrum by shutting down the government. You are a disgrace to this country!
Stand firm we want the wall
Stand firm we want the wall
Don't back down!!!!!
Don't back down!!!!!
Hang tough. Build that wall.
Hang tough. Build that wall.
STAND FIRM SIR!
long live Trump.  God bless you   Maga
long live Trump.  God bless you   Maga
GO TRUMP! BUILD THE WALL! TRUMP 2020!
GO TRUMP! BUILD THE WALL! TRUMP 2020!
Trust In Trump. trustintrumpshirt.com
Trust In Trump. trustintrumpshirt.com
Walls work! Build it!
Walls work! Build it!
Step down.  Enough of your lies.
Step down.  Enough of your lies.
Build the wall. Keep us safe.
Build the wall. Keep us safe.
All they want to do is obstruct. Please build the wall. You are doing such of a fabulous job. The democrats should lose their paycheck not those others effected by the shut down.
All they want to do is obstruct. Please build the wall. You are doing such of a fabulous job. The democrats should lose their paycheck not those others effected by the shut down.
I want to see that wall go up!!!
I want to see that wall go up!!!
Stand firm, Mr. President!
Stand firm, Mr. President!
Yes the wall
Yes the wall
It's very obvious.
It's very obvious.
STAND WITH OUR PRESIDENT!!!
STAND WITH OUR PRESIDENT!!!
We support our PRESIDENT!!!!
We support our PRESIDENT!!!!
Hang in their you will win .
Hang in their you will win .
We support you. Stay strong.
Secure the Southern border!
Secure the Southern border!
We're behind you
We're behind you
Stopping you is their goal
Fear builds walls
Build the wall!!! We support you!
Build the wall!!! We support you!
God bless President Trump and God bless America
The people are with you!!!!!!!!!
The people are with you!!!!!!!!!
Don’t give in! Build the wall!
Don’t give in! Build the wall!
Sorry arse Russian assets
Build that wall!!!
Build that wall!!!
Americans need secured all the way up yeaaa
Americans need secured all the way up yeaaa
Build that WALL!!!!
Build that WALL!!!!
Please build the wall President Trump❤️❤️❤️❤️
Please build the wall President Trump❤️❤️❤️❤️
Good Job Mr. President!!!
Good Job Mr. President!!!
Great job Chief, stand firm
Great job Chief, stand firm
They didn't want you to speak longer than eight mins because they know what a fool u are.
Build that wall!!!
Build that wall!!!
keep up with the news
Richard Rogers you are an idiot
The numbers also show that Americans wanted someone other than trump to be president.
Stand firm!!!
Stand firm!!!
Hang tough Mr. President!
Hang tough Mr. President!
How was the fund raiser?
DO NOT GIVE IN.....we support you....
DO NOT GIVE IN.....we support you....
Yes we want the wall.
Yes we want the wall.
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
Build the wall Mr President
Build the wall Mr President
Build It!!! You the man Trump! 👍❤️
Build It!!! You the man Trump! 👍❤️
The number one cause of illegal immigration is people overstaying their visas and the number one way drugs come into the country is through commercial shipping.  TRUMP LIES TO YOU! THERE IS NO CRISIS!
Don’t back down!! BUILD THE WALL!! TRUMP 2020
Don’t back down!! BUILD THE WALL!! TRUMP 2020
We support you MR PRESIDENT.
We support you MR PRESIDENT.
Congress Res. 990 In 2017 alone, ICE arrested 127,000 Aliens for: *1,800 homicide offenses; *5,000 sexual assaults *76,000 dangerous drugs *48,000 assault offenses; *11,000 weapon offenses; *2,000 kidnappings  Whereas ICE Homeland Security Investigations made 4,818 gang-related arrests in fiscal year 2017;  Whereas ICE identified or rescued 904 sexually exploited children;  Whereas ICE identified or rescued 518 victims of human trafficking;  https://www.congress.gov/bill/115th-congress/house-resolution/990/text
Secure the border
Secure the border
I want border security
I want border security
Thank you🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Thank you🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Yes we want The Wall !!!!
Yes we want The Wall !!!!
100% behind you sir! Secure our border.
100% behind you sir! Secure our border.
Mary Stone not in your life time
Americans want border security  not a wall
LOVE THIS MAN!
LOVE THIS MAN!
Go get them Mr. President
Go get them Mr. President
I want a wall!
I want a wall!
I stand behind you Mr. President!
I stand behind you Mr. President!
I support, ill help build
I support, ill help build
Mr. President do NOT cave to the crazy American people hating foreigner loving Democrats. Call a national emergency and build the wall. Or use whatever funds are available for a border barricade and dig a 40ft deep X 40 ft wide trench lined with barbed wire on the Mexican side of the border. Also close the entire souther border. If the Republican Party caves to the dimms. Don't sign any funding packages without funding for the wall. Republicans will never win another election if you don't declare a national emergency and build the wall.
Please build the wall
Please build the wall
>>FLASH~ALERT<<  BUILD THE WALL!!!
>>FLASH~ALERT<<  BUILD THE WALL!!!
President Donald J. Trump is doing exactly what voters elected him to do.
President Donald J. Trump is doing exactly what voters elected him to do.
BUILD THE WALL DONALD 🇺🇸🇬🇧
Build that wall !
Build that wall !
Chuck Schumer is a joke
Chuck Schumer is a joke
Keep it up Trump!! We love you!
Keep it up Trump!! We love you!
Secure our border. Build the wall.
Secure our border. Build the wall.
Secure border
Secure border
Mexico will pay for it!
Mexico will pay for it!
Build the wall he is 100% right
Build the wall he is 100% right
Mr President....Please hold fast !!!
Mr President....Please hold fast !!!
Jason Parkerson they will pay later. It's just a loan. Time to close the border.
One of your promises was that Mexico will pay for the wall now theres a shutdown cus they arent paying for the wall cus you want is to pay for it now so thats already a promise unfulfilled and im a Trump supporter but this is getting ridiculous
Close the borders and fund the wall
Close the borders and fund the wall
Campaign number 2 build the wall around hairy ball Canadian ladies a******
We need our wall, Donnie!
We need our wall, Donnie!
We want our tax dollars put to good use!  We don’t want our tax dollars used on an ineffective border wall.  Secure our airports where terrorists are coming in.  READ your security briefings so that you will be informed by the facts and not your imagination
AMEN!!! We want the wall.
AMEN!!! We want the wall.
Stand your ground Mr. President....
Stand your ground Mr. President....
Yes I want border security
Yes I want border security
BUILD THE WALL,PLEASE!
BUILD THE WALL,PLEASE!
YES!! This American cares!!
YES!! This American cares!!
YES WE DO!! Build the wall!!
Suspend congressional pay untill they found the wall
Suspend congressional pay untill they found the wall
Border security!!!
Border security!!!
🚩Here is a statement from  🇺🇸JASON ROBINSON, a veteran 🇺🇸(not me)... (copied).  "My wife is gonna be pissed that I put my dirty laundry out on FB... And I hope every single person on my feed reads this and many share it. You want to know why I’m pissed about the borders and the “Migrant Caravan”? I’m a 90% disabled combat vet, medically retired, like thousands of others. I’ve been out of work over a year, and with the amount of VA appointments, and the amount of time per appointment, who the hell would hire me? I barely pay my mortgage and bills, I juggle repo on my vehicles and termination on utilities monthly, and we eat, ramen and cereal on a regular basis. We shop at Goodwill and frequent PawnShops not only to shop but to get loans to pay bills or maybe get something we need from time to time. Social Security won’t approve me, and State and Federal assistance programs say I am above their “poverty” levels, so they won’t help me. Yet some of you think it’s ok to allow migrants with nothing to offer our Nation a free pass into this country and you cannot tell me that it won’t cost the tax payer anything. I barely get approved for free lunches for my girls at school and the taxes in Virginia I cant afford to pay, and again, you want to allow these migrants to just walk in...and you want me to offer open arms?  How about you take care of us? All of us? I’m not the only one. There are many way worse than me. There are homeless. There are sick. There are hungry. In this nation. That have paid their dues. Born here. Raised here. Paid taxes here. Worked here, served here. Take care of them.  It’s time to close the revolving door of free and take care of Americans first.  Think about that crap for a second."
God bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸
God bless you President Trump! 🇺🇸
Nuclear option time!
Nuclear option time!
Stand strong!! Build the wall
Stand strong!! Build the wall
BUILD THE WALL, MR. PRESIDENT! 👍 MAGA! 🙏 🗽 🙏
BUILD THE WALL, MR. PRESIDENT! 👍 MAGA! 🙏 🗽 🙏
Yes we do. Don’t back down
Yes we do. Don’t back down
Build it!!!!!
Build it!!!!!
Why aren't Dems worried more about the safety of the good American people? Rhetorical.
Why aren't Dems worried more about the safety of the good American people? Rhetorical.
Build That Wall!
Build That Wall!
GOD bless Donald J. Trump!
GOD bless Donald J. Trump!
Agree with president Trump 100%
Agree with president Trump 100%
Drain the swamp the current dems running the house are obstructing legislation that We the people want
We need a WALL
We need a WALL
Build that wall trump🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build that wall trump🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stand firm Mr. President.
Stand firm Mr. President.
He is NOT lying!!!!
Wonderful speech.  I stand with you!
Wonderful speech.  I stand with you!
undocumented immigrants can't vote
undocumented immigrants can't vote
The only news...FOX....NEWS!!!!
The only news...FOX....NEWS!!!!
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸 #maga
BUILD THE WALL 🇺🇸 #maga
Stop getting all your news from FOX!
Stop getting all your news from FOX!
We're with you on this one sir.
We're with you on this one sir.
Stand Strong! We need you!
Stand Strong! We need you!
#Q #WWG1WGA #JFKjr thank you DJT!
#Q #WWG1WGA #JFKjr thank you DJT!
We LOVE you up in CANADA 🍁 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝
We LOVE you up in CANADA 🍁 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝 💝
Stop Congress from getting paid.
Stop Congress from getting paid.
#BuildtheWall
#BuildtheWall
Border  security.
Border  security.
Let the people vote !!
Let the people vote !!
Yes we do mr President
Yes we do mr President
This is so insane. There is no crisis. You are attacking the federal employees who keep our government running
You're going down...
You're going down...
We the people want security. Don’t care what they want
We the people want security. Don’t care what they want
Excellent speech, Mr. President, sir!!
Yes we do!!!!!!!
BUILD THE WALL!!!! #buildthewall
BUILD THE WALL!!!! #buildthewall
Go Trump!! You got this
Go Trump!! You got this
We are behind you!
We are behind you!
Americans want you gone
Americans want you gone
We need the Wall.
We need the Wall.
Build the Wall.  Do not back down Mr. President!
and, Americans DON'T want an expansive border wall.  but when the POTUS chooses his favorite approval poll (Rassmusen at the time) and lies about 1% point (49% approval NOT 50%) in order to convince people he's doing great, is it any wonder that we believe that ~4,000 terrorist aliens were apprehended at the southern border when the number was ACTUALLY 6?
Is the liar in Chief off yet
Is the liar in Chief off yet
I feel the Democrats Do Not want you having a win on the Wall!! They think without a Wall you won't be elected again,....We are with you President Trump!! Stay Strong! We need the Wall!! You are a Great President and we are Proud of you!!
Stand firm sir
Stand firm sir
Mr President...BUILD THE WALL!!! 🇺🇸
Mr President...BUILD THE WALL!!! 🇺🇸
You got the money .why don't you build it?! You cry you whine you pout...want Democrats to build more to take out of others pocket you quick to same way you've also lied to the American people Thought you said Mexico will build the wall Mexico will pay?! Ummm
We want a wall!!!!
We want a wall!!!!
Stand strong. We are behind you. They well not win. Veto anything they wany, unless it be good for the American people. Noone can say you do not care or think of Americans first.  God bless
Barry Banzet same here. We the people are ready, tired of playing games.
Wake me up when the shootin starts.
Wake me up when the shootin starts.
LOCK HIM UP!!!!!!
LOCK  IT DOWN!!!!
LOCK  IT DOWN!!!!
BUILD IT!!!!
BUILD IT!!!!
Why didn’t the GOP help you?
Why didn’t the GOP help you?
STOP THE HYPOCRISY!!!!!!  BUILD THE WALL AT ALL COST!!! American Lives Matter!!!!!!!!!!! 👏🏼👏🏼👏🏼🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸✨  https://www.facebook.com/476717839377771/posts/766725050377047/
You whiny little orange man baby.  Stop your damn lies and whining and act like a damn man.
You whiny little orange man baby.  Stop your damn lies and whining and act like a damn man.
Do NOT cave on the wall.
Do NOT cave on the wall.
YES!  WE WANT A WALL!
YES!  WE WANT A WALL!
Tonight would be just fine with me!
Tonight would be just fine with me!
But your promises are lies man!
But your promises are lies man!
Stopping you. They hate America
WE WANT THE WALL ! WE WANT THE WALL ! WE WANT THE WALL !
WE WANT THE WALL ! WE WANT THE WALL ! WE WANT THE WALL !
Stand your ground!
Stand your ground!
ALL DEMOCRATS CLAIM TO BE DOWN WITH THE STRUGGLE, HOWEVER, WE DON’T SEE ANY OF THEM LIVING IN THE SOUTH SIDE OF CHICAGO!!!
ALL DEMOCRATS CLAIM TO BE DOWN WITH THE STRUGGLE, HOWEVER, WE DON’T SEE ANY OF THEM LIVING IN THE SOUTH SIDE OF CHICAGO!!!
WE HAVE SPENT THE LAST 30 YEARS IMPORTING POVERTY  IT HAS RUINED CALIFORNIA AND IS DESTROYING EVERY SATE IN THE UNION  WE CANNOT TAKE IN THE WORLD'S POVERTY AND SURVIVE!
STAND STRONG...BUILD THE WALL.
STAND STRONG...BUILD THE WALL.
Stop the invasion!
Stop the invasion!
Build it bro...
Build it bro...
Stay the course!!  Build the Wall!
Stay the course!!  Build the Wall!
Then tell him to stop being buddy buddy with Putin. That’s REAL danger.
Stand strong!! We need national security!! ❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
Stand strong!! We need national security!! ❤️🇺🇸❤️🇺🇸
2016 : Donald Trump “ Mexico will pay for the wall I promise !!! “   2016: Donald Trump “ Mexico will pay us back for the wall “   2018 : Donald trump “ give me funding or ill withhold 1 million jobs In Jeopardy and close the government..... it’s the democrats fault”   😂 😂 😂 some leader .... your promise was to have mexico pay not put 1 million hard working , blue collar , tax paying Americans out of work
So Very Proud Of P Trump👍🇺🇸
So Very Proud Of P Trump👍🇺🇸
Make it happen 👍🏽
Make it happen 👍🏽
Seize elchapos 14billion in assets and build the wall . That easy.
Seize elchapos 14billion in assets and build the wall . That easy.
What really pisses me off is that the Dumbcrats are fighting you, MR PRESIDENT, on the VERY same things that they were in favor of and the Republicans are letting them do it!
KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN!
KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! KEEP IT SHUT DOWN!
Trump/Pence 2020!!!
Trump/Pence 2020!!!
Stand firm!
Stand firm!
I want the wall and stronger border security.
I want the wall and stronger border security.
"Build That Wall" !
"Build That Wall" !
BUILD THAT WALL!!! 👍👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
BUILD THAT WALL!!! 👍👍👍🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
MAGA Best president ever!
MAGA Best president ever!
Stand your ground.
I'd buy a piece of the wall! 🇺🇸
I'd buy a piece of the wall! 🇺🇸
Finish the Wall.
Finish the Wall.
Jeff Graziano You're damn right we want him to fail! And he will.
the demoncrats want you to fail .
the demoncrats want you to fail .
Anne Tourjee how about we don't give South America 10.6 billion in aid. How about you pay 70% of your pay. You don't penalize someone for success and reward others who don't have success. Wake up
Anne Tourjee how about we don't give South America 10.6 billion in aid. How about you pay 70% of your pay. You don't penalize someone for success and reward others who don't have success. Wake up
your promise was that taxpayers would not pay for the wall. We're among you to hold to your promise. Also, find a way to pay for it. Maybe a 70% tax on income over $10 million?
your promise was that taxpayers would not pay for the wall. We're among you to hold to your promise. Also, find a way to pay for it. Maybe a 70% tax on income over $10 million?
BUILD THE WALL.   Don't give!!
Republicans dominated for the past two years. Why are you now blaming democrats, that took over the House as of this year, for stalling the building of the wall? Not that it matters, because the wall isn't going to help. There are ways of getting around it. In all honesty, I think you're just doing what every other politician likes to do, blame the opposing party for the delays/screw ups.  Just about every single one of you are a failure.
#BUILDTHEWALL SIR!
#BUILDTHEWALL SIR!
DO NOT BACK DOWN  !!!!
DO NOT BACK DOWN  !!!!
I wish we have a President like u!
I wish we have a President like u!
Build the wall Mr. President !!
Build the wall Mr. President !!
Trump Inks Executive Order Immediately Halting All Welfare, Unearned Entitlements and Subsidy Payments For 2019 -Illegal Immigration Ceases Instantly.
They will do everything in their power not to help you as they know you will get voted in next year they are just out for themselves just like all the MPs in the UK they don’t give a flying toss about American people and keeping them safe
It would. Americans are sick of the illegals, sick of the corruption, sick of seeing our war veterans treated like crap, sick of Obamacare, sick of the deception and lies of the Democrats, and if Congress doesn't want to do their job, then fire them and we'll handle it ourselves with our President
Joshua James Howard the wall would be funded completely in bout AJ hour lol
In my observations, President Trump, we aren't facing Democrats anymore. We are facing off against evil, itself.   There have been jokes circulating, that if you gave a public address stating that oxygen is good for us, they would all suffocate themselves to try and slander you.   I am starting to believe this, however, because all they do is try to stop you from protecting Americans and our country.   Here is what I suggest, if Congress will not fund the border wall, begin selling the bricks to us Americans. Design some kind of order form, and we will purchase the bricks.   I am willing to work OT, to buy as many of those bricks, as I can afford.   We the people stood behind you, to beat Hillary. You think we won't do it again, against a Democrat, cry-baby congress?
In my observations, President Trump, we aren't facing Democrats anymore. We are facing off against evil, itself.   There have been jokes circulating, that if you gave a public address stating that oxygen is good for us, they would all suffocate themselves to try and slander you.   I am starting to believe this, however, because all they do is try to stop you from protecting Americans and our country.   Here is what I suggest, if Congress will not fund the border wall, begin selling the bricks to us Americans. Design some kind of order form, and we will purchase the bricks.   I am willing to work OT, to buy as many of those bricks, as I can afford.   We the people stood behind you, to beat Hillary. You think we won't do it again, against a Democrat, cry-baby congress?
Build the wall Mr. President. ❤️🇺🇸
Build the wall Mr. President. ❤️🇺🇸
Build the wall. God bless America.
Build the wall mr. President!
Build the wall mr. President!
Just build the danged wall
Just build the danged wall
Border wall at all cost
Border wall at all cost
Build the wall........ ...
If Not Building Border Security,American may be Fullness Imigrant2...This is Souvereign USA...If American Fullness Imigrant,Some Thing Happen to Sociality People USA...It is Dangerous...Rebuke Govermant Mexico...The Govermant Mexico Have Stopped People Mexico Go To USA...If Many Much People Imigrant Mexico to USA,The People USA Angry&Fight to Imigrant Mexico....I Hope Democrat Understand What Situation People USA...Oke Mr Trumph....God Bless You....Imanuel
We Love you TRUMP❤❤
We Love you TRUMP❤❤
No way Jose! Get it? Jose?😂
Jenna Say Paw  yes we do
No, you don’t.
No, you don’t.
We need this wall!!!💯
We need this wall!!!💯
AMERICANS are behind you 100% President Trump thank you for taking a stand!!  The communists are the only ones against the wall. Keeping you in our prayers <3
AMERICANS are behind you 100% President Trump thank you for taking a stand!!  The communists are the only ones against the wall. Keeping you in our prayers <3
2020 for Trump !
2020 for Trump !
Yes they do sir!
Yes they do sir!
Cheque or money order??? Pablo Escobar’s brother launched $50M GoFundMe to impeach Donald Trump https://www.msn.com/en-ca/news/world/pablo-escobar’s-brother-launched-dollar50m-gofundme-to-impeach-donald-trump/ar-BBRZdI7?li=AAggFp4
Nah, the "national emergency" this evening is the total screw-up by Manafort's lawyers indicating "collusion" with Russian Intelligence. ARE YOU GOING TO ADDRESS THAT ISSUE OF NATIONAL IMPORTANCE THIS EVENING? NAH!
Fake polls from fake news !
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
Trump!Trump!!Trump!!!
Why was this not done with in the last two years??? 🤔 When Mexico refused to pay for it , President Trump and Republicans held the House and the Senate for two years.! Why didn't they push the wall through??? Why?
Build it! 👊🏻 build it! 👊🏻 build it! 👊🏻
Don’t give up! Build the wall!
Don’t give up! Build the wall!
We want the wall !!!!!!
We want the wall !!!!!!
Keep America safe
We want the wall!!!
We want the wall!!!
Thank you Sir!
Thank you Sir!
Be strong !   God bless our president.
Be strong !   God bless our president.
JUST DO IT.
JUST DO IT.
Build our wall Mr. President!
Build our wall Mr. President!
And screw the Chamber of Commerce and their "deal".  What is this?  A holdup?!  They are a big part of why we are in this mess with their CHEAP LABOR.
Faux News cosigning your nonsense does not make you credible.
Faux News cosigning your nonsense does not make you credible.
Build The Wall  Mr President!
Build The Wall  Mr President!
Yes! We want the border wall.
Yes! We want the border wall.
Yes Sir we do!
Yes Sir we do!
Mexico builds it right
Comrade Collusion!!  The end is near!
Comrade Collusion!!  The end is near!
Just donated 220 dollars
Tom Jackson https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
Tom Jackson https://www.gofundme.com/TheTrumpWall
With you 100 % PRESENT TRUMP.
With you 100 % PRESENT TRUMP.
The democrats want power.
To the dems, stopping you is more important than all Americans put together.  They are totally EVIL.  God bless you President Donald J. Trump.
Build that wall!
Build that wall!
Kyndra Doscher good summation - dems are total nutjobs on this issue over there 🤪
Yes we do! Build that wall!
Yes we do! Build that wall!
Go trump  ! Do the job we hired you to do!
Go trump  ! Do the job we hired you to do!
The dems care only about their political power. Not about America or its citizens.
Lmao why you little durp durp durp dur dur durrrrrrrrrpppp!!!!🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒🐒oooooo ooooo ahhhh ahhh here ya go lil 🐒🍌
Republicans have lost. Get over it. You are Obsolete. Once Trumplstiltsken is out, everything he did, will be nullified. Extinct. A Micky mouse footnote in the history books. Like you, his voters.
Stand strong, build the wall
Stand strong, build the wall
Build it 20ft higher
Build it 20ft higher
🇺🇸🇺🇸STAND STRONG TRUMP🇺🇸🇺🇸.         DO NOT BACK DOWN !!
🇺🇸🇺🇸STAND STRONG TRUMP🇺🇸🇺🇸.         DO NOT BACK DOWN !!
Good job President
Good job President
Build that wall!!!
Build that wall!!!
44k likes basically just means you'll win 2020
44k likes basically just means you'll win 2020
Build that wall Mr. President 💪🏻
Build that wall Mr. President 💪🏻
All they want to do is stop you!!
All they want to do is stop you!!
A country without borders is like a house without walls, it collapses! 🇺🇸
Get it done, Mr. President!
Get it done, Mr. President!
MAGA 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸TRUMP
MAGA 2020 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸TRUMP
Stand your ground.
Stand your ground.
A must read.
Wouldn't mind a wall around Hillary.
We are with you!  Build the WALL!  ❤️🇺🇸❤️
We are with you!  Build the WALL!  ❤️🇺🇸❤️
Please build the wall.
Please build the wall.
We're with you Mr. President!
We're with you Mr. President!
Walter Merritt I don't remember voting on a wall. And I vote in every election. And yes I want the wall.
You’re not fulfilling one of your promises. Mexico was supposed to pay for it. Even then the American People voted against it.
You’re not fulfilling one of your promises. Mexico was supposed to pay for it. Even then the American People voted against it.
Penny Slavik Williams yes they do...but chump has chronic diarrhea of the mouth
Penny Slavik Williams yes they do...but chump has chronic diarrhea of the mouth
Karen Edwards all politicians lie.
Karen Edwards all politicians lie.
Karen Edwards unfortunately!
Karen Edwards unfortunately!
Carolie Warden which he is a pro at
Carolie Warden which he is a pro at
As usual he lied
As usual he lied
You promised Mexico would pay for it...lie #1 And it won't work!!!
You promised Mexico would pay for it...lie #1 And it won't work!!!
Call your reps and tell them you want the wall. A call is much more effective than just posting on FB.   In Virginia    Warner  202-224-2023,   Kaine   202-224-4024
Mexican makes America great again
Mexican makes America great again
Mr President, just build the wall on the Mexican side and call it foreign aid. Plenty in the budget already for that.
Mr President, just build the wall on the Mexican side and call it foreign aid. Plenty in the budget already for that.
You just went on prime time TV and repeatedly lied. You just lie with abandon.  Shame on you and those who don't stand up to you.
faux news and more lies.
faux news and more lies.
SECURE THE BORDERS!!!  END OF DISCUSSION!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP MUST BE SO FRUSTRATED WITH THE IGNORANCE OF CONGRESS AND THE MEDIA!
SECURE THE BORDERS!!!  END OF DISCUSSION!!! PRESIDENT TRUMP MUST BE SO FRUSTRATED WITH THE IGNORANCE OF CONGRESS AND THE MEDIA!
Jeff O'Kane more guns at the border, just shoot everybody....like the germans did...go trump
Todd Schroeder Oh you know they aren’t going to let THAT happen!
Todd Schroeder Won’t take that long. Will have to replace Ginsburg when she kicks the bucket in the next month or so. Hope Ted Nugent gets appointed, so liberal heads explode in unison.
Todd Schroeder Won’t take that long. Will have to replace Ginsburg when she kicks the bucket in the next month or so. Hope Ted Nugent gets appointed, so liberal heads explode in unison.
Jeff O'Kane no taxes for a year...go trump go
Jeff O'Kane no taxes for a year...go trump go
Jeff O'Kane keep the government shut down untill 2020
Todd Schroeder Your other choice was Hillary Clinton, explain the better option. 🤔
Jeff O'Kane not liberal, not right wing....middle of the road.....cannot trust a man the has tricked people for years
Todd Schroeder Son, just stop. I love bashing you liberal pussies, but you aren’t even putting up an intelligent fight.
Jeff O'Kane we need a little catholic boy that got his penis played with in the supreme court.....go trump
Todd Schroeder Maybe Democrats will find some dirt on the next SCOTUS appointment in their grade school or Kindergarten years. Stay classy Democrats. Stay...... classy.
Jeff O'Kane too bad trump gonna turn your hunting grounds into oil sands.....his buddies need the cash
Todd Schroeder All I know is your tears will be extra salty, just the way I love them. Get ready for the next SCOTUS nomination. 😂
Todd Schroeder All I know is your tears will be extra salty, just the way I love them. Get ready for the next SCOTUS nomination. 😂
Jeff O'Kane drink the poison.....it does not kill brain cells, the government said so
Jeff O'Kane that way he can put another pervert catholic in the supreme court, maybe another drunk too
https://www.facebook.com/160389977329803/posts/2090209427681172/
https://www.facebook.com/160389977329803/posts/2090209427681172/
As long as the demand for the drugs is here, the supply will find a way here.....the war on drugs .....when will the government learn
Todd Schroeder Sir, you don’t have the mental capacity to carry on an intelligent conversation with me. So just stop.     You are wasting my time. Go find some liberal to heckle. Night bro.
https://www.facebook.com/160389977329803/posts/2090209427681172/
Jeff O'Kane the drugs do not come from people crossing border iilegaly....the come in from airports, cars, trains...
Todd Schroeder Are you referring to my profile picture when I was touring the carrier USS Midway in San Diego harbor on the anniversary of Pearl Harbor? That makes me gay?    Son, you need to stop eating the paint chips and start taking the meds the Doctor gave you.🥴
Todd Schroeder Are you referring to my profile picture when I was touring the carrier USS Midway in San Diego harbor on the anniversary of Pearl Harbor? That makes me gay?    Son, you need to stop eating the paint chips and start taking the meds the Doctor gave you.🥴
Jeff O'Kane I voted for him, lesser of the 2 evils
Jeff O'Kane bend over and swap the deck...bitch
Jeff O'Kane who was on a ship?
Stick to your guns! Build that wall!
Stick to your guns! Build that wall!
Americans want you to go away, stop lying and we can't wait for you to be locked up!!!
Americans want you to go away, stop lying and we can't wait for you to be locked up!!!
Liar, con man, Russian asset
Liar, con man, Russian asset
The dumocrates dont want you working for the people that elected you
The dumocrates dont want you working for the people that elected you
Build that wall! Do what you have to do to get that Wall!!! And the ones who don't want the wall...just put them idiots on the other side!!!
That is Demon rats
Build the wall. My President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the wall. My President 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
BUILD THAT WALL!
BUILD THAT WALL!
Yes!! We need the barrier.
Fake, manufactured hysteria.
Fake, manufactured hysteria.
THE REAL QUESTION IS......HOW MANY MILLIONS OR BILLIONS HAS NANCY BEEN PAID TO GO AGAINST A WALL. SHE WAS ALL FOR A WALL BEFORE WHEN OBAMA , THE WORST PRESIDENT EVER WAS IN OFFICE. INVESTIGATE IT
Jamie Bennett again and again and again
Nope, Trump is lying
Nope, Trump is lying
Jamie Bennett There really isn't.
THERE IS NO CRISIS AT THE BORDER
THERE IS NO CRISIS AT THE BORDER
They are BREAKING THERE OATH OF OFFICE TO THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!  IMPEACH OR FIRE THESE MORONS!  REMOVE THEM FROM OFFICE! LET THE PEOPLE DECIDE!  VOTE THEM OUT!  WHY ARE A BUNCH OF CALIFORNIA DRUG ADDICTS RUNNING OUR COUNTRY!
They are BREAKING THERE OATH OF OFFICE TO THE AMERICAN PEOPLE!  IMPEACH OR FIRE THESE MORONS!  REMOVE THEM FROM OFFICE! LET THE PEOPLE DECIDE!  VOTE THEM OUT!  WHY ARE A BUNCH OF CALIFORNIA DRUG ADDICTS RUNNING OUR COUNTRY!
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
Trump, remind us again which of your promises you have fulfilled so far? Repeal and Replace the ACA? You didn’t do that. Tax cuts for everyone? You didn’t do that. Show your taxes? You didn’t do that. Get North Korea to denuclearize? You didn’t do that. You have fulfilled one promise to cut taxes for corporations and the super rich. That is it. We don’t need a wall that cost $5B that can be climbed, tunneled under, flown over, or boated around. Perhaps use what little intelligence you have and use our taxpayer money on infrastructure, education, or the homeless.
Trump, remind us again which of your promises you have fulfilled so far? Repeal and Replace the ACA? You didn’t do that. Tax cuts for everyone? You didn’t do that. Show your taxes? You didn’t do that. Get North Korea to denuclearize? You didn’t do that. You have fulfilled one promise to cut taxes for corporations and the super rich. That is it. We don’t need a wall that cost $5B that can be climbed, tunneled under, flown over, or boated around. Perhaps use what little intelligence you have and use our taxpayer money on infrastructure, education, or the homeless.
Love you POTUS 💙
Mexico will pay NOT The wall already being built NOT Congress will pay NOT I'll declare marshal law to get my wall  the courts  NOT
Mexico will pay NOT The wall already being built NOT Congress will pay NOT I'll declare marshal law to get my wall  the courts  NOT
Amen!  Build that wall!
Amen!  Build that wall!
Your ego driven border wall is a waste of money and most Americans (including some Republicans) knows it. You used last night's address to collect campaign contributions from your supporters in the guise of a "border wall fund" when the funds went directly to your re-election campaign. I hope there is a campaign violation related to this and possibly fraud charges.
ABC, NBC, CBS.. ALL 100% BIASED!
Sharon Joyce yup, Fox News being the most biased
FELLOW AMERICANS: LET'S START CALLING OUT THE BIAS WE SEE ON TV STATIONS. NAME THE STATION TO SHAME THEM.
FELLOW AMERICANS: LET'S START CALLING OUT THE BIAS WE SEE ON TV STATIONS. NAME THE STATION TO SHAME THEM.
What we want is your resignation.
What we want is your resignation.
Let the people vote for the wall
www.gofundme.com/thetrumpwall  Brian Kolfage
I’m with you president!
I’m with you president!
Your population that want to traffic human beings, take illegal drugs and hire cheap labour will get their fix and people with or without a wall. These drugs and people are bought and hired by Americans. There is your problem.
Fake news, from the fake president.
Just play a couple small clips of Pelosi and Schumer Obama and clinton talking about needing the wall in the past during your speech tonight
Just play a couple small clips of Pelosi and Schumer Obama and clinton talking about needing the wall in the past during your speech tonight
Give it a rest. You're not getting it.....you spoiled little manchild...
Give it a rest. You're not getting it.....you spoiled little manchild...
The Dems need to grow up.
Mr President thank you so much for standing in the face of such evil people such as shumer and pelosi. Thank you for caring enough for the very ones coming against you to ensure their safety as well as those who stand with you. Please Mr. President declare the emergency and build that wall. I work everyday right next to a building housing illegal immagrants for ICE. They are bringing them in by the bus loads. These illegal immagrants are draining the tax payers ability to ever get ahead. If pelosi or any of the other evil ones want to fund them then lets drain their pocketbooks not the average american ctizen.
Yes build the wall
Yes build the wall
Go get em Donnie.  We, the people, are behind you 100%.
Go get em Donnie.  We, the people, are behind you 100%.
Build the wall sir
Build the wall sir
President Trump please just stop begging them, rule over them w an executive  power!!!
I have a Third Option - Get The Funding Secured and Declare The Emergency So The Border Could be Secured in Months instead of Years. We have More Pressing Issues to Work On. Remember All This Construction Creates USA Jobs.
You are using Fake News networks to get out your message.  You are a traitor to your base.
Build that wall!
Build that wall!
What's more important to you? It seems that you only care about yourself and building some monument to yourself...
Charlene Dickerson incorrect again.
Jo Anne Howell Sitterson A majority didn't vote for him. Only 34% want a wall, which makes sense because that figure pretty much matches his base.
Charlene Dickerson incorrect. This is why we voted for him
The numbers show a border wall.is not wanted by a majority of Americans. Why does Fox Noise keep spreading this lie when Trump's own handpicked government officials don't even back him up because their own statistics prove he is not being truthful!
Build the wall, Sir!!
YOU WILL MAKE A 'BIGLY' IMPRESSION ON THE NATION, PRESIDENT TRUMP!  WE ARE DEVOUT 'TRUMPLICANS' FOREVER!
YOU WILL MAKE A 'BIGLY' IMPRESSION ON THE NATION, PRESIDENT TRUMP!  WE ARE DEVOUT 'TRUMPLICANS' FOREVER!
Fox calls out Trump's lies.  https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/donald-trump-border-speech-fox-news_us_5c356ed3e4b0dbd06601649c?ncid=fcbklnkushpmg00000063&utm_source=main_fb&utm_medium=facebook&utm_campaign=hp_fb_pages
Don't back down
Don't back down
Kick some ass tonight!
Kick some ass tonight!
Thank you President Trump!! Democrats want a one World Order, that is why they are fighting so hard. Drain the Swamp and expose them all
Damn straight! Behind you 100% in Wisconsin!!!
We want a WALL, TRUMP 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
We want a WALL, TRUMP 2020🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Protect the border. Protect Americans. BUILD THE WALL
The promise that Mexico is paying for the wall? The Dems are stopping you from having that happen? What the hell.
I dont care how or who  Get it built
I dont care how or who  Get it built
You crushed it Mr President!
You crushed it Mr President!
Yes we do I'm sick of the dems
Don’t give up. Stand your ground Mr. President.
What a sad and pathetic bomb of a speech last night. Ratings were terrible. Reviews were worse. SAD. #wompwomp
It is not clear that a house without an external fence to protect the security of your borders is my friend Trump
Republicans have given amnesty to illegal aliens six times since 1986 with the Assurance from the lying liberal Democrats that they would secure the Border now here we are over 30 years later and the lying liberals have not only failed to secure the Border but they are continuing with the same lies that they've been telling for 30 years secure the southern border once and for all I'm 57 years old I've been waiting for this to happen since I was 19 and here we are watching The Lying liberals play the same game over and over again with our Southern border they do not care about the security of our country or the security of the American people the lying liberal Democrats will continue to play this game for another 30 years if we let them.
Dems are all about Themselves!!!!
Dems are all about Themselves!!!!
Yes we do!!!!
52% of Americans oppose the wall.
Secure our nation
Secure our nation
Just DO IT..BOTH!   Attn:Trump, BUILD THAT WALL; use Powers of Nt'l Emergency! AND, REOPEN the GOVERNMENT! Call their bluff; Don't let Dems dictate-manipulate!-- Delores Holbrook Dixon
I stand with our President, build the wall!!
I stand with our President, build the wall!!
I think you can build the wall without making much noise
Lie, lie lie. That's it. That's all you do. All the news stations are calling you out on your lies including faux entertainment news that usually lies for you!!! What has this country come to?  The worst president ever and can't wait for the Democrats hold you accountable. Gotta love that subpoena power!!!
No.. Americans want a president
The process of inspecting the IAEA inspections, which is one of the verification stages of denuclearization in North Korea, is to be announced, and border immigration applications should be made by verifying the identity, disease and finance by 100 persons per month. You can not find it.you choices impasse
THE WALL IS COMING!  GET COMFY!
SO YOU WORK WITH HER AT THAT DIVE BAR HON?  BLESS YOUR HEART.  ;)  @KAG
Stormy Daniels is folding clothes in her underwear on Instagram during this morons speech.   Sorry Trump, you lose.
Stormy Daniels is folding clothes in her underwear on Instagram during this morons speech.   Sorry Trump, you lose.
Yes we do Mr. President
But you said MEXICO was going to pay for the wall. Was that another lie? Don’t give in Nancy make him get the money from mexico
Absolutely!!  #BUILDTHEWALL
Absolutely!!  #BUILDTHEWALL
Build the wall!  Don't have!  Congressmen should not be paid during a shut down.  They don't feel the pinch to negotiate.
Stopping you!!! And it’s sick!!!
Stopping you!!! And it’s sick!!!
If during tonight's speech President Trump would make a graph of a circled colored in 100% to show the entire federal budget - and then tape a toothpick on the circle to indicate how much is needed to build the wall- the left would  be able to visualize what a tiny amount is needed for the wall!!   The left is dim and they need to see the "crumbs" it will cost to preserve and protect this nation.  It is the president's job - was in the oath he swore when inaugurated!!! And he intends to build it!  Thank you Mr President! 🇺🇸
You are right, President Trump!
Shut down the IRS and stop taxing our paychecks!! That’ll show them!!!
Stay stead fast Mr. President. If you need us. We are here.
Stay stead fast Mr. President. If you need us. We are here.
Give Kelly Conway a special "THANK YOU FROM ALL OF US"...for shutting down that RUDE...DISRESPECTFUL ...JIM ACOSTA.  He is horrible man.
Give Kelly Conway a special "THANK YOU FROM ALL OF US"...for shutting down that RUDE...DISRESPECTFUL ...JIM ACOSTA.  He is horrible man.
How much American blood was shed because of your 7 deferments to Vietnam?  Your bone spurs haven't hurt your golf game.
We love President Trump! !!
We love President Trump! !!
Walls are a necessity; there's a good reason that we live and sleep within them. Build it and show the world.
Congressional Democrats DEMAND Central America's NORTHERN-TRIANGLE'S WARFARE (The Worst Warfare On Earth) BY GANGS ON HUMANITY to  continue to increase in the USA for the Democrat's USA COMMUNIST POLICE STATE. Democrats are arguing for no wall in order to extend BORDER SECURITY TO EVERY CITY WHILE DEMOCRAT CITIES KEEP SECEDING FROM THE USA TO HELP GROW "THE NORTHERN TRIANGLE'S" HELLISH WAR BY GANGS TO EVERY CITY IN THE USA FOR A COMMUNIST POLICE STATE. #
Mexico supports the wall
Mexico supports the wall
You couldn't get funding when Republicans were in control of both the House and Senate. Why do you think you can get funding when Democrats control the House? The people said loud and clear they didn't want your dumb wall when we elected Democrats to take control of the House! Quit throwing a tantrum and open the government!
You couldn't get funding when Republicans were in control of both the House and Senate. Why do you think you can get funding when Democrats control the House? The people said loud and clear they didn't want your dumb wall when we elected Democrats to take control of the House! Quit throwing a tantrum and open the government!
Build That Wall! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build That Wall! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT!! THE AMERICAN PEOPLE ARE BEHIND YOU!!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Give ‘em hell Mr President! We’re behind you and have your back! 🇺🇸
Americans (both Ds and Rs) want border security.  Not a “wall”.  Bozo T President.
The most important thing to those idiots are stopping your promises no matter what the cost is.  Funny thing is Bush sr,good old Billy boy Clinton, Bush Jr, that loser Obuma , Killary Clinton all wanted the wall at least that’s what they said when they were running and trying to get the presidency
Mr President, KEEP Gov SHUTDOWN till they give the $5.7 BILLION, EVEN IF it takes 2 more years. PERIOD. FULL STOP!
I LOVE MY PRESIDENT!!! ❤❤❤❤
I LOVE MY PRESIDENT!!! ❤❤❤❤
A Wall Should Have Been Built in 2006. Bush signed Bill to build a wall for $10.4 billion This was just posted by Christopher Mitchum--movie actor Robert Mitchum's son and was in John Wayne movie and other flickeroos and served as local elected representative---I'm forwarding it to a Tucson talk radio host on now and Sean Hannity and Mark Levin---I'm going to try to get it to Rush---it will eventually be spread----of course it will get to Trump and CongrASS--forward it and send it a messages -- it's wild fire  "The W." It's a "Fact sheet" from GWB. It seems he signed a bill passed by Congress on 10/16/06 to build the wall for $4.6-$10.4 billion. So why wasn't it built? https://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/news/releases/2006/10/20061026-1.html?fbclid=IwAR1KCDOGjSb5oHV2cKAZn74r8SDwuIMX3bLUCQDLrH61u2LsCOELXf7vjAY Fact Sheet: The Secure Fence Act of 2006   RSS Feed  White House News  en Español  En Español       Fact sheet President Bush Signs Secure Fence Act       Fact sheet In Focus: Homeland Security   "This bill will help protect the American people. This bill will make our borders more secure. It is an important step toward immigration reform."  - President George W. Bush, 10/26/06  Today, President Bush Signed The Secure Fence Act - An Important Step Forward In Our Nation's Efforts To Control Our Borders And Reform Our Immigration System. Earlier this year, the President laid out a strategy for comprehensive immigration reform.	The Secure Fence Act is one part of this reform, and the President will work with Congress to finish the job and pass the remaining elements of this strategy.  The Secure Fence Act Builds On Progress Securing The Border  By Making Wise Use Of Physical Barriers And Deploying 21st Century Technology, We Can Help Our Border Patrol Agents Do Their Job And Make Our Border More Secure. The Secure Fence Act:  Authorizes the construction of hundreds of miles of additional fencing along our Southern border; Authorizes more vehicle barriers, checkpoints, and lighting to help prevent people from entering our country illegally; Authorizes the Department of Homeland Security to increase the use of advanced technology like cameras, satellites, and unmanned aerial vehicles to reinforce our infrastructure at the border. Comprehensive Immigration Reform Begins With Securing The Border. Since President Bush took office, we have:  More than doubled funding for border security - from $4.6 billion in 2001 to $10.4 billion this year; Increased the number of Border Patrol agents from about 9,000 to more than 12,000 - and by the end of 2008, we will have doubled the number of Border Patrol agents since the President took office; Deployed thousands of National Guard members to assist the Border Patrol; Upgraded technology at our borders and added infrastructure, including new fencing and vehicle barriers; Apprehended and sent home more than 6 million people entering America illegally; and We are adding thousands of new beds in our detention facilities, so we can continue working to end "catch and release" at our Southern border.
A Wall Should Have Been Built in 2006. Bush signed Bill to build a wall for $10.4 billion This was just posted by Christopher Mitchum--movie actor Robert Mitchum's son and was in John Wayne movie and other flickeroos and served as local elected representative---I'm forwarding it to a Tucson talk radio host on now and Sean Hannity and Mark Levin---I'm going to try to get it to Rush---it will eventually be spread----of course it will get to Trump and CongrASS--forward it and send it a messages -- it's wild fire  "The W." It's a "Fact sheet" from GWB. It seems he signed a bill passed by Congress on 10/16/06 to build the wall for $4.6-$10.4 billion. So why wasn't it built? https://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/news/releases/2006/10/20061026-1.html?fbclid=IwAR1KCDOGjSb5oHV2cKAZn74r8SDwuIMX3bLUCQDLrH61u2LsCOELXf7vjAY Fact Sheet: The Secure Fence Act of 2006   RSS Feed  White House News  en Español  En Español       Fact sheet President Bush Signs Secure Fence Act       Fact sheet In Focus: Homeland Security   "This bill will help protect the American people. This bill will make our borders more secure. It is an important step toward immigration reform."  - President George W. Bush, 10/26/06  Today, President Bush Signed The Secure Fence Act - An Important Step Forward In Our Nation's Efforts To Control Our Borders And Reform Our Immigration System. Earlier this year, the President laid out a strategy for comprehensive immigration reform.	The Secure Fence Act is one part of this reform, and the President will work with Congress to finish the job and pass the remaining elements of this strategy.  The Secure Fence Act Builds On Progress Securing The Border  By Making Wise Use Of Physical Barriers And Deploying 21st Century Technology, We Can Help Our Border Patrol Agents Do Their Job And Make Our Border More Secure. The Secure Fence Act:  Authorizes the construction of hundreds of miles of additional fencing along our Southern border; Authorizes more vehicle barriers, checkpoints, and lighting to help prevent people from entering our country illegally; Authorizes the Department of Homeland Security to increase the use of advanced technology like cameras, satellites, and unmanned aerial vehicles to reinforce our infrastructure at the border. Comprehensive Immigration Reform Begins With Securing The Border. Since President Bush took office, we have:  More than doubled funding for border security - from $4.6 billion in 2001 to $10.4 billion this year; Increased the number of Border Patrol agents from about 9,000 to more than 12,000 - and by the end of 2008, we will have doubled the number of Border Patrol agents since the President took office; Deployed thousands of National Guard members to assist the Border Patrol; Upgraded technology at our borders and added infrastructure, including new fencing and vehicle barriers; Apprehended and sent home more than 6 million people entering America illegally; and We are adding thousands of new beds in our detention facilities, so we can continue working to end "catch and release" at our Southern border.
January 2017 - Trump inaugurated - GOP majorities in both houses of Congress January 2017 Wall not an emergency February 2017 Wall not an emergency March 2017 Wall not an emergency April 2017 Wall not an emergency May 2017 Wall not an emergency June 2017 Wall not an emergency July 2017 Wall not an emergency August 2017 Wall not an emergency September 2017 Wall not an emergency October 2017 Wall not an emergency November 2017 Wall not an emergency December 2017 Wall not an emergency January 2018 Wall not an emergency February 2018 Wall not an emergency March 2018 Wall not an emergency April 2018 Wall not an emergency May 2018 Wall not an emergency June 2018 Wall not an emergency July 2018 Wall not an emergency August 2018 Wall not an emergency September 2018 Wall not an emergency October 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Wall not an emergency November 2018 Democratic majority elected in House January 2019 EMERGENCY  Fact: Border apprehensions are at a 45 year low. There is no crisis at our border. It's fake news.  #NoWall #Impeach #Incarcerate
THANK GOD FOR TRUMP! #KAG
RENEE. MIRROR IMAGE HON?
Communist Bernie Zionist shill
You are insane.
You are insane.
democrats work for the cartel
democrats work for the cartel
Good job President Trump!
Good job President Trump!
Protect the border Mr. President.
Protect the border Mr. President.
Stay strong Mr. President
Stay strong Mr. President
Stand firm President Trump... NEVER forget these same democrats know we need the wall. What they do not want is for you to get credit for doing something to protect America and her children. They are willing to spend billions of our tax dollars to support and encourage criminals... turn a blind eye to drug and human trafficking... hoping you fail and the voters do NOT re-elect you. They fear you because if you succeed as you have done by calling the Korean dictator's bluff and bringing a real chance for peace in Korea or how the economy is positive, unemployment numbers that are at a historic low, and bringing back real family supporting jobs... you will be re-elected. They fear another four years because of the possibility of you appointing another judge or two to our Supreme Court. Their entire effort to destroy America is to stop your success. We are the victims while they lie with cold stone orchestrated words. Your love for America is your foundation President Trump... and those that also love America and her proud history support you... 100%.AS
Stand firm President Trump... NEVER forget these same democrats know we need the wall. What they do not want is for you to get credit for doing something to protect America and her children. They are willing to spend billions of our tax dollars to support and encourage criminals... turn a blind eye to drug and human trafficking... hoping you fail and the voters do NOT re-elect you. They fear you because if you succeed as you have done by calling the Korean dictator's bluff and bringing a real chance for peace in Korea or how the economy is positive, unemployment numbers that are at a historic low, and bringing back real family supporting jobs... you will be re-elected. They fear another four years because of the possibility of you appointing another judge or two to our Supreme Court. Their entire effort to destroy America is to stop your success. We are the victims while they lie with cold stone orchestrated words. Your love for America is your foundation President Trump... and those that also love America and her proud history support you... 100%.AS
Alaska is with you !
Alaska is with you !
The best President. Ever, agree.
The best President. Ever, agree.
Yes!!!! Build the Wall.  Trump for 2020
Yes!!!! Build the Wall.  Trump for 2020
President Trump is the BEST President EVER! Trump 2020!!! Keep the government SHUTDOWN,  deport all illegal immigrants, build the wall and close the border permanently!
President Trump is the BEST President EVER! Trump 2020!!! Keep the government SHUTDOWN,  deport all illegal immigrants, build the wall and close the border permanently!
Lol comunism? Dang you'll eat everything he feeds you
Lol comunism? Dang you'll eat everything he feeds you
False! Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in Canada
False! Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in Canada
The borders are secured, you're just desperate for 2020
The borders are secured, you're just desperate for 2020
Of all the walls around the world that were built. It held no one out.   Waste of money
STAY THE COURSE MR. PRESIDENT..... STAY THE COURSE
STAY THE COURSE MR. PRESIDENT..... STAY THE COURSE
THEY ARE EVIL DEVILS. WWW.MAGAPILL.COM
THEY ARE EVIL DEVILS. WWW.MAGAPILL.COM
What's important to Americans is that you open the government so people can get a paycheck
NANNN this is a tactic to stop the speaneas ...to stop investigations....because you knew that with the amont that you asked for the game of throne wall.....THEY WILL SAY NO....so .what you do...you use your troll followers with your WALL..SHUTDOWN THE GOV....ALL THIS FOR STOPING OR DELAYING THE INVESTIGATIONS......JUST A SMOKE SCREEN.....YOULL DRAG THIS SHUTDOWN FOR 2 MORE YEARS IF YOU CAN....WHY DID YOU SAY ...YEARS....HUMMMM .....BIZARRE
AMAN...THANKFUL WE AMERICANS F I N A L L Y HAVE SOMEONE LOOKING OUT FOR AMERICA...ADMIRE YOUR BACKBONE !!  KEEP UP THE GOOD FIGHT !!! The American people should be able to see it all..like tonight...both sides...they look like hand holding idots !!!  The TRUTH always come to light !!!
BUILD THE BEAUTIFUL WALLS.
BUILD THE BEAUTIFUL WALLS.
Stand strong sir... I AM A GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEE KEEP my check as long as it takes...BUILD THE WALL.....
Load of 💩. Using FAIR statistics that have been proven wrong. Depending on the poll only 35-45% of Americans support the wall. Nothing but a monument to himself because he knows that’s the only way he will get one.
Load of 💩. Using FAIR statistics that have been proven wrong. Depending on the poll only 35-45% of Americans support the wall. Nothing but a monument to himself because he knows that’s the only way he will get one.
I admire Trump if there is no Trump as the president of the US right now to against China . US may be sinking into the water by China in the next 5 years. So we must vote for Trump and let him do the right way and the right time .
Democrats are playing a childish game that will eventually bite us!
I thought you said Mexico would pay for the Wall Don? So why are you asking Congress to pay for it?
Putting criminals behind bars, that would include you. Now sit back as the mass of foriegn tRump bot comment away
Speak english and right american this is our country unless you are afraid to say it in english
Speak english and right american this is our country unless you are afraid to say it in english
Great Speech Mr President Let's Secure the Border FIRST and then End the Government Shutdown last. Hows that Nancy Pelosi and Chucky Boy Schumer NOT THE OTHER WAY AROUND! :) Stay Firm Mr President
It's a false sense of security they are going to keep coming through the air ports.
You need to start your own news Network.. Trump news network! Then give it to us straight once a week! Put these pos news out of business!
Lots of people are going without pay because of YOU!!!!!! Not the Democrats; Not the Easter Bunny, Santa Claus, or Cupid. It's on YOU!!!! Stop the bullshit, you horrible waste of space.
We all know what you said but you can still change your mind big deal so what! If its better for the people why not? We dont need it. Its a waste of money time efforts and all sorts of necessary peoples talents and disposition towards aspects of you your administration and our country
YES, WE NEED BORDER SECURITY.
YES, WE NEED BORDER SECURITY.
Americans want you out! Get out!
Americans want you out! Get out!
Do it, whatever it takes.Deep inside the libtards  feels the need of BORDER WALL but since they HATE PRES. TRUMP SO MUCH ,THEY DENIED IT NOW.  HYPOCRITES !!!
Is that what Democrats want us to hate them for what they are?
Don't make promises Mr.Trump that you cannot keep. Secure the border, work on good domestic and foreign relationships. You said mexico was going to pay for the wall, work with mexico you can work it out. Are you able to work well with mexico, central and south america and other nations? There is always a way to do things and it is not impossible to work things out. Be a nation builder, people do change you know, you can change other nations as well. Its how you are willing to relate and work things out with others. Don't make any promises that you cannot keep, it makes you untruthful and someone that cannot be trusted.  Undivide the house, the senate, and make it equal with both sides working together not just one against another. Be of one mind with same vision that sees the best outcome of what is best for the people and other nations. Rewrite, and update the constitution if it is possible it is old, it needs to be revised and up to date. Be a good leader and lead the people to prosperity Mr.Trump.
WHY ARENT YOU PEOPLE SCREAMING FOR A WALL ON THE NORTH BORDER?  Windsor Canada is only a bridge trip away from Detroit ... and lots and lots of Muslims live in Michigan.  WALL ON THE NORTH BORDER!
WHY ARENT YOU PEOPLE SCREAMING FOR A WALL ON THE NORTH BORDER?  Windsor Canada is only a bridge trip away from Detroit ... and lots and lots of Muslims live in Michigan.  WALL ON THE NORTH BORDER!
Please don't build a wall....ONLY WHITE PPL who don't want more POC in the USA want that.
Please don't build a wall....ONLY WHITE PPL who don't want more POC in the USA want that.
Democrats are anarchists, and anyone who believes and follows them are also anarchists, whether they want to be or not.
Democrats are anarchists, and anyone who believes and follows them are also anarchists, whether they want to be or not.
Stand firm President Trump!
Hoping your address tonight will include Sean Hannity's clips of HILLARY,OBAMA,and  SHUMER'S VOTES FOR THE WALL IN 2006!!!!!! PLEASE,PLEASE PLEASE INCLUDE THOSE CLIPS...IT WILL BE YOUR SAVING GRACE!!!!!!
Hoping your address tonight will include Sean Hannity's clips of HILLARY,OBAMA,and  SHUMER'S VOTES FOR THE WALL IN 2006!!!!!! PLEASE,PLEASE PLEASE INCLUDE THOSE CLIPS...IT WILL BE YOUR SAVING GRACE!!!!!!
Mexico paying for a wall?  You bombed on that one, big guy.  A wall is not a magic solution for border security in the south. What about  the Atlantic and Pacific Oceans? What about Canada?
Good speech Mr President! 👍  You are doing the right thing and what we expect from you, our leader.  Now get the job done and implement the National Emergency procedure!  The Dems response was pathetic, only hoping the opportunity will pass if you cave in to their stupid demands, so that they can continue with the status quo.  Stick to your guns Sir!   We are with you and support you all the way!  God bless you! 🙏
The answer is obviously obvious, and sad.  These people called Congress are at the core of Our Country, and are collecting great paychecks and benefits from our taxes, SO well taken-care of, but SO many of them won't even do their jobs and uphold The Law, so many of them are just plain un-American--all on Our dime.
Yes this wall is needed as a statement if nothing else we are fed up with the drugs and violence in our country keep it to your own selves
Yes this wall is needed as a statement if nothing else we are fed up with the drugs and violence in our country keep it to your own selves
So we go from Mexico paying for the wall to 800k employees not being paid for weeks? Stop getting your orders from fox and friends and fix this man.
Stopping u is the most important thing to do because u are wasting 5 billion dollars on a stupid wall
Stopping u is the most important thing to do because u are wasting 5 billion dollars on a stupid wall
Most US citizens want more border patrol agents, going after companies that profit from the illegals, and not a wall that won't work.
The border is fine no crisis, you are fear mongering again and you need to stop.
The people that elected him are ignorant.
Do your bone spurs stop you from grabbing them by the pussy?
If AGT and the Voice can have people from all of U.S. vote on contestants and have results in a real short time, why can’t you propose this on a vote of the American people to see what the majority of the people want? For the wall. Against the wall. Both parties abide by the results being that you all work for the American people! Just saying.
The majority of Americans know a wall is not the answer.
I don't care what the media says we want. They DO NOT speak for me. BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT!! We desperately need it!! We should have had one long ago. STAND STRONG FOR US...WE STAND STRONG BEHIND YOU !!!!!❤
I don't care what the media says we want. They DO NOT speak for me. BUILD THE WALL MR. PRESIDENT!! We desperately need it!! We should have had one long ago. STAND STRONG FOR US...WE STAND STRONG BEHIND YOU !!!!!❤
If that's the case you'll take the already agreed on bi partisan bill that gave you 1.6 billion for border security...
If that's the case you'll take the already agreed on bi partisan bill that gave you 1.6 billion for border security...
Build that wall Mr. President!!
Build that wall Mr. President!!
UM YOUR PROMISE WAS THAT MEXICO IS GOING TO PAY NOT AMERICANS
Stopping you from destroying this country in your quest to fulfill your promises based on lies and propaganda!  #NOWALL #ImpeachTheMF
Stopping you from destroying this country in your quest to fulfill your promises based on lies and propaganda!  #NOWALL #ImpeachTheMF
That's what the people put you in office for. When you consider the overall budget, the cost for the barrier is marginal. Having proper ports of entry encourages legal migration, or requests for asylum. WY encourage illegal migration and put law enforcement in jeopardy. The Democrats act like children. Mr Trumps mandate is to lead and protect the country. This is something Fems should support. It's such another instrument to control migration.
Ted Cruiz said use money seized from El Chapo drug cartel.. $14 billion.. just like local police use confiscated drug money to fight the drug problem.
Maybe if Democrats weren't taking bribe money from the Mexican cartels this wouldn't be an issue. Can't see another reason why Pelosi, Schumer, Obama, Clinton, etc would flip-flop on building a barrier.
Trump people live in a fact free haze, the majority of the world considers stupidity.
Trump people live in a fact free haze, the majority of the world considers stupidity.
The democrats are getting more anti American by the day
Sorry but you sound like a parrot.
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall. How come you didn't shut down their government?
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall. How come you didn't shut down their government?
Christy Grubbs I guess not
anyone?????
so if walls dont work do inmates in prison stay voluntarily??
so if walls dont work do inmates in prison stay voluntarily??
Donald Trump we both from New York you say you was going to put the money up why you trying to take from the middle class you know Mexico is not paying for the wall we need our jobs I got a mortgage to pay New York City you playing with our money
IF DURING A GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN THESE CONGRESSMEN AND WOMEN DIDNT GET PAID I BET THEY WOULD COME TO TERMS MUCH QUICKER.
IF DURING A GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN THESE CONGRESSMEN AND WOMEN DIDNT GET PAID I BET THEY WOULD COME TO TERMS MUCH QUICKER.
The people didn't elect you...the electoral college did. The people voted more for Hillary than you.
The people didn't elect you...the electoral college did. The people voted more for Hillary than you.
SCHUMERSHUTDOWN. PELOSISHUTDOWN. SHUTDOWN DEMOCRAT.
SCHUMERSHUTDOWN. PELOSISHUTDOWN. SHUTDOWN DEMOCRAT.
And it is OBVIOUS IN SO MANY WAYS, Dems don’t give a 💩 about American CITIZENS! Only ILLEGAL VOTES matter to them!
And it is OBVIOUS IN SO MANY WAYS, Dems don’t give a 💩 about American CITIZENS! Only ILLEGAL VOTES matter to them!
HOLD. YOUR. GROUND. We see what the traitors are doing. They want to flood America with cheap labor that they don't have to pay but they can promise benefits to all for votes.
Work together to secure the border!!! They had no problem with getting money for the Tunisia Jordan border. They had no problem denying veterans some benefits. I’m sick of the Democrats in office right now. They are not working for the people. They forgot they WORK FOR US!! They need to be doing what we elected you for. By disregarding what the American people are asking for is ridiculous. They’re not listening. They don’t care what we want. Pelosi called you a conman today. She said you have us preoccupied with the wall while doing other things you don’t want us to know. Honestly whatever you’re doing while we’re focused on the wall, you have my support. I know you love this country. I know you are trying to have our best interest at heart. I wish I could sit down and talk to you and tell you what Americans really think. I wish we could all sit down and tell you and the rest of our government the things we won’t you all to focus on. It doesn’t work that way. I am going to write a letter to you and I hope you read it. I hope everyone else follows suit. I hope everyone on all sides of the political platform to contact their congressman/congresswoman and tell them what we truly want you all to do for us. I wholeheartedly believe that the senate, house and even yourself truly doesn’t know what we would like to happen. For me less aid to other countries and more aid here for things we need. Instead of 808 million going to Jordan only send 404 million. Use that for tiny homes for anyone who is homeless. Use it for things in this country. Our money that we worked for is going to other countries. How much money is being sent to other countries per year? If they haven’t figured out how to invest that money and grow their economies you now, they never will. Take your time with your address tonight. Don’t get so hot tempered. Speak your peace and go on. This isn’t a rally, it’s an address to the nation. Treat it as such. Good luck Mr. President. We’re behind you. ♥️🇺🇸♥️🇺🇸♥️🇺🇸♥️
Work together to secure the border!!! They had no problem with getting money for the Tunisia Jordan border. They had no problem denying veterans some benefits. I’m sick of the Democrats in office right now. They are not working for the people. They forgot they WORK FOR US!! They need to be doing what we elected you for. By disregarding what the American people are asking for is ridiculous. They’re not listening. They don’t care what we want. Pelosi called you a conman today. She said you have us preoccupied with the wall while doing other things you don’t want us to know. Honestly whatever you’re doing while we’re focused on the wall, you have my support. I know you love this country. I know you are trying to have our best interest at heart. I wish I could sit down and talk to you and tell you what Americans really think. I wish we could all sit down and tell you and the rest of our government the things we won’t you all to focus on. It doesn’t work that way. I am going to write a letter to you and I hope you read it. I hope everyone else follows suit. I hope everyone on all sides of the political platform to contact their congressman/congresswoman and tell them what we truly want you all to do for us. I wholeheartedly believe that the senate, house and even yourself truly doesn’t know what we would like to happen. For me less aid to other countries and more aid here for things we need. Instead of 808 million going to Jordan only send 404 million. Use that for tiny homes for anyone who is homeless. Use it for things in this country. Our money that we worked for is going to other countries. How much money is being sent to other countries per year? If they haven’t figured out how to invest that money and grow their economies you now, they never will. Take your time with your address tonight. Don’t get so hot tempered. Speak your peace and go on. This isn’t a rally, it’s an address to the nation. Treat it as such. Good luck Mr. President. We’re behind you. ♥️🇺🇸♥️🇺🇸♥️🇺🇸♥️
Looks like you'll have to declare a National Emergency because "We the People" want it!! Stick to your guns President Trump. 🇱🇷🇱🇷🇱🇷
Looks like you'll have to declare a National Emergency because "We the People" want it!! Stick to your guns President Trump. 🇱🇷🇱🇷🇱🇷
Rodriguez---Thank you & God Bless you & your wife.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez, thank you for your sacrifice!
Ruben Radar Rodriguez, thank you for your sacrifice!
Caron ~ Thank you and your wife for bearing this burden for the good of our country.  May God encourage your hearts as we go forward.
Thank you both for loving your country and fellow American citizens with your sacrifice.
Thank you both for loving your country and fellow American citizens with your sacrifice.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez 👍
Ruben Radar Rodriguez 👍
Ruben Radar Rodriguez bahahahahahahahahaha
Ruben Radar Rodriguez bahahahahahahahahaha
Michael Pearson And you,sir, are a troll.
Michael Pearson And you,sir, are a troll.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez is another lying Trump supporter.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez is another lying Trump supporter.
Thanks you for your sacrifice
Thanks you for your sacrifice
Ruben Radar Rodriguez well said! Thank you for your sacrifice.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez well said! Thank you for your sacrifice.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez thank you for your sacrifice,  we support you and your family.  Thank you from louisiana!!!!
Ruben Radar Rodriguez thank you for your sacrifice,  we support you and your family.  Thank you from louisiana!!!!
Thank you for supporting #PresidentTrump while he continues the push to do what is best for #Americans, and what Americans have asked him to do. #KeepingPromises
Ruben Radar Rodriguez  more people like u need to speak out!!! People need to stop being quiet because they are scared
Ruben Radar Rodriguez  more people like u need to speak out!!! People need to stop being quiet because they are scared
One of the main reasons Trump got elected was because of the wall. You really think he doesn’t have support? Do you lock your doors when you aren’t home or away from home? Do you let complete strangers come inside? Well think of America as you home. We lock the doors until we know who is entering first.
One of the main reasons Trump got elected was because of the wall. You really think he doesn’t have support? Do you lock your doors when you aren’t home or away from home? Do you let complete strangers come inside? Well think of America as you home. We lock the doors until we know who is entering first.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez worried more about a wall than healthcare?
Ruben Radar Rodriguez worried more about a wall than healthcare?
Michael Pearson Lying Trump supporter?  I am a Proud Iowa Trump Supporter who, like Ruben, does not lie.  Mike Gruenfeld, your figures are far from the truth.
Michael Pearson Lying Trump supporter?  I am a Proud Iowa Trump Supporter who, like Ruben, does not lie.  Mike Gruenfeld, your figures are far from the truth.
Thank you!
Let's see how long you'll be willing to go furloughed for. You'll break.
Let's see how long you'll be willing to go furloughed for. You'll break.
I call bullshit. .
I call bullshit. .
Wow, you would rather have a crumbling cement wall than provide healthcare to women and children. You are a true member of Cult 45.
Wow, you would rather have a crumbling cement wall than provide healthcare to women and children. You are a true member of Cult 45.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez you are in a minority as more and more NOT 100% backing POtuS. 60% say no to Wall
Ruben Radar Rodriguez you are in a minority as more and more NOT 100% backing POtuS. 60% say no to Wall
Lydia Heilman no let’s shut the government down when they want to give us healthcare that is expensive and insurance companies still deny claims.did you forget Obama shut down the government for that? Oh yeah, we have to pass the bill to see what’s in the Bill. Now how was that transparency?
Lydia Heilman no let’s shut the government down when they want to give us healthcare that is expensive and insurance companies still deny claims.did you forget Obama shut down the government for that? Oh yeah, we have to pass the bill to see what’s in the Bill. Now how was that transparency?
Janet Wood how is it not relevant? Give me some facts. Or do you only believe in emotional name calling?
Janet Wood how is it not relevant? Give me some facts. Or do you only believe in emotional name calling?
Ruben Radar Rodriguez Amen to that!
Heaven forbid the government tries to give everyone healthcare! Much better for the government workers to lose their homes over a wall the majority of Americans don't want. Don't be a martyr for me sir.
Heaven forbid the government tries to give everyone healthcare! Much better for the government workers to lose their homes over a wall the majority of Americans don't want. Don't be a martyr for me sir.
Janet Wood old but still holds true...
Janet Wood old but still holds true...
Ruben Radar Rodriguez I'm proud of you both for your sacrifice...
Ruben Radar Rodriguez I'm proud of you both for your sacrifice...
Liz Livingston This analogy is getting old and furthermore not even relevant!
Ruben Radar Rodriguez your a patriot mate keep it up
Ruben Radar Rodriguez your a patriot mate keep it up
Ruben Radar Rodriguez ahhhhh your own profile reveals you aren't a Federal employee..... More time invested in creating this account but fake is fake....it's been reported to Facebook
Chris Carr All federal employees keep their insurance during a shut down so your comment is irrelevant. https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.fedweek.com/issue-briefs/opm-issues-status-update-on-benefits-during-shutdown/amp/
Stay strong yourself. I’ve been wondering how people affected view the issue, as that’s what matters. God bless. If necessary, find another as this might take awhile.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez, thank you for your support. May God bless you and your family.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez Thank you for supporting our President and sorry that you are negatively impacted by the shutdown.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez Thank you for supporting our President and sorry that you are negatively impacted by the shutdown.
If Trump does get the wall built passed without Dems support and it does make a difference, the Dems are going to prove to everyone that they didn’t pass it because they don’t like trump. If you see the videos of them saying we need to control immigration and build barriers, then they are on stalling because Trump is keeping his promises and they don’t like a politician who keeps his promises. I don’t care who pays for it as long as it gets taken care of. I know many people who have come here the legal route.
If Trump does get the wall built passed without Dems support and it does make a difference, the Dems are going to prove to everyone that they didn’t pass it because they don’t like trump. If you see the videos of them saying we need to control immigration and build barriers, then they are on stalling because Trump is keeping his promises and they don’t like a politician who keeps his promises. I don’t care who pays for it as long as it gets taken care of. I know many people who have come here the legal route.
Ruben Radar Rodriguez    Drusilla Morrison read this post please.
Chris Carr Obama shut down the government to get the bill passed. What’s the difference?
Chris Carr Obama shut down the government to get the bill passed. What’s the difference?
I have dedicated & made sacrifices for this country or my county since 1974. Today I am proudly on furlough as my wife & I are sacrificing to support President Trump's efforts to secure the border, one of the main promises upon which we voted him in. The border was relatively secure when my parents (since naturalized & successful business people before retiring) immigrated here during dangerous times before President LBJ created welfare programs. It was a real struggle. If they didn't work--they didn't eat. If they didn't eat, they would die. Period. I say "relatively" because southern border immigrants were humble & respectful workers from mostly Mexico--not massive groups from Central & South America making demands of governments who lured them with give-away programs during Democrat terms.  In recent years while on helicopter patrol between Rivera & Falfurrias I have seen up to 40+ illegal immigrants burst out running from under one mesquite tree.  Unheard of in my previous decades of law enforcement.  Where were Schumer & Pelosi crying in 2013 when I was furloughed two weeks from my Corpus Christi federal job under Obama? And for what cause--to figure out who was going to pay for a national security barrier?  Hell no, but instead to force hard-working Judeo-Christian taxpayers to pay for the socialist issues of Abortion, Planned Parenthood, and the self-destructive pyramid-scheme called Obamacare. THAT shutdown was the real "tantrum," to use Schumer's word from last night's rebuttal. In 2013 I--a former Democrat--was screwed by Democrats because they won their shutdown tantrum.  They created the shutdown, now they can't stand it when their own weapon is used against them.   President Trump, please do not succumb to the emotional screamers. Anyone with my military aircrew survival training can recognize self-serving propaganda tactics of Exaggerate/Fabricate/Saturate.  All manners of border security ARE vital. Anyone with my law enforcement experience knows that you protect your home with multiple layers, not just locked doors, not just a dog, not just a fence, not just security lights, not just cameras, not just a loud alarm, but with a totality of layers which exponentially increases the deterrence factor in a burglar's mind.  Anyone with my CBP experience knows from direct experience that this crisis is real, and unmanageable without enforcement.  President Trump, you are right about the military or federal, long range Predator drones with Radar domes & VADER pods such as the ones we used to launch from Corpus Christi. Fantastic surveillance, being able to detect smugglers/crossers, groups, vehicles & vessels from 20,000 feet day or night.  Yet these or other advanced airborne or ground sensors mean nothing without obstacles, barriers, or boots-on-the-ground to stop or apprehend them. For every effective barrier that is put in place or extended, our limited agents can more efficiently concentrate their efforts in other problem areas.   Great speech last night by President Trump, in the courageous lineage of Presidents John F. Kennedy (Cuban missile crisis) & Ronald Reagan (Libya, Berlin Wall, "The bombing starts in 10 minutes!")  Making America Safe & Strong again.  I know everyone can't share my experiences & direct observations in life where I can speak first hand about these issues, but I feel sorry for people who instead repeat blind rhetoric, without analyzing facts.  Like those who believe the reporters and politicians who, BEFORE THE SPEECH, were saying that it would contain lies. The word for that is "Prejudice" (Pre-Judging).  And worse, from politicians who supported strong borders when someone else was president.  Partisan haters, putting party before national defense.  I remember occasionally having intermediate supervisors like that in county sheriff politics, who if it was not THEIR idea, it was shot down, regardless of how much money it saved or how effectively crime would be decreased.  You cannot impeach a president for hatred or dislike or disagreement, you need articulable crime(s).  Cut the Democrat funds using our tax money for Planned Parenthood to find the money for strong borders.  Show me any other strong, successful nation on earth that has open borders without monstrous taxation?
I have dedicated & made sacrifices for this country or my county since 1974. Today I am proudly on furlough as my wife & I are sacrificing to support President Trump's efforts to secure the border, one of the main promises upon which we voted him in. The border was relatively secure when my parents (since naturalized & successful business people before retiring) immigrated here during dangerous times before President LBJ created welfare programs. It was a real struggle. If they didn't work--they didn't eat. If they didn't eat, they would die. Period. I say "relatively" because southern border immigrants were humble & respectful workers from mostly Mexico--not massive groups from Central & South America making demands of governments who lured them with give-away programs during Democrat terms.  In recent years while on helicopter patrol between Rivera & Falfurrias I have seen up to 40+ illegal immigrants burst out running from under one mesquite tree.  Unheard of in my previous decades of law enforcement.  Where were Schumer & Pelosi crying in 2013 when I was furloughed two weeks from my Corpus Christi federal job under Obama? And for what cause--to figure out who was going to pay for a national security barrier?  Hell no, but instead to force hard-working Judeo-Christian taxpayers to pay for the socialist issues of Abortion, Planned Parenthood, and the self-destructive pyramid-scheme called Obamacare. THAT shutdown was the real "tantrum," to use Schumer's word from last night's rebuttal. In 2013 I--a former Democrat--was screwed by Democrats because they won their shutdown tantrum.  They created the shutdown, now they can't stand it when their own weapon is used against them.   President Trump, please do not succumb to the emotional screamers. Anyone with my military aircrew survival training can recognize self-serving propaganda tactics of Exaggerate/Fabricate/Saturate.  All manners of border security ARE vital. Anyone with my law enforcement experience knows that you protect your home with multiple layers, not just locked doors, not just a dog, not just a fence, not just security lights, not just cameras, not just a loud alarm, but with a totality of layers which exponentially increases the deterrence factor in a burglar's mind.  Anyone with my CBP experience knows from direct experience that this crisis is real, and unmanageable without enforcement.  President Trump, you are right about the military or federal, long range Predator drones with Radar domes & VADER pods such as the ones we used to launch from Corpus Christi. Fantastic surveillance, being able to detect smugglers/crossers, groups, vehicles & vessels from 20,000 feet day or night.  Yet these or other advanced airborne or ground sensors mean nothing without obstacles, barriers, or boots-on-the-ground to stop or apprehend them. For every effective barrier that is put in place or extended, our limited agents can more efficiently concentrate their efforts in other problem areas.   Great speech last night by President Trump, in the courageous lineage of Presidents John F. Kennedy (Cuban missile crisis) & Ronald Reagan (Libya, Berlin Wall, "The bombing starts in 10 minutes!")  Making America Safe & Strong again.  I know everyone can't share my experiences & direct observations in life where I can speak first hand about these issues, but I feel sorry for people who instead repeat blind rhetoric, without analyzing facts.  Like those who believe the reporters and politicians who, BEFORE THE SPEECH, were saying that it would contain lies. The word for that is "Prejudice" (Pre-Judging).  And worse, from politicians who supported strong borders when someone else was president.  Partisan haters, putting party before national defense.  I remember occasionally having intermediate supervisors like that in county sheriff politics, who if it was not THEIR idea, it was shot down, regardless of how much money it saved or how effectively crime would be decreased.  You cannot impeach a president for hatred or dislike or disagreement, you need articulable crime(s).  Cut the Democrat funds using our tax money for Planned Parenthood to find the money for strong borders.  Show me any other strong, successful nation on earth that has open borders without monstrous taxation?
Fuk off dude your about as stoned as one can get without having a stroke out.  How much powder are you inhaling?  Damnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnn
If it's Donald J. Trump's idea, the dems don't want it.  They hate him more than they care about America.
If it's Donald J. Trump's idea, the dems don't want it.  They hate him more than they care about America.
I love my President! we stand with you sir! Keep up the great work.
JUST BUILD THE WALL. TRUE AMERICANS ARE BEHIND YOU, MR. PRESIDENT!
So can you answer why it wasn’t fully funded when republicans had control of everything?
Yesssssssssssssssssssssssss  Border Security
Yesssssssssssssssssssssssss  Border Security
“Trump shall become My trumpet to the American people," http://www.rightwingwatch.org/post/self-proclaimed-prophet-god-using-donald-trump-to-expose-darkness-and-perversion/
Don Williams Don you'll be dead way before it's built and be paid for. Old man.
BUILD THAT WALL!
BUILD THAT WALL!
How about using that money to get people treatment for their opioid addiction or help poor kids get the healthcare they need??..a Stupid promise for a stupid useless wall from a stupid and useless “man”..
Listen to Trump speak, and then wait for the truth with the rebuttal.
It's our America to..we will pay for it
Tanya Pittman AMEN SISTA
What's more important to Democrats you ask? Getting you out of office and a real president in. One that is not a liar, crook, and Russian/North Korea lover; one who doesn't think they are a dictator and one who upholds the constitution (and has read it) and don't think he's above the law. That's what important to Democrats...restoring the office of the president of the United States!
What's more important to Democrats you ask? Getting you out of office and a real president in. One that is not a liar, crook, and Russian/North Korea lover; one who doesn't think they are a dictator and one who upholds the constitution (and has read it) and don't think he's above the law. That's what important to Democrats...restoring the office of the president of the United States!
Roberta Anastasia  she isn’t making it up
Amy Miller you are making this up. I am from a military family and we are heartsick over how this draft dodger has ruined this country and now causing hardship to ours.
Roberta Anastasia Keep it shut down! We are a military family and fully support the government shutdown. Being a military family and living on post, I have gotten to hear how many other military families feel about the shutdown and 99% of then AGREE!
The country wants the government open!
They don't seem to care about the safety of Americans. I have tried and tried to get a copy of the Democrats plan and the cost of it and can't find anything but political banter anywhere !
Hey here's the problem the dumbrats and George Bush talked about border security. They also talked about building wall I meant a fence. But the fact is none of them had the balls to get it done. So now with one more year till the 2020 election  the dumbrats don't want the  wall built because they won't have those illegal Voters. The Dumbrats also don't won't Trump to go in the history books as a President that kept he's promise to the American People awhile keeping America Safe  and also making America Great once again.
Hey here's the problem the dumbrats and George Bush talked about border security. They also talked about building wall I meant a fence. But the fact is none of them had the balls to get it done. So now with one more year till the 2020 election  the dumbrats don't want the  wall built because they won't have those illegal Voters. The Dumbrats also don't won't Trump to go in the history books as a President that kept he's promise to the American People awhile keeping America Safe  and also making America Great once again.
I GOT A COUPLE BILLION AND THE POWER TO SHUT DOWN THE GOVERNMENT- TRUMP
Thank you Mr. President for keeping America safe! But we also need a beautiful concrete dome to keep illegals from coming in by air. Call your Congressman and demand it today! #BuildTheDome! 🇺🇸
Build the wall along the southern border.
Build the Wall! We the people stand with you President Trump!
Please build the wall for the people of the US
They will do anything to stop you! They don’t care what the cost. Keep fighting for us...🇺🇸👍🏻
Dearest Mr President,   I have request your Excellency. There will be NEW YEAR'S EVE and FEAST OF THANKSGIVING on 29th Year of Lebath 2nd Year (on 5th of March 2019th Year).  There will be NEW YEAR on 1st of Azi 3rd Year (on 6th of March 2019th Year).  There will be FEAST OF GOD CREATED DAY (LIGHT) AND NIGHT (DARK) from Sundown 29th of Lebath 2nd Year to Sundown 1st of Azi 3rd Year (evening 5th to evening 6th of March 2019th Year)    Shalom!
I hope President Trump gets the wall
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
Mark Sharif I'm sure its not just the goverment's you been sucking lmao
MY NEIGHBORS WIFE RIDES MY BOYS COAT TAIL SHES IN THE IN AND OUT CLUB
MY NEIGHBOR IS IN LOVE WITH HIS PARTNER
MY NEIGHBOR FUCKS HIS WIFE AFTER 20 YEARS EVERY DAY
MY NEIGHBOR WENT TO YALE AND STUDIES CRIMINAL JUSTICE
I CAN AFFORD TO LIVE IN ANY NEIGHBORHOOD I WANT
IM THE FACE OF THE AMERICAN DREAM
I CAN AFFORD TO LIVE ANYWHERE I WANT
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
DICK IN THE ASS IS BETTER THEN IN AND OUT





THIS IS HIGH SOCIETY. THESE PEOPLE WENT TO HARVARD AND YALE
IN AND OUT IS PROTECTED UNDER NANCY PELOSI CONSTITUTION
I BEEN SUCKING THE GOVERNMENTS DICK SINCE THE 80s
Whem Pres Trump says 4000 undocumented illegals crossed over the southern border, the ICE stats suggest he is right!  ICE says •  Over a 10-year period (2005-2014) ICE arrested approximately 4,000 MS-13 members, leaders, and associates. This represents about 13 percent of all gang members they arrested nationwide (31,000) during that period.  •  92 percent of the MS-13 affiliated aliens arrested were illegal aliens.
Fact: Illegal border apprehensions are at a 46 year low. Fact: 0 terrorists have been found crossing our southern border. Does this sound like a "crisis" worth harming 800,000 Americans over? Get your facts from reputable sources, rather than this ass-clown president!
The most important thing to democrats is using their buzzword tantrums in place of real arguments to control people through mob rule. Nothing new happening with them. Stay on strike all year long if you need to and include cuts to the DNC paychecks to pay actual employees that deserve it. :)
Great job sir. Proud to call you my Present. We need a wall. Please keep fighting for us.
While we are at it deport every single illegal that voted in our elections, charge every single American that processed all their write in ballots as votes.................Michael
Mr. President , you know the way around it. Do what needs to be done for U.S.. BUILD THE WALL!!!!!
Build the wall mr president we stand behind you.
We want to hear from the President, not the news channels.
Just shutdown the border I guarantee you the Mexican government will build that wall in record time
While trump wants to build a wall the enemy are already in the Whitehouse, Russia straight in the front door with arms wide open.
Donald Trump for Prison 2020
I think the initiative should be taken further than just a fence.
LOL his PROMISE was to have MEXICO pay for it.  He lies... it will be fun to see him FACT CHECKED tonight by credible sources.
LOL his PROMISE was to have MEXICO pay for it.  He lies... it will be fun to see him FACT CHECKED tonight by credible sources.
If everyone in America  pays 17.00 we have  5.5 billing to build a wall
I know you're a billionaire Trump, just use your own money to build the wall, problem solve!
Great job mr. President. Build the wall do whatever you have to do
Yes!! We need that wall immediately, but must have doors in case if we need them for any reason.
We want the wall just as much as you president...we need it.
We want the wall just as much as you president...we need it.
Start a fund raising for Protecting our USA from those who believe otherwise.And use as tax right off also its for a good cause
Why don’t you just lie to the American people a few more times. Mexico will pay for the wall. What a joke this clown is.
Since the democrats have caused the government shutdown let them pay the wages for all the employees not receiving a paycheck because of their drama! Schumer and Pelosi should be the first to make payments out of their own non earned wages!!!
I love this plan.  I love in fl . Huge impact for us.  100% support wall plan.  Maybe much less should have been spent in Russian investigation.  We are with you
I love this plan.  I love in fl . Huge impact for us.  100% support wall plan.  Maybe much less should have been spent in Russian investigation.  We are with you
Build the wall Mr. President,we are behind you 100%, best president ever, I pray for you everyday.
Damn those airplanes ✈️ and boats 🚣  got past my 5.5 billion dollar 💵 wall again   Damn !   now what  !!
President Trump stand  firm  and  build  the  wall.
Dear Mr. President, since you, the senate, and the house of representatives have chosen not to work with each other I suppose that none of you  been denied you salaries in regard to the shutdown...what a surprise.  Does that mean I don't owe taxes for the weeks or months that this shutdown is in effect?  Afterall if I'm not receiving services why should I pay for it?
Funny how new trade deal with Mexico will pay for the barrier indirectly. So Trump did figure out a way to get Mexico to pay for the barrier. Smart move . Dems can't keep up .
We do NOT need this wall, I am a hard working citizen and want to go out clubbing on the weekends without having my price of cocaine upcharged 200%! The only compromise I would be willing to make is if we could open cocaine dispensaries!
If Mexico pays for it. Show us the money. Better yet show us your plan.
What a wonderful speech.  He is such a great patriot for our nation.
US politics is quite puzzling to a lot of us in the UK.  I seem to remember the promise DT made was that the Mexicans would pay for a wall to be built.  Until that money has been made available, it seems undemocratic to take the money of US citizens to pay for it - there are so many good causes that need that money, ordinary people who could benefit from improvements in services.  Also, has anyone ever wondered if it’s really to keep people out?  I remember a big wall being built under those circumstances in Europe post war and it’s main function, far from keeping out the bad guys, ended up preventing so-called free people from leaving their own country, often being shot in the process.  Walls rarely create long term benefits and they mostly separate, they don’t bring people together.  Sadly, isolation policies cost much in terms of trade opportunities and standard of living in the countries that impose such ideas - even here there are short-sighted people trying to initiate debilitating isolation whilst caring nothing for how the economic costs of such plans will affect the least empowered in our society...
Thank you, Mr. P for standing up for the Citizen!  Give them an ultimatum; "It's either a Wall or you will cut off Healthcare and Education to the illegal, law breaking, NON Citizen"
Stop blaming everyone else for your own stupidity
Stop blaming everyone else for your own stupidity
Donald Trump for Prison 2020 https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2019/01/08/paul-manafort-robert-mueller-plea-deal-russia-investigation/2485091002/Paul Manafort, President Trump's former campaign chief, accused of lying about sharing polling data with Russianusatoday.com
It's time to let the people vote on it
maybe we should let the Americans speak bc Congress is not speaking for us
maybe we should let the Americans speak bc Congress is not speaking for us
Support and prayers for all you do Mr. President.
Stay 💪 strong we are behind you on this!!!
My. President, southern cameroonians need America to stop Paul Biya from killing innocent civilians
Build the wall please Mr president
So how is Mexico paying for the wall again? Another false promise. Typical 😂
Take the money from Congress they are not working for their fat paychecks
The majority of Americans do not want a wall.  Stop with your Fear Mongering LIES
When nancy said you lied just now...I turned it off.   If I happen to listen to the news I will hear her and Chuck for the next week with the same crap that I just blocked out of my life for the evening. These people are nuts and I wish they would go away.
"BUILD THE WALL"!!!!!!!  It's about time we have a president that really cares about our country and for the people. It has been a long time coming. Toooooo long! Go Mr President!!!!! Very proud to have him!!!!
EXCELLENT, EXCELLENT,EXCELLENT SPEECH, MR PRESIDENT!
no matter the outcome we are on your side sir
Your promise was ....MEXICO will pay for the wall.  Not...the AMERICAN tax payers will pay for the wall.   Please be honest in your statements.   Please remember why you voted for Trump!
President Trump you are the best president I have ever seen , I am a hard worker  and have lost my insurance after I wAs told I was grandfathered in i am so tired of people who want something for nothing  theirs lot's of people who want me to start a militias to stop this night   MAre
Stand your ground on this it’s been needed for years!!!!!
But you promised México would pay, and instead you’re trying to pass the cost off to taxpayers... some of whom, you’ve stopped from getting paychecks at all. And the majority of us who are already struggling even with our paychecks.
#Declassify FISA and stop the nonsense.
If President Trump said we should all breathe the Dems would start holding their breath!
If President Trump said we should all breathe the Dems would start holding their breath!
Mr. President - As a Navy veteran I know that you did not swear to protect the country when you were sworn in to office. You swore to protect & defend the Constitution of the United States just as I did when I was sworn in to the Navy. The last two years of my enlistment I was stationed at the Fleet Area Control & Surveillance Facility In Jacksonville, Florida. While there our air traffic controllers would detect planes and ships trying to evade detection, which would turn out to be bringing drugs into the country. The point being our border with Mexico is not the only way drugs and people are coming into the county illegally. what do suggest; a dome like in the Simpson Movie.
Shut down the border show Mexico we mean business
Democrats are all in on following the Luciferian agenda.
Look out,,its the nancy and chuck show, they really are out of touch,and im not even an american..
I have friends that lived near the border that must hide belongings as things were stolen from their yards.
Declared a National Emergency and build the wall to secure our boarders Mr. President.
Interesting listen...  https://m.facebook.com/story.php?story_fbid=2468045599876608&id=1102865066394675
The question is why don't democrats want border security???? It baffles me. I know it's for the votes, but they are really willing to trade their own security for votes? Why??????
I wounder how many people who are against the wall donate to these other countries! This should show all americans how much the Democratic elites care about them when they have walls themself. Democrats just want votes and are willing to put you at risk to get them! Wake up! Build the wall!
Because you Mr President said that Mexico would pay not the American tax payers  that's why.
Consider Compromise  yes to security
Great speech, Mr. President. You call Dems who they truly are.
Just seen Dem response to address. Do I think Dems see security one way and Republicans see it another....yes. Do I think only unity can end the shutdown....yes. So, let's approve both methods....simple!
Your doing a “Great Again” job pres. keep up the good work!
Withhold pay from Congress and the Senate. They are withholding pay from their constituents because they refuse to negotiate. It's time their pockets are empty. If they were under pay for performance they would wouldn't get a check. Better yet if you cant hold their pay then encourage them to donate their pay to those who are hard working individuals, doing the jobs most of them never would and now they are doing it without pay
This is one reason why Americans vote for you!  Build the wall.  Don’t cave to the bullies!
anyway is 911 war or wto war nobody want to die
We want border security and a wall as high as you can build it. The American people own this country not Congress!
UP THE RESISTANCE  STOP TRUMP AT ALL COSTS F.... the American M... F...ers
They don't want you to win! They will never give it to you and that is the only reason. They pretend the voters didn't want this. Someone send them the chants from all your rallies "Build the Wall"
KEEP IT SHUT DOWN! It hasn't affected my life one bit.
Mr Trumpski, the truth is the most important thing - truth and clarity. We are talking about a man without a plan, only interested in money at any cost. A wall will not keep Americas enemies out for they sit in the Whitehouse.  Manaforte taking money from Russia, guilty of tax fraud, providing inside polling info to Russian spy, secret deals with Russian spy in Madrid on Americas stance on Russian sanctions eye- the truth is out there
President Trump: Please end the government shutdown.  I'm for better border security but does it have to be a Wall?
I have the wall courtesy of the democrats and hilary clintons.
We are with you, Mr. PRESIDENT.   Chuck and  Nancy are lifetime politicians =liars!
We are with you, Mr. PRESIDENT.   Chuck and  Nancy are lifetime politicians =liars!
What’s most important is for you to keep your word and get the money from Mexico like you said. You didn’t mislead your voters did you. That’s there sticking point. Don’t build a wall build a shipping canal that’ll create jobs on both sides and they won’t want to come. Then build a Super-max Wall if you want. This way both country’s pay for the canal share in the overall upkeep and profits it’s a business deal a win win deal and your the master of the business world. Thanks best wishes.
Wouldn't it be cheaper to electrify the wall that we already have? Plus these drug dealers use boats in the Gulf & Pacific coast, as well as small planes. Plus, people that use illegal drugs will (sadly enough) just make their own.
It won’t matter.  Rage politics is only answer dems have.
oh stfu Chancy (thats Chuck and Nancy) just build the fkn wall and STFU!
Trump you need to see this. you can fund the wall this is how. https://www.teaparty.org/chuck-norris-comes-brilliant-solution-fund-wall-youve-got-hear-340586/
Americans want border security!
I think Mr. President that once this wall goes up you should find all the homeless vets, and give them housing and a pay check and have them patrol the wall. It will bring down the rates of homeless people in America, and it will help the vets giving them a purpose.
I am not against stopping the inflow. My concern is your background as a builder and a stubborn temperament. Are their tech alternatives, sensors and drones - for that price get Musk to pop a bird up there.
I called Congress for you brother..from kalifornia..
Life need to be secured first before think about something else!
Dem's just want to win. They hate the President and will do anything to make him loose. They care nothing about the American people. We voted Trump in because he will fight against the establishment.
Thank you President Trump, Do Not give up to those trolls,  Be strong,the people with you
I think the market cares more about a trade deal with China than a government shutdown.However, if the shutdown continues Trump may lose consumer and business confidence.
It’s obvious that it’s all about the wall...I support it, but don’t support all of us Americans you are hurting,including myself
We need the wall 60 years ago.
I'm all for boarder patrol and a wall but how much of this money is coming from trumps pocket or out of the pockets of are high up political figures. I know money is being pulled out of my mother's pocket who has worked for this government for over 25 years and if she can't make her house payment that will leave her homeless how many of a government officials are looking at loosing there homes if this shutdown continues.....
Mexico should pay for it! Go get the money!!!
Stand strong Pres. Trump and don’t give in to any amnesty deal.  Reagan gave amnesty in return for a securing our border.   They got their amnesty and our borders are still wide open.  One American life lost because of an illegal, is one to many.
I am from West Africa {Nigeria} but I support you Donald J Trump. Protect your country. Build the wall.
We support your decision Mr President and are praying for you
We support your decision Mr President and are praying for you
The removal of (D-MN), IIhan Abdullahi Omar from the 5th Congressional District in her participation in marriage fraud.  Created by C.M. on January 05, 2019  We have 30 days that get 100,000 signatures. Please Patriots sign , I did. https://petitions.whitehouse.gov/petition/removal-d-mn-iihan-abdullahi-omar-5th-congressional-district-her-participation-marriage-fraud
Call a special election put it to the people and you will see how many of us what the Wall!
You know to get past all the zoning restrictions your going to have to use Adobe right
But your cool with the president lying non stop?
All of this is the Democrats' fault. I really wish they cared enough about the U.S. citizens to help pay for the wall that is supposed to protect us. I guess they don't care about our safety.
THEY HATE YOU MORE THAN THEY LOVE OUR COUNTRY
we are behind you Mr President!!!
I think there is no point of the wall because face it we already know how to fly airplanes and dig tunnels and still have other ways yo get in the country no matter what you do
But Mexico was going to pay for it.
Obama NEVER asked ANYONE...when HE signed his "Executive Orders"... AGAINST what America would have accepted. BUILD THAT WALL... WHATEVER has to be done to DO IT!! AND STOP "CATCH AND RELEASE"... It's NOT FAIR TO US...to just DROP OFF, hundreds of illegals in OUR CITIES! LUDICROUS
Obama NEVER asked ANYONE...when HE signed his "Executive Orders"... AGAINST what America would have accepted. BUILD THAT WALL... WHATEVER has to be done to DO IT!! AND STOP "CATCH AND RELEASE"... It's NOT FAIR TO US...to just DROP OFF, hundreds of illegals in OUR CITIES! LUDICROUS
We need a wall/ barrier or whatever they want to call it.  Come here legally....and I don’t care who pays for it.  Think of Americans first this time
Do all Illegal libtards use the laugh Emoji? 🤔
Do all Illegal libtards use the laugh Emoji? 🤔
Neither, getting their hands on taxpayer money is their only goal
Whats good for the president.. screwing over a person's livelihood or get what he wants .. what a shame he still around
Whats good for the president.. screwing over a person's livelihood or get what he wants .. what a shame he still around
We The People = Must take action For illegal immigration has been occurring for decades  - FINALLY  ONCE in our life time Have a President Who is  FOR We The People
Wish America could vote on it. But use electoral votes so all the illegals that vote for Democrats wont have as much pull.
Liberals are willing to exchange American blood for Latino votes.  Simple as that.
Good luck Mr President!! We stand with you. Build the Wall!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Good luck Mr President!! We stand with you. Build the Wall!!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
The promise was that “Mexico will pay for the wall”.
BUILD THE WALL..WHATEVER IT TAKES! #KAG
BUILD THE WALL..WHATEVER IT TAKES! #KAG
Baron Von Brztekkenburg depends on who you asked!  Border patrol agents say YES to WALL
Trump will have to confront one of the biggest challenges in building support for his wall: The people who live on the border say there is no national emergency and they don’t want a wall.  https://truthout.org/articles/mayor-of-texas-border-town-trumps-wall-is-pointless/Mayor of Texas Border Town: There is No Crisis Here, Trump's Wall is Pointlesstruthout.org
Americans would regret not building their border wall in future. Just like Nigeria is regretting,  If the wall is not built on time , Americans would loose control over the immigrants and the only escape would be to run away, just like few people who survived the massacre in northern Nigeria deserted their homes. Now the people who are playing politics with these immigrants would loose their control over them, just like it happened in Nigeria.
Americans would regret not building their border wall in future. Just like Nigeria is regretting,  If the wall is not built on time , Americans would loose control over the immigrants and the only escape would be to run away, just like few people who survived the massacre in northern Nigeria deserted their homes. Now the people who are playing politics with these immigrants would loose their control over them, just like it happened in Nigeria.
Not true. https://www.cbsnews.com/news/views-on-southern-border-wall-have-been-consistent-since-trump-became-president/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62105165
May they choose wisely. #BuildTheWall
Hold the line, Mr. President! Thank you!
Americans want their money.
I think you should take a cue from Syria Mr President
Bringing Back MANUFACTURING!  ( as in, crisis on our borders)
Oh, NOW we understand why you had this bogus distraction "address" tonight.  Better get a real lawyer this time, Dippy Donnie!!  https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2019-01-08/manafort-denies-intentionally-lying-to-mueller-investigatorsMueller Suspects Manafort Gave 2016 Polling Data to Russianbloomberg.com
Democrats are unable to think straight , because they are off the latch, since we elected President Trump. Sick of the lot of them.  But........I just love PRESIDENT TRUMP!! Keep up the Great WORK S I R!!!!!
President looked weak last night. When you are coming from a strong position you don’t have to justify yourself. He convinced me last night the wall is MORE worthless and pointless than it was on Monday.
It is just not about Trump..it is against the electors of Trump they are after. The left is of one mind..Trump or someone like him is to never be elected again
Trumptards are so gullable. They'll believe any bullshit Donathon tells them.
Pelosi: Approves over 30 billion in foreign aid. No outrage. Pelosi and Chucky: Displays her ignorance and snubs protecting her constituents. Liberals blame Trump. Sounds legit.
Can't you write an executive order and make it concrete we don't want a fence!
Democrats want border security!
Your not worth the time to even waste your one big lie after other soon you will be gone just out collusion has been found you are a trader and you know what the penalty is for traders
Pay for it yourself you love to brag how rich you are and your trumpanzes will build it. Problem solved. Move on
It’s all about stopping trump at all cost
How about putting people back to work
Yes we want border security.   But a "wall"  won't do it. It's a childish solution to a complex problem.
Yes we want border security.   But a "wall"  won't do it. It's a childish solution to a complex problem.
Providence Rhode Island is a war zone!
Please build the wall! The steal wall will require much more costly maintenance in the future and will be easier to penetrate v’s concrete.
https://www.governorpalin.org/2019/01/07/gop-democrats-passed-full-funding-border-wall-jordan/?fbclid=IwAR1iRAR7L-3C4-Pghp3ds4fLvIoAO9U_l6WTSJqe4W3CXrVz5KqqPT51yRE.     Why are we funding walls in other countries, but GOP and Democrats refuse to fund one on our border ?
We voted for them for one reason and one reason ONLY!!! TO STOP TRUMP!
Shut it down until we get the wall
Efficient security , not a monument of your ego.
DO WHAT YOU HAVE TO DO MR. PRESIDENT!!!  National Emergency Option!!!
"...another one of my promises...?"  What happened "Promises made, Promises Kept?"  Which is it Mr. President?
I stand by you president Trump 100%.
No they don't.  Only your cultist do and they are  un-Merican
Go get em tiger... We expect NO LESS. If they don't play nice, do what you gotta do within your powers. Just letting you know, on a personal level...  This LEGAL CUBAN IMMIGRANT REFUGEE is proud of you and proud of MY RED, WHITE AND BLUE.   God bless the troops, God bless you and yours and may God FOREVER bless the USA...  Home of the free, BECAUSE of the BRAVE!  Donald J. Trump
I recently asked my Mexican friend how his relatives back home felt about a wall being built. He said they will get over it.
I'm ready to hunt down these Shapeshifting Reptilians kill em all!!!!
Maury Masalin we are going to let you pay for it😜
You promised Mexico was going to pay for the wall......
After the great negotiator failed to get mexico to pay for the wall, how did he fail got get funding when he had all three branches of govt? LOL
With that atrocious grammar yes, i'd say she watches judge Jeanie because judge Jeanie talks like a crazy Puerto Rican woman from the Bronx. I don't believe she ever graduated law school, she can't even conjugate a sentence.
Well you also promised better heath care. You also promised Mexico would pay For the wall.
God Bless our President Donald J. Trump..God Bless our Border Walls..Goe Bless all who stand and protect our United States Constitution and its Citizens!
Well, Mr. President, where Schumer and Pelosi are concerned, the first thing I think of is that there is no GLORY for them in sitting down and working together with you for a secure BORDER.   And that is important to them. They prefer to draw the line in the sand...they are stronger within the Democrat Party when they can work against you, and, for sure, they aren't interested in your ability to fulfill promises...just the opposite.  🇺🇲🙏Stand your ground...for AMERICA!  God Bless You!
Well, Mr. President, where Schumer and Pelosi are concerned, the first thing I think of is that there is no GLORY for them in sitting down and working together with you for a secure BORDER.   And that is important to them. They prefer to draw the line in the sand...they are stronger within the Democrat Party when they can work against you, and, for sure, they aren't interested in your ability to fulfill promises...just the opposite.  🇺🇲🙏Stand your ground...for AMERICA!  God Bless You!
Since when was the border ever insecure...stop making a problem that doesnt exist just to make a buck for yourself
Larry Boydston a wall won’t stop the drugs.🤦🏼‍♂️
Kevin Carlson is that you Obama
Patricia Murphy-Dailey so it’s NOT about protecting us from terrorists?
Patricia Murphy-Dailey looks to me like you want to discriminate.🤷🏼‍♂️
Kevin Carlson  Perhaps it us their neediness & connection to drug & human trafficking.
Build a wall on only one border. Looks to me like you don’t like the people on the other side, or why wouldn’t you build it on the Canada side too? You and your followers are motivated by the color of those on the other side of the wall you wish to build.
Polls say building that wall is not that important to Americas
Make a poll!! Post the link on twitter and have a honest to god poll right here on fb!!  👍 👍
They were for it until you wanted it and so now they are against it so hang tough we still want the wall no matter what
They were for it until you wanted it and so now they are against it so hang tough we still want the wall no matter what
Dems want trump out. Can’t stand the truth. They lost
>>FLASH~ALERT<<  BUILD THE SOUTHERN BORDER DEFENSE BARRIER!!!  BUILD THE WALL!!!
>>FLASH~ALERT<<  BUILD THE SOUTHERN BORDER DEFENSE BARRIER!!!  BUILD THE WALL!!!
Hey #Shit4Brains we have border security, we haven’t been invaded in almost 100 years
...  I 100% support President Trump. I offer no apology for what I am posting, for this is truly how I feel. This is my opinion, not a debate. If you disagree, or find my position offensive, I am perfectly fine with that. Feel free to unfriend me if we cannot agree to disagree. I wont debate or argue my beliefs. I have lived through several United States Presidents prior to our current President Trump. In my lifetime, I have never seen nor heard of a President scrutinized over every word he speaks, humiliated by the public to the point of disgrace, slandered, ridiculed, insulted, lied to/about, threatened with death, had his wife and our First Lady disrespected, and his minor child insulted, threatened and harassed.  I am ashamed and saddened by the ruthless, meanspirited, hateful, cruel, biased people who display themselves as having no civic pride, morals, ethics, decency or respect for our country's traditions and values. My elders and teachers taught me many years ago to respect our President, whether I voted for them or not. All the news stations and reporters who feel they have the right to perpetuate blatent lies and fabricate "facts" for a "good story" are dividing our country beyond belief. Many only report the negative "news" and never the accomplishments of our President. If people do not research everything put out by the MSM, they are left to believe all the hate mongering news. This is leading to so much intolerance that I feel we are nearing the brink of a civil war! No other President that took the oath of office, has been on the news 24/7, scrutinized for their every word, facial expression, decision, handshake, what he eats... NO, he is not perfect, far from it! No President or person is, including you and I!!!!! Yes, he makes stupid comments and doesn't use the flowery language of a "professional politician". However, I believe he truly loves the United States of America and works tirelessly to make things better for us all. He is very different than what we've become accustomed to, thank goodness. The people who would rather see our country fail than help him do his job need to stop. I was always taught "If you can't be part of the solution then at least don't be part of the problem". I personally want our President Donald Trump, as I did his predecessors, to succeed. To hope for failure is INSANE. United we stand; divided we fall!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 COPY AND PASTE IF YOU'RE SICK OF IT TOO!
...  I 100% support President Trump. I offer no apology for what I am posting, for this is truly how I feel. This is my opinion, not a debate. If you disagree, or find my position offensive, I am perfectly fine with that. Feel free to unfriend me if we cannot agree to disagree. I wont debate or argue my beliefs. I have lived through several United States Presidents prior to our current President Trump. In my lifetime, I have never seen nor heard of a President scrutinized over every word he speaks, humiliated by the public to the point of disgrace, slandered, ridiculed, insulted, lied to/about, threatened with death, had his wife and our First Lady disrespected, and his minor child insulted, threatened and harassed.  I am ashamed and saddened by the ruthless, meanspirited, hateful, cruel, biased people who display themselves as having no civic pride, morals, ethics, decency or respect for our country's traditions and values. My elders and teachers taught me many years ago to respect our President, whether I voted for them or not. All the news stations and reporters who feel they have the right to perpetuate blatent lies and fabricate "facts" for a "good story" are dividing our country beyond belief. Many only report the negative "news" and never the accomplishments of our President. If people do not research everything put out by the MSM, they are left to believe all the hate mongering news. This is leading to so much intolerance that I feel we are nearing the brink of a civil war! No other President that took the oath of office, has been on the news 24/7, scrutinized for their every word, facial expression, decision, handshake, what he eats... NO, he is not perfect, far from it! No President or person is, including you and I!!!!! Yes, he makes stupid comments and doesn't use the flowery language of a "professional politician". However, I believe he truly loves the United States of America and works tirelessly to make things better for us all. He is very different than what we've become accustomed to, thank goodness. The people who would rather see our country fail than help him do his job need to stop. I was always taught "If you can't be part of the solution then at least don't be part of the problem". I personally want our President Donald Trump, as I did his predecessors, to succeed. To hope for failure is INSANE. United we stand; divided we fall!! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 COPY AND PASTE IF YOU'RE SICK OF IT TOO!
The government shutdown is your fault Trump, you said you would own it. So own it! You can't pass the buck on this one!
They rather have Americans suffer  and not appear weak to stop the president from looking good to voters
If you found a cure for cancer they would oppose it.
Dems are babies!!  The politicians and the voters. They cry and whine when they don’t get their way. We raised 20million!  That means we want the wall. We want immigrants, just not illegal ones!!
,I'm announcing my candidacy for President in 2020 Looking for a VP She has to be hot.. Mckinnon/ ??? 2020 #MASA Maake America Sexy Again.
We all want border security. But only 30% want a wall. Funny thing...30%..is also the amount of Americans diagnosed with delusions.
Maybe all that win win they lose is the problem.
Maybe all that win win they lose is the problem.
No! Americans want you to get hit by a truck!
Did he just say, Democrats aren’t Americans??
Flood the tunnels too... Then work on airport security and other means of entry.  And do not forget those who have overstayed their visa.
I want border security just not a worthless pointless wall. A 10 mile moat would work better anyway
Stay strong President Trump. We the people are behind you!!  Build the Wall!!  Go gettem Trumpster!!
Praying for you!  Praying for America!
Wow the liberal comment never seen to amaze me🤦‍♀️ why are they so stupid and brainwashed? Like honestly!!
Your own propaganda machine!  Fox News. Also, wanting border security is not synonymous with a wall. Ff
They gave you funding for border security, just not a wall.
Why won't yall pay for the wall since you want the wall ? Its real simple
Yes we want the Wall built!!! Keep our country safe.
The Democrats are opposing the President ONLY BECAUSE they are just about obstruction!!!  THEY KNOW the Border needs a wall and security...see below:  https://www.facebook.com/redpillusa/videos/223178005279698/The Caucasian ManDemocrats: “Shiiiiiiiiieeeet”Play Video
I have friends and family in prison. If walls didn't work, they'd be out causing mischief.
Hold The Line Pres Trump !!!!! Do not back off !!!!!
open the government then talk immigration. Just because Trump promised a big beautiful wall doesn't mean he gets what he wants. He constantly lies about everything
Missed your speech, Donnie.  I was watching your girlfriend fold her clothes on Instagram.
AMERICANS WANT TRUMP IN PRISON FOR TREASON
Well that's a no brainier . Anything to stop Trump
Just say the word  Mr.President and we'll come down there and build it our Damn selves
I personally think you should let Democrats have this one, you’ll still get your wall built just you should surprise everyone & show the Democrats that you can bend but you won’t break
You tell them Trump! God bless the 45th. Our children and grandchildren will thank you. Make it big make it beautiful. #Trump2020  #BUILDTHEWALL
walls do work. the national numbers for people breaking into prisions hasnt risen in decades
walls do work. the national numbers for people breaking into prisions hasnt risen in decades
Donald Trump never had a majority to support him. All polls say he is lying and the majority of Americans don’t think we need or want a wall.
Donald Trump never had a majority to support him. All polls say he is lying and the majority of Americans don’t think we need or want a wall.
If Trump thinks Mexico will pay, tell him to keep up all the records of the so-called money we are getting from Mexico and when it gets to $5.8 billion, he can show Congress and get the wall built.
The odds makers are taking bets on how many times Trump will lie tonight. http://www.nydailynews.com/news/politics/ny-pol-trump-lies-gambling-speech-odds-35-bet-20190108-story.html
Good old Fox - straight from Trump's playbook....fabricated numbers, lies, twisted logic & putting false words in peoples' mouths....I expect Trump to spew Fox's rhetoric in this lie-filled article almost word for word (except pausing mid-sentence to repeat the bigger words & sniff)...what a maroon...
Mexico isn't gonna pay for his vanity project, it never was going to pay for it. Trump told a lie. Now Trump wants the US taxpayer to pay for his vanity project, and his supporters are so brain dead they aren't saying to Trump "You said on several occasions that Mexico would pay for the wall, not us!"
Scott Czeiszperger how about the wall or no paychecks for the demo rats 🐀
Travis Copsey I agree but they will never let that happen the least we can get out of it is our wall.
Travis Copsey I agree but they will never let that happen the least we can get out of it is our wall.
Scott Czeiszperger how about no foreign aid at all, we have enough people that need help in the us.
Don't give them a damn dime for foreign aid unless we get our wall.
Faux News!  Haha haha!  Also known as the Trump propaganda channel.
Democrats want to turn all of the common citizens of the world into slaves for the ruling global elite.
You have not kept your promise! You have not and collected the money from Mexico. The fact is, you and you alone are responsible for not finishing that wall. You had both houses and two years time mr. trump. The question is what stopped YOU, mr. trump, building the wall?
There is difference between border security and a wall. I fully support border security. There needs to be a compromise between all or nothing, a wall is a waste of resources. Right now we have TSA workers calling off putting our airports at risk. Any president who would do that doesnt care about security, he cares about an absurd campaign promise and power.
There is difference between border security and a wall. I fully support border security. There needs to be a compromise between all or nothing, a wall is a waste of resources. Right now we have TSA workers calling off putting our airports at risk. Any president who would do that doesnt care about security, he cares about an absurd campaign promise and power.
Wait, for a grand total of 1 promise kept? When does that check come in from mexico btw?
Mexico pays everyday because of tarrifs we get from them. That is what Trump meant
Mexico pays everyday because of tarrifs we get from them. That is what Trump meant
The wall should come as soon as Mexico pays for it...that was his campaign promise!
Judy Conrad  the cartels are a multi billion dollars even trillion dollar industry ... why because Americans feed off their drugs ..... it’s a drug epidemic here. If we ask for drugs they will supply. Going beyond that they have submarine, airplanes , hundreds of tunnels already in place, boats, drones, catapults... you think a wall is going to stop them from making trillions of dollars. Ha!
Chrisopher Hernandez,  What is the answer?
Duh! We all want border security but a dumb wall is not the answer .
Yes, Potus, Americans, all Americans want border security, just not an ineffective wall.  Your campaign promise was that Mexico would pay for the wall, which they aren't, so promise broken.  Now drop the wall and negotiate increased cbp personnel, technological defenses and other effective defenses.
A wall is not a COMPLETE immigration policy  which is what we need
I don't care who pays for the wall, we need it,
More LIES from adulterous, hateful, lying, inept, dense and very CORRUPT 45. OLD 45 promised that Mexico would pay for the  WALL. Polls show Americans want border security not ridiculous WALLS.
Incompetent 45 doesnt care that our national security is in big jeopardy today. The TSA agent arent getting paid and are calling out sick. Our airports where most of the terrorists and drugs come through are NOT secure due to CORRUPT 45s SHUTDOWN!  Adulterous 45 is a disgrace!
BUILD THE WALL STAND STRONG WE BACK YOU 100 % TRUMP
BUILD THE WALL STAND STRONG WE BACK YOU 100 % TRUMP
Border security yes.  Border wall no.  There is money in the House appropriation bill for border security including fencing.
"How I heard it:  Trump: "Let's spend a couple of bucks and fix the brakes on this car."  Schumer: "Brakes are ineffective at stopping cars!"  Pelosi: "We have more than enough money in the budget for body work after a crash! Besides, who cares about the people we might run over?"
We stand with President Trump! Build the wall!!
stormy daniels will be folding laundry in her underwear on instagram tonight for 8 minutes.
stormy daniels will be folding laundry in her underwear on instagram tonight for 8 minutes.
The cost to protect American lives is never to high.
The cost to protect American lives is never to high.
All NWO globalists/socialists hate the thought of America and our freedoms. Just never thought they're so many. Not to say IN OUR GOVERNMENT! WHAT THE HELL. PLEASE SAVE FREEDOM PRESIDENT TRUMP!
All NWO globalists/socialists hate the thought of America and our freedoms. Just never thought they're so many. Not to say IN OUR GOVERNMENT! WHAT THE HELL. PLEASE SAVE FREEDOM PRESIDENT TRUMP!
Stand tough!!!! We need this wall! It is better to pay 5 billion for a wall than 151billion to support them. We need security Now!!!!!
Stand tough!!!! We need this wall! It is better to pay 5 billion for a wall than 151billion to support them. We need security Now!!!!!
Buld the wall sorman and his orcs are coming the battle of middle earth begans 🌎😂😂
What's more important to YOU...Getting your way and screw all the little people or letting people work rather than throwing a tantrum
That's RIGHT! Keep that border CLOSED until the DemonRATS give in! That's OUR money they have HOSTAGE!!!
Trump is exposing communism in New Mexico and in California
The most important thing for Demonscrats is 2020 US Elections because there have no candidat so far and they need collectivly a lot attention to beat the actual president.
Yes we do President Trump We Want the Wall And We Want People To come Into Our Country The Right Way.. Thank you for Your Firm Position On The Wall.. Americans Are With You , We Stand With you And We Will Be Voting For You Again In 2020 Because YOU ARE THE BEST PRESIDENT EVER..!!!! #MAGA
Will not be tuning in tonight. Don't appreciate the president lying to us.
Will not be tuning in tonight. Don't appreciate the president lying to us.
This Massachusetts woman stands with President Trump and Border Security. Build the Wall. Thank you President Trump and God bless you.
This Massachusetts woman stands with President Trump and Border Security. Build the Wall. Thank you President Trump and God bless you.
Fact checkers are going to have a field day!!!!!!
Fact checkers are going to have a field day!!!!!!
I think deplorable fits. I mean, what better adjective is there for people who support a man who ran a sham charity?
Watching your speech tonight. China has a wall and it goes for miles. Democrats want 54 billion dollars in foreign aid, look how much money could be saved if we forget all this foreign aid and take 5 billion dollars to build a wall or strong fence. God told Nehimiah in the old testament to build a wall to protect Jerusalem. Several years back the Democrats wanted better border security and a wall.
Watching your speech tonight. China has a wall and it goes for miles. Democrats want 54 billion dollars in foreign aid, look how much money could be saved if we forget all this foreign aid and take 5 billion dollars to build a wall or strong fence. God told Nehimiah in the old testament to build a wall to protect Jerusalem. Several years back the Democrats wanted better border security and a wall.
Mr. President...furlough the DEMOCRATS AND REPUBLICANS PAY CHECK AND THEN YOU WILL HAVE THE $5 BILLION FOR BODER PATROL IN 45 MINUTES...as an essential government Employee I need my pay check...thank you and you right our border needs to be SECURED 😡😡😡
ask me why people #walkaway would be glad to have a conversation.
The people voted for a wall they want the wall, Build that Wall!
The people voted for a wall they want the wall, Build that Wall!
More people voted against him. Gerrymandering should be a crime.
What's more important to you Donald J. Trump? Serving the country or lining your pockets? And your supporters? A healthy nation based on the concept of human rights, or propping up this failed businessman's latest scam?
It is nice to hear from the President.🇺🇸️
It is nice to hear from the President.🇺🇸️
You're the man Mr . President..stay the course..we want the wall..keep the government shut down until we get the wall..the Democrats only care about their own agenda..not the American people's safety and welfare..Thank you for all the great work you are doing for our beloved Nation..MAGA
Hey pussy-grab, remember that time you told us Mexico was going to pay for the wall?  Was that "fake news"?
Hey pussy-grab, remember that time you told us Mexico was going to pay for the wall?  Was that "fake news"?
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall so I suggest you ask them. Democrats aren't stopping you from getting you tiny Dick monument, they just aren't going to allow the Murikan taxpayer to cover the cost
Watching a couple of the most bizarre people I have ever had to listen to, trying to convince the American people that they are the good guys.   Pelosi was certainly ineffective in convincing me.    Watching them, it was hard not to notice how hard they were trying, but as a mom, they looked more like a couple of little kids trying to talk their way out of trouble.  The body language was almost funny if it were not so scary to know they are part of our government.    Pelosi seemed to need her big brother standing there.  Like they think there is a chance that two of them outnumbers Trump.  Lol.  Watching her face, wow.  She looked she wanted to bust out screaming like a bratty child who is not getting her way and Somebody better pay attention to her and do what she says.    Chuck? well, he was there.
Watching a couple of the most bizarre people I have ever had to listen to, trying to convince the American people that they are the good guys.   Pelosi was certainly ineffective in convincing me.    Watching them, it was hard not to notice how hard they were trying, but as a mom, they looked more like a couple of little kids trying to talk their way out of trouble.  The body language was almost funny if it were not so scary to know they are part of our government.    Pelosi seemed to need her big brother standing there.  Like they think there is a chance that two of them outnumbers Trump.  Lol.  Watching her face, wow.  She looked she wanted to bust out screaming like a bratty child who is not getting her way and Somebody better pay attention to her and do what she says.    Chuck? well, he was there.
Americans want you out of office.... then truly America will be great again
They want open borders and high taxes.
You promised Mexico was going to pay....about 1000 times, you are breaking a promise you dimwit.
You promised Mexico was going to pay....about 1000 times, you are breaking a promise you dimwit.
😂🤣😂🤣😂🤣😂 Fox "news"??? Fox "news"??? Literally the definition of #fakenews!! 😅😅😅
😂🤣😂🤣😂🤣😂 Fox "news"??? Fox "news"??? Literally the definition of #fakenews!! 😅😅😅
“AUTHORITIES ALONG U.S., MEXICO BORDER FIND TUNNEL WITH RAIL SYSTEM, SOLAR-POWERED LIGHTING UNDER CALIFORNIA”  https://www.newsweek.com/mexico-us-border-drug-tunnel-jacumba-underground-wall-trump-solar-power-train-1162022?fbclid=IwAR33ulk8eamsMY_misR1iaMnZrE2zB5R5jD4lAFyRRWwhnLdC_CH8rgBvaU
Border security can be achieved without a wall.  #dotard
STAND WITH US AND HAVE THOSE REPUBLICANS DO THE THE SAME. Don't let the Democrats make them a deal for them. You make the deal.
What’s more important to the Republicans ? You couldn’t even do it with them
What’s more important to the Republicans ? You couldn’t even do it with them
I can't speak for the Democrats, but I know what's more important to me. Getting you out of office. Immediately!
I can't speak for the Democrats, but I know what's more important to me. Getting you out of office. Immediately!
Clint Waite Where'd you get that statistic?  You might want to go back to school.
BUILD THE WALL! 100% of America agrees sir  #trump2020 🇺🇸
BUILD THE WALL! 100% of America agrees sir  #trump2020 🇺🇸
He said it right there at the top: fulfilling a campaign promise which is nothing more than red meat to his base. His address tonight will be nothing more than untruths and misinformation. A manufactured crisis because right wing pundits called him out. Nothing more.
It would be nice if you had this guy with you, but if not, I think you should let people know about this.  https://www.foxnews.com/us/walls-work-says-arizona-sheriff-who-claims-crime-dropped-by-91-percent-thanks-to-border-fence
It would be nice if you had this guy with you, but if not, I think you should let people know about this.  https://www.foxnews.com/us/walls-work-says-arizona-sheriff-who-claims-crime-dropped-by-91-percent-thanks-to-border-fence
Oops. LMFAO. You know you're going to tell more lies tonight. https://www.cbsnews.com/news/views-on-southern-border-wall-have-been-consistent-since-trump-became-president/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62105165
Oops. LMFAO. You know you're going to tell more lies tonight. https://www.cbsnews.com/news/views-on-southern-border-wall-have-been-consistent-since-trump-became-president/?ftag=CNM-00-10aab6a&linkId=62105165
No, you just want hold everybody hostage to get your way when over 70 % of the people don't want it!
No, you just want hold everybody hostage to get your way when over 70 % of the people don't want it!
I loved the speech.!  Very personal and professional and too the point.   Very good !
I loved the speech.!  Very personal and professional and too the point.   Very good !
Bullshit people are not getting paid !! That's  ur priority!!
Well Mexico kinda kept you from fulfilling that promise whether it gets built or not sooo...
Well Mexico kinda kept you from fulfilling that promise whether it gets built or not sooo...
So proud of our Great President. Thank you President Trump for everything you are doing. TRUMP 2020.
So proud of our Great President. Thank you President Trump for everything you are doing. TRUMP 2020.
Can I share this if I quote you? Freaking brilliant.
Can I share this if I quote you? Freaking brilliant.

Of course Americans want border security. That's like saying people want sunshine and happiness. Duh! The thing is, we're a 200 year old country--if we didn't already figure out how to secure our borders, we wouldn't be here. This is a made-up problem---anyone with common sense can see that!
Of course Americans want border security. That's like saying people want sunshine and happiness. Duh! The thing is, we're a 200 year old country--if we didn't already figure out how to secure our borders, we wouldn't be here. This is a made-up problem---anyone with common sense can see that!
How embarrassing and humiliating it must be to be a Democrat.
The DemoncRats don’t want you to fulfill your promises.  They know they are finished and their last resort  is you to fail the American people by not letting you build the wall.... 🙏🏼GOD BLESSED A❤️ERICA!🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020 #BUILDTHEWALL
The DemoncRats don’t want you to fulfill your promises.  They know they are finished and their last resort  is you to fail the American people by not letting you build the wall.... 🙏🏼GOD BLESSED A❤️ERICA!🇺🇸 #TRUMP2020 #BUILDTHEWALL
More than TWENTY-FIVE TIMES, President Donald J. Trump demanded a government shutdown in an attempt to force the American people to fund an expensive, ineffective border wall he promised Mexico would pay for. #TrumpShutdown
They care more about importing new dependent voters because Americans don’t agree with their policy.
They care more about importing new dependent voters because Americans don’t agree with their policy.
Better look at real polls not those fake news polls.  https://www.google.com/amp/s/thehill.com/homenews/administration/423099-poll-majorities-oppose-trumps-wall-funding-demand-call-for-compromise%3famp
You need to emphasize how many people are waiting in line do it legally,  is it fair to let them in and basically say to bad so sad to the ones doing it the right way.
You need to emphasize how many people are waiting in line do it legally,  is it fair to let them in and basically say to bad so sad to the ones doing it the right way.
Definitely  build the wall.This is something that should have been done years ago.With you 100% President  Trump
R Doug Harner that’s different.   They just like to  cry and moan about anything and everything.   They are total morons.
I just dont understand whats why so much resistance. Wasnt this Obamas canidate promise?
BUILD THE WALL!!!!!! WE'RE WITH YOU MR. PRESIDENT.
Let the people vote!! As it should be!!
Border security is needed, they are only stopping because its President Trump . All of those who voted for the Democratic’s I hope , you can sleep at night knowing what’s going on at our southern border.
President trump your the man build the wall and make sure your name is on it
Stand your ground! It’s time the people goes to Washington and starts a protest for Trump and the Wall!
Stand your ground! It’s time the people goes to Washington and starts a protest for Trump and the Wall!
It’s us about time that we have a president that keeps his promise and put Americans FIRST
It’s us about time that we have a president that keeps his promise and put Americans FIRST
I don’t  understand why people and the Democratics are so against our President, it about time democrats wake and smell the coffee. Which I think they don’t.  This is a personal issue in which they are not strong enough to fight it in a clean way. Everybody voted for the damm bother. Whey is the problem now.? Is it because is Mr. Trump, or what.  Pososi and Schumer are such hiprocrits that they don’t believe their own s......t.
President Trump they are breaking the law not protecting our country like they said they would when they took the oath
WE all want border security but it has been found that cyber and other forms of security are more effective.  Please allow the immigrants who need our protection in.  We have get boarder security agents.  Get more of them.  Thanks and Blessings,
True Democrat idiocy.  Cussing always works. Lol
A wall is not the answer. Did you forget about all the tunnels?
Why build dig a trench instead
Why build dig a trench instead
Build the wall ,God bless America.
WE want the wall the Dem are in office to vote for what's best for Americans not act like kids pulling a fit because  they want everything there  way
Secure the Border ..look at Europe!!
I’ll tell you what’s more important to me. And why I voted for you. Healthcare.
Just watched your address to the nation. Hang tough Mr. President. We support the wall!
Just watched your address to the nation. Hang tough Mr. President. We support the wall!
Do you need dinero for the wall ? I will give you some .
How about telling the dems ur releasing the names of all the people in congress who paid hush money for their affairs
God bless you #POTUS. Stay strong and keep Americ safe. The 🙏🙏🙏
There are a lot more likes than negative comments. The silent majority supports Trump and the Wall.
There are a lot more likes than negative comments. The silent majority supports Trump and the Wall.
Maybe Democrats like drug dealers &  criminal than others,
Your shutting off their stream of voters
President Trump. You should remind the American citizens of the word Propaganda when describing the news media. Not all Americans believe their Propaganda
President Trump. You should remind the American citizens of the word Propaganda when describing the news media. Not all Americans believe their Propaganda
I've toured the border with CBP agents, and you know what they first showed me? THE TUNNELS. But no, let's throw money away on a useless deterrent to non-violent people....
Gonna have a lot of pissed off Americans if you keep up with shutdown, can't take foodstamps away from those who are in need of it. A lot of the American people who are on food assistance for their kids and WIC are going to be against you! This is uncalled for. And you can't expect people to work for free! #justsaying
Stand strong Mr President build the wall
We need to build border wall for Americans security
Mr. President, you said that Mexico would have to pay for the wall. How about we take foreign aid money from Mexico, Honduras, Nicaragua, El Salvador, etc. and fund that wall. Why do we continue to provide aid to countries who won't take care of their own people.
Help  people  Sudan  don't  the ferydam
Tell them to give their paychecks to those that are not getting paid!
I am not in favor of constructing a border wall, but you aren't interested in my opinion or representing me as an American. You only seem interested in representing your "base." Weren't you elected to represent ALL the people?
#BUILDTHEWALL get rid of democrat puke and upchuck.
#BUILDTHEWALL get rid of democrat puke and upchuck.
They were born on the wrong side of the wall , that doesn't make them monsters. #John_Snow
Now I still feel messed up a little bit because me and my accident lawyer he got his third he gave me a thousand and hold back nine thousand he said well when we get the lien they don't see how much I can give you a lot of that well tomorrow yeah I'm going to have a naturally address for him too because he's going to have to cut a check he's going to give Medicaid that lean is going to be 500 he's giving me the rest of my money I
I cant believe how delusional Pelosi and Schumer are, Mr President shut down the boarder completely now.
Build the wall out of doors and fence from the properties of the people who don't want the wall apparently they feel safe
Build the wall out of doors and fence from the properties of the people who don't want the wall apparently they feel safe
Forgot in message above Citizens from way before the Flag and for the Flag Simper Fi. Always
Forgot in message above Citizens from way before the Flag and for the Flag Simper Fi. Always
And as soon as you finish your State address they couldn't wait to talk so bad about you it's sad it's truly truly sad they would rather be more happier seeing you and she'll and Miss Miller case if I was you I'll keep the government shut the hell down and I can throw away the key to the courts
Patrick Odell back where
Go back then easy solution
I was so disappointed, rejected at the SA embassy yesterday.  I wanted to visit Disneyland!! How bad is that your staff rejected me???? You humiliated me, I lost all respect for USA now  so disappointed. Lady judged me in a 10 second interview. Australia beats your country.  Cant believe it
Janice Leigh Schroder God Does not condone murder by aliens that are hateful illrgals
I even saw a Mexican as young as 19 crying because she couldnt get home. God owns the world, not you Mr Trump. I'm not a drug addict, I just wanted to see Disneyland for goodness sakes
Who are Trumps advisors? Red neck niki, K.K. Klint, Ivor deal ?
Who are Trumps advisors? Red neck niki, K.K. Klint, Ivor deal ?
GOD GOT HIS HAND ON YOUR HEART, BUILD THE WALL, PROTECT AMERICA!!🙏🙏
PLEASE DO WHAT YOU HAVE TO DO AS SOON AS POSSIBLE. The people are waiting. Don't let the fake news media impress you - they lie (as always - "as printed"). We are the people!  And WE ARE THE STATE --> monopoly of violence!!!
PLEASE DO WHAT YOU HAVE TO DO AS SOON AS POSSIBLE. The people are waiting. Don't let the fake news media impress you - they lie (as always - "as printed"). We are the people!  And WE ARE THE STATE --> monopoly of violence!!!
Proud of the resolve of this President
Have you heard of things called tunnels Donald? Or, how about ladders?
The only true way forward is together. A strong future is built on the backs of many and no part in it is any less important than the other. We will get there together Mr. President!
I just called 800.350.6647 to support President Trump on the wall
I am not a Trump fan. I am Democrat 💯 and will be voting that way in 2020. If someone can show me some data showing the walls effectiveness and that the 5.6/7 billion he is requesting will achieve that effectiveness I will support the wall. I do not want Trump to fail. I don’t care who is in office. I want our president to succeed and make this country better. I do not support open borders as a lot of Republicans have said. I am very aware that we cannot take everyone in and still be able to take care of ourselves. I know we need to have a limit. I do care about America despite what Republicans think. If Trump has a lasting positive impact for this country then I will be glad he represented America. It is very sad to see this country so divided. Democrats are just as much involved in this shut down as Republicans. Neither side is willing to compromise. I hope a compromise can come soon so Trump can prove me wrong and maybe change my mind in not voting for him in 2020.
I am not a Trump fan. I am Democrat 💯 and will be voting that way in 2020. If someone can show me some data showing the walls effectiveness and that the 5.6/7 billion he is requesting will achieve that effectiveness I will support the wall. I do not want Trump to fail. I don’t care who is in office. I want our president to succeed and make this country better. I do not support open borders as a lot of Republicans have said. I am very aware that we cannot take everyone in and still be able to take care of ourselves. I know we need to have a limit. I do care about America despite what Republicans think. If Trump has a lasting positive impact for this country then I will be glad he represented America. It is very sad to see this country so divided. Democrats are just as much involved in this shut down as Republicans. Neither side is willing to compromise. I hope a compromise can come soon so Trump can prove me wrong and maybe change my mind in not voting for him in 2020.
Thanks stay strong do not give in to two people that have no yes no common sense and treat us common folk like we are ignorant as to what they are doing I support you be strong.!!
Thanks stay strong do not give in to two people that have no yes no common sense and treat us common folk like we are ignorant as to what they are doing I support you be strong.!!
Hang in there, Mr. President!  We know that the Democreeps are motivated only by their own self interest (sadly!)
Hang in there, Mr. President!  We know that the Democreeps are motivated only by their own self interest (sadly!)
Why is the wall so important? Criminals will find away to get in like dig a tunnel. Oh wait they already do that.
Our family is with you Mr. Trump stand firm and keep standing up for our country we are proud to have you as our President.
Mr, President, Why do you not cut the pay of all of Cogress and take away all the perks they receive as a member of Congress, then perhaps they will see the light !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Very proud of you Mr. President stay strong
Seems people do not understand the objective. The objective is to STOP people from crossing the border illegally. The objective is not catch and release like we do in sport fishing. The only electronic method that would stop illegal crossing would be drones programmed to shoot and kill. Building a wall is far more humane.
Stay Strong!! I am an former Air Force wife and live in Texas. I want the wall. If the Dem want to drag this out, so be it. Sad, but not surprised.
We can/could have better border security.  We do not require a wall of concrete or steel.  Double ICE's budget, hire more BPA, crack down hard on illegal employment of aliens, add lawyers to challenge sanctuary cities...  My God, I could put $5b to much better use!!!
We need to build one like the Germans did.
This has to be one of Manford’s Russian Facebook tied Facebook pages
Stand with the truth! Build our wall!
Stand with the truth! Build our wall!
Build the wall don't give in the 25% thats shut down we haven't even missed.
Build that wall Mr. President, thank you!
You promised Mexico would pay for the wall.
Thank you President Trump for your Oval Office address.  Maybe a national crisis needs to be called.  This nonsense resistence towards you and your administration  is a disgrace to our nation.  Please do not give in to Chuck and Nancy. Thank you and God bless!
Thank you President Trump for your Oval Office address.  Maybe a national crisis needs to be called.  This nonsense resistence towards you and your administration  is a disgrace to our nation.  Please do not give in to Chuck and Nancy. Thank you and God bless!
But please help me with money buddy I've been on your side the whole time
Build the wall president trump! Keep up the good work
Build the wall president trump! Keep up the good work
Mr President, I do agree we need to secure our borders, but we need to build a smart wall not a wall like China built 2000 years ago and it was useless. Sensors, heat cameras, drones, AI, etc - not bricks... c’mon!
Border security is very important.  However, the method proposed should be questioned. One cannot successfully resolve a 21st century problem with 5th century technology(wall). One only needs to look back in history....The Maginot Wall....built by the French in the 1930s  to prevent German invasion.  We all know how that went.
Funny how the media quickly side with Democrats 100% need the wall. These families women and children can easily come over legally and get visa and go through process like all the legal immigrants from Mexico.
I'd rather pay for a wall then all the benefits we pay out #buildthewall#standstrongamerica
I'd rather pay for a wall then all the benefits we pay out #buildthewall#standstrongamerica
If you do not have money, use the Mexicans to build the wall. You could pay them with a green card...
E-Verify. Stop hiring illigals. Fine businesses who hire them. Put Americans first. Stop the feebees. And yes, how about a double wall with a solid dirt road between them so border control can do their job.
"That is power, the mob is Rome. And while Commodus controls them he controls everything."
Thanks Mr president build the wall!!!!!
Americans want their tax refund check.... 😝
Thank you Mr President.  Stand your ground and please keep fighting for us.  #Trump2020
Please president Trump help us I hope you get the money you ask for from Congress for the wall and end this government shutdowns
Why do the Congress and Senate still get paid with the govt shutdown?  Take away their pay just like everyone else and see how fast things get done.
Just assuming, most of these comments aren’t coming from those on furlough or those working and not getting paid. Please go to your bosses and tell them you won’t accept a paycheck until the shutdown has ended. Let me see how many of the base reacts after you can’t pay your bills because he can’t have a wall. Kind of like if you don’t play the football game the way I want I’ll take my ball and go home. Kidsey stuff.
1. Walls don’t work. Illegal immigrants have tunneled underneath and/or erected ramps up and down walls to simply drive over them. People find a way. When East Germany erected its wall, it created a military zone, staffed by booted, machine-gun carrying guards ready to shoot to kill. Yet thousands managed to make it to West Germany anyway. More to the point, do we really want to model ourselves after communist East Germany?  2. Most illegal immigrants are “overstayers.” They come to the US legally — for vacations, business, to study, etc. — and then STAY past their visas. By 2012, overstayers accounted for 58% (THE MAJORITY!) of all unauthorized immigrants. A wall is meaningless here!  3. Walls have little impact on drugs being brought in to the US. According to the DEA, almost all drugs come in through legal points of entry, hidden in secret containers and/or among legit goods in tractor-trailers. A wall will have little to no impact on the influx of drugs into our country.  4. It’s environmentally impractical. Walls have a hard time making it through extreme weather. For example, in 2011, a flood in Arizona washed away 40 feet of STEEL fencing. Torrential rains and raging waters do serious damage. Also, conservative sources generally do not address the environmental harm that walls create, but there is plenty of documentation available that show its potential for irreparable damage to both plant and animal life.  5. A wall would forces the U.S. government to take land from private citizens in eminent domain battles. Private citizens own much of the land slated for the wall. The costs of the government snatching private land — and the legal battles that would ensue — are incalculable.  6. Border patrol agents don’t like concrete or steel walls because they block surveillance capabilities. In other words, they can’t mobilize correctly to meet challenges. So in many ways, a wall makes their job more difficult.  7. Border patrol agents say, “Walls are meaningless without agents and technology to back them up.” Are we prepared to pour countless billions annually — after the wall is built — to create a nearly 2,000 mile, militarized 24-hour surveillance border operation? Because according to patrol agents, that’s the only way a wall would work. Again, are we really, going to use East Germany, a brutal communist state, as our model here?  Are we seriously going to model ourselves on East Germany and their wall? A 1979 celebration in E. Berlin. 8. Where walls have been built, there was “no discernable impact on the influx of unauthorized aliens.” In other words, they came in elsewhere, primarily where natural barriers such as water or mountainous regions precluded a wall.  9. An unintended consequence is that a wall blocks farmworkers from EXITING when their invaluable seasonal work is done. Farmers are against the wall because it makes getting cheap seasonal labor almost impossible as few American citizens want or can even do those jobs. And if seasonal worker do get in, a wall makes it harder for them to leave! A wall traps migrant farm laborers in our country.  10. Trump’s $5 billion is a laughable drop in the bucket for what would ACTUALLY be needed. For example, according to the Cato Institute: An estimate for a border wall area that only covered 700 miles was originally 1.2 billion. How much did it REALLY cost? SEVEN BILLION. And that’s only for 700 miles. Whatever we think it’s going to cost, experience shows us we have to multiply it by more than 500%.  11. According to MIT engineers, the wall would cost $31.2 billion. Homeland Security estimates it at $22 billion. Given the pattern of spending mentioned in number 10 (plus Murphy’s Law), that means we’re really talking about pouring endless billions into something that doesn’t even work. And, of course, we taxpayers will be footing the bill, not Mexico. Given all the drawbacks, is that REALLY the best use of our taxes?  As the conservatives of the Cato Institute put it, “President Trump’s wall would be a mammoth expenditure that would have little impact on illegal immigration.” (Emphasis mine) Also it would create many “direct harms:” “the spending, the taxes, the eminent domain abuse, and the decrease in immigrant’s freedoms of movement.”
They don't fulfill campaign promises Mr president...they don't want you fulfilling campaign promises......
Americans  want our republic  restored, we want to regain our sovereignty reinstate our constitution and Bill of rights.  We want the united states cooperation  destroyed,  we want the criminal Federal Reserve banking cartel abolished and  our currency  returned to a value backed system.  We want the 97 percent of federal government agencies that have no right to exist under the constitution gone.  We want the traitors arrested.  The wall is  just a minor issue of  what Americans want.
Americans  want our republic  restored, we want to regain our sovereignty reinstate our constitution and Bill of rights.  We want the united states cooperation  destroyed,  we want the criminal Federal Reserve banking cartel abolished and  our currency  returned to a value backed system.  We want the 97 percent of federal government agencies that have no right to exist under the constitution gone.  We want the traitors arrested.  The wall is  just a minor issue of  what Americans want.
No they don’t! Only your supporters do!
THANK YOU MR PRESIDENT,  WE NEED THE WALL.
THANK YOU MR PRESIDENT,  WE NEED THE WALL.
The majority do not want a wall border security yes.  You are suppose to be governing for the majority
Neither.  The Democrats want to avoid a useless  project
Neither.  The Democrats want to avoid a useless  project
Twitter helped me and you. So i can help you build that wall.
Twitter helped me and you. So i can help you build that wall.
Be good president. .mercy. .the money not the important thing in life
Stand strong Mr. President, we are behind you and the other snowflakes just want more votes.  Has anyone checked into Calif's laws for collecting votes yet?
Declassify everything on the Democrooks it’s time to hang them high!
Decker---That's total BS!
Funny that, of all the news organizations and all the polls  only Fox shows a majority for the wall. Then again Fox leads all other organizations in retractions.
Funny that, of all the news organizations and all the polls  only Fox shows a majority for the wall. Then again Fox leads all other organizations in retractions.
Hi, Dan! https://www.facebook.com/photo.php?fbid=1967719046596858&set=a.106243116077803&type=3&theater
Correction... fools and Anti-American traitors.
Correction... fools and Anti-American traitors.
Jill Travassos... wrong! The Shitstain in the White House now is the fake. He is a disgrace to the Office, and only fools support him.
Jill Travassos... wrong! The Shitstain in the White House now is the fake. He is a disgrace to the Office, and only fools support him.
FAKE PRES LEFT TWO YEARS AGO SON ... BLESS YOUR HEART. YOU REALLY NEED TO GET OUT MORE. ;)
More delusional bullshit from the fake president
More delusional bullshit from the fake president
Build that damn wall, long and tall !!!
Keep working for the true Americans! Thank you Mr. President Trump
I'm watching you tonight, Mr President!
Build four walls.  Small ones.  One on each side of you and I'll pay for it myself.
We support you right here in Northeast Texas Mr President! God Bless!
Don't play the blame card,Stop it.      I'm not employed,thank you.     Accept a phase in up to that amount,you expect to be re-elected right?    No concern for the bugget,nor the payments to our troops .      Demanding will not work well for you in the long run,if you want to be re-elected to see it come about.
Go for it president trump we’re behind you.
Perhaps the answer is to stop funding these countries and buy them so we can really improve their conditions.
We are giving one more penny to another country till our government takes care of ours! Pelosi Schumer your time is up!
Mr President: how do we the American People vote to have the Voted Officials Congressman and congresswomen receive the same Medical Benefits, OBAMA Care, for their health insurance.  They deserve to have all the benefits they voted for the rest of America.  We would not want them to miss out on the experience and the cost increases they have in storage for everyone else!
You did the right thing President Trump. You had to do a state of the Union because you are in this IMMIGRATION battle alone outside of all support base that's in every state in the USA.  I'm sick of the democrats, unelected big money donors, and the media dementing & rottening minds AND destroying the fabric of this country.
Stay strong President Trump!  We want border security!
Great job, Mr. President! We love and support you because you love and support all Americans. Stay strong. You are in office by the grace of God.
Thank you Mr. president for bring up, Marilyn Pharis in the central coast Santa Maria, Ca.  Marilyn Pharis death was so terrible, ruthless and painful for her not the people who did this, they get 2 trials with interpreters and 25 years for taking a beautiful life from us.
SECURITY YES WALL NO ..........AND YOUR PROMISE WAS THAT MEXICO WOULD PAY
Stand strong.  We support you Mr. President.
During your campaign you said you were a negotiator and would work with both parties. In case you are unaware, negotiating is all about give and take. However, it is becoming clear that you are not able to work well with others and are nothing more than another politician dividing the country by political affiliation. Enough is enough with this government shut down! You are acting like a two year old who didn’t get his way. Meanwhile, there are American families who are wondering how they going to pay their bills and feed their children. Unfortunatlely, not all of us a rich like you Mr. Trump!
Anyone remember the “Secure Fences Act?”  What has changed, hmmm.
Everyone wants border security. What they don’t want is an ineffective expensive wall just to boast your ego and one that you convinced your “sheep”, Mexico would pay for.
That right ! Stop giving are jobs to them . We would have more jobs to the people over in America that need job's . American are struggling enough . With out them coming over here and take the jobs that we need . They shot us if we came in there country !
I would like the wall to be done . Please stop the lying and get your facts right, I am starting to think otherwise on a candidate for 2020
Don’t give in.  Keep it closed.  Build the barrier
what is sad, our government stops the wall, wanting to spend the money on donations to other countries. the money comes from the taxes. take care of us first.
Democrats wanted it until Trump took office.
it must be nice to work for the gov , having a nice vacation.
Yes build the Wall build the Wall the America people are with you
We all know the answer to this.
Easy one! They are against you even if it hurts us. They only care about how things impact them politically. They couldn’t care less about Americans.
I voted for you because you said you were going to take care of business.  TAKE CARE OF BUSINESS.
Everyone is for border security Crazy Donnie.   How is money to  be spent. No blank check.
We want border security. Term limits for Congress and Senate!!!!!!! Lets go....
Amazing how some people have decided the greatest threat to our sovereignty and safety are hungry, dehydrated, exhausted families with nothing but the clothes they are wearing. But mass shootings, domestic terrorism and Russian election interference are totally fine...
So secure the border, but a wall ain't it. Stop holding America hostage for your wall, and open the govt.
Peter says the president and the other two members of Congress shall be put into a room and no one comes out until an agreement is made
Shud have ashamed to promote cowardly criminal Tricky Trump
Mister president please build your wall
It’s a cost vs benefit issue. Wall will be a wasteful boondoggle.
Yes, build the wall! We need it!! MAGA!!! Thank you President Trump 2020!!!!
Hold your ground until it is done!
Stay strong Mr President your wall will be built in Jesus name!!!!!!
Stay strong Mr President your wall will be built in Jesus name!!!!!!
I'll bet every Democrat has a fence around their homes, such hypocrits.
Steve Demarb OK, here's your compromise and solution. Have the 1.8 million DACA aka *dreamers* pay 5k each for US Citizenship. Wall gets funded, DACA's become citizens and best part? Mexican's funded the wall! (Mic drop!)
For the ones who's argument is trump said Mexico will pay for the wall don't forget you can keep your doctor you can keep your coverage
Bill Champion -respectfully, note that you chose the word I used- “short-sighted”...and that is def not true of those who support our President (which was the point I was making when I used the word first).  People were hugely concerned with the direction that Obama was taking our country and certain that it would get much worse with Hillary. Mexico will pay for the wall with change to the burden we see from that country if Dems will stop obstructing progress.  I don’t recall anyone saying we would negotiate with their President for a fund. I cannot fathom how people are so naive, blind, or brainwashed to not see the changes we need for U.S. security and welfare.  We must enforce law and    do what we can to keep our border from being breached.  Do we help others?  Sure...what is the best solution?  All people of the world matter...not just those who try to enter illegally.  Countries need to work to improve their standard of living..the U.S. cannot house the world.  Additionally, we have the right to guard against harm. I am amused at Trump’s character attack.  Surely, you know that the “trained politicians” who have served are no better.  Trump was in the entertainment industry before politics...so far there is no evidence of the disgusting behavior known by Clinton, JFK, etc. while serving as POTUS. Trump is not a trained, polished politician.   Many appreciate that he is not just that smooth talking image used by a political machine.  Many appreciate the fact that he has actual knowledge, skill, and success needed to bring good change...not just a do nothing career politician.  Is he perfect..no, but he was the best choice at the time.  He has proven to be capable of leading toward good change -especially if Dems would support this country and stop obstructing progress. Those who support the Dems socialist, NWO agenda are the short-sighted and misguided base.
Vickie Jarrett Cartledge I changed my sentence above from "crazed base" to "short-sighted" base. I was addressing his crazed base, the ones that "ignore" the fact Trump said multiple times that Mexico "will pay" for the border wall. He ran for President on that platform. I will wait for the President of Mexico to say they will pay for the wall. Now, as for as not nice to mention Trumps "crazed base", its interesting his base is OK with his life-long disgusting or "unflattering" comments and actions, many of those targeting women. We deserve better.
Bill Champion ...not nice to call his base crazed...there are many people who feel the Dems are crazed...but we are all entitled to an opinion. Anyway, don’t underestimate or be short-sighted - Mexico could pay in time due to changes.  It looks like the Dems will continue to obstruct.  Amazing that the President has managed to improve the economy.  Many are thankful for the change from Obama’s NWO direction and the fact that Hillary is not POTUS.
For Trump to fulfill his campaign promise, Mexico has to pay for the wall! Trump guaranteed "MEXICO" will pay for the wall!!! He should run for President in 2020 and tell his short-sighted base that they will be paying for the wall. The Trumpster Wall is a diversion to keep Mueller's investigation off Fox News.
President Trump if you feel the need to declare a state of emergency to get your money to provide security for this country because the Democrats just don't like you do what you have to do.
NO I do not want it, it is immoral and you would do better to revise the current immigration system, which by the way has allowed terrorist to fester in this country legally.
Thank you Mr. President for all you do for our country . Build the wall !
Haven't you already had 2 years to build this wall?
Build that wall!!!! I support our president ..
Build that wall!!!! I support our president ..
Build the wall! We are behind you President Trump! #buildthewall
Suppose to be drug people
Janet Williams that's what I said too and the senate. There the ones stopping this, it's not the rest of us. Get the prisoners to help build the wall, like the frigid people
why don't you shut congress down and not pay them-then I would think they would come and build your wall
why don't you shut congress down and not pay them-then I would think they would come and build your wall
I stand with you, Mr. President. Thank you for trying to take care of US.
It’s important for the Democrats to 🛑 you Mr. President from fulfilling your promises so that when it’s time for re-election, Democrats can through it in your face and the rest of the USA 🇺🇸! Democrats will say, “He didn’t keep his promises!” Those that elected you know the TRUTH and will continue to support you President Donald J. Trump!
YES! Stay the course Mr. President! We are behind you!
your promise was build the wall mr gorbachev and have mexico foot the tab, the way I heard it, just sayin.
Mr president  I am 72 years old and in my  opinion you are the best president in my life time  and I have your  back build the wall
Unfortunately stopping you from for filling your promises is  more important to them then national security..go president trump 2020
I support you do the job we elected you to do dont allow them to bully you or try to tear you down, continue to stand your ground America supports you!!@
Go fund me page to build the wall 330,000 people have donated 19,000,000 dollars in 23 days
Ruth, you are 100% correct! AND the people DID vote.... for Trump!
Linda Acree I doubt that but that is the American way
Ruth Alford My guess is you'd be out voted 2 to 1 at least!
Ruth Alford My guess is you'd be out voted 2 to 1 at least!
Put it to a physical vote I'm erican and don't want the wall. People should have the right to vote
Like you worked with them for the last two years? Calling them obstructionists and evil!???  Don’t expect too much from us now that you need us.
we need to call Pelosi (202)225-4965 and Chuck (202)224-6542 and leave a message "Build The Wall". We work hard for our money,first they didn't vote to give us the tax reduction and, the money they have of ours, they are wanting to help other countries with...we don't work so they can use our money to work against America!
Waiting on that health care and cleaning of the swamp still or the denuking of North Korea
Waiting on that health care and cleaning of the swamp still or the denuking of North Korea
"4000 terrorist attempted to cross the southern border". Trumps latest lie.
"4000 terrorist attempted to cross the southern border". Trumps latest lie.
They want the baby cut in half.
Put our military all around the 50 states and no one comes in and if you leave do not try to return.
let him build it we can always knock it down later. much later.
Greg Merz Why don't you F*ck off asshole.
Phil N Pam Baker my my, wouldn't your ignorant self just make a fine dictator?
Phil N Pam Baker my my, wouldn't your ignorant self just make a fine dictator?
Do not give in to the whining ignorant bastards!! They need put in their place, once and for all!! This has gone way beyond ridiculous!!! 😡😡😡😡
Do not give in to the whining ignorant bastards!! They need put in their place, once and for all!! This has gone way beyond ridiculous!!! 😡😡😡😡
I dont see why not put guard towers every so far from each other along the boarder staff up to. 25+ .  per tower
And we’ve paid for it 10 ways from Sunday multiple times over!  It will be good to finally have the darn thing done!
Mr. Trump, Please ask the Democrats if they even care about their kids, grandkids or great grandkids. Because America is going to be a terrible place for them to grow up in. I am scared for my kids.
I am 100 percent behind you President Trump!!
Just tell the Dims that you are building a northern border wall for Mexico.
Build the wall Mr.President.We stand behind you.
Build the wall Mr.President.We stand behind you.
Build the Wall Mr.President you have my support!🇺🇸
It is no longer a wall, he wants a picket fence made of steel.
Great job Mr. President.  The Schumer and Pelosi response makes clear they do not care about our security only obstruction. Stand your ground! # MAGA #MY PRESIDENT!
Brent Congdon if the shutdown continues it could mean no wic programs for babies, no paychecks for the real disabled folks, no I.R.S. checks that I paid into the system all year, and possibly eventually could affect social security checks just to name a few. And most folks on social security are on fixed incomes.
Brent Congdon if the shutdown continues it could mean no wic programs for babies, no paychecks for the real disabled folks, no I.R.S. checks that I paid into the system all year, and possibly eventually could affect social security checks just to name a few. And most folks on social security are on fixed incomes.
Not opposed to building the wall but part of your promise was that Mexico would pay for it. Who will pay for it?? Us the poor. And if this shutdown continues it only hurts the poor more and more. I'm on the fence with this since you Mr. President have changed your game and plans so many times.
Not opposed to building the wall but part of your promise was that Mexico would pay for it. Who will pay for it?? Us the poor. And if this shutdown continues it only hurts the poor more and more. I'm on the fence with this since you Mr. President have changed your game and plans so many times.
Show clip when they voted for the border should be secured!
The promise was Mexico was going to pay for it not us. I'm all for it, but your not fulfilling the promise.
Donald.Fund the wall with El Chapos ill gotten $$$
Donald.Fund the wall with El Chapos ill gotten $$$
If this is such a crisis, why didn't you and the Republican controlled Congress fund it last year?
Only people will not get pay checks an they will not vote for you if you do not end this
Only people will not get pay checks an they will not vote for you if you do not end this
Please post your security plan so Americans can read it. Then we can decided if we call our elected representative s
Pinocchio continues with the hate mongering and hate.
Take the money from all the wasteful govt programs to pay for the wall. The illegals are flooding into Arizona where I live. Plus some how they're getting medical benefits when they shouldn't.
Need to cut the Pay for Congressmen, Governors Everyone in Government until they Actually DO Their JOBS.  Use their pay to Build "The Wall".
Yes we do wants border security!!!
Well done speech just now  Mr.president Donald Trump 👍👍👍👏👏👏🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸 God bless you🙏🙏🙏Me and my Family agree with you 100℅ on  that wall  and everything else you do .We are Proud of you
Mr. President why can we the people of America vote on the wall instead of putting up with the stupid Democrats.
Mr. President why can we the people of America vote on the wall instead of putting up with the stupid Democrats.
Build the wall president  Trump
We haven't had a wall for over 200 years, during which time we've won two world wars, a cold war, and took over the entire planet. Why do we need a wall now?
Don't be  a fool  walls only creates  enemies  be smart and don't talk So much garbage  were tired  of hearing you  trying to brainwash  our people  Americans wake up  before is too late
Build that wall and make it tall then DEPORT THEM ALL !!!!!!
YOU ARE NOT GETTING A FUCKING WALL. PERIOD.
I am from Canada , you should see the FOOL we have for a PM if we had Trump Canada would be great again
Who’s going to pay for the wall?
A wall will not stop people from crossing our border. It may add a slight hindrance but that’s about it.
They care more about destroying you than securing the border. I'm praying for God's boldness and courage for you.
They care more about destroying you than securing the border. I'm praying for God's boldness and courage for you.
President Trump! Please go on hunger strike until the wall gets built, no matter how long it takes,  #TrumpHungerStrikeNow
It appears that the democrats are serving their own agendas and have forgotten their responsibilities as elected persons.
The only job Democrat’s want to do right now is obstruct your administration, they don’t know or care what it is they’re obstructing
I'm a furloughed employee. I say build the wall. I agree with you President Trump and will vote for u again. Your doing a great job for our country. God bless you and your family.
We got the money but law says government cannot money or tips
Have trump supporters pay for it if they want it so badly
HOW ABOUT HE OPEN UP A GO FUND ME FOR THE WALL!!!!
The white house has a fence but not the border
The Democrats  get on my last NERVES take it out of the pay they are not earning
the thing I want to know is why is it that the news said that more Citizens do not want the wall but I was not asked and none of my family was asked. I want the wall for the security of my family and friends. the border patrol can not stop everyone or everything from entering the us. the Democrats needs to stop being bull headed and compromise. I watched as they blamed Donald J. Trump. Stop blaming him for everything that goes wrong.
I want border security not just a wall across our entire border. Address the real issues with the system and Congress will work with you  It is time to compromise!
Secure the border, end illegal immigration once and for all.
The democrats aka Pelosi, Schuman most likely don’t want the Wall built, to keep the Drug Cartel and them wealthy. Remember in 2009, democrats under Obama, overturned the 1988 Ban on use of federal funds for needle-exchange program. Why do democrats want to encourage drug users to continue the deadly habits?
I agree with the wall but not the government shutdown will have a crisis here if it's not opened back up....
please president trump please build the wall!  you are using common sense!
Well Calvin Wright, I'm 75 years old and in 2 days I could figure out how to get over, under or through ANY FUCKING WALL the orange pig can build. And so could any half conscious human being.
Thank you President Trump.  God  Bless you.
Build the wall even if it  takes AMERICANS rushing the border with concrete blocks.....
#BUILDTHATWALL ... AMERICANS SUPPORT YOU.
Why don't you tell Pelosi and Schumer to kiss your a double s?
You are Always in my prayers  Mr. President.
Thank you President Trump for protecting America
I am for a beaded curtain will solve all the issues and can be fashionable at the same time
Declare a national crisis please protect the citizens of this country.  We know that they, Pelosi and Schumer, do not care about us.
Fox News (I use the term loosly) is full of bull, all surveys/polls I have seen the majority think the wall is not needed. The majority DO want border security, there are a number of options. Don't mix the two.
Do they really? How about an honest president?
Wasnt mexico paying for the wall? That was the promise.
Americans want safety and security! Yes!! We also want to live and thrive!!!! Survival and poverty are unfortunately the results of a corrupt system. Change that and your name will live on forever. Make America great!
President Trump the American people are with you. Democrats are a little slow.
Chuck Schumer Barack Obama Hillary Clinton Joe Biden Dianne Feinstein ALL voted to spend billions on a “Secure Fence” in 2006  Why are they opposed to one now!!!  🤔
Pelosi and Schumer had no problem sending $150billion in cash to Iran, but won’t spend $5billion to protect US citizens
Pelosi and Schumer had no problem sending $150billion in cash to Iran, but won’t spend $5billion to protect US citizens
Stand your ground call them up to the podium on live tv call them out ! But do not give in no wall no deal ! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Stand your ground call them up to the podium on live tv call them out ! But do not give in no wall no deal ! 🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
I say wait for the checks to come in from Mexico.🤔
Dan, It's B.O.R.D.E.R   Trump ball licker Crack me up.
You haven’t been paying attention have you?
Mexico is paying for it, via the updated Trade Agreement negotiated and signed by your President, Donald J. Trump!
Mexico is paying for it, via the updated Trade Agreement negotiated and signed by your President, Donald J. Trump!
Kristy Rodencal Goettl my vote for the wall counters yours so your vote doesn't count. Easy to make Mexico pay out a 10% tax on all money sent to Mexico each year, as well as quite given them tax payers money each year until the Boarder is controlled.
Kristy Rodencal Goettl my vote for the wall counters yours so your vote doesn't count. Easy to make Mexico pay out a 10% tax on all money sent to Mexico each year, as well as quite given them tax payers money each year until the Boarder is controlled.
Saige Turner yeh...research the Dems bill that funds other countries. At least keep our money here!
Joseph Siegel funny how no one mention this until he said it...but its not true...its not just free money....learn how this works before you run stupid crap from dumb ass trump
William Bieke everything you just said was wrong....learn about how that works before you listen to that idiot...go back to your coloring book
William Bieke some people are complete idiots and you can't argue with stupid
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin You keep saying the same stupid crap. You keep calling Trump a liar.... Should we go back to all the lies Obummer fed us??? "If you like your plac you can keep it".... Funny how your party was all for a wall before........... You all just hate not being in power and getting to shove your ideology down our throats.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin he’s better than all the other manure we’ve had in the last 20 years or so. And he’s doing it for free. So what the hell do you do.
Henk Adelbert Lapomarda Griffin he’s better than all the other manure we’ve had in the last 20 years or so. And he’s doing it for free. So what the hell do you do.
Mexico is paying for the wall. USMCA trade agreement. It's not enough to complete it. Unless you voted for Trump his campaign promises are of no concern to you. You're campaign promises are in Godzillary's book currently on sale in the bargin bin at barns and noble. Stop acting like Trump owes you anything. You wasted your vote on a 2 time loser.
Mexico is paying for the wall. USMCA trade agreement. It's not enough to complete it. Unless you voted for Trump his campaign promises are of no concern to you. You're campaign promises are in Godzillary's book currently on sale in the bargin bin at barns and noble. Stop acting like Trump owes you anything. You wasted your vote on a 2 time loser.
How many LIES will President Hoax be delivering in his FARCE delivered tonight from the headquarters of CENTRAL FAKE NEWS AGENCY operated out of the Oval Office???
President Hoax is a NATURAL BORN PATHOLOGICAL LIAR and the Biggest Fattest Hoax ever perpetuated on the American People!!!
Karen Henderson Typical liberal worries about a misspelling and turns to nastiness, because you cannot prove your point. Have a great day.
Susan Eidoen the ones that the groups are sending in are giving fake ss numbers, id,s and are able to vote as long as they vote dem giving a certain number to use so when they work they can file taxes. true facts. another group is coming in and told what to say. bless this country..
Arev Neerg your so wrong .you need to grow up. we need the wall. you don,t know whats going on in this country. .
Kristy Rodencal Goettl my vote counts, too. Build the wall.
Kristy Rodencal Goettl my vote counts, too. Build the wall.
Kristy Rodencal Goettl but you are in the minority
Kristy Rodencal Goettl but you are in the minority
Kristy Rodencal Goettl if we don’t fund the wall-once they get here we will be funding their welfare, food stamps and medical JS
Kristy Rodencal Goettl if we don’t fund the wall-once they get here we will be funding their welfare, food stamps and medical JS
Saige Turner You don't have a clue do you.  Those coming across the border and working are being paid in cash which they send home to their familys.  I've seen it happen many times.  They pay NO social security.  They don't even have legal Social Security cards.  Idiot!!!
Yay, finally an intelligent American !!!  My message to Donald Trump :   “Sure, border security !!! But that does not necessarily mean a 5 billion dollar wall !!! The Democrats also want border security ... but not the 5 billion dollar wall that you are proposing for border security !!! You need to learn how to negotiate and compromise !!! You are used to bullying until you get your own way !!! You have no respect or consideration for the other people with whom you are negotiating !!! You are 71 but you act like a child who hasn’t learned that he cannot always have his own way !!! You need to grow up !!! I hope the Democrats don’t let you get away with your bullying ways so that you may learn how to be a mature individual !!! Otherwise you need to be removed from circulation because people like you are a menace and not worthy of living in society with other people ...”
Even having the money that has been confiscated doesn't automatically allocate it to that particular budget funding. It must still be approved by congress no matter where the money comes from. Doesn't haven't to be the specific taxpayer money, how much did Obama send Iran again? Oh yeah, it was billions as well of our taxpayer money. As a government employee household of 35 years I can assure you first hand the government wastes far more than that just in idle hand-wrenching and not making a decision? Why didn't they fix this crap when they had control for so many years exactly? Do you know? They don't want to for their own agenda's and now more than ever simply because of stupid blind hate of Trump for no real actual reason any worse than anything any other president has ever done in their lifetime. Kennedy was a womanizer if that's your beef and everyone knew it, but overlooked it. Character issues, let's don't trot out all of Bill's as we just don't have that much time left in this world now do we. Please, get an actual real reason to not want better border security, a better economy for all, left and right sides, beside the lame and whimpy "I just can't stand Trump" and would rather see our country go down in flames than agree with him. How very childish.
Lies, lies, lies.  As a citizen of the United States, my vote counts!  I am not in support of the wall.  There are other ways to secure our southern border.  You said that Mexico would pay for it and now you're asking for the American people to fund it.  Go to Mexico and get your 5 billion.  Spend the taxpayers money on something that will work.
Lies, lies, lies.  As a citizen of the United States, my vote counts!  I am not in support of the wall.  There are other ways to secure our southern border.  You said that Mexico would pay for it and now you're asking for the American people to fund it.  Go to Mexico and get your 5 billion.  Spend the taxpayers money on something that will work.
We don't need to another 9/11! It's scary to think so many Americans have forgotten why we need protection!
We know it’s to fight you know matter what. They don’t care about Americans.
I agree build the wall it will help it will slow down illegal immigration and any immigrant that wants to take the proper action of obtaining there citizenship that's fine come on but build the wall
Keep it shut make them not take a paycheck
I understand Mr. President stated he expected Mexico to help pay for the wall and now there are those who say he flopped on a promise.  I wish those people would consider that Mexico is dealing with the caravan at this point.  This was an unforseen expense.  The wall will pay for itself.
We always with you....give a head mr president..godbless
Why is it always fox news?   If the majority of Americans want something,  more sources would say it
Here is what I would like to see: every federal employee whose pay you’re holding hostage to go on strike or walk out on their jobs.
We the people voted for this president and won! Build the wall
Absolute joke of a president...
Thank you Mr. President for all you are doing to help protect us.
We are turning against g each other because of our differing views about this wall....face it, this is gonna get worse. Already, the food stamp program will be short next month that and they have no funding for March. The Government t workers most likely are having to rely on family to help make their car and house payments. I don't know what the solution is, but we need to help our fellow Americans. The economy is gonna begin to slow. People other than Government  workers are gonna be without work due to this. People won't afford their wonderful government insurance premiums and won't be able to afford healthcare. I'm not saying the Wall is foolish. I support the Wall. But it's about to get rough America. For all of us.
Yes Americans want the wall and we love our President
Stopping you,hope they do not succeed,keep on keeping on
Stopping you,hope they do not succeed,keep on keeping on
Maybe we should all stop going to work and spending money untill they decide to vote yes for the wall haha
President Trump build the wall and if Pelozi or Schumer can get over it .I will say it didn't work lol
President Trump build the wall and if Pelozi or Schumer can get over it .I will say it didn't work lol
It seems to me,they r against him.everything is his fault.we need a solution,he is willing to look for one and their not.fighting him every turn.
It seems to me,they r against him.everything is his fault.we need a solution,he is willing to look for one and their not.fighting him every turn.
Chris Kirk walls work great ask prisoners
Chris Kirk walls work great ask prisoners
What’s so bad about a wall? I am really trying to see this from both sides, but I honestly cannot grasp opposing. Whatever the facts it won’t hurt? Spiteful anyone? 🥃
Hey Donald it's time to impeach your ass!
Shumer and Palozi should be ashamed of themselves. Did they forget they were for boarder control .  It's because they are the ones that can't have the power to execute the boarder wall. They are to arrogant to let someone else take care of the problem
Shumer and Palozi should be ashamed of themselves. Did they forget they were for boarder control .  It's because they are the ones that can't have the power to execute the boarder wall. They are to arrogant to let someone else take care of the problem
Why doesn't the same problem exist at the northern border of America?🤦‍♀️. And I  am so grateful and proud o four president.
Go for roll! We got your back! LOVE YOU PRESIDENT TRUMP!
Great address dont give in keep firm
Miss Trump stand your ground and show them who's got the bigger balls
Miss Trump stand your ground and show them who's got the bigger balls
Fantastic Oval Office Address!!! Behind You, my President, 100% !!!! Thank you, again.🇺🇸
Protect our United States of America!
I agree with hold congress pay checks and work to secure our borders. I don't  believe Trump is holding government workers hostage, it's congress.
the promise was mexico would pay for the wall. not us
Take away their pay and see what happens
Lining their pockets with the $54 billion that they “ want for foreign aide”. Riiggghhhhtttt. Can you SPECIAL INTEREST?!
If they don't want a wall what would they like.
We need a wall. You know it and so do many others. Just the typical democrat crip crap. And tell kellyanne Conway nice job yesterday. We may be related but I doubt it.
If the elephant and the donkey are fighting only the people of America suffer I thought it was America first and not the wall first
Just do what you promised the good people of America.
If you don’t want border security your house and property should always be open and available to all strangers, at your own personal cost.
Pablo Morales Wake up, Read,Be informed, don't keep living under a tree.
Neither A or B. How about impeachment?
No, we want medicare for all, good public schools, an affordable higher education and clean water. But thanks for checking.
They care more about stopping you. They’ve been trying to impeach you from the start.
Yes Mr President, please stand strong and build the wall. I want my children and my grandchildren to be safe from these terrorists. Also I'm praying for you and your family! God bless you.
Offer the Democrats a 3 year deal on the wall- if there is no noticeable positive changes, we’ll take it down.
Supplement the victims of the furlough
Stop building all these walls that they can climb over.
They stopped with Fake News, now they are telling the truth, already dictated in campaigns, it is now until 2020.
Pretty obvious that all democrats care about is "get Trump"!
Pretty obvious that all democrats care about is "get Trump"!
Do what it takes to build the wall. Protect our children
Do what it takes to build the wall. Protect our children
Also,  those  mass  killings,  Parkland,  columbine,  etc  were done  by  white  Americans!
Also,  those  mass  killings,  Parkland,  columbine,  etc  were done  by  white  Americans!
I want the government to quite thinking about power and money and there own pockets and do whats best for the people and work together to get this figured out. This is becoming rediculouse how democrats cant just come to a compromise.
You should be ashamed of yourself. I have no idea how you sleep at night. Pathetic to use fear to control. Shame.
Out of all the president's in my lifetime I would love to shake Trump's hand.
President Trump you are doing a great job,if the democrats would stop acting like kids I believe this could be a great country again
This kind of stuff leads to revolution asked the French.
Yea STUPIT Dems👿They don't care about us😤
When will you ppl wake up?! These elite bastards have less in common with you than the people you're trying to block off with the wall...
Let the people vote on it!!
Build a base, use service folks who can not find employment when discharged, drones, that gives employment and  guards the boarder. Just saying
Legalize cannabis and build a big wall with that revenue mr. President.
Or how about getting new Democrat votes?  Illegals tend to vote that way.
I vote to build the wall!   Not only for security but also the endless benefits we pay with our tax dollars to support the ILLEGALS for years and years.  We need to make laws to fight the Boarder crisis and make our Boarder laws effective, fix DACA, and to have laws made to secure Boarder that make sense. It’s  only common sense to fix the Southern Border. It’s time to do what is right for our American citizens!
Do not give in, build the wall, we stand with you.
American want security, it's right but is not the Wall the correct way. I'm Sorry President.
Top you Mr. President fulfilling another promises
The wall is to keep you in !
Don"t back down Mr.Trump! BUILD THE WALL!!! to keep our country safe!!
Mr President YOU're right  Build the wall that may save your country. Make America great again
Mr President YOU're right  Build the wall that may save your country. Make America great again
Canadian here... You have one hell of a great PRESIDENT!!!
Take the money from Foreign Aid! We spent $50B+ last year. Just cut that aid.
Why not show what’s happening at the border now live. Show people that are clueless how bad it is.  I’m all for the wall. We need more security as a country.
How about starting with a partial bill that just covers essential workers pay.  Do not want to take out a loan to pay bills.
Mr president I want a let’s make America great again hats
Dems would still oppose Trump no matter what, blind hate is such a useless thing.
Build the wall thank you Mr president.
Nobody has ever argued against border security!! The “wall”’ extending from coast to coast that you wanted Mexico to pay for is the problem!!
Stand strong Mr. President. We are with you 100 percent.
Did you forget the Mexico is paying for it ???!!!
Israel has walls and Heaven has walls and gates too
Most of America sees the idiocy represented by the democrats. They are signing their on demise as a party in Congress
Thank you for your hard work in office.  We are proud of you.  You build, we'll pray.
I believe your "promise" was mexico will pay for your monument to yourself. #SAD
President Trump...it's all about throwing a fit so you can't help out America. So very shameful.  Keep up the great job!
Can Mexico pay 50% of the total cost? Can Mexico support the funding to help their people in the US. Can their Embassy pay for all the cost to help their people?
The promise was that Mexico was going to pay for it. Why should our taxes pay for it now? As much as I would like to see you impeached, I would much rather see you indicted after your term in office.
Do you even need to ask? Lock them up for Sedition and get on with business. Simple.
Fund it with El Chapo funds? Is that feasible?
That's it, they will block everything you try. O didn't do a single thing that was good for the country, instead he ramrodded hurtful legislation, hurting our democracy too. Thanks for not being a baby like him.
Your promise was Mexico was going to pay for it
Obviously the former - since day one — EGO!!!!
The Democrats do not want to hear from you on anything you say!
The Democrats do not want to hear from you on anything you say!
Your promise was that the American people will not pay for yet I've been or of work for 3 weeks because of your huge ego and tiny prick.
Pay no attention to the negative comments from the false Americans they are democrats or foreigners who went back on their alegence to America
True Story !!!  The democrats are more interested in destroying you, than in what's in the best interests of our country !!!  I've never seen anything like it !!!  The democrats need to have their HEADS EXAMINED !!!
Speak the truth for once in your life and perhaps people will be willing to work with you.
My family is praying for you and your family, Mr. President.  Thank you for fighting for America and her citizens.  You will get 4 votes from my family in 2020.
Take Congress pay checks away they are paid to much and get benefits that our veterans need and deserve
I guess democrats are not American.
Kamala Harris calls the wall "a vanity project." For one to want national security at the border is now vanity in a country according to her. Americans just want immigrants to be like them, legal.
Sen Graham one of the few sane in that  congress!  Where are the  “Old West” guys  when we need them?
Your doing a great job mr president  You can't tie your shoes if your hands are tied behind your back.
We want real border security not a wall! Security that includes fully staffing and PAYING our border security officers and TSA officers!!
We all need border security but for the wall,I wanna reminded you MEXICO 🇲🇽 WILL PAY IT‼️
Build the wall using taxpayers money! I gladly and willing support that expense! Thank you for standing up for the American people! Stay strong!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Build the wall using taxpayers money! I gladly and willing support that expense! Thank you for standing up for the American people! Stay strong!🇺🇸🇺🇸🇺🇸
Let the fun begin!!!! - Just a starter kit.... (*Show & Tell*), https://www.imdb.com/name/nm1136942/
Canadian's want the wall at the border too!
So.tell them to build the wall with their own hands
Stand strong for us! Build the wall!
Build the wall President Trump....America needs this!!! Our dear friend was hit and killed by a drunk, illegal immigrant!!!!
That is exactly why you won the election by far
God bless you in all your doing for us, God's will be done, stay strong  in the Lord President Trump's, May God continue to protect you and all your family 🙏
Noone knows they have the armor of God on them.  Ramona Jeannine
Your doing a awesome job mr president!! You stand for what America stands for! Keep standing strong and they will fold in time
venezuela needs help I ask on behalf of all Venezuelans who act to help children and Venezuelans with this economic crisis we do not want to mature in this country I really ask from my heart to help us
Build the wall mr president..we are behind you..it is now or never...we will help you..just tell us what you need...praying for you every day.
Loved your speech tonight!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Linda in San Diego
Build and Secure....Do Not Back Down....shut down the house and with hold their checks
Build and Secure....Do Not Back Down....shut down the house and with hold their checks
It's Patriotism vs. Globalism and THE WALL...will all but end Globalism and it's open borders...too!
We should also build a wall between Mexico and south America since the use Mexico as away into the us I bet half the people or majority the border patrol catches are from South America.
Clearly stopping President Trump based on tonight’s broadcast!  Build the fence, protect America!  The Experts want it, listen to them. 🇺🇸 🇺🇸 USA
There not promises there pipe dreams
we need the wall i just dont see why we are so divided as a country
Just get Gov employees back to work, please. I support wall but not at Gov employees price
With family and close friends in law enforcement, whom I care about,  the question is why are we putting up with dying out here for sanctuary laws?  What are we really arguing about here?
I am a Settler, Not a Refugee? Not an immigrant. irony Hello Aboriginal Red Indians.
Sir Who doesn't want border security, The budget and personnel are in place and under your command.
I lost relative's already. Build the dam wall before I come down there and make the brick for you all.
My president Democrats think about company with Islamic terrorist group , like rejim in Iran , Democrats don’t care about ppl,
My president Democrats think about company with Islamic terrorist group , like rejim in Iran , Democrats don’t care about ppl,
I think its time America started making pennies out of steel again ;)
The only problem I see with the wall is making the American people pay for it why not just raise taxes on Mexican Imports since every car in America comes from there anyway maybe use that money to pay for the wall and you should paint the Mexican side camouflage so they can't see it to climb over
Why is “Getting rid of Trump” not one of the choices?  That’s what America wants.
Over power and over rule you don't need them it is a national emergency that's been going on for to long. I'm tired of giving these aliens our jobs and freebies. Go get um #Trump 2020
Can't wait to see what *cough* totally not fake news you're going to tell us.
YOU ARE RIGHTMR. PRESIDENT  WE WANT THE WALL. WE BACK YOU 100%
God bless USA with abundant blessing
Mr. President, We the People need you to declare war on the democrats and immigration. This way they those idiots that oppose you can then be charged with treason given their actions; Whoever, owing allegiance to the United States, levies war against them or adheres to their enemies, giving them aid and comfort within the United States or elsewhere, is guilty of treason and shall suffer death, or shall be imprisoned not less than five years and fined under this title but not less than $10,000; and ...
Secure our borders. Quite spending money helping foreign countries use the money for our security
Wait I thought Mexico  was paying for your wall?
Wait I thought Mexico  was paying for your wall?
We have to be with our president who want the best for us and our country do not get paid the congress no checks until they approve what you need for our protection .do what you have to do   you are the president of this country Donald Trump
Their power security is more important than our border security  to them.
Dems are never going to become moral, responsible, ethical adults.
God bless you mr President Trump And God bless America
God bless you mr President Trump And God bless America
Build the wall - the sooner the better!!
Thank you Mr President.  Build the wall!
Wait a minute what about all the known ISIS terrorist camps that are in the United States across our country. Confirmed by the FBI. Mr. President Donald Trump when you gonna do something about that and all the jihadist terrorist in our country
What’s more important to you—fulfilling a very bad promise, very weak solution, or doing the right thing for America?
Stand firm, Mr. President! We are behind you!
Build the wall with cartel money. Use all the drug money coming over the boarder. El Chap had money. Use it to build the wall!!!
Proposal of Nation wide fence ban at next meeting! Start with government buildings and elected officials homes🐂💩
Congress should give up their visiting protocols, security cameras, guards and chauffeurs and then say a word about the WALL...War Against Lies and Liens
Why Mexico is not paying as per your promise Mr President?
Why Mexico is not paying as per your promise Mr President?
Since we are giving Mexico Federal Aid money, can we ask them to build a wall on their side of the border with the money we give them? It would also create jobs there...
Build a wall on your northern border.
Protect the border build that wall protect America it's the only way to stop the illegals from getting in.
Take away the democrats security guards, and see how they feel. BUILD THE WALL SECURE OUR BORDERS
The internet polls I've seen reflect support for the wall by over 80 %.
Ur doing a good job mr trump keep up the work
The people did not elect Donny as President. He won the Electoral College not the popular votes.
The people did not elect Donny as President. He won the Electoral College not the popular votes.
We Want Border Security!!!! Every Nation should have borders!!!  We stand with you Mr. President!!! El Chap was arrested, use the money he had and all drug money caught coming across the border!  That way Mexico does pay for the wall! Or Tax all remittance leaving the country! We want the wall!!
Why did Democrats get time after your speech? So wrong. Schumer has been in office since ‘81 and Pelosi since ‘87. All they do is get rich. They self serve rather than sacrificially serve. They were undeserving of equal time. They’ve had nothing but time!
If they ain't funding it, the public will...
Yes Mr. President  We want the wall
seriously. That is a negotiating tactic with Mexico. It is cost effective and will pay for itself with less people to process.
It's all about prevent Trump from succeeding. They refuse to even negotiate or offer alternate ideas for border security. But Trump is acting like a child and solely to blame for the shutdown... Dumbocrats!
behind  you president Trump stand strong praying for you
If amricans need wall but human need humanity don't be ra***
democrat's vote for wall when they knew it wouldn't be built. But they know Trump will build it and that's the facts.
Do not cave---I called all of our congressmen today. Did You??? please call your's and let them know to stand with the President
If you need an experienced Project Mananger reach out
As long as Mr. Trump works in prayer, I am sure that if it's in God's line and God had planned that it would be, surely,the wall will be built. May God's will be done.  I am praying for him(President.)  May God bless the USA🇺🇸
Go ahead, Mr. President, and build the wall...We're behind you 100% AND WILL STAY BEHIND YOU, no matter what the Dems do!!!
Proverbs 16:6 King James Version (KJV)  6 By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the Lord men depart from evil.
We really need to build the wall in the border.
Border security and a wall are two different things. We don't need your wall!
Border security and a wall are two different things. We don't need your wall!
Build that wall! Behind you in Indiana 100 percent!!!!
We support you Mr. President. Declare the state of emergency and let's get the wall done.
Build it. I gave money to the go fund me, use it all.
Build it. I gave money to the go fund me, use it all.
Stand your ground. We need border security
If Democrats would work with President Trump, they would gain a lot of respect.....
Stay strong Mr. President! You have my support!
President Trump we need border security, thank you for sticking to your promises.
Here's a thought. Imagine you live in a new place. Imagine how beautiful your life is you have wonderful neighbors. The birds are chirping the sun is shinning. You go into your house and you find out on the news there has been a catastrophe. Now remember you live inside the wall. The president comes on and says he will implement Marshall law. Now depending on what the situation you may be required to stay in your home. If you try to go out lethal forced my be used. Now you have rights but at this time you are under marshal law. You have no food and your water has stopped. You can't go out to find out what is wrong or ask for help. 911 is off and the president is only telling you what you want to hear about the situation. Your children need food water and medical and you are confined to your home. Oh and for fun we will take away the right to bare arms also. You go out to get help because you have no other choice, you need help for you and your loved ones, you are killed or better yet taken into custody. Or you want to leave the U.S. because everyone is sick or you don't even know what is going on. Now after that thought I have to ask myself which side of the wall do I want to be on? I know its frustrating wanting to keep people out but I don't see people wondering about the possibility of having to stay inside the wall. Look up the definition of a reservation check your history fact before you decide if you want to live on a reservation too.
Just like drill baby drill impacted oil prices, build baby build.
We the American majority want our borders secured and will hold in blame to every democrook who stands in the way of the building of the wall when American blood is spilled. It is no different from when a drunk driver kills an innocent person and is charged with manslaughter. Every democrook who stands in the way of the building of the wall and the security of the southern border will result in catastrophy and are therefore just as cupable in the downfall of this nation.
We the American majority want our borders secured and will hold in blame to every democrook who stands in the way of the building of the wall when American blood is spilled. It is no different from when a drunk driver kills an innocent person and is charged with manslaughter. Every democrook who stands in the way of the building of the wall and the security of the southern border will result in catastrophy and are therefore just as cupable in the downfall of this nation.
Build the wall!! Stay strong Mr. President Trump!!!! Thank u for standing up for us Americans!!! The Democrats are terrorists!! They dont care about Americans at all!
Democrats don't represent America anymore. It's a shame they have leadership roles in our country that they don't care about.
Democrats don't represent America anymore. It's a shame they have leadership roles in our country that they don't care about.
President Trump after building the wall  that I know you will, please send the Democrats to the eye center we can pay for that too.
Yes! Americans wants borders security and flushing down the swamp in D.C., make it happen Mr.President.
Build the wall  GOD BLESS AMERICA  BLESS YOU Mr President
Democrats are really showing their support for Americans voices! Americans have donated their own money to get this built so no government spending could happen. And yet, they still dont want to help secure our Nation... whats wrong with this picture and how is this being allowed to happen?? If you ask me . . We dont need democrats running anything anymore!
Democrats are really showing their support for Americans voices! Americans have donated their own money to get this built so no government spending could happen. And yet, they still dont want to help secure our Nation... whats wrong with this picture and how is this being allowed to happen?? If you ask me . . We dont need democrats running anything anymore!
Border security? Ok. tRump wall?  No way!  Waste of money.
That’s means some of thous lazy fat people before will start working in strawberry fields ,good job Don  I like that !
Build the wall. We desperately need it. I and  most Americans want   the wall. Only " Dufus  Democrats" are opposed to the wall.
Build the wall. We desperately need it. I and  most Americans want   the wall. Only " Dufus  Democrats" are opposed to the wall.
It doesnt matter if your wall is of iron or concret, while you continue supporting coruption governments in some countries of C. A. Especially Honduras the people will continue leaving their countries. All the walls have been fallen.
WE ALL NEED TO CALL OUR CONGRESSMAN!!!! They work for us remember? Tell them to BUILD THE WALL!!!
BUILD THAT WALL...Mr President.
Obviously stopping President trump.  Their hate is palpable.
When will the democrats start working for the american people who put them in office? All they think about is there pay check. Wake up and start working with our pŕesident and for the american people!!
Sir if that wall isn't built. Myself as well as many many others like me will become that wall
Declare Marshal Law! They can’t stop you!
Build the wall and drain the swamp !!
Supporting President Trump all the way.....Mr President build that wall!!!!
No we dont, we want the Gov open and working. I could care less about people coming here, I say welcome all.
Build the wall Mr President. Stand your ground, we stand with you.
Build the wall Mr President. Stand your ground, we stand with you.
Trump we love you! And we are cheering u on! They are all just pissed cuz you will make things the right way in America and jealous because they couldn’t do what u do!!!!!
American’s want Border Security and a Wall and obstructionist Democrats and Socialists want Open Borders. Dems don’t want Border security.
English please
WHAT ???
Nancy Rasner Duggan God long Red month than this Felon is History
President Trump ! Take charge ! You know what we all want, so please do this ! Thank you, I respect you so much ! Thank you !
We r behind u 100:/ luv u praying always! Build that wall....
Listen to Barack Obama speach and proposal of 2014 that was not supported, it is awesome.
Build the wall Mr President! We stand with you !
Keep up the great work President Trump!!!  We voted for this wall and you!!!
all this garb with the democrats has given me an extreme insight. (((((((((GO PRESIDENT TRUMP)))))))))))))))
I think you should finish your promise to drain the swamp first. Drain the swamp in all states. Then you won’t have any resistance.
Stand firm sir, we must have the Wall.
They just wanna go opposite what ever Republicans wants. Even knowing that will hurt American citizens, I am so confused. Why they have to do this ?
